knowledge1: Jessie Willcox Smith // Jessie Willcox Smith Jessie Willcox Smith (September 6, 1863 – May 3, 1935) was an American female illustrator during the Golden Age of American illustration. She was considered "one of the greatest pure illustrators". She was a contributor to books and magazines during the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Smith illustrated stories and articles for clients such as "Century", "Collier's", "Leslie's Weekly", "Harper's", "McClure's", "Scribners", and the "Ladies' Home Journal". She had an ongoing relationship with "Good Housekeeping", which included the long-running Mother Goose series of illustrations and also the creation of all of the "Good Housekeeping" covers from [sep] knowledge2: Jessie Mae Brown Beavers: Jessie Mae Brown Beavers (March 18, 1923 – September 6, 1989) was an American journalist based in Los Angeles, California. She was an editor at the Los Angeles Sentinel from 1949 to 1989, and served sixteen years on the city's Human Relations Commission, beginning with her 1973 appointment by mayor Tom Bradley. ; Jessie Mae Brown Beavers: Jessie Mae Brown was born in Los Angeles, the daughter of Arnetta Hoyt Brown, a Baptist deaconess. She attended the University of California, Los Angeles,[1] where she earned a bachelor's degree in sociology.[2] ; Jessie Mae Brown Beavers: Brown was editor of the family section of the California Eagle from 1944 to 1949, when she joined the staff of the Los Angeles Sentinel as an editor.[3] In 1966 she was one of the organizers and leaders of the Los Angeles chapter of the National Association of Media Women.[4][5] In 1969, she was given the Outstanding Woman in Journalism Award by the University of Southern California chapter of Theta Sigma Phi.[6] ; Jessie Mae Brown Beavers: Beavers served on the Los Angeles Human Relations Commission for sixteen years, after she was appointed by mayor Tom Bradley in 1973.[7][8]  On the commission, she worked closely with fellow commissioner Toshiko S. Yoshida during the American bicentennial,[9] chaired the affirmative action subcommittee, and in 1982 organized hearings on racial bias in the entertainment industry.[10][11] She also served one the Los Angeles County Music and Performing Arts Commission.[12] She ran for a seat on the Los Angeles City Council in 1987.[13][14] ; Jessie Mae Brown Beavers: Beavers was a member of Jack and Jill and the Lullaby Guild.[15] In 1968 she was cited for her work by the President's Youth Council.[16] In 1972 she was honored alongside Quincy Jones, editor Ruth Washington, and student leader Willis Edwards by the Committee of Women for Good Government.[17] In 1973 she was honored by colleagues and admirers (including Mayor Bradley, judge Vaino Spencer, columnist Gertrude Gipson, and clubwoman Leontyne Butler King) at a tribute event at the Beverly Wilshire Hotel, hosted by singer Thelma Houston.[18]
knowledge1: Billy Conigliaro // Billy Conigliaro William Michael Conigliaro (born August 15, 1947 in Revere, Massachusetts) is a former Major League Baseball outfielder who played in the American League for the Boston Red Sox (1969–1971), Milwaukee Brewers (1972) and Oakland Athletics (1973). He is the younger brother of Tony Conigliaro; Billy and Tony were Red Sox teammates in 1969 and 1970. Conigliaro showed great promise as a hitter in his years in Boston, with 16 doubles and 18 home runs in 1970, and 26 doubles and 11 home runs in 1971. He finished 8th in the American League in doubles in 1971, his most; Billy Conigliaro // Triple A affiliate on what was to be a "temporary" basis. He was an early pupil of Shotokan karate grandmaster, Kazumi Tabata, who acknowledges him in his book. Billy Conigliaro William Michael Conigliaro (born August 15, 1947 in Revere, Massachusetts) is a former Major League Baseball outfielder who played in the American League for the Boston Red Sox (1969–1971), Milwaukee Brewers (1972) and Oakland Athletics (1973). He is the younger brother of Tony Conigliaro; Billy and Tony were Red Sox teammates in 1969 and 1970. Conigliaro showed great promise as a hitter in his years in Boston, with 16 doubles; Billy Conigliaro // home runs during the 1970 season after his famous "beaning" incident in 1967. Unhappy in Milwaukee, he announced his retirement from baseball in the middle of the 1972 season. He came back to baseball in 1973 as a part-time player with the eventual World Champion Athletics, making brief appearances in the American League Championship Series and the World Series. Once again Billy became disgruntled with ownership — this time in Oakland — and retired at the conclusion of that season. He attempted a comeback with the A's several years later, but ultimately retired for good after being assigned to their; Billy Conigliaro // productive year in the majors. In 1970, he was 10th in American League in being hit by pitches with 7. His most memorable game may have been on July 4, 1970, when both Billy and Tony homered against the Cleveland Indians. After the 1971 season, Billy was traded from the Red Sox to the Brewers in a blockbuster deal that also included Ken Brett, Jim Lonborg, George Scott, Tommy Harper and Marty Pattin. Billy, who idolized his older brother Tony, had been highly critical of the Red Sox for trading his brother to the Angels, especially after Tony's remarkable 36; Tony Conigliaro // Providence, Rhode Island as a sports anchor; in August 1976, he moved to a similar position at KGO-TV Channel 7 in San Francisco. On January 9, 1982, Conigliaro, in Boston to interview for a broadcasting position, suffered a heart attack while being driven to the airport by his brother Billy. Shortly thereafter, he suffered a stroke and lapsed into a coma. Conigliaro remained in a vegetative state until his death more than eight years later, in February 1990, at the age of 45. In commemoration, the Red Sox wore black armbands that season. He is buried in Holy Cross Cemetery [sep] knowledge2: Billy Conigliaro: William Michael Conigliaro (August 15, 1947 – February 10, 2021) was an American baseball outfielder who played five seasons in Major League Baseball (MLB).  He played for the Boston Red Sox, Milwaukee Brewers, and Oakland Athletics from 1969 to 1973.  He batted and threw right-handed, and was the younger brother of Tony Conigliaro, with whom he was teammates on the Red Sox from 1969 until 1970. ; Billy Conigliaro: Conigliaro was born in Revere, Massachusetts, on August 15, 1947.[1]  His father, Sal, was employed at a tool and die shop and was eventually promoted to plant manager.  Both he and his wife, Teresa, inspired their sons to pursue baseball.[2]  Conigliaro attended Swampscott High School,[1] where he graduated as a three-sport star.  He threw a no-hitter against Winthrop High School in April 1964, several days after his brother Tony made his major league debut.[2]  Conigliaro was subsequently drafted by the Boston Red Sox in the first round (fifth overall pick) of the inaugural MLB draft in 1965.[1][3] ; Billy Conigliaro: Conigliaro played in the minor leagues from the 1965 to 1968 seasons.[4]  He made his Major League Baseball debut on April 11, 1969, at the age of 21,[1] entering as a pinch runner and stealing a base in a 2–1 extra-innings win over the Cleveland Indians.[5] He made his first start five days later, hitting two home runs in that game.[6]  Although he was sent back to the minors in May, he was called back up by the Red Sox during the September roster expansion.[2] He finished his first year in the majors with a .288 batting average, four home runs, and seven runs batted in (RBIs) in 32 games played.[1] ; Billy Conigliaro: Conigliaro's best performance came during the 1970 season.[7]  He recorded career-highs in hits (108), runs scored (59), home runs (18), RBIs (58), and games played (114).  He also had the fifth-most assists as a left fielder in the American League (AL) with seven.[1]  In order to fit Conigliaro into their lineup that year, the Red Sox moved Carl Yastrzemski to first base.[2][8]  Billy Conigliaro reportedly became "very emotional" when his brother Tony was traded to the California Angels at the end of the season.[8]  He subsequently batted .262 with 11 home runs and 33 RBIs in 1971, finishing eighth in the AL in doubles (26).[1] ; Billy Conigliaro: Conigliaro was part of a ten-player trade that sent him, George Scott, Jim Lonborg, Ken Brett, Joe Lahoud, and Don Pavletich from the Red Sox to the Milwaukee Brewers for Tommy Harper, Marty Pattin, Lew Krausse, and minor-league outfielder Pat Skrable on October 10, 1971.[9]
knowledge1: L.A. Lopez // and remains as an impassioned artist who wishes to : "Make a difference through his craft by the grace of God." L.A. Lopez Lyle Areanne Lopez (born June 1, 1985 in Quezon City) is a Filipino actor, singer and preacher. Formerly known as "L.A. Lopez"', he was "discovered" by the comedy king Dolphy Quizon in a talent search titled "That's My Boy". He began his career as a child actor on the children's show "Eh Kasi Bata". Garnered several Awit Awards as a child singer. He made a comeback in 2002 with the song "Yakap" which made it to the [sep] knowledge2: Joseph A. Lopez: Joseph Anton Lopez SJ (born José Antonio López; October 4, 1779 – October 5, 1841)[a] was a Mexican Catholic priest and Jesuit. Born in Michoacán, he studied canon law at the Colegio de San Nicolás and the Royal and Pontifical University of Mexico. He became acquainted with the future Empress consort Ana María Huarte and was made chaplain to the future imperial family. He was later put in charge of the education of all the princes in Mexico. Lopez was a close ally of Emperor Agustín de Iturbide, residing in Madrid for four years as his attorney and political informant, and accompanying him during his exile to Italy and England. ; Joseph A. Lopez: Following Iturbide's execution in 1824, Lopez moved to the United States with the exiled Empress Ana María and her children and settled in Washington, D.C. He became the chaplain to the Georgetown Visitation Monastery and entered the Society of Jesus in 1833, working also as a novice and minister at Georgetown College. When the president of Georgetown College, William McSherry, died, Lopez became acting president in 1840, making him the first Latin American president of a university in the United States. As an educator, he garnered a reputation as a strict disciplinarian. Just several months into his presidency, he fell ill and was sent to recuperate in St. Inigoes, Maryland; he died there in 1841. ; Joseph A. Lopez: López was incardinated as a priest in the Archdiocese of Baltimore[c] and became the chaplain to the Georgetown Visitation Monastery.[7] He began anglicizing his name as Joseph Anton Lopez.[12] Though already a priest, he sought admission to the Society of Jesus and was received on December 10, 1833.[13] As a Jesuit novice, he worked at Georgetown College during his formation,[14] eventually becoming minister of the college.[7] He also became the librarian of the college.[1] His work at Georgetown required him to relinquish his role as chaplain to the Iturbides, who eventually moved to Philadelphia.[15] ; Joseph A. Lopez: Following the death of William McSherry, Lopez was named president of Georgetown College on January 1, 1840,[3] in an acting capacity,[16] with the expectation that the provincial superior would soon appoint a permanent successor to relieve him of this post.[17] Upon his appointment, he became the first Latin American president of a university in the United States.[d][1] He was known as a strict disciplinarian, both of his students and all Jesuits under his charge.[17] One notable event during his tenure was the establishment of a literary society alongside the existing Philodemic Society, known as the Philonomosian Society, which replaced the Phileleutherian Society.[17] His presidency lasted just several months, before he became ill,[18] and was succeeded by James A. Ryder on May 1, 1840.[19] He returned to the position of minister only briefly,[17] before being sent to St. Inigoes, Maryland, to recuperate.[7] ; Joseph A. Lopez: A week before his death, the Jesuits tending to Lopez feared that a coffin would not be ready for him in time; upon learning this, Lopez told them not to worry because he would not die until Saturday. True to his prediction,[18] on October 5, 1841, he died in St. Inigoes, where he was buried in Chapel Field. Eventually, all the graves there were reinterred in the cemetery adjoining St. Ignatius Church in the same village.[20]
knowledge1: Patrick Merrill // Patrick Merrill Patrick Merrill (born February 22, 1979 in Montreal, Quebec) is a former Canadian professional lacrosse player for the Toronto Rock in the National Lacrosse League and of the Toronto Nationals in Major League Lacrosse. He is currently the Head Coach and General Manager of the San Diego Seals. Merrill was a first-round draft choice of the Toronto Rock in 2002, and after four seasons with the Rock, was chosen first overall by the Boston Blazers in the 2008 expansion draft. However, following the cancellation and subsequent reinstatement of the 2008 season, the Blazers, along with the Arizona Sting,; Patrick Merrill // announced that they would not participate in the 2008 season. A dispersal draft was held, and Merrill was chosen second overall by the Titans. Merrill's brother Brodie Merrill also plays in the NLL for the San Diego Seals. Reference: Patrick Merrill Patrick Merrill (born February 22, 1979 in Montreal, Quebec) is a former Canadian professional lacrosse player for the Toronto Rock in the National Lacrosse League and of the Toronto Nationals in Major League Lacrosse. He is currently the Head Coach and General Manager of the San Diego Seals. Merrill was a first-round draft choice of the Toronto Rock in [sep] knowledge2: Patrick Merrill: Patrick Merrill (born February 22, 1979) is a former Canadian professional lacrosse player for the Toronto Rock in the National Lacrosse League and of the Toronto Nationals in Major League Lacrosse. He is currently the Head Coach and General Manager of the San Diego Seals. ; Patrick Merrill: Merrill was a first-round draft choice of the Toronto Rock in 2002,[1] and after four seasons with the Rock, was chosen first overall by the Boston Blazers in the 2008 expansion draft.[2] However, following the cancellation and subsequent reinstatement of the 2008 season, the Blazers, along with the Arizona Sting, announced that they would not participate in the 2008 season.[3] A dispersal draft was held, and Merrill was chosen second overall by the Titans.[4] ; Patrick Merrill: Merrill's brother Brodie Merrill also plays in the NLL for the San Diego Seals. ; Patrick Merrill: Reference:[5] ; Patrick Merrill: GP–Games played; G–Goals; A–Assists; Pts–Points; LB–Loose balls; PIM–Penalty minutes; Pts/GP–Points per games played; LB/GP–Loose balls per games played; PIM/GP–Penalty minutes per games played.
knowledge1: Maxime Masson // Maxime Masson Maxime Masson (October 15, 1867 in Saint-Justin – October 2, 1960) was a Roman Catholic priest. He was the main architect of religious buildings in the town of Sainte-Thècle, located in Mauricie, in the province of Quebec. He was pastor of the Sainte-Thècle parish for 52 years. During that time, he was the main coordinator for the construction of the church from 1903 to 1905, as well as the rectory and other buildings on the lot of the "Fabrique de Sainte-Thècle". He was instrumental in the erection of the monastery ("couvent" in French) in 1912, led by the; Maxime Masson // the son of Amable Masson, farmer and Zoe Paquin. He studied classics at Séminaire Saint-Joseph de Trois-Rivières and theology at the Grand Seminary Trois-Rivières. He was ordained on July 8, 1894, in the chapel of the Seminary Trois-Rivières by Bishop L.F. Lafleche. At the beginning of his priesthood, Masson was vicar of the parish of Saint-Justin (1894–1899), at Saint-Léon-le-Grand (1902), at Saint-Timothée of Hérouxville (1902–1903), before being assigned as pastor to Sainte-Thècle, on February 6, 1903. Masson was the first president of the School board of the village of Sainte-Thècle from July 19, 1915, to April 14, 1947. He finished; Maxime Masson // his course in Sainte-Thècle on July 1, 1955. He was chaplain of the movement "Catholic Action" and pious associations. Two toponymic designations were assigned in recognition of his work life at Sainte-Thècle: School Masson (i.e. old boys' school) and Masson Street which connects the lower village and the village of the church. He died on October 2, 1960, and was buried in the cemetery of Sainte-Thècle. Maxime Masson Maxime Masson (October 15, 1867 in Saint-Justin – October 2, 1960) was a Roman Catholic priest. He was the main architect of religious buildings in the town of Sainte-Thècle, located in Mauricie,; Maxime Masson // steps, and water fountain in front of the church and the rectory. He made a carved wood clock, the base of which resembles the base of the church towers and the high altar. Maxime Masson celebrated 2497 baptisms recorded in the registers of Sainte-Thècle, between February 7, 1903, and April 30, 1955. He owned one of the first automobiles in the history of Sainte-Thècle, a Ford Model T 1911. His biggest test was the collapse of the two church towers during the hurricane of August 3, 1938. Born on October 15, 1867, in Saint-Justin (Maskinongé County, Quebec, Canada), he was [sep] knowledge2: Maxime Masson:  Maxime Masson (October 15, 1867, in Saint-Justin – October 2, 1960) was a Roman Catholic priest. He was the main architect of religious buildings in the town of Sainte-Thècle, located in Mauricie, in the province of Quebec. He was pastor of the Sainte-Thècle parish for 52 years. During that time, he was the main coordinator for the construction of the church from 1903 to 1905, as well as the rectory and other buildings on the lot of the Fabrique de Sainte-Thècle. He was instrumental in the erection of the monastery (couvent in French) in 1912, led by the religious community Daughters of Jesus ("Filles de Jésus" in French), and the erection in 1939 of the first college run by the religious Brothers of St. Gabriel (Frères de Saint-Gabriel in French).[1] ; Maxime Masson: He designed and built including the magnificent calvary (in 1935) located in the cemetery land, a cement lion in 1939 located on the outside of the church and the paintings on the ceiling of the sacristy.[2] He carved the Stations of the Cross erected in the parish cemetery of Sainte-Thècle from stone that came from France. He performed extensive embellishment work such as cement flowerpots, cement balls, the steps, and water fountain in front of the church and the rectory.[3] He made a carved wood clock, the base of which resembles the base of the church towers and the high altar.[4] ; Maxime Masson: Masson celebrated 2497 baptisms recorded in the registers of Sainte-Thècle, between February 7, 1903, and April 30, 1955.[5] ; Maxime Masson: He owned one of the first automobiles in the history of Sainte-Thècle, a Ford Model T 1911.[6] ; Maxime Masson: His biggest test was the collapse of the two church towers during the hurricane of August 3, 1938.[7]
knowledge1: Daniel Alexander Cameron // Daniel Alexander Cameron Daniel Alexander Cameron (December 10, 1870 – September 4, 1937) was a Canadian politician from the province of Nova Scotia. Born in Sydney River, Nova Scotia, the son of John and Isabella (Macdonald) Cameron, Cameron was educated at Sydney Academy and Dalhousie University where he received a Bachelor of Laws degree. He was admitted to the bar in October 1893. In 1894, he started practicing law in Sydney. He was a member of the County Council from 1900 to 1911. He was the stipendiary magistrate for Sydney from 1905 to 1911. In 1911, he was appointed treasurer; Daniel Alexander Cameron // resigned in 1930 and was defeated in the 1930 federal election when he ran as the Liberal candidate for the electoral district of Cape Breton South. He was elected in the 1935 election for the electoral district of Cape Breton North and Victoria. He served for a little less than 2 years before dying in office in 1937. Daniel Alexander Cameron Daniel Alexander Cameron (December 10, 1870 – September 4, 1937) was a Canadian politician from the province of Nova Scotia. Born in Sydney River, Nova Scotia, the son of John and Isabella (Macdonald) Cameron, Cameron was educated at Sydney [sep] knowledge2: Daniel Alexander Cameron: Daniel Alexander Cameron (December 10, 1870 – September 4, 1937) was a Canadian politician from the province of Nova Scotia. He was one of the first Nova Scotian legislators of the 20th century to die while in office. ; Daniel Alexander Cameron: Born in Sydney River, Nova Scotia, the son of John and Isabella (Macdonald) Cameron, Cameron was educated at Sydney Academy and Dalhousie University where he received a Bachelor of Laws degree. He was admitted to the bar in October 1893. In 1894, he started practicing law in Sydney. He was a member of the County Council from 1900 to 1911. He was the stipendiary magistrate for Sydney from 1905 to 1911. In 1911, he was appointed treasurer and solicitor for the Municipality of Cape Breton. ; Daniel Alexander Cameron: In 1916, he was elected to the Nova Scotia House of Assembly for the electoral district of Cape Breton. A Nova Scotia Liberal, he was defeated in 1920. From 1921 to 1923, he was a Member of the Legislative Council of Nova Scotia and was a Minister Without Portfolio in the cabinet of George Henry Murray. He resigned from the Legislative Council in 1923 and was elected to the House of Assembly for Victoria County. From 1923 to 1925, he was the Provincial Secretary in the cabinet of Ernest Howard Armstrong. He resigned in 1930 and was defeated in the 1930 federal election when he ran as the Liberal candidate for the electoral district of Cape Breton South. He was elected in the 1935 election for the electoral district of Cape Breton North and Victoria. He served for a little less than two years before he died in office in 1937. ; Daniel Alexander Cameron: This article about a Member of the Nova Scotia House of Assembly is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Serena (video game) // (voiced by Josh Mandel) who is waiting in a cabin for his wife, Serena, but can't remember anything about her. As he explores more of the cabin and examines the varying items throughout, his memories about her and their relationship begin returning, evoking multiple changes in his emotion. The title character is named after "Serena Nelson", an advocate of adventure games funded by Kickstarter. For her activism, she has often been referred to as the "Hero of the Adventure Game Revival Movement". Following an incident where Nelson was outed for being a transgender person by a studio executive, the game [sep] knowledge2: Serena Tideman: Serena Tideman (born 24 February 1978) is an American composer[citation needed] and classical and improvisational cellist who resides in Port Townsend,  Washington. ; Serena Tideman: Tideman's appearances include: ; Serena Tideman: Selected works include: ; The Dead Science: In 2008, the band signed to Constellation Records, with whom they released their third album, Villainaire.[4] ; The Dead Science: The band reunited in 2023 for a performance commemorating the 20th anniversary of Submariner.
knowledge1: Margaret Rose Vendryes // Margaret Rose Vendryes Margaret Rose Vendryes (born 1955, Kingston, Jamaica) is a visual artist, curator, and art historian based in New York. Vendryes began her studies in costume design before moving to fine art and earning a Bachelor's degree at Amherst College, graduating in 1984. She went on to earn her MA in Art History in 1992 from Tulane University and her PhD from Princeton University in 1997 where she focused on African American art history. Vendryes is Chair of the Department of Performing and Fine Arts and Director of the Fine Arts Gallery at York College in New York; Margaret Rose Vendryes // of soul & gender - Guro Ntozake". The exhibition, titled "i found god in myself: the 40 anniversary of Ntozake Shange's for colored girls..." and curated by Peter "Souleo" Wright, traveled to African American Museum in Philadelphia in 2016 and City Without Walls (cWOW) gallery in 2017 in Newark, New Jersey. The exhibition also featuring artists Renée Cox, Carrie Mae Weems, Deborah Willis, Saya Woolfalk, Michael Paul Britto, Pamela Council and Dianne Smith among others. Margaret Rose Vendryes Margaret Rose Vendryes (born 1955, Kingston, Jamaica) is a visual artist, curator, and art historian based in New York. Vendryes began her; Margaret Rose Vendryes // juxtaposes and combines portraits of Western pop culture icons with traditional African masks. Because these masks are traditionally worn only by men, she has noted her exploration of power, race, gender and beauty through these works. The project has included many Black American women icons including Aretha Franklin, Grace Jones, and Whitney Houston. Schomburg Center for Research in Black Culture commissioned an artwork in 2014 from Vendryes for an exhibition celebrating the 40th anniversary of Ntozake Shange’s "for colored girls who have considered suicide / when the rainbow is enuf" called, "My spirit is too ancient to understand the separation [sep] knowledge2: Margaret Rose Vendryes: Margaret Rose Vendryes (March 16, 1955 – March 29, 2022) was a visual artist, curator, and art historian based in New York.[1][2][3][4] ; Margaret Rose Vendryes: Vendryes was born on March 16, 1955, in Kingston, Jamaica.[5] She began her studies in costume design before moving to fine art and earning a Bachelor's degree at Amherst College, graduating in 1984.[6] She went on to earn her MA in Art History in 1992 from Tulane University and her PhD from Princeton University in 1997 where she focused on African American art history and was the first Black woman to earn a PhD in art history from Princeton.[5][7][8][9] ; Margaret Rose Vendryes: Vendryes served as Chair of the Department of Performing and Fine Arts and Director of the Fine Arts Gallery at York College in New York where she began working in 2000.[1][10] She was set to assume the role of Dean of the School of the Museum of Fine Arts at Tufts University in Boston in June 2022.[11] ; Margaret Rose Vendryes: From 2000 to 2001 she worked as visiting lecturer for Art & Archaeology and African American Studies at Princeton University. She also worked as associate professor for Modern American and Contemporary Art at City University of New York from 2002 till 2007.[12] ; Margaret Rose Vendryes: She warned against what she calls "the race-centered approach" to interpreting artwork, the practice of reading the influence of an artist's race into their artwork, as she believed it could limit the interpretation and context of the work and minimize the assessment of their impact on the larger art movements.[13]
knowledge1: Lemuel W. Joiner // Lemuel W. Joiner Lemuel Whiting Joiner (November 9, 1810 – October 22, 1886) was a member of the Wisconsin State Assembly and the Wisconsin State Senate. Joiner was born in 1810 in Royalton, Vermont. He moved to Cincinnati in 1830 and then to Williamsport, Indiana in 1834, and in 1845 he moved to Wyoming, Wisconsin. Joiner died on October 22, 1886. Joiner's son, Robert, also served in the Senate. Joiner was elected to the Assembly in 1853. He was later a member of the Senate three times. First, from 1857 to 1858, second, from 1861 to 1862 and third, from; Lemuel W. Joiner // 1869 to 1870. He was a Republican. Lemuel W. Joiner Lemuel Whiting Joiner (November 9, 1810 – October 22, 1886) was a member of the Wisconsin State Assembly and the Wisconsin State Senate. Joiner was born in 1810 in Royalton, Vermont. He moved to Cincinnati in 1830 and then to Williamsport, Indiana in 1834, and in 1845 he moved to Wyoming, Wisconsin. Joiner died on October 22, 1886. Joiner's son, Robert, also served in the Senate. Joiner was elected to the Assembly in 1853. He was later a member of the Senate three times. First, from 1857 to 1858, second, [sep] knowledge2: Lemuel W. Joiner: Lemuel Whiting Joiner (November 9, 1810 – October 22, 1886) was an American farmer, Republican politician, and Wisconsin pioneer.  He served six years in the Wisconsin State Senate and one year in the State Assembly, representing Iowa County.  His son, Robert Joiner, also served in the Legislature. ; Lemuel W. Joiner: Joiner was born in 1810 in Royalton, Vermont.[1] He moved to Cincinnati in 1830 and then to Williamsport, Indiana in 1834.  In 1845 he moved to Wyoming, Iowa County, Wisconsin, which was his primary residence for the rest of his life. Joiner died on October 22, 1886.[1] ; Lemuel W. Joiner: Joiner was elected to the Assembly in 1853.[1] He was later a member of the Senate three times. First, from 1857 to 1858, second, from 1861 to 1862 and third, from 1869 to 1870.[1] He was a Republican.[3] ; Lemuel W. Joiner: This article about a Republican Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly born in the 1810s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Lemuel W. Joiner: This article about a member of the Wisconsin State Senate is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: B. Brian Blair // Press. B. Brian Blair Brian Leslie Blair (born January 12, 1959) is an American politician and professional wrestler. He is best known for his appearances with the World Wrestling Federation (WWF) under the ring name B. Brian Blair as one half of the tag team The Killer Bees in the 1980s. As a child, Blair wanted to be Superman and even prayed that he might somehow become a superhero. By the time he was in high school, he also worked out to help out his parents. Blair moved out of his house at age 16 and held several jobs to [sep] knowledge2: Blair Tugman: Blair Tugman is an American[1] mixed martial artist currently competing in the Lightweight division of Bellator MMA. A professional competitor since 2007, he has also competed for CES MMA. ; Blair Tugman: Tugman faced A.J. McKee at Bellator 182 on August 25, 2017. He lost via unanimous decision.[2]
knowledge1: Patricia Cladis // Patricia Cladis Patricia Cladis (1937 - July 3, 2017) was a Canadian American physicist specializing in the physics of liquid crystals. She was a research physicist at Bell Labs beginning in 1972. She was a fellow of the American Physical Society and also received a Guggenheim fellowship. Cladis was born in Shanghai. She attended high school at Little Flower Academy in Vancouver, BC, graduating in 1955. In 1959, Cladis earned her B.A. in combined Honours Mathematics and Physics from the University of British Columbia. She then went on to acquire her M.A. in Physics from the University of Toronto in; Patricia Cladis // more recent interests were patterns in complex fluids, which includes polymers; she wrote a book in 1995 about patterns in complex systems. One example of the applications of liquid crystals is in LCD displays. She was the author or co-author of more than 130 publications and the editor for multiple books. The best-known book that she edited was published in 1995 entitled "Spatio-temporal patterns in nonequilibrium complex systems". Cladis died on July 3, 2017, in Summit, New Jersey. Patricia Cladis Patricia Cladis (1937 - July 3, 2017) was a Canadian American physicist specializing in the physics of liquid crystals. She; Patricia Cladis // was the recipient of the Edith Kreeger Wolf Distinguished Professor award, an endowment given by the Gender and Sexuality Studies department of Northwestern University to recognize women who have made major contributions to their fields. Other institutions include University of Paris (Orsay), Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes, École Normale Supérieure, Weizmann Institute of Science, University of Duisburg-Essen, and University of Bayreuth. She was appointed a fellow of the American Physical Society in 1983, and later received the Guggenheim Fellowship in 1993. She also received the Humboldt Prize, an award which "recognizes lifetime achievements and facilitates international scientific collaboration". She was; Patricia Cladis // on the Editorial Board of "Liquid Crystals" from 1986-1993. She was a board member of the International Liquid Crystal Society. Cladis' concentration in her graduate studies was in the field of superconductivity. She specialized in the physics of liquid crystals, and her research has focused on liquid crystals throughout her entire career. She joined Bell Labs to continue her work on liquid crystals, researching "their material properties and processing". She was "well- known for her work on liquid crystal defects, her discovery of the reentrant nematic phase, and her work on phase transitions and pattern formation in liquid crystals". Her; Patricia Cladis // conducting research at the University of Paris (Orsay) in her field of specialty, the physics of liquid crystals. During her time in Paris, she worked with the Orsay Liquid Crystal Group, whose founder, Professor Pierre-Gilles de Gennes, later went on to receive the Nobel Prize in 1991 for his work on liquid crystals and polymers. After her research position in Paris, she went on to work at Bell Labs as a research physicist to continue her work in liquid crystals, where she has worked since 1972. She held visiting appointments at a number of institutions, including Northwestern University, where she [sep] knowledge2: Patricia Cladis: Patricia Elisabeth Cladis (July 13, 1937 – July 3, 2017)[1] was a Canadian-American physicist who specialized in the physics of liquid crystals. She was a research physicist at Bell Labs in Murray Hill, New Jersey from 1972 to 1997[1] before founding Advanced Liquid Crystal Technologies in Summit, New Jersey.[2] She was a fellow of the American Physical Society and also received a Guggenheim fellowship. ; Patricia Cladis: Cladis was born in Shanghai.[2] She attended high school at Little Flower Academy in Vancouver, BC, graduating in 1955. In 1959, Cladis earned her B.A. in combined Honours Mathematics and Physics from the University of British Columbia.[3] She then went on to acquire her M.A. in physics from the University of Toronto in 1960.[3] She received her PhD in physics with a concentration in superconductivity from the University of Rochester in 1968.[3] ; Patricia Cladis: After receiving her master's degree in 1960, Cladis joined Transport Canada, the governmental department of transport, as a meteorologist before moving on to be a programmer-analyst at KCS Ltd. in 1962.[3] She was appointed a position at Western Connecticut State University as an assistant professor of physics in 1963.[3] For the following four years until 1968 she worked as a research assistant at the University of Rochester while she did her graduate studies.[3] She then moved to Paris for three years, conducting research at the University of Paris (Orsay) in her field of specialty, the physics of liquid crystals.[4] During her time in Paris, she worked with the Orsay Liquid Crystal Group, whose founder, Professor Pierre-Gilles de Gennes, later went on to receive the Nobel Prize in 1991 for his work on liquid crystals and polymers.[4] After her research position in Paris, she went on to work at Bell Labs in 1972 as a research physicist to continue her work in liquid crystals.[4] After 25 years, she founded Advanced Liquid Crystal Technologies in 1997,[2] a commercial physical and biological research company based in Summit, New Jersey.[5] ; Patricia Cladis: She held visiting appointments at a number of institutions, including Northwestern University, where she was the recipient of the Edith Kreeger Wolf Distinguished Professor award, an endowment given by the Gender and Sexuality Studies department of Northwestern University to recognize women who have made major contributions to their fields.[3][6] Other institutions include University of Paris (Orsay), Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes, École Normale Supérieure, Weizmann Institute of Science, University of Duisburg-Essen, and University of Bayreuth.[3] ; Patricia Cladis: She was appointed a fellow of the American Physical Society in 1983, and later received the Guggenheim Fellowship in 1993.[3] She also received the Humboldt Prize, an award which "recognizes lifetime achievements and facilitates international scientific collaboration."[3][7] She was on the Editorial Board of Liquid Crystals from 1986-1993.[3] She was a board member of the International Liquid Crystal Society.[4]
knowledge1: Jimmy Tompkins (priest) // Jimmy Tompkins (priest) Reverend James John Tompkins (7 September 1870 – 5 May 1953) was a Roman Catholic priest who founded the Antigonish Movement, a progressive effort that incorporated adult education, cooperatives and rural community development to aid the fishing and mining communities of northern and eastern Nova Scotia, Canada. The Antigonish Movement later evolved into the Extension Department (now the Coady International Center) of St. Francis Xavier University. Father Tompkins believed in the emancipating power of education and sought to improve economic conditions through study groups and co-operative action. "It is not enough to have ideas, we have to; Jimmy Tompkins (priest) // Little Dover and Queensport. As parish priest Tompkins observed firsthand the plight of the poor fishing community there and helped organize and lead what would become the Antigonish Movement of cooperative fisheries, stores, housing projects, and adult study groups. The Antigonish Movement was eventually institutionalized in the form of the Extension Department at St. Francis Xavier, which was headed by Tompkins' double-cousin Father Moses Coady and which included Father (Dr.) Hugh MacPherson, A.B. MacDonald and others. Jimmy Tompkins (priest) Reverend James John Tompkins (7 September 1870 – 5 May 1953) was a Roman Catholic priest who founded the Antigonish Movement,; Jimmy Tompkins (priest) // Rome from 1897 to 1902. On his return, he continued teaching at St. Francis Xavier University and became the vice-rector in 1907. Working closely with the Carnegie Corporation, he implemented various reform and modernization programs, culminating in an unsuccessful attempt to amalgamate various sectarian and non-sectarian colleges in the Maritime Provinces into one nondenominational university centered around Dalhousie University in Halifax. Although the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Halifax Edward McCarthy supported amalgamation, the Catholic Bishop of Antigonish James Morrison successfully opposed it and eventually exiled Tompkins to the tiny fishing village of Canso, Nova Scotia as parish priest for Canso,; Jimmy Tompkins (priest) // put legs on them", he often said. He started the first regional library in Nova Scotia along with the first credit union and a cooperative housing association in Reserve Mines that was dubbed "Tompkinsville". Father Tompkins was the Spiritual founder of the Antigonish Movement. Jimmy Tompkins was born in Margaree Forks, Nova Scotia, a small farming community on Cape Breton Island. From 1888-1895, he attended St. Francis Xavier University in alternate semesters while teaching Greek and Mathematics to support himself. He attended the Urban College of the Congregatio de Propaganda Fide (Papal Congregation for the Propagation of the Faith) in; Jimmy Tompkins (footballer) // his brave tackling, time on the ball in defence and attacking runs, he also scored five goals. His career highlights included playing in an F.A. cup semifinal against Sheffield United in 1936. Towards the end of his career he occasionally deputised as captain when regular skipper Mike Keeping was absent through injury. Seeing the imminent approach of World War II Tompkins signed on in the Territorial Army. On the outbreak of hostilities he was swiftly drafted into the regular army as a private with the Royal Fusiliers. He worked his way rapidly through the non-commissioned ranks, then was commissioned as [sep] knowledge2: Jimmy Tompkins (priest): James John "Jimmy" Tompkins (7 September 1870 – 5 May 1953) was a Roman Catholic priest who founded the Antigonish Movement, a progressive effort that incorporated adult education, cooperatives and rural community development to aid the fishing and mining communities of northern and eastern Nova Scotia, Canada. The Antigonish Movement later evolved into the Extension Department (now the Coady International Center) of St. Francis Xavier University.  ; Jimmy Tompkins (priest): Father Tompkins believed in the emancipating power of education and sought to improve economic conditions through study groups and co-operative action. "It is not enough to have ideas, we have to put legs on them", he often said. He started the first regional library in Nova Scotia along with the first credit union and a cooperative housing association in Reserve Mines that was dubbed "Tompkinsville". Father Tompkins was the Spiritual founder of the Antigonish Movement. ; Jimmy Tompkins (priest): Jimmy Tompkins was born in Margaree Forks, Nova Scotia, a small farming community on Cape Breton Island. From 1888-1895, he attended St. Francis Xavier University in alternate semesters while teaching Greek and Mathematics to support himself. He attended the Urban College of the Congregatio de Propaganda Fide (Papal Congregation for the Propagation of the Faith) in Rome from 1897 to 1902. On his return, he continued teaching at St. Francis Xavier University and became the vice-rector in 1907. ; Jimmy Tompkins (priest): Working closely with the Carnegie Corporation, he implemented various reform and modernization programs, culminating in an unsuccessful attempt to amalgamate various sectarian and non-sectarian colleges in the Maritime Provinces into one nondenominational university centered around Dalhousie University in Halifax. Although the Roman Catholic Archbishop of Halifax Edward McCarthy supported amalgamation, the Catholic Bishop of Antigonish James Morrison successfully opposed it and eventually exiled Tompkins to the tiny fishing village of Canso, Nova Scotia as parish priest for Canso, Little Dover and Queensport. ; Jimmy Tompkins (priest): As parish priest Tompkins observed firsthand the plight of the poor fishing community there and helped organize and lead what would become the Antigonish Movement of cooperative fisheries, stores, housing projects, and adult study groups. The Antigonish Movement was eventually institutionalized in the form of the Extension Department at St. Francis Xavier, which was headed by Tompkins' double-cousin Father Moses Coady and which included Father Hugh MacPherson, A.B. MacDonald and others.
knowledge1: Alexander Vovin // Alexander Vovin Alexander Vladimirovich Vovin (, born 1961 in Saint Petersburg, Russia) is a Russian-American linguist and philologist, currently directeur d'études at the School for Advanced Studies in the Social Sciences (École des hautes études en sciences sociales (EHESS)) in Paris, France. Alexander Vovin earned his M.A. in structural and applied linguistics from the Saint Petersburg State University in 1983, and his Ph.D. in historical Japanese linguistics and premodern Japanese literature from the same university in 1987, with a doctoral dissertation on the "Hamamatsu Chūnagon Monogatari" (ca. 1056). After serving as a Junior Researcher at the St. Petersburg Institute of; Alexander Vovin // Oriental Studies (1987–1990), Assistant Professor of Japanese at the University of Michigan (1990–1994), Miami University (1994–1995), and Assistant and Associate Professor at the University of Hawai'i (1995–2003), he became the full professor at the same university and continued working there until 2014. He has also been a visiting professor at the International Research Center for Japanese Studies, Kyoto (2001–2002, 2008), a visiting professor at the Ruhr University Bochum, Germany (2008–2009), and a visiting professor at the National Institute for Japanese Language and Linguistics (NINJAL) in Tokyo, Japan in May–August 2012. Alexander Vovin specializes in Japanese historical linguistics (with emphasis on; Alexander Vovin // etymology, morphology, and phonology), and Japanese philology of the Nara period (710–792), and to a lesser extent of the Heian period (792–1192). His most current project involves the complete academic translation into English of the Man'yōshū (ca. 759), the earliest and the largest premodern Japanese poetic anthology, alongside the critical edition of the original text and commentaries. He also researched the moribund Ainu language in northern Japan, and worked on Inner Asian languages and Kra–Dai languages, especially those preserved only in Chinese transcription, as well as on Old and Middle Korean texts. Alexander Vovin Alexander Vladimirovich Vovin (, born 1961; Alexander Bovin // Order of Lenin, Order of the October Revolution and Order of the Red Banner of Labour. Bovin died on 29 April 2004, after a brain hemorrhage. Alexander Bovin Alexander Bovin (, transliteration: "Alexandr Yevgenyevich Bovin") (9 August 1930 – 29 April 2004) was a Soviet and Russian journalist, political scientist and diplomat, notable for being the first Soviet, and then Russian ambassador to Israel after the re-establishment of Soviet-Israeli diplomatic relations. He was a leading journalist of Soviet Union and Russia of the late 20th century. "The New York Times" called him "one of the most colorful and daring commentators [sep] knowledge2: Alexander Vovin: Alexander (Sasha) Vladimirovich Vovin (Russian: Александр Владимирович Вовин; 27 January 1961 – 8 April 2022) was a Soviet-born Russian-American linguist and philologist, and director of studies at the School for Advanced Studies in the Social Sciences (EHESS) in Paris, France. He was a world-renowned linguist, well known for his research on East Asian languages. ; Alexander Vovin: Alexander Vovin earned his M.A. in structural and applied linguistics from the Saint Petersburg State University in 1983, and his Ph.D. in historical Japanese linguistics and premodern Japanese literature from the same university in 1987, with a doctoral dissertation on the Hamamatsu Chūnagon Monogatari (ca. 1056). ; Alexander Vovin: After serving as a Junior Researcher at the St. Petersburg Institute of Oriental Studies (1987–1990), he moved to the United States where he held positions as assistant professor of Japanese at the University of Michigan (1990–1994), assistant professor at Miami University (1994–1995), and assistant professor and then associate professor at the University of Hawaiʻi (1995–2003). He was appointed full professor at the University of Hawaiʻi in 2003, and continued working there until 2014. He was visiting professor at the International Research Center for Japanese Studies, Kyoto from 2001 to 2002 and again in 2008, a visiting professor at the Ruhr University Bochum, Germany (2008–2009), and a visiting professor at the National Institute for Japanese Language and Linguistics (NINJAL) in Tokyo, Japan from May to August 2012. ; Alexander Vovin: In 2014, Vovin accepted the position of Director of Studies at the Centre de recherches linguistiques sur l'Asie orientale (CRLAO) unit of the EHESS, where he remained until his death in 2022.[1] ; Alexander Vovin: Alexander Vovin specialized in Japanese historical linguistics (with emphasis on etymology, morphology, and phonology), and Japanese philology of the Nara period (710–792), and to a lesser extent of the Heian period (792–1192). His last project before his death involved the complete academic translation into English of the Man'yōshū (ca. 759), the earliest and the largest premodern Japanese poetic anthology, alongside the critical edition of the original text and commentaries. He also researched the moribund Ainu language in northern Japan, and worked on Inner Asian languages and Kra–Dai languages, especially those preserved only in Chinese transcription, as well as on Old and Middle Korean texts.
knowledge1: Krystyna Szczepańska // emigrated to Vancouver. Her second daughter is Elizabeth. Set designer Costume designer Interior decoration Stage designer Decoration Costume designer Krystyna Szczepańska Krystyna Szczepańska (born 18 August 1950) is a Polish stage and costume designer. She was born in Kraków as a second child of Piotr Szczepański, a lawyer and graduate of Jan Kazimierz University, and Stanisława née Żółtańska, teacher of Russian language. Her parents came from Berezhany; they both acted as members of the Home Army. Krystyna's elder sister Alicja is a lawyer, like their father. She was married to director Andrzej Maj and she mainly designed sets and costumes [sep] knowledge2: Krystyna Szczepańska: Interior decoration
knowledge1: Jeffrey Viggiano // Jeffrey Viggiano Jeffrey Donald "Jeff" Viggiano (born July 24, 1984) is an American-born Italian professional basketball player who last played for Umana Reyer Venezia of the Lega Basket Serie A. Viggiano played high school basketball at Suffield, in West Suffield, Connecticut. In high school, Viggiano won the 2000 Gatorade Player of the Year in the state of Connecticut, as well as the State Championship alongside teammate Dan Presser. He then played 4 seasons of college basketball at the University of Massachusetts Amherst, with the UMass Minutemen. After he played in Sweden and Hungary with Norrköping Dolphins and Soproni Sördögök KC,; Jeffrey Viggiano // season. On July 1, 2016, he again re-signed with Venezia. Jeffrey Viggiano Jeffrey Donald "Jeff" Viggiano (born July 24, 1984) is an American-born Italian professional basketball player who last played for Umana Reyer Venezia of the Lega Basket Serie A. Viggiano played high school basketball at Suffield, in West Suffield, Connecticut. In high school, Viggiano won the 2000 Gatorade Player of the Year in the state of Connecticut, as well as the State Championship alongside teammate Dan Presser. He then played 4 seasons of college basketball at the University of Massachusetts Amherst, with the UMass Minutemen. After he played in; Jeffrey Viggiano // in 2008 Jeff was signed by Italian LegADue team Nuova Pallacanestro Pavia. That year he averaged 14.1 points and 4.2 rebounds per game and gained the call of powerhouse Armani Jeans Milano. In August 2010, he goes on one-year loan to Angelico Biella. In December 2011 he signed with Benetton Treviso. In July 2012, he signed a one-year deal with Enel Brindisi. On August 30, 2013, he signed with Montepaschi Siena for the 2013–14 season. On July 1, 2014, he signed with Umana Reyer Venezia for the 2014–15 season. On July 16, 2015, he re-signed with Venezia for one more [sep] knowledge2: Jeffrey Viggiano: Jeffrey Donald Viggiano (born July 24, 1984) is a retired American-born Italian professional basketball player who last played for Umana Reyer Venezia of the Lega Basket Serie A. ; Jeffrey Viggiano: Viggiano played high school basketball at Suffield, in West Suffield, Connecticut. In high school, Viggiano won the 2000 Gatorade Player of the Year in the state of Connecticut, as well as the Connecticut State Championship alongside teammate Dan Presser. He then played 4 seasons of college basketball at the University of Massachusetts Amherst, with the UMass Minutemen.[1] ; Jeffrey Viggiano: After he played in Sweden and Hungary with Norrköping Dolphins and Soproni Sördögök KC, in 2008 Jeff was signed by Italian LegADue team Nuova Pallacanestro Pavia. That year he averaged 14.1 points and 4.2 rebounds per game and gained the call of powerhouse Armani Jeans Milano.[2] In August 2010, he goes on one-year loan to Angelico Biella.[3] In December 2011 he signed with Benetton Treviso.[4] In July 2012, he signed a one-year deal with Enel Brindisi.[5] ; Jeffrey Viggiano:  On August 30, 2013, he signed with Montepaschi Siena for the 2013–14 season.[6] On July 1, 2014, he signed with Umana Reyer Venezia for the 2014–15 season.[7] On July 16, 2015, he re-signed with Venezia for one more season.[8] On July 1, 2016, he again re-signed with Venezia.[9] ; Jeff Viggiano: Jeffrey Donald Viggiano, detto Jeff (Hartford, 24 luglio 1984) è un ex cestista statunitense naturalizzato italiano, di ruolo ala piccola.
knowledge1: Lynn Garrison // Army Medical Corps during the First World War, and with the Royal Regiment of Canadian Artillery, during the Second World War. His brother Tim Garrison resided in Prince George, British Columbia, Canada. Lynn Garrison Lynn Garrison (born April 1, 1937) is a Canadian pilot and political adviser. He was a Royal Canadian Air Force fighter pilot in the 403 City of Calgary Squadron, before holding jobs as a commercial pilot, film producer, director and mercenary. Later he became a political adviser in Haiti, and is now an author. With regard to flying, Garrison is known for his oft-repeated comment, "If [sep] knowledge2: Earl Garrison: Earl Garrison was an Oklahoma Senator from District 9 between 2004 and 2016, which included Muskogee and Wagoner counties. He succeeded long-time State Senator "Bulldog" Ben Robinson of Muskogee after Senator Robinson was prevented from seeking reelection due to term limits. ; Earl Garrison: Garrison served in the Oklahoma Senate from 2004 to 2016. He was Minority Whip from 2011-2014. He also served as Assistant Minority Leader. He also worked as an educator and rancher. He served in the United States Air Force.[1] ; Earl Garrison: In November 2021, Earl Garrison's daughter Jessica Jean Garrison announced a campaign for Oklahoma's United States Senate seat held by James Lankford.[2] However, she later filed for the open United States Senate seat created by the retirement of Jim Inhofe.[3] ; Jim Garrison: Once in office, Garrison cracked down on prostitution and the abuses of Bourbon Street bars and strip joints. He indicted Dowling and one of his assistants for criminal malfeasance, but the charges were dismissed for lack of evidence. Garrison did not appeal. Garrison received national attention for a series of vice raids in the French Quarter, staged sometimes on a nightly basis. Newspaper headlines in 1962 praised Garrison's efforts, "Quarter Crime Emergency Declared by Police, DA. – Garrison Back, Vows Vice Drive to Continue – 14 Arrested, 12 more nabbed in Vice Raids." Garrison's critics often point out that many of the arrests made by his office did not result in convictions, implying that he was in the habit of making arrests without evidence. However, assistant DA William Alford has said that charges would, more often than not, be reduced or dropped if a relative of someone charged gained Garrison's ear. Alford said Garrison had "a heart of gold."[11] ; Jim Garrison: In the same year, Garrison was defeated for reelection as district attorney by Harry Connick Sr. On April 15, 1978, Garrison won a special election over a Republican candidate, Thomas F. Jordan, for Louisiana's 4th Circuit Court of Appeal judgeship, a position for which he was later reelected and which he held until his death.[33]
knowledge1: Maggie Cogan // Maggie Cogan Maggie Cogan is a resident of New York City who became a minor celebrity in the early 1960s when she was the first female horse and carriage driver in Central Park, working for the Plaza Hotel. She appeared in a 1967 Universal newsreel with her horse and carriage, and in 1968, also appeared on quiz show What's My Line?, with contestants attempting to guess her occupation. After leaving her career briefly in the 1960s, she resumed it in 1970, befriending Lisa Ryan, the daughter of actor Robert Ryan, who had also become a horse-and-carriage driver. By this point,; Maggie Cogan // Wallkill, NY. The New York Times reported that the arrangement was short lived as Cogan returned to Central Park five weeks later. Maggie Cogan Maggie Cogan is a resident of New York City who became a minor celebrity in the early 1960s when she was the first female horse and carriage driver in Central Park, working for the Plaza Hotel. She appeared in a 1967 Universal newsreel with her horse and carriage, and in 1968, also appeared on quiz show What's My Line?, with contestants attempting to guess her occupation. After leaving her career briefly in the 1960s, she resumed; Maggie Cogan // she had had 2 unsuccessful marriages and given birth to two sons, both of whom she gave up when her life began to unravel. In 1977, while living with Ryan, Cogan began to show signs of mental illness and she was eventually committed to a mental hospital by her parents. Eventually, she became homeless when she left her career for good. Director Michel Negroponte discovered her living in Central Park and made the documentary film Jupiter's Wife about her. Cogan was raised in a town near New York City, and in high school, she was an active student, participating in; Maggie Cogan // She also claimed to have Extra Sensory Perception. However, her charm and wit helped her make friends who helped feed and clothe her during this period. She also developed a deep love for animals, adopting several dogs and living with them. In 1989, Michel Negroponte was attempting to make a documentary about his childhood in Central Park when he encountered Cogan and decided to make the film, Jupiter's Wife, about her instead. He filmed Cogan throughout 1989 until the end of 1991, showing her with her dogs, with friends, moving around Central Park, attending a gymnastics class that was taught [sep] knowledge2: Maggie Cogan: Maggie Cogan is an American minor celebrity in the early 1960s when she was the first female horse and carriage driver in Central Park,[1] working for the Plaza Hotel. She appeared in a 1967 Universal newsreel with her horse and carriage, and in 1968, also appeared on quiz show What's My Line?, with contestants attempting to guess her occupation.[1] ; Maggie Cogan: After leaving her career briefly in the 1960s, she resumed it in 1970, befriending Lisa Ryan, the daughter of actor Robert Ryan, who had also become a horse-and-carriage driver.[2] By this point, she had had 2 unsuccessful marriages and given birth to two sons, both of whom she gave up when her life began to unravel. In 1977, while living with Ryan, Cogan began to show signs of mental illness and she was eventually committed to a mental hospital by her parents.[2] ; Maggie Cogan: Eventually, she became homeless when she left her career for good. Director Michel Negroponte discovered her living in Central Park and made the documentary film Jupiter's Wife about her. ; Maggie Cogan: Cogan was raised in a town near New York City, and in high school, she was an active student, participating in cheerleading and dance clubs. After graduating, she attended several colleges but never completed an undergraduate degree. At 19, she began a career with the Palace Hotel, becoming the first ever female Central Park carriage driver.[1] In 1968, when the city announced that horse-drawn carriages would have to carry meters like taxicabs, Cogan was quoted in the associated story in the New York Times, saying "Meters! It's ridiculous. In this country, they almost want to meter our minds. It'll be like Coney Island. Tawdry."[3] ; Maggie Cogan: Cogan began to exhibit signs of increasing mental instability in the 1970s, while living with Ryan. She developed an infatuation with Ryan's father (actor Robert Ryan) and began sending him odd gifts, such as voodoo dolls attached to love notes.[2] In 1977, she developed an additional infatuation with serial killer David Berkowitz and in the same year was mugged on the street, with her attacker slashing her face.[2] According to Ryan, "For the rest of the summer she barricaded herself in her bedroom and wouldn't come out."[2]
knowledge1: Albert Outler // Albert Outler Albert Cook Outler (November 17, 1908 – September 1, 1989) was a 20th-century American Methodist theologian and philosopher. Outler is generally considered to be one of the most important Wesley scholars in the history of the church as well as the first real United Methodist theologian. He was also a key figure in the 20th-century ecumenical movement. Outler was born and raised in Georgia and was an ordained Methodist elder who served in several appointments. He graduated from Wofford College and received his Doctor of Philosophy degree from Yale University, teaching at both Yale and Duke University before; Albert Outler // statement put forth by the United Methodist Church after its formation in 1968. With his many references to the early church, Outler's work has proven very influential to those in the paleo-orthodox movement and contemporary evangelicalism, notably Thomas C. Oden. Albert Outler wrote and edited a great many works. Many of his writings have been collected in the "Albert Outler Library" series by Bristol House publishers. Albert Outler Albert Cook Outler (November 17, 1908 – September 1, 1989) was a 20th-century American Methodist theologian and philosopher. Outler is generally considered to be one of the most important Wesley scholars in; Albert Outler // beginning a long tenure at Southern Methodist University in Texas. He was a delegate to Consultation on Church Union, served on the Faith & Order board of the World Council of Churches and was an official observer at the Second Vatican Council. Outler is widely credited with being the first to recognize John Wesley's method for theologizing, via what Outler referred to as the Wesleyan Quadrilateral: scripture, church tradition, reason, and personal experience. This understanding of Wesleyan theology is prevalent throughout Methodism, particularly in the United Methodist Church. Using this model, Outler was a key figure in organizing the theological [sep] knowledge2: Albert Outler: Albert Cook Outler (November 17, 1908 – September 1, 1989) was a 20th-century American Methodist historian, theologian, and pastor. He was a professor at Duke University, Yale University, and Southern Methodist University. He was a key figure in the 20th-century ecumenical movement. ; Albert Outler: Outler was born and raised in Georgia and was an ordained Methodist elder who served in several appointments. He graduated from Wofford College and received his Doctor of Philosophy degree from Yale University, teaching at both Yale and Duke University before beginning a long tenure at Southern Methodist University in Texas. He taught courses in Christian history, Christian theology, Christian doctrine, and Wesleyan studies.[1] ; Albert Outler: He was a delegate to Consultation on Church Union, served on the Faith & Order board of the World Council of Churches and was an official observer  representing the Methodist at the Second Vatican Council.[2] He was a key figure in the 20th-century ecumenical movement.[3] ; Albert Outler: Along with his contemporaries Colin Williams, Frank Baker, and John Deschner, Outler's work on John Wesley became a catalyst for contemporary Wesleyan scholarship.[4] ; Albert Outler: Outler's contributions to Methodist history and theology include his book John Wesley[5] for "The Library of Protestant Thought" series, the first book that argued for Wesley as an important theologian in the Western tradition, as well as his critical editions of Wesley's Sermons[6] for the Works of John Wesley editorial project.
knowledge1: Megan Hine // Megan Hine Megan "Meg" Hine is a British survival consultant, adventurer, television presenter and writer. She is widely known for her work alongside Bear Grylls on "" (2015, 2016), "Car Vs Wild" (2013) and "Bear Grylls: Breaking Point" (2015). Behind the scenes she has worked on a wide range of television shows all over the world. Grylls once said "she is stronger than 99% of the men he knew" She has survived killer snakes, not washing for three months, gun-toting opium farmers and managed to keep dozens of celebrities alive for outdoor endurance reality shows. Megan Hine is an expedition [sep] knowledge2: Meg Thalken: Meg Thalken in Washington, District of Columbia) is an American stage, film and television actress, known to television viewers for her work on ER. ; Meg Thalken: In their review of A Guide for the Perplexed, where Thalken had the role of Sheila, Variety wrote, "These are worthy, interesting characters, but the narrative never emerges from situation into story."[2] ; File:Meg Thalken.jpg: Original file ‎(3,744 × 5,616 pixels, file size: 1.55 MB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Meg Thalken.jpg: Click on a date/time to view the file as it appeared at that time. ; File:Meg Thalken.jpg: The following other wikis use this file:
knowledge1: Rigoberto Torres // Rigoberto Torres Rigoberto Torres (born 1960) is a sculptor who was born in Aguadilla, Puerto Rico and worked in New York City, before moving to Florida where he currently lives and works. Torres began working in a factory where religious figures were cast, producing religious statuary. He also considers himself to be a community based artist. Torres is known in part for the sculptures in plaster and fiberglass that he created of his neighbors in the Bronx, together with his partner John Ahearn. Between the years 1981 and 1985, they collaborated on four murals. These were "We Are Family", "Life; Rigoberto Torres // in a factory casting religious statues. They worked together on the Bronx sculptures, sometimes known as the "South Bronx Hall of Fame", creating monuments to ordinary people as a response to the practice of enshrining famous, heroic figures in public places. Torres was born in Aguadilla, Puerto Rico, in 1960. At age four, he moved to New York, first in upper Manhattan and then to the Bronx. In 1990 he returned to Puerto Rico where he produced twenty-two works over the course of a year, including "Ruth Fernandez in 1991. Rigoberto Torres Rigoberto Torres (born 1960) is a sculptor who [sep] knowledge2: Rigoberto Torres: Rigoberto Torres (born 1960) is a sculptor who was born in Aguadilla, Puerto Rico and worked in New York City, before moving to Florida where he currently lives and works.[1] Torres began working in a factory where religious figures were cast,[2] producing religious statuary.[3] He also considers himself to be a community based artist.[4] ; Rigoberto Torres: Torres is known in part for the sculptures in plaster and fiberglass that he created of his neighbors in the Bronx, together with his partner John Ahearn. Between the years 1981 and 1985, they collaborated on four murals. These were We Are Family, Life on Dawson Street, Double Dutch, and Back to School.[5] The mural Double Dutch (1981/2010), for example, was acquired by the Pérez Art Museum Miami, city in which Torres lives.[6] The sculptures, like much of Torres' work, were displayed in public attached to buildings, free standing and in street events as an element of performance art.[1] On many occasions, Torres would prompt Ahearn to move their studio to the sidewalk along Walton Avenue so that neighborhood children could watch and also volunteer as subjects.[7][8] ; Rigoberto Torres: Rigoberto and John have sculpture installed on the exterior walls of buildings throughout The Bronx.  [11] ; Rigoberto Torres: Torres was born in Aguadilla, Puerto Rico, in 1960. At age four, he moved to New York, first in upper Manhattan and then to the Bronx.[16] ; Rigoberto Torres: In 1990 he returned to Puerto Rico where he produced twenty-two works over the course of a year, including Ruth Fernandez in 1991.[16]
knowledge1: Shane Fontayne // Shane Fontayne Michael Barakan (born 29 April 1954, London, England), known as Shane Fontayne, is an English rock guitarist. Active since the 1970s, he was the guitarist for Bruce Springsteen during the 1992-1993 "Other Band" Tour, as Springsteen had disbanded his own E Street Band three years earlier. During his career he has worked with Ian Hunter, Van Zant, John Waite, Chris Botti, Joe Cocker, Johnny Hallyday, Marc Cohn, Randy VanWarmer, Graham Nash, Mick Ronson and others. In the 1970s he was associated with Byzantium, an English psychedelic music band, after being in their precursor Ora, and over the years; Shane Fontayne // December 2012 Fontayne played lead electric guitar for Ann and Nancy Wilson's version of "Stairway to Heaven" with Jason Bonham taking his father's position on drums honoring the remaining members of Led Zeppelin at the Kennedy Center Honors ceremony. Fontayne was married to actress Mackenzie Phillips from 1986 to 2000, and has a son with her, also named Shane, born in 1987. Fontayne's older brother Peter is a well known music critic in Japan. Shane Fontayne Michael Barakan (born 29 April 1954, London, England), known as Shane Fontayne, is an English rock guitarist. Active since the 1970s, he was the; Shane Fontayne // has worked with a range of artists, including Steve Forbert ("Little Stevie Orbit", 1980 album), Maria McKee ("Maria McKee" (1989 album) and later Joe Cocker ("Heart & Soul", 2004 album), Richard Marx ("My Own Best Enemy", 2004 album). He has also been the guitarist for the French rocker Johnny Hallyday for his 1995 tour "Lorada tour", and 1996 concert in Las Vegas. In addition, Fontayne has been singer/songwriter Marc Cohn's touring guitarist since 1998. He has recently worked with Crosby, Stills & Nash and Graham Nash (solo) on tour (also producing the latter's 2016 album This Path Tonight). On 2 [sep] knowledge2: Shane Fontayne: Michael Barakan (born 29 April 1954), known as Shane Fontayne, is an English rock guitarist. Active since the 1970s, he was the guitarist for Bruce Springsteen during the 1992–1993 "Other Band" Tour, as Springsteen had disbanded his own E Street Band three years earlier.[1] During his career Fontayne has worked with Ian Hunter, Van Zant, John Waite, Black Lace, Chris Botti, Joe Cocker, Johnny Hallyday, Marc Cohn, Randy VanWarmer, Graham Nash, Mick Ronson and others.[2] ; Shane Fontayne: In the 1970s Fontayne was associated with Byzantium,  an English psychedelic music band, after being in their precursor Ora, and over the years has worked with a range of artists, including Steve Forbert (Little Stevie Orbit, 1980 album), Maria McKee (Maria McKee, 1989 album) and later Joe Cocker (Heart & Soul, 2004 album), Richard Marx (My Own Best Enemy, 2004 album). ; Shane Fontayne: He has also been the guitarist for the French rocker Johnny Hallyday for his 1995 tour "Lorada tour", and 1996 concert in Las Vegas. In addition, Fontayne has been singer/songwriter Marc Cohn's touring guitarist since 1998.  He has recently worked with Crosby, Stills & Nash and Graham Nash (solo) on tour (also producing the latter's 2016 album This Path Tonight). ; Shane Fontayne: On 2 December 2012, Fontayne played lead electric guitar for Ann and Nancy Wilson's version of "Stairway to Heaven" with Jason Bonham taking his father's position on drums honoring the remaining members of Led Zeppelin at the Kennedy Center Honors ceremony. ; Shane Fontayne: Fontayne was married to actress Mackenzie Phillips from 1986 to 2000. The couple have a son, Shane (1987).[3] Fontayne's brother, Peter, is a music critic in Japan.[4]
knowledge1: Michael H. Schneider Sr. // retired from active service on October 1, 2016. Michael H. Schneider Sr. Michael Haygood Schneider Sr. (born 1943) is a former United States District Judge of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Texas. Born in San Antonio, Texas, Schneider received an Associate of Arts degree from Lon Morris College in 1963, a Bachelor of Science degree from Stephen F. Austin State University in 1965, and a Juris Doctor from the University of Houston Law Center in 1970. Schneider served as an assistant district attorney in the Harris County, Texas District Attorney's Office from 1971 to 1975,; Michael H. Schneider Sr. // Michael H. Schneider Sr. Michael Haygood Schneider Sr. (born 1943) is a former United States District Judge of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Texas. Born in San Antonio, Texas, Schneider received an Associate of Arts degree from Lon Morris College in 1963, a Bachelor of Science degree from Stephen F. Austin State University in 1965, and a Juris Doctor from the University of Houston Law Center in 1970. Schneider served as an assistant district attorney in the Harris County, Texas District Attorney's Office from 1971 to 1975, before entering private practice in Texas from 1975; Michael H. Schneider Sr. // to 1976. He was a general attorney of Dresser Industries from 1976 to 1980, also serving as a municipal judge (part-time) for the City of West University Place, Texas from 1978 to 1990. He was a general attorney of Bawden Drilling, Inc. from 1980 to 1986, and a general solicitor of the Union Pacific Railroad Company from 1986 to 1989, returning to private practice from 1989 to 1990. Schneider entered into his judicial career as presiding judge of the 157th District, Harris County, from 1990 to 1996, thereafter becoming chief justice of the First Court of Appeals of Texas in [sep] knowledge2: Michael H. Schneider Sr.: Michael Haygood Schneider Sr. (born 1943) is a former United States district judge of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Texas. ; Michael H. Schneider Sr.: Born in San Antonio, Texas, Schneider received an Associate of Arts degree from Lon Morris College in 1963, a Bachelor of Science degree from Stephen F. Austin State University in 1965, and a Juris Doctor from the University of Houston Law Center in 1970. ; Michael H. Schneider Sr.: Schneider served as an assistant district attorney in the Harris County, Texas District Attorney's Office from 1971 to 1975, before entering private practice in Texas from 1975 to 1976. He was a general attorney of Dresser Industries from 1976 to 1980, also serving as a municipal judge (part-time) for the City of West University Place, Texas from 1978 to 1990. He was a general attorney of Bawden Drilling, Inc. from 1980 to 1986, and a general solicitor of the Union Pacific Railroad Company from 1986 to 1989, returning to private practice from 1989 to 1990. ; Michael H. Schneider Sr.: Schneider entered into his judicial career as presiding judge of the 157th District, Harris County, from 1990 to 1996, thereafter becoming chief justice of the First Court of Appeals of Texas in Houston, from 1996 to 2002. During that time, he also received a Master of Laws from the University of Virginia Law School in 2001. He was a justice of the Supreme Court of Texas from 2002 to 2004. On May 17, 2004, Schneider was nominated by President George W. Bush to a seat on the United States District Court for the Eastern District of Texas vacated by John H. Hannah Jr. Schneider was confirmed by the United States Senate on September 7, 2004, and received his commission on September 10, 2004. Schneider assumed senior status on January 7, 2016.[1] He retired on October 1, 2016.
knowledge1: LaDonna Smith // LaDonna Smith LaDonna Smith (born 1951) is an American avant garde musician from Alabama (U.S.). She is a violinist, violist, and pianist. Since 1974 she has been performing free improvisational music with musicians such as Davey Williams, Gunther Christmann, Anne Lebaron, Derek Bailey, Eugene Chadbourne, Misha Feigin, Michael Evans, David Sait, Jack Wright, John Russell, Sergey Letov, Toshi Makihara, Andrew Dewar and many other of the world's major improvisers. As a performer, she has toured the USA, Canada, Europe, including Russia and Siberia, China and Japan. Her music is documented on dozens of CD and LP recordings, including the obscure [sep] knowledge2: Kion Smith: Kion Smith (born October 7, 1998) is an American football offensive tackle for the Miami Dolphins of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Fayetteville State. ; Kion Smith: Smith played high school football at Lumberton High School. He was out for his entire senior season due to an injury.[1] ; Kion Smith: Smith was at Fayetteville State University for his collegiate career. He played in 20 total games while he was there. His senior season was cancelled entirely due to the COVID-19 pandemic.[2][3] ; Kion Smith: After going undrafted in the 2021 NFL Draft, Smith signed a contract with the Atlanta Falcons. However, he was not on the final 53-man roster.[5] ; Kion Smith: On September 6, 2021, Smith joined the Miami Dolphins practice squad.[6] He signed a reserve/future contract with the Dolphins on January 11, 2022.[7] He was waived on August 30, 2022 and re-signed to the practice squad.[8] He signed a reserve/future contract on January 16, 2023.[9]
knowledge1: Michael Prysner // Michael Prysner Michael Prysner (born June 15, 1983) is an American political activist. He is the co-founder of March Forward!, an organization of active-duty members of the US military and veterans of the Iraq and Afghanistan wars who encourages current active-duty service personnel to resist deployment. Prysner is a US Army veteran who served in Iraq. His rank was corporal. According to Prysner, his duties in Iraq included ground surveillance, home raids and the interrogation of prisoners, and these experiences led him to take a radical anti-war stand. In 2008, Prysner ran a write-in campaign for the US House of [sep] knowledge2: Joseph Michael Linsner: Joseph Michael Linsner (born December 13, 1968)[1] is an American comic book writer/artist, known as the creator of the mature-audiences supernatural character Dawn,[2] and for his illustrations of female characters. He is a popular cover artist in the comics industry.[3][2] ; Joseph Michael Linsner: Linsner was born in Queens, New York,[1] one of three brothers. His father died when Joseph was 14 years old.[4] Linsner grew up with a fascination for Batman, the X-Men, Conan the Barbarian,[5] and the pinup artist Alberto Vargas.[4] Later influences included Alan Moore, Pat Mills, and David Cronenberg.[5] ; Joseph Michael Linsner: Linsner introduced the lingerie-wearing occult character Dawn in Cry for Dawn,[3] a nine-issue series self-published by Linsner and Joseph M. Monks' Cry for Dawn Productions beginning in 1989.[6][7] Cry For Dawn Productions dissolved in late 1993,[8] and Linsner took Dawn to Sirius Entertainment;[9]  Dawn was published by Sirius for several limited series and one-shots[10] from 1995 to 2000. ; Joseph Michael Linsner: Linsner broke into mainstream comics drawing the cover of Justice League Quarterly #13 (Winter 1993). His Marvel Comics work includes the one-shot Killraven #1 (Feb. 2001),[5] several covers for the company's mid-2000s Mystique series, and painted covers and interior penciling and inking for the Wolverine-Black Cat three-issue limited series Claws (Oct.-Dec., 2006), followed in 2011 by the three-issue limited series Wolverine & Black Cat: Claws 2 (Aug.–Nov., 2011). ; Joseph Michael Linsner: In 2002, Linsner self-published I Love New York, a benefit book for the American Red Cross following the September 11 attacks; the comic presents his perceptions as a native New Yorker on that day.[11][12]
knowledge1: Charles Allen (Massachusetts politician) // 1833, 1835, and 1840); he also served in the Massachusetts State Senate (1836–1837). In 1842, he was a member of the Maine-New Brunswick boundary commission created by the Webster–Ashburton Treaty that ended the Aroostook War. He was a judge of the Court of Common Pleas (1842–1845) and a delegate to the 1848 Whig National Convention in Philadelphia. He was twice elected to Congress as a Free-Soil Party candidate (March 4, 1849 – March 3, 1853), but did not seek renomination in 1852. In 1849 he edited the Boston "Whig", later called the "Republican". After leaving Congress, he resumed the practice [sep] knowledge2: Charles Allen (jurist): Charles Allen (April 17, 1827 – January 13, 1913) was an American jurist. ; Charles Allen (jurist): Allen was born at Greenfield, Massachusetts to Sylvester and Harriet (Ripley) Allen.[5] Allen graduated from Harvard University in 1847 and studied law.[6] He received the degree of LL.D. from Harvard in 1892.[6] ; Charles Allen (jurist): Allen was admitted to the bar in 1850 and practiced law at Greenfield for twelve years, then advanced to state offices, serving as the Massachusetts Attorney General from 1867 to 1872.[6] During his sixteen years of service (1882–1898) on the bench of the Massachusetts Supreme Judicial Court,[6] he became known as one of the most eminent jurists of his day. ; Charles Allen (jurist): Allen's publications include:[6] ; Charles Allen (jurist): This biography of a state judge in Massachusetts is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Richie Dorman // Richie Dorman Richie Dorman (born 14 June 1988) is a retired Welsh professional footballer, and current Technical Director for Finnish club SJK. Dorman, from Hawarden, is the brother of fellow player Andy Dorman. Dorman played for the academy of English club Blackburn Rovers, and played in the United States for the New Hampshire Phantoms in 2006. While in the United States, he also played amateur football for the Boston University Terriers. He also had two spells in his native Wales with Airbus UK. Dorman joined Finnish club Kraft on loan in April 2011. He later played for SJK. Dorman was; Richie Dorman // named in the Veikkausliiga 'Team of the Month' in June 2014. On 30 October 2018, SJK announced Dorman as their new Technical Director. Richie Dorman Richie Dorman (born 14 June 1988) is a retired Welsh professional footballer, and current Technical Director for Finnish club SJK. Dorman, from Hawarden, is the brother of fellow player Andy Dorman. Dorman played for the academy of English club Blackburn Rovers, and played in the United States for the New Hampshire Phantoms in 2006. While in the United States, he also played amateur football for the Boston University Terriers. He also had two spells in; Richard Lee Dorman // where he partnered with Larry Breen to form Dorman and Breen Architects. Dorman won AIA Awards of Merit for his Lakenan residence (1958) and Ivory Tower restaurant (1960) and AIA Honor Awards for his Beber restaurant (1963), Malibu United Methodist Church (1966) and Siedenbaum restaurant (1966). He is listed by the city of Beverly Hills as one of its "Master Architects". He won the competition to design a trade fair pavilion for the United States Department of Commerce in Thessaloniki, Greece. He was one of 100 young Americans profiled in "The Take-Over Generation", a 1962 special issue of "Life"; he [sep] knowledge2: Richie Dorman: Richie Dorman (born 14 June 1988) is a Welsh retired professional footballer, and current Technical Director for Finnish club SJK. ; Richie Dorman: Dorman, from Hawarden, is the brother of fellow player Andy Dorman.[2] ; Richie Dorman: Dorman played for the academy of English club Blackburn Rovers, and played in the United States for the New Hampshire Phantoms in 2006.[2] While in the United States, he also played amateur football for the Boston University Terriers.[1] He also had two spells in his native Wales with Airbus UK.[3] Dorman joined Finnish club Kraft on loan in April 2011.[2] He later played for SJK.[4] Dorman was named in the Veikkausliiga 'Team of the Month' in June 2014.[5] ; Richie Dorman: This biographical article related to association football in Wales, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Dana Awartani // Dana Awartani Dana Awartani (born 1987) is a Palestinian-Saudi artist born and raised in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia where she lives and works today. Awartani graduated with a bachelor's degree in Fine Art from Central Saint Martins, London. She then received a Master's in Traditional Arts from the Princes School, London. At the Prince’s School she learned how to make stained glass, miniature painting, gilding—various traditional techniques from cultures all over the world. However, she couldn’t gain a degree in illumination there, so she found a master in Turkey to help her become a master in illumination. Artwani employs a variety; Dana Awartani // behind every structured piece, there is no randomness when it comes to creating such pieces.″ On the Islamic art, she said: ″Islamic Art is firstly not made for the sake of making art. It is a sacred spiritual practice that is used as a way to worship God and for God. It teaches one sabr (patience) and respect and as an Islamic artist, my work is a form of prayer and dhikr (remembrance). I need to be 100% focused and in a good mood to be able to do it, otherwise it doesn’t work." Dana Awartani Dana Awartani (born 1987) [sep] knowledge2: Dana Awartani: Dana Awartani (born 1987) is a Saudi visual artist, of Palestinian ethnicity.[1][2] She works in various mediums including painting, video art, and sand mosaic; and incorporates traditional methods of Islamic art. Awartani was born and raised in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia where she lives today. ; Dana Awartani: Awartani graduated with a bachelor's degree in fine art from Central Saint Martins, London.[3] She then received a master's degree in traditional arts from The Prince's School, London.[4] At The Prince’s School she learned how to work in stained glass, miniature painting, and gilding; various traditional techniques from cultures all over the world. However, she couldn’t gain a degree in the traditional illumination of texts there, so she found an instructor in Turkey to help her to master this discipline.[5] ; Dana Awartani: Awartani was included in the Rhizoma project of the 55th Venice Biennale in 2013.[14] Her work is in the collection of the Hirshhorn Museum and Sculpture Garden, Washington D.C.[15] and the British Museum, London.[4]
knowledge1: Carol Chell // Carol Chell Carol Chell (born 1941) is a British children's television presenter and TV executive. She originally qualified as a teacher, and produced many educational TV shows in the 1960s. She is best known for her work as a long serving presenter from 1966-88 on BBC's "Play School" Chell appeared as herself as part of a group of 'time-travellers' trying to solve the puzzles on the planet Arg in episode 1 of series 2 of the BBC quiz series "The Adventure Game" on 2 November 1981 (now available on the DVD release of the series from Simplymedia.) She took part; Carol Chell // in the ATV schools series "Starting Out" in 1982. She later worked for the satellite TV station The Children's Channel where she was head of pre-school programming until the channel's demise in 1998. Chell appeared alongside Johnny Ball on a celebrity edition of "Pointless", featuring stars of children's television. This aired on Saturday 20 September 2014 on BBC One. Carol Chell Carol Chell (born 1941) is a British children's television presenter and TV executive. She originally qualified as a teacher, and produced many educational TV shows in the 1960s. She is best known for her work as a long serving [sep] knowledge2: Carol Chell: Carol Chell (born 1941) is a British children's television presenter and TV executive. She originally qualified as a teacher, and produced many educational TV shows in the 1960s. She is best known for her work as a long-serving presenter from 1966 to 1988 on Play School[1][2] and from 1971 to 1980 on Play Away.[2] ; Carol Chell: She attended Nottingham Girls' High School, then a direct grant grammar school. ; Carol Chell: For a time she taught at Pierrepont Secondary Modern School for Girls, in Nottingham; also teaching there at the time was Brian Clark, who would become a television writer, writing Telford's Change. ; Carol Chell: Chell appeared as herself as part of a group of 'time-travellers' trying to solve puzzles on the planet Arg in episode 1 of series 2 of BBC TV quiz series The Adventure Game on 2 November 1981 (available on the DVD release of the series from Simplymedia). She took part in the ATV schools series Starting Out in 1982. She later worked for satellite TV station The Children's Channel, where she was head of pre-school programming until the channel's demise in 1998. ; Carol Chell: Chell appeared alongside Johnny Ball on a celebrity edition of Pointless, featuring stars of children's television. This aired on 20 September 2014 on BBC One.
knowledge1: Avraham Eilat // in touch until Yoshida's death in 2009. In 1970, after participating in some exhibition in Israel and abroad, Eilat received a grant for overseas studies from the America-Israel Cultural Foundation, and studied at St. Martin's College of art in London. There he worked on sculpture under Anthony Caro and at the same time began to create experimental films under the guidance of the avant-garde film maker Malcolm Le Grice. Avraham Eilat Avraham Eilat (, born 1939 in Tel Aviv) is an Israeli artist, educator and curator. He graduated from the Hebrew Gimnasium Herzliya in Tel Aviv, and was enrolled in [sep] knowledge2: Avraham Eilam-Amzallag: Avraham Eilam-Amzallag (Hebrew: אברהם (אבי) אמזלג עילם; born 28 September 1941) is an Israeli musician and composer. ; Avraham Eilam-Amzallag: Avraham (Avi) Eilam-Amzallag was born in Casablanca, Morocco. He immigrated to Israel as a child. He first studied the flute and later compositional studies at the Buchman-Mehta Music Academy in Tel Aviv. ; Avraham Eilam-Amzallag: He is the founder of an ensemble that performs oriental music. His compositions are described as a fusion of oriental Jewish music with contemporary technique.[1] ; File:Avraham Eilam-Amzallag.jpg: Original file ‎(992 × 1,355 pixels, file size: 85 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Avraham Eilam-Amzallag.jpg: The Wikimedia Foundation has received an e-mail confirming that the copyright holder has approved publication under the terms mentioned on this page. This correspondence has been reviewed by a Volunteer Response Team (VRT) member and stored in our permission archive. The correspondence is available to trusted volunteers as ticket #2018090810006288.
knowledge1: Tom Buk-Swienty // Tom Buk-Swienty Tom Buk-Swienty (born July 19, 1966 in Eutin) is a Danish historian, journalist and author, known for his work on the Second Schleswig War. Buk-Swienty was raised in Sønderborg, Denmark. Buk-Swienty holds degrees in history and American Studies from the University of Copenhagen and the University of California. During 1994-2005, he served as the American correspondent for the Danish periodical "Weekendavisen" and also as a lecturer at the University of Southern Denmark in Odense until 2010. He is now an independent author and since 2014 has been an adjunct professor in history at University of Southern Denmark. His; Tom Buk-Swienty // 2014. He is married to Annette and has a son Alexander and a daughter Sasha. Tom Buk-Swienty Tom Buk-Swienty (born July 19, 1966 in Eutin) is a Danish historian, journalist and author, known for his work on the Second Schleswig War. Buk-Swienty was raised in Sønderborg, Denmark. Buk-Swienty holds degrees in history and American Studies from the University of Copenhagen and the University of California. During 1994-2005, he served as the American correspondent for the Danish periodical "Weekendavisen" and also as a lecturer at the University of Southern Denmark in Odense until 2010. He is now an independent author and; Tom Buk-Swienty // writing career began during his US stay where he wrote books based on his knowledge of America. After his return to Denmark, he began studying the war of 1864, and he then wrote the first volume of his two-volume work on that conflict. The first book was well received and received several awards, which spawned the second volume of the work two years later. In 2013 he published the first volume of a two-volume biography of Wilhelm Dinesen, Karen Blixen's father, "Captain Dinesen. Fire and blood" and the second volume, "Captain Dinesen. Till death do us part", published in October [sep] knowledge2: Tom Buk-Swienty: Tom Buk-Swienty (born 19 July 1966 in Eutin) is a Danish historian, journalist and author, known for his work on the Second Schleswig War.[1] ; Tom Buk-Swienty: Buk-Swienty was raised in Sønderborg, Denmark. He holds degrees in history and American Studies from the University of Copenhagen and the University of California. During 1994–2005, he served as the American correspondent for the Danish periodical Weekendavisen and also as a lecturer at the  University of Southern Denmark in Odense until 2010. He is now an independent author and since 2014 has been an adjunct professor in history at University of Southern Denmark. ; Tom Buk-Swienty: His writing career began during his US stay where he wrote books based on his knowledge of America. After his return to Denmark, he began studying the war of 1864, and he then wrote the first volume of his two-volume work on that conflict. The first book was well received and received several awards, which spawned the second volume of the work two years later. In 2013 he published the first volume of a two-volume biography of Wilhelm Dinesen, Karen Blixen's father, "Captain Dinesen. Fire and blood" and the second volume, "Captain Dinesen. Till death do us part", published in October 2014. ; Tom Buk-Swienty: Tom Buk-Swienty (født 19. juli 1966 i Eutin) er en dansk historiker, journalist og forfatter, der blandt andet er kendt for sine to bøger om den dansk-tyske krig i 1864, Slagtebænk Dybbøl (2008) og Dommedag Als (2010). Disse bøger har inspireret til DR drama-tv-serien 1864 instrueret af Ole Bornedal. ; Tom Buk-Swienty: Buk-Swienty er vokset op i Sønderborg.
knowledge1: Mineo // Mineo Mineo (, Greek: Menaion and Menai, Latin: Menaeum and Menaenum) is a town and "comune" in the Metropolitan City of Catania, part of Sicily. It lies southwest of Catania, from Ragusa, from Gela, and from Caltagirone. It has approximately 5,600 inhabitants. It serves as the center of the cult of Saint Agrippina of Mineo and the church Church of Sant’ Agrippina. It is also a site of literary interest since Luigi Capuana, one of Italy's most famous writers in the 19th and early 20th centuries, hailed from Mineo and was at one time the town's mayor. Mineo now houses [sep] knowledge2: Settimo Mineo: Settimo Mineo (Italian pronunciation: [ˈsɛttimo miˈnɛːo]; born 28 November 1938) is an Italian member of the Sicilian Mafia Pagliarelli mandamento from Palermo. ; Settimo Mineo: Settimo Mineo, known as "Tonton Settimo",[1] was born in Palermo in 1938.[2] He officially owns a jewelry shop in the Palermo, but is considered the oldest boss of the Sicilian Mafia.[3] In 1982, he escaped an ambush that cost the life of his brother Giuseppe, while in 1981 his brother Antonino was murdered.[3] Testified against by pentito Tommaso Buscetta, he was sentenced to five years in prison in the Maxi Trial. After he was released from prison, he was then re-arrested in 2006 and sentenced in the "Gotha" trial.[4] He was released in 2013 by decision of the Supreme Court of Cassation.[5] ; Settimo Mineo: Despite being a former associate of Antonio Rotolo, a historical ally of the Corleonesi Mafia clan, in recent years Mineo made alliances with the cousins Franco and Tommaso Inzerillo, members of the Inzerillo Mafia clan and had as his right-hand man, Salvatore Sorrentino, all of them known rivals of Rotolo and of the Corleonesi, showing that Settimo Mineo had changed sides inside the Cosa Nostra.[6] ; Settimo Mineo: On 29 May 2018, Mineo was elected the new head of the Sicilian Mafia Commission after the death of Salvatore Riina.[7] On 4 December 2018, he was re-arrested in the operation "Cupola 2.0" conducted by the Carabinieri, on charges to be the new head of the "Dome" of Cosa Nostra.[8][3][9] ; Settimo Mineo: According to investigators, after Mineo's arrest, he was replaced by Giuseppe Calvaruso as the new head of the Pagliarelli mandamento. Calvaruso was Settimo Mineo's most trusted man, and is known by his peculiar and very modern entrepreneurial attitude in managing the Pagliarelli mandamento.[10]
knowledge1: Klaudia Kulon // two gold medals (in the classification of women and the team classification) in World University Chess championships in Katowice. Also in 2014 she won the 4th Memorial of Krystyna Hołuj-Radzikowska in Wroclaw. In 2015 Klaudia the second time in a row won the gold medal in Polish Students Women's Chess Championship. In March 2017 she won silver medal in Polish women's chess championship. Klaudia Kulon played for Poland in European Girls' U18 Team Chess Championship: Klaudia Kulon played for Poland in European Team Chess Championship: Klaudia Kulon played for Poland in Women's Chess Olympiads: Klaudia Kulon played for Poland in [sep] knowledge2: Klaudia Kaczorowska: Klaudia Kaczorowska (born 20 December 1988) is a Polish volleyball player, a member of Poland women's national volleyball team and Polish club PGE Atom Trefl Sopot, bronze medalist of European Championship 2009, and Polish Champion (2011, 2013). ; Klaudia Kaczorowska: In 2012, Kaczorowska went to Polish club Atom Trefl Sopot. On March 15, 2015 she achieved with the team from Sopot the Polish Cup 2015.[1] In May 2015 she signed a new contract with her current team.[2] ; Klaudia Kaczorowska: 20 grudnia 1988 Trzcianka ; Klaudia Kaczorowska: przyjmująca ; Klaudia Kaczorowska: Klaudia Kaczorowska (ur. 20 grudnia 1988 w Trzciance) − polska siatkarka grająca na pozycji przyjmującej, reprezentantka kraju. Jest absolwentką Szkoły Mistrzostwa Sportowego PZPS w Sosnowcu.
knowledge1: Virginia Raffaele // Virginia Raffaele Virginia Raffaele (born 27 September 1980) is an Italian comedian, actress, impersonator and presenter. Born in Rome, the daughter of two circus performers, Raffaele studied classical and modern dance at the and in 1999 graduated at the Accademia Teatro Integrato directed by Pino Ferrara. Raffaele started her career on stage, often working as a sidekick of the comedy duo Lillo & Greg. After her television debut as a correspondent in the Rai 2 program "Quelli che... il Calcio", she became first known for her imitations and parodies in the Italia 1 show "Mai dire Grande Fratello Show". She [sep] knowledge2: Raffaele Maiello: Raffaele Maiello (born 10 July 1991 in Acerra) is an Italian professional football player who plays as a midfielder for Serie B club Bari. ; Raffaele Maiello: He made his Serie A debut for Napoli on 16 May 2010 in a game against Sampdoria when he came on as a substitute in the 86th minute for Luca Cigarini.[1] ; Raffaele Maiello: On 29 January 2022, he joined Bari in Serie C on loan, with Bari holding an obligation to purchase his rights in case of promotion to Serie B.[2] ; Raffaele Maiello: This biographical article related to association football in Italy, about a midfielder born in the 1990s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Raffaele Maiello (calciatore): Cresciuto nelle giovanili del Napoli, debutta in Serie A il 16 maggio 2010 in Sampdoria-Napoli (1-0), ultima giornata del torneo 2009-2010, subentrando all'86' a Luca Cigarini.[4][5]
knowledge1: Martha Cunz // Martha Cunz Martha Cunz (February 24, 1876 – May 15, 1961) was a Swiss artist who is best known as a printmaker. As one of the earliest 20th century European artists to master the modernist woodcut, she was influential on other artists. Martha Cunz was born in St. Gallen, Switzerland. She received most of her art training at the Women's Art School in Munich, where her teachers included Christian Landenberger, Ludwig Schmid-Reutte, and Peter Paul Müller. In 1900, she went to Paris to study with Luc-Olivier Merson and Lucien Simon. The following year, back in Munich, a course in lithography; Martha Cunz // lithographs were made in 1931. For the following two decades, she devoted herself to painting, mainly landscapes and portraits. Cunz is known to have influenced the work of contemporaries like Carl Thiemann, and she also taught printmakers, including Rosa Paul. This page is translated from . Sources listed on that page include: Martha Cunz Martha Cunz (February 24, 1876 – May 15, 1961) was a Swiss artist who is best known as a printmaker. As one of the earliest 20th century European artists to master the modernist woodcut, she was influential on other artists. Martha Cunz was born in St.; Martha Cunz // with Ernst Neumann sparked her interest in printmaking. By the following year, she had moved on to woodcuts, and in 1903 she became a founding member of the German Association of Graphics. Until the outbreak of World War I, Cunz lived in Munich and only returned to Switzerland for an annual visit. She also traveled around Europe, spending time in Holland (1904, 1911) and Italy (1914). In 1920, she built a studio built at her parents' home in St. Gallen and lived there for the remainder of her life. For the first three decades of her career, Cunz specialized in; Martha Cunz // lithographs and woodcuts, especially color woodcuts printed using a Japanese multi-block technique. She was one of the first 20th century European artists to take up color woodblock printmaking. Her style is characterized by the play of subtly graded constrasting colors that overlap to create a luminous surface. By 1905, Cunz was showing in the annual Glass Palace Exhibition in Munich, and some of her earliest woodcuts were published in April 1905 in the journal "Deutsche Kunst und Dekoration" alongside work by Wassily Kandinsky and other Munich artists. The last of her 71 woodcuts was made in 1927, and her last [sep] knowledge2: Martha Cunz: Martha Cunz (24 February 1876 – 15 May 1961) was a Swiss artist who is best known as a printmaker. As one of the earliest 20th-century European artists to master the modernist woodcut, she was influential on other artists. ; Martha Cunz: Martha Cunz was born in St. Gallen, Switzerland. She received most of her art training at the Women's Art School in Munich, where her teachers included Christian Landenberger, Ludwig Schmid-Reutte, and Peter Paul Müller. In 1900, she went to Paris to study with Luc-Olivier Merson and Lucien Simon. The following year, back in Munich, a course in lithography with Ernst Neumann sparked her interest in printmaking. By the following year, she had moved on to woodcuts, and in 1903 she became a founding member of the German Association of Graphics. ; Martha Cunz: Until the outbreak of World War I, Cunz lived in Munich and only returned to Switzerland for an annual visit. She also traveled around Europe, spending time in Holland (1904, 1911) and Italy (1914). ; Martha Cunz: In 1920, she built a studio built at her parents' home in St. Gallen and lived there for the remainder of her life. ; Martha Cunz: For the first three decades of her career, Cunz specialized in lithographs and woodcuts, especially color woodcuts printed using a Japanese multi-block technique. She was one of the first 20th century European artists to take up color woodblock printmaking.[1] Her style is characterized by the play of subtly graded contrasting colors that overlap to create a luminous surface.
knowledge1: Mattias Asper // Mattias Asper Mattias Asper (born March 20, 1974 in Sölvesborg) is a retired Swedish football goalkeeper. He has played 3 international matches for Sweden national football team, and was a squad member in the UEFA Euro 2000. Asper was the first choice goalkeeper for Mjällby AIF in four seasons before signing to the Allsvenskan side AIK in 1998. Lee Baxter began the 1998 season as the first choice. But after seven games AIK had only managed to collect seven points, including only one win. On the 8 of June, Asper made his debut against Östers IF putting Lee Baxter on; Mattias Asper // returned to Sweden and Malmö FF in 2002, after being on loan to Beşiktaş J.K.. He won the Swedish championship with Malmö FF in 2004. Mattias Asper Mattias Asper (born March 20, 1974 in Sölvesborg) is a retired Swedish football goalkeeper. He has played 3 international matches for Sweden national football team, and was a squad member in the UEFA Euro 2000. Asper was the first choice goalkeeper for Mjällby AIF in four seasons before signing to the Allsvenskan side AIK in 1998. Lee Baxter began the 1998 season as the first choice. But after seven games AIK had only [sep] knowledge2: Mattias Asper: Nils Mattias Joacim Asper (born 20 March 1974) is a Swedish former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. Starting off his career with Mjällby AIF in the mid-1990s, he went on to play professionally in Spain, Turkey, and Norway before returning to Mjällby in 2008. A full international between 1999 and 2002, he won three caps for the Sweden national football team and was a squad member for them at UEFA Euro 2000. ; Mattias Asper: Asper was the first choice goalkeeper for Mjällby AIF in four seasons before signing to the Allsvenskan side AIK in 1998. Lee Baxter began the 1998 season as the first choice. But after seven games AIK had only managed to collect seven points, including only one win. On the 8 of June, Asper made his debut against Östers IF putting Lee Baxter on the bench, which would last for the rest of the season. With Asper in the net, AIK did not lose a single game in the 1998 season and they also won Allsvenskan the same year. ; Mattias Asper: In 1999, AIK qualified for Champions League making it all the way to the group stage. This year, Asper held a clean sheet for 797 minutes in Allsvenskan which was a new record. ; Mattias Asper: His performances in AIK attracted interest from Spanish club Real Sociedad, who bought him just before the 2000-01 season. However, he did not have much of a success in Spain and eventually returned to Sweden and Malmö FF in 2002, after being on loan to Beşiktaş J.K. He won the Swedish championship with Malmö FF in 2004. ; Mattias Asper: He announced his retirement on 26 November 2014.[1]
knowledge1: Rory Tapner // Rory Tapner Rory Tapner (born 30 September 1959) is a UK businessman who, in September 2010 was appointed CEO of Coutts, the Wealth Management division of Royal Bank of Scotland Group. In February 2015 he stepped down as CEO when he was replaced in the role by Alison Rose, the then head of Natwest's Commercial Bank. Prior to this, he was Chairman and CEO Asia Pacific at UBS AG from May 2004 until June 2009 and a member of the UBS Group Executive Board from 2006 until June 2009 when he stepped down and returned to the UK. He was; Rory Tapner // Holdings (from August 2016); and the Council of the University of Buckingham (from July 2017). He sits on the Advisory Board of QuantuMDx. Rory Tapner Rory Tapner (born 30 September 1959) is a UK businessman who, in September 2010 was appointed CEO of Coutts, the Wealth Management division of Royal Bank of Scotland Group. In February 2015 he stepped down as CEO when he was replaced in the role by Alison Rose, the then head of Natwest's Commercial Bank. Prior to this, he was Chairman and CEO Asia Pacific at UBS AG from May 2004 until June 2009 and a; Rory Tapner // Executive Board. In September 2010 he was appointed CEO of Coutts Bank, the wealth management division of RBS Group from which he stepped down in March 2015. For 9 years, Rory Tapner was the Hon. Treasurer and Chairman of the Financial Committee of the Council of King's College London. He is Deputy Chairman of the World Questions; King's Answers fundraising campaign. He is a Fellow of King's College, London. He is Chairman of various organisations : British Ski and Snowboard, the governing body of British Snowsports; the Advisory Board of King's Business School; Sanctum Wealth Management (India); SPS Intelligent Engineering; Rory Tapner // educated at Radley College and at King's College London (LLB, 1982). His daughter is the model Rosie Tapner. From 1983 to 2009 he was with UBS AG and predecessor firms (SG Warburg, SBC Warburg and UBS Warburg) and held the following roles - Joint Head of UK Corporate Finance and Head of UK Capital Markets Team; Global Head of Equity Capital Markets; Joint Global Head of Investment Banking; Chairman of Investment Banking; and Chairman and CEO UBS Asia Pacific. He was a member of UBS Investment Bank Executive Board from 1996 until 2004, and from 2006 joined the UBS Group [sep] knowledge2: Rory Tapner: Rory Tapner  (born 30 September 1959) is a British businessman who, in September 2010 was appointed CEO of Coutts, the Wealth Management division of Royal Bank of Scotland Group. In February 2015 he stepped down as CEO; he was replaced in the role by Alison Rose, the then head of RBS Commercial and Private Banking.  Prior to this, he was chairman and CEO Asia Pacific at UBS AG from May 2004 until June 2009 and a member of the UBS Group executive board from 2006 until June 2009 when he stepped down and returned to the UK. In June 2019 he was appointed Chair of the Board at Brown Shipley Holdings Limited. In May 2020, Tapner was named Chairman of the Board of Directors of Quintet Private Bank, Brown Shipley's parent.[1] ; Rory Tapner: He was educated at Radley College and at King's College London (LLB, 1982). His eldest son, Freddie Tapner is the founder of The London Musical Theatre Orchestra, and its principal Conductor. His younger daughter is the TV presenter and model Rosie Tapner.[citation needed] ; Rory Tapner: From 1983 to 2009 he was with UBS AG and predecessor firms (SG Warburg, SBC Warburg and UBS Warburg) and held the following roles - Joint Head of UK Corporate Finance and Head of UK Capital Markets Team; Global Head of Equity Capital Markets; Joint Global Head of Investment Banking; Chairman of Investment Banking; and Chairman and CEO UBS Asia Pacific. He was a member of UBS Investment Bank Executive Board from 1996 until 2004, and from 2006 joined the UBS Group Executive Board.  In September 2010 he was appointed CEO of Coutts Bank, the wealth management division of RBS Group from which he stepped down in March 2015.[2] ; Rory Tapner: For 9 years, Tapner was the Hon. Treasurer and Chairman of the Financial Committee of the Council of King's College London.[citation needed]  He was Deputy Chairman of the World Questions; King's Answers fundraising campaign.[citation needed]  He is a Fellow of King's College, London.[citation needed]  He is, or has been, Chairman of various organisations including : GB Snowsport, the governing body of British Snowsports; Quintet Private Bank; and SPS Technology. ; Rory Tapner: Rory Tapner (* 30. September 1959) ist englischer Geschäftsmann und war von August 2010 bis Februar 2015 Leiter des Wealth Management bei  RBS Coutts Bank Ltd.[1] Tapner war seit der Übernahme der SG Warburg durch den Schweizerischen Bankverein 1995 und bis 2009 in der UBS in wichtigen Rollen aktiv gewesen[2], unter anderem als Global Head Investment Banking sowie Präsident und Geschäftsführer der UBS Asia Pacific.[3]
knowledge1: Maja Alm // the Jukola relay for the club in 2013 and 2014. Maja Alm Maja Møller Alm (born July 10, 1988) is a Danish orienteering competitor who has won seven World Championships and two World Games titles. She is especially known for her four gold medals on the sprint distance, where she has won the title four years in a row: 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018. She is also a medalist from the Junior World Championships. Since 2006 she has been coached by Danish national coach Lars Lindstrøm. Alm is remarkable for her dominant running speed, which gives her a great advantage [sep] knowledge2: Maja Jager: Maja Buskbjerg Jager (born 22 December 1991) is a Danish recurve archer. A two-time competitor at the Olympic Games (2012 and 2020), Jager was the women's individual champion at the 2013 World Archery Championships, an achievement for which she was awarded the Danish Sports Name of the Year prize for 2013. She is also a multiple medalist at the European Games and the European Archery Championships. ; Maja Jager: Jager was born on 22 December 1991 in Nørre Broby to Jan and Hanne Jager.[2] She was introduced to archery at the age of eight,[3] and in her youth practised in a warehouse in Tilst, a venue procured by her father using his local connections as a fruit grower in the Aarhus region. She was later trained by former Danish Olympic archer Ole Gammelgaard.[2] ; Maja Jager: In 2013 Jager moved to Goesan, South Korea to train under Kim Hyung-Tak, the coach of the Korean archery team at the 1984 Summer Olympics, as part of an agreement between Kim and the Danish Archery Federation.[4] To meet her residency requirements in South Korea she undertook and completed an undergraduate degree in computer system engineering at Jungwon University. Despite a difficult start adapting to her new environment, which she later reflected were the most challenging of her life, Jager graduated from Jungwon University and returned to Denmark in 2018 after five years in South Korea. As of 2019 Jager was enrolled in a postgraduate programme at the Technical University of Denmark.[5] ; Maja Jager: Jager made her first appearance for the Danish national team at the 2009 Archery World Cup.[2] She later participated in the 2010 European Archery Championships and the 2011 World Archery Championships, where she finished ninth overall in the women's individual competition.[a] The following year she made her Olympic debut at the 2012 Summer Olympics in London.[3] She and teammates Carina Christiansen and Louise Laursen comprised Denmark's three-person entry for the women's team event, the nation's debut in the discipline.[7] In the preliminary ranking round, which determined the seedings for the subsequent elimination rounds, the trio set a new Danish national record of 1,946 points over the 216-arrow contest, finishing with the eighth seed of the twelve competing nations.[8] Victory over India in the first knockout round saw them advance to the quarter-finals, where they were eliminated by South Korea.[9] ; Maja Jager: In early 2013 Jager relocated to South Korea at the invitation of 1984 Olympic gold medal-winning coach Kim Hyung-Tak, one of two athletes selected by the Danish Archery Federation to undergo full-time training in the country ahead of the 2016 Summer Olympics.[4] Jager spent six months under Kim's instruction before contesting the 2013 World Championships held in Belek, Turkey.[5] She entered the tournament's individual event with an unimpressive record, having failed to progress beyond the last 32 competitors in an international competition since 2011.[10] In the event's preliminary ranking stage Jager achieved a new Danish record for the 144-arrow round, scoring 1,351 points from a maximum of 1,440 to qualify for the subsequent elimination rounds as the eighth seed.[11] Jager proceeded to deliver a surprising run of results in the knock-out rounds,[5] eliminating both Ki Bo-bae and Yun Ok-hee, the World Archery Federation's number one and number two-ranked archers respectively, to enter the final against Xu Jing, who had achieved a silver medal in the women's team event at the 2012 Summer Olympics. After tying on five set points each over the regulation five sets, Jager outshot Xu in the subsequent tiebreaking one-arrow shoot-off, landing her single arrow 1 millimetre (0.039 in) closer to the centre of the target to claim the world championship title.[10]
knowledge1: Angela Bairstow // Angela Bairstow Angela Bairstow was an English badminton player. She first came to prominence in 1958 when she won the National Junior singles title. Further wins followed in 1959 and 1960; in addition she won four junior doubles titles. After the step up to senior competition she reached the final of the 1963 All England Badminton Championships singles losing out to Judy Hashman. In 1963 at the All England Championships she was seeded to win in the Singles, Doubles and the Mixed. The controversy over her opponent picking up an old slow shuttlecock to finish off the game changed how; Angela Bairstow // She repeated the triple at the first Asian Championships in 1965 in Lucknow. After which the organisers banned non-Asian players from entering. Bairstow brought to prominence a deceptive backhand sliced serve and flick had her opponents stand back an extra 6 inches from the service line for fear of being embarrassed as the shuttlecock flew over their heads. She married her coach, H. Ian Palmer, in 1970 and had three children (born 1969, 1970 and 1972) and four grandchildren. Angela Bairstow Angela Bairstow was an English badminton player. She first came to prominence in 1958 when she won the National; Angela Bairstow // used shuttles are now discarded. Although never winning an All England title Bairstow became a significant player winning a host of titles from 1964-1968 including the Scottish Open, German Open, Dutch Open, Asia Cup, Irish Open, English National Badminton Championships and European Badminton Championships. Bairstow also won in 1966 two golds and one silver medal at the Commonwealth Games in Kingston Jamaica. Caring for her sick doubles partner overnight before losing the women's doubles final the next day. In 1965 Bairstow won the Dutch open in Singles, Doubles and Mixed in the same year with another three Dutch titles afterwards. [sep] knowledge2: Angela Bairstow: Angela Bairstow (1942–2016) was an English international badminton player. ; Angela Bairstow: She first came to prominence in 1958 when she won the English National Junior singles title. Further wins followed in 1959 and 1960; in addition she won four English National Junior doubles titles. After the step up to senior competition she reached the final of the 1963 All England Badminton Championships singles losing out to Judy Hashman.[1] In 1963 at the All England Championships she was seeded to win in the Singles, Doubles and the Mixed. ; Angela Bairstow: Although never winning an All England title Bairstow became a significant player for England winning a host of titles from 1964 to 1968 including the Scottish Open, German Open, Dutch Open, Asia Cup, Irish Open, English National Badminton Championships and European Badminton Championships. ; Angela Bairstow: In 1965 Bairstow won the Dutch open in Singles, Doubles and Mixed in the same year with another three Dutch titles afterwards. She repeated the triple at the second Asian Championships in 1965 in Lucknow. After which the organisers banned non-Asian players from entering.  Bairstow brought to prominence a deceptive backhand sliced serve and flick. She is the only player in history who won medals in both Asian and European Championships. ; Angela Bairstow: Bairstow represented England and won two golds and one silver medal, at the 1966 British Empire and Commonwealth Games in Kingston, Jamaica.[2][3][4]
knowledge1: Muhammad Nabil al-Khatib // Muhammad Nabil al-Khatib Muhammad Nabil al-Khatib () is a Syrian politician and member of the Ba'ath Party. He served as justice minister from 2000 to 2003. Khatib became a member of the central committee of the Baath Party in 2000. He was first appointed justice minister by then president Hafez al-Assad to the cabinet headed by Muhammad Mustafa Mero in March 2000. He continued to serve as justice minister after the first cabinet reshuffle by Bashar al-Assad when he became the president of Syria. In a 2001 reshuffle, he retained his post. His term lasted until 2003. Then Khatib was [sep] knowledge2: Abdul Ilah Khatib: Abdul Ilah Mohammad Khatib or Abdelilah al-Khatib (/ˈɑːbdəl ˈɪlə æl kəˈtiːb/ ⓘ AHB-dəl IL-ə al kə-TEEB; Arabic: عبد الإله الخطيب) (born in 1953) is a former Minister of Foreign Affairs for Jordan. On March 11, 2011 he was appointed as the UN Special envoy to Libya. [1] ; Abdul Ilah Khatib: Married, and the father of three children, Khatib graduated with his Master's degree in International economics from Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies, a master's degree in International Communications from the American University in Washington, D.C., and a bachelor's degree in political science from the School of Political Science in Athens, Greece. ; Abdul Ilah Khatib: This article about a Jordanian politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; File:En-us-Abdel Ilah Al Khatib from Jordan pronunciation (Voice of America).ogg: This file contains additional information, probably added from the digital camera or scanner used to create or digitize it.
knowledge1: Steven Andersson // Steven Andersson Steven A. Andersson (born August 15, 1964) is a Republican member of the Illinois House of Representatives representing the 65th district. The 65th district is located in northwestern Kane County. Elected in the 2014 general election, he took office two weeks earlier than the majority of the 2015 freshman class when his predecessor Timothy L. Schmitz chose to resign early. Andersson earned his bachelor's degree from in 1986 and his J.D. in 1992, both from Northern Illinois University. He is a small business owner and is a partner in the law firms of Mickey, Wilson, Weiler, Renzi & [sep] knowledge2: Dennis Andersson: Dennis Andersson (born 3 June 1991)[1] is a former motorcycle speedway rider from Sweden.[2] ; Dennis Andersson: He rode for the Atlas Wrocław in the Polish Speedway Ekstraliga and continued to ride for the club until the end of the 2012 season. In 2013, he joined Stal Rzeszów for one season before completing a final season in Poland with Polonia Bydgoszcz.[2] His British league debut came in 2011 for the Poole Pirates, where he would spend three seasons in total at the club.[3] ; Dennis Andersson: Andersson won the 2010 Under-19 European Champion title. He also won the Swedish U-21 Championship on two occasions in 2010 and 2012.[4][5] ; Dennis Andersson: European Championships
knowledge1: Diane Paulus // Diane Paulus Diane Marie Paulus (born 1966 in New York City, USA) is the Terrie and Bradley Bloom Artistic Director of the American Repertory Theater (A.R.T.) at Harvard University, and was selected for the 2014 TIME 100, "TIME" Magazine’s annual list of the 100 most influential people in the world. She is an American director of both theater and opera Paulus was nominated for the Best Director Tony Award for her revival of "Hair", and won the award in 2013 for her revival of "Pippin". She has received the 2009 Harvard College Women’s Leadership Award and the Columbia University IAL [sep] knowledge2: Camille Paulus: Camille Paulus  (born 24 April 1943) is a Belgian lawyer and liberal politician. ; Camille Paulus: He graduated with a doctorate in law at the Vrije Universiteit Brussel (VUB) in 1966. ; Camille Paulus: He succeeded Frans Van den Eynde as the mayor of Aartselaar in 1989.[1] Paulus was a Law Professor at the Vrije Universiteit Brussel, mayor of Aartselaar, and President of the Liberaal Vlaams Verbond (1982–1993). He was governor of the Belgian province of Antwerp from 1 October 1993 until 30 April 2008. ; Camille Paulus: This article about a Flemish politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Camille Paulus: This article about a mayor in Belgium is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Folorunsho Coker // degree in diplomacy, international trade and finance from the University of Westminster where he finished with distinctions. In 1999, Folorunsho was appointed as personal assistant to senator Bola Ahmed Tinubu, the former governor of Lagos State and national leader of the All Progressive Congress (APC) and in 2003, he was appointed Deputy Chief of Staff to the Lagos State Government.He was later appointed as the managing director of the number plate production authority of State of Lagos, a position he held for 10 years. In 2014, he was appointed Special Adviser on the Central Business District of Lagos to Raji; Folorunsho Coker // Babatunde Fashola (SAN), then governor of Lagos State. On October 19, 2015, Folorunsho was appointed commissioner for tourism, Arts & Culture for Lagos State, a position he held until October 19, 2016. In March 2017, he was appointed Director General of Nigerian Tourism Development Corporation by President MuhammaduBuhari. He was erroneously named the Director General of the National Film and Video Censors Board before it was corrected and announced by Femi Adesina, the special adviser on media and publicity to President Muhammadu Buhari. It is a brand launched by Coker Led NTDC administration for the promotion of domestic tourism in [sep] knowledge2: Michael Folorunsho: Michael Ijemuan Folorunsho (born 7 February 1998) is an Italian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Serie A club Hellas Verona, on loan from Napoli. ; Michael Folorunsho: Folorunsho spent his youth years with Lazio and played for their Under-19 squad.[1] On 18 July 2017, he signed with Serie C club Virtus Francavilla.[2] Folorunsho made his professional Serie C debut for Virtus Francavilla on 26 August 2017, in a game against Lecce.[3] He played 60 Serie C games for Virtus Francavilla in the two seasons.[1] ; Michael Folorunsho: On 13 July 2019, Folorunsho signed for Serie A club Napoli on a permanent deal.[4] He was loaned out two days later to Serie C club Bari for two years.[5] Napoli sent Folorunsho on loan to several clubs in the Serie B: Reggina in 2020–21,[6] Pordenone[7] and Reggina[8] in 2021–22, and Bari in 2022–23.[9] ; Michael Folorunsho: On 16 August 2023, Folorunsho agreed to join Serie A club Hellas Verona on loan for the duration of the 2023–24 season.[10] ; Michael Folorunsho: Folorunsho is of Nigerian descent.[11]
knowledge1: Hiren Gohain // Hiren Gohain Hiren Gohain (born 1939) is a Marxist literary critic, poet and social scientist from the Indian state of Assam. He studied in Cotton College, did his graduation from Presidency College, Calcutta and then moved to Delhi University to pursue his post-graduation in English literature. After completion of his master's degree, for some time, he became a lecturer in Kirori Mal College of Delhi University. Later, he went to the Cambridge University for doctoral research on the topic 'Paradise Lost and the 17th Century Crisis' later published as 'Tradition and Paradise Lost: A Heretical View'., a work highly acclaimed; Hiren Gohain // In Shakespeare (1988, English) 21. The Magic Plant (1992, English) 22. Aspects of Early 19th Century Bengalee Culture (1990, English) Hiren Gohain Hiren Gohain (born 1939) is a Marxist literary critic, poet and social scientist from the Indian state of Assam. He studied in Cotton College, did his graduation from Presidency College, Calcutta and then moved to Delhi University to pursue his post-graduation in English literature. After completion of his master's degree, for some time, he became a lecturer in Kirori Mal College of Delhi University. Later, he went to the Cambridge University for doctoral research on the topic 'Paradise; Hiren Gohain // books in Assamese are "Sahityar Satya", "Sahitya Aru Chetana", "Biswayatan", "Asomiya Jatiya Jibanat Mahapurushiya Paramapara", "Assam: A Burning Question" and several other significant and widely read books. He has also written 4 volumes of memoirs which are also relevant for their incorporation of social and historical content. He is a contributor to journals such as "Economic and Political Weekly", "Frontier", and occasional publications of institutions like Indian Institute of Advanced Studies (IIAS), Centre for English and Foreign Languages (CIEFL), Shillong. He also is a columnist for various regional and national newspapers. He is also a regular contributor to Economic and [sep] knowledge2: Hiren Gohain: Hiren Gohain (born 1939) is a scholar, writer, literary critic, and social scientist from the Indian state of Assam.[1] ; Hiren Gohain: Gohain studied in Cotton College, and did his graduation from Presidency College, Calcutta and then moved to Delhi University to pursue his post-graduation in English literature. After completion of his master's degree, for some time, he became a lecturer in Kirori Mal College of Delhi University. Later, he went to the Cambridge University for doctoral research on the topic 'Paradise Lost and the 17th Century Crisis' later published as 'Tradition and Paradise Lost: A Heretical View', a work highly acclaimed for its original research and fresh perspective. After coming back from Cambridge, he became a professor at the Department of English in Gauhati University.[2] ; Hiren Gohain: It was Gohain who for the first time brought the ideas and methods of Anglo-American New Criticism to the study of Assamese/Indian literature in Assamese. While studying in Cambridge, he had an eclectic radical ideology but later on, after his return to India, he became a Marxist. It was he who adapted the ideas of critics like György Lukács, Antonio Gramsci, and other critics into the nascent field of Assamese literary criticism. Some of his books in Assamese are Sahityar Satya, Sahitya Aru Chetana, Biswayatan, Asomiya Jatiya Jibanat Mahapurushiya Paramapara, Assam: A Burning Question and several other significant and widely read books. He has also written 4 volumes of memoirs which are also relevant for their incorporation of social and historical content. He is a contributor to journals such as Economic and Political Weekly, Frontier, and occasional publications of institutions like Indian Institute of Advanced Studies (IIAS), Centre for English and Foreign Languages (CIEFL), Shillong. He also is a columnist for various regional and national newspapers. ; Hiren Gohain: He is also a regular contributor to Economic and Political Weekly.[3] His book 'Assam A Burning Question'[4] is a compilation of several essays on the socio-political crisis confronting Assam in the context of Assam Movement written in the mid-1980s, and the period dominated by extremism.[5] Recently, he played an important role in the mediation of peace talks between the Government of India and the Assamese insurgent group ULFA.[6] He was the founder president of the Asomiya Sahitya Sanmilani.He is a recipient of Sahitya Aademy award for his book on Sankardev. ; Hiren Gohain: Gohain has been a voice of Assam as critic of Assamese national extremism, Hindutva extremism and socio-political issues.[11]
knowledge1: Evgeny Shalunov // Evgeny Shalunov Evgeny Vladimirovich Shalunov (; born 8 January 1992) is a Russian professional road and track bicycle racer, currently riding for UCI Professional Continental team . Shalunov has competed as a professional since the middle of the 2011 season, having signed a stagiaire deal with in July 2011. A winner of eight national events in 2011 with Lokomotiv–Urbycolan, Shalunov signed with the team for the 2012 season. After finishing fourth in the La Roue Tourangelle held in France in March, Shalunov won his first UCI Europe Tour race in April 2012, by winning the Vuelta a La Rioja in; Evgeny Shalunov // Spain. Attacking around from the finish in La Rioja, Shalunov soloed to the finish line to win by 28 seconds ahead of 's Pablo Urtasun and teammate Mikhail Antonov. He was named in the start list for the 2017 Giro d'Italia. Evgeny Shalunov Evgeny Vladimirovich Shalunov (; born 8 January 1992) is a Russian professional road and track bicycle racer, currently riding for UCI Professional Continental team . Shalunov has competed as a professional since the middle of the 2011 season, having signed a stagiaire deal with in July 2011. A winner of eight national events in 2011 with Lokomotiv–Urbycolan,; Maxim Shalunov // the KHL during the 2010–11 KHL season. After being drafted by the Blackhawks, Shalunov returned to Russia and played the 2011–12 MHL season with Belye Medvedi. During the 2012-2013 season, Shalunov's time was divided between Belye Medvedi as well as Traktor's VHL team, Chelmet Chelyabinsk. He also played one game with Traktor. Shalunov played in North America during the 2013–14 season. He started the season with the Rockford IceHogs, the Blackhawks' American Hockey League affiliate. After registering four assists in twenty games with Rockford, Shalunov was assigned to the Toledo Walleye, the Blackhawks' ECHL affiliate where he contributed with 18 [sep] knowledge2: Evgeny Shalunov: Evgeny Vladimirovich Shalunov (Russian: Евгений Владимирович Шалунов; born 8 January 1992) is a Russian professional road and track bicycle racer, who currently rides for UCI ProTeam Gazprom–RusVelo.[4] ; Evgeny Shalunov: Shalunov has competed as a professional since the middle of the 2011 season, having signed a stagiaire deal with Team RadioShack in July 2011.[5] ; Evgeny Shalunov: A winner of eight national events in 2011 with Lokomotiv–Urbycolan, Shalunov signed with the Lokosphinx team for the 2012 season. After finishing fourth in the La Roue Tourangelle held in France in March,[6] Shalunov won his first UCI Europe Tour race in April 2012, by winning the Vuelta a La Rioja in Spain.[7] Attacking around 30 km (18.6 mi) from the finish in La Rioja, Shalunov soloed to the finish line to win by 28 seconds ahead of Euskaltel–Euskadi's Pablo Urtasun and teammate Mikhail Antonov.[8] ; Evgeny Shalunov: He was named in the start list for the 2017 Giro d'Italia.[9] ; Evgeny Shalunov: Cet article est une ébauche concernant un coureur cycliste russe.
knowledge1: Felix Newman // Felix Newman Felix Newman (born 1993) is a British rower. Whilst in education at Abingdon School he gained colours and was the captain of the Abingdon School Boat Club. After leaving Abingdon in 2012 he attended Selwyn College at Cambridge. In 2018 he won a British Education Award, while at Selwyn College. In 2014 and 2015 he was selected for the Goldie crew before securing the bow seat of the Cambridge boat at the Boat Race 2016 which Cambridge won. In addition, he has been in winning crews at the Henley Royal Regatta three times, twice in the Princess Elizabeth; Felix Newman // Cup and once in the Thames Cup, and has represented the Great Britain's men's coxed four at the 2011 World Rowing Junior Championships at Eton in England. Felix Newman Felix Newman (born 1993) is a British rower. Whilst in education at Abingdon School he gained colours and was the captain of the Abingdon School Boat Club. After leaving Abingdon in 2012 he attended Selwyn College at Cambridge. In 2018 he won a British Education Award, while at Selwyn College. In 2014 and 2015 he was selected for the Goldie crew before securing the bow seat of the Cambridge boat at [sep] knowledge2: Felix Newman: Felix Newman (born 1993) is a British rower. ; Felix Newman: Whilst in education at Abingdon School he gained colours and was the captain of the Abingdon School Boat Club.[1] After leaving Abingdon in 2012 he attended Selwyn College, Cambridge.[2] ; Felix Newman: In 2018 he won a British Education Award, while at Selwyn College.[3] ; Felix Newman: In 2014 and 2015 he was selected for the Goldie crew before securing the bow seat of the Cambridge boat at the  Boat Race 2016[4] which Cambridge won. In addition, he has been in winning crews at the Henley Royal Regatta three times, twice in the Princess Elizabeth Cup and once in the Thames Cup, and has represented the Great Britain's men's coxed four at the 2011 World Rowing Junior Championships at Eton in England.[5]
knowledge1: G. Fowler Stewart // G. Fowler Stewart George Fowler Stewart (1861 – 3 January 1917), generally known as Fowler Stewart, was a Scots-born businessman and public figure in Adelaide, South Australia. Stewart was the youngest son of Charles Stewart, a prominent manufacturer of Kirkcaldy, Fifeshire, Scotland, and was educated at a college in Edinburgh. In 1879 he started work at the London office of D. & J. Fowler founded by his uncles David, James and (later) George Fowler. In 1881 he was sent to Adelaide to learn the business there, and in 1887 took over management of the Fremantle, Western Australia branch. He spent; G. Fowler Stewart // several years travelling the world, returned to Adelaide in 1889 and in 1890 married Laura Hill, youngest daughter of William Hill. When D & J Fowler was floated as a public company, Stewart was sent to London as a Director. He returned to Adelaide in 1901 and in 1914 retired from the Company. He died suddenly at home as a result of a heart attack. Stewart was Stewart married Laura Hill (1863–1957) on 26 June 1890. Laura was a granddaughter of John Dunn of Mount Barker. They had a home "Waldo", Glenelg; later "Waldo", Kensington Gardens G. Fowler Stewart George [sep] knowledge2: G. Fowler Stewart:  George Fowler Stewart (1861 – 3 January 1917), generally known as Fowler Stewart, was a Scots-born businessman and public figure in Adelaide, South Australia. ; G. Fowler Stewart: Stewart was the youngest son of Charles Stewart, a prominent manufacturer of Kirkcaldy, Fifeshire, Scotland, and was educated at a college in Edinburgh. In 1879 he started work at the London office of D. & J. Fowler founded by his uncles David, James and (later) George Fowler.  In 1881 he was sent to Adelaide to learn the business there, and in 1887 took over management of the Fremantle, Western Australia branch. He spent several years travelling the world, returned to Adelaide in 1889 and in 1890 married Laura Hill, youngest daughter of William Hill. When D & J Fowler was floated as a public company, Stewart was sent to London as a Director. He returned to Adelaide in 1901 and in 1914 retired from the Company.[1] ; G. Fowler Stewart: He died suddenly at home as a result of a heart attack. ; G. Fowler Stewart: Stewart was ; G. Fowler Stewart: Stewart married Laura Hill (1863–1957) on 26 June 1890. Laura was a granddaughter of John Dunn of Mount Barker.
knowledge1: Johann Christian von Engel // Johann Christian von Engel Johann Christian von Engel (1770–1814) was a Hungarian historian. He was born in Leutschau (today Levoča, Slovakia), Hungary, and received his education at the University of Göttingen, where Heyne and Schlözer were among his teachers. He wrote several historical works which in their day were treasure houses of knowledge and scholarship. He was the first to put the history of Hungary on a sound scholarly basis. In 1812 he was ennobled. His greatest works are "Geschichte des ungarischen Reiches und seine Nebenländer" (“History of imperial Hungary and neighboring lands,” 5 vols., 1797–1804) and "Geschichte des Königreichs; Johann Christian von Engel // Ungarn" (“History of the kingdom of Hungary,” 5 vols., 1814). Johann Christian von Engel Johann Christian von Engel (1770–1814) was a Hungarian historian. He was born in Leutschau (today Levoča, Slovakia), Hungary, and received his education at the University of Göttingen, where Heyne and Schlözer were among his teachers. He wrote several historical works which in their day were treasure houses of knowledge and scholarship. He was the first to put the history of Hungary on a sound scholarly basis. In 1812 he was ennobled. His greatest works are "Geschichte des ungarischen Reiches und seine Nebenländer" (“History of imperial Hungary [sep] knowledge2: Johann Christian von Engel: Johann Christian von Engel (1770–1814) was an Austrian historian of Ukrainian, Romanian, Hungarian, Croatian, and German history. ; Johann Christian von Engel: He was born in Leutschau (today Levoča, Slovakia), then belonging to Kingdom of Hungary under Habsburg monarchy, and received his education at the University of Göttingen, where Heyne and Schlözer were among his teachers. He wrote several historical works which in their day were treasure houses of knowledge and scholarship. He was the first to put the history of Hungary, Ukraine, and the Danubian principalities on a sound scholarly basis. In 1812 he was ennobled. ; Johann Christian von Engel: His greatest works are Die Geschichte der Ukraine und der ukrainische Kosaken, wie auch der Königreiche Halitsch-Wladimir ("History of Ukraine and the Ukrainian Cossacks, along with the Kingdom of Halych-Volodymyr", Halle 1796) Geschichte des ungarischen Reiches und seine Nebenländer (“History of imperial Hungary and neighboring lands,” 5 vols., 1797–1804); Geschichte der Moldau und Walachey (Halle, 1804) and Geschichte des Königreichs Ungarn (“History of the kingdom of Hungary,” 5 vols., 1814). ; Johann Christian von Engel: Johann Christian von Engel (n. 17 octombrie 1770, Leutschau, astăzi Levoča, Slovacia - d. 20 martie 1814, Viena) a fost un istoric austriac de etnie germană. ; Johann Christian von Engel: Fiind unul dintre precursorii lui Robert Roesler, a susținut înaintea acestuia teoria conform căreia poporul român s-ar fi format numai în regiuni din sudul Dunării și ar fi emigrat la nord pe fluviu abia în secolul al IX-lea.
knowledge1: Balázs Baji // European Championships and the bronze medal at the 2017 World Championships. Balázs Baji Balázs Baji (; born 9 June 1989) is a Hungarian track and field athlete who specializes in the 60 metres hurdles and 110 metres hurdles. Among his best results in 110 metres hurdles are a seventh place from the 2008 World Junior Championships, a sixth place from the 2011 Summer Universiade and a silver medal from the 2011 European U23 Championships which he achieved with a new Hungarian U23 record. For his performances he was named the best U23 male athlete in Hungary in 2011. In his [sep] knowledge2: Bekő Balázs: Magó (1937) •  Singer (1938) •  Steiner (1947) •  Fehérvári (1948) •  Horváth F. (1949) •  Nagy J. (1951) •  Serényi (1952) •  Horváth J. (1952) •  Dragollovich (1952) •  Kósa (1953) •  Dragollovich (1953) •  Jánosi (1953) •  Weisz (1957) •  Garamszegi (1957) •  Fekete (1957) •  Molnár F. (1958–59) •  Toricska (1960) •  Hauser (1960–61) •  Seres (1961) •  Hauser (1961) •  Kósa (1962–63) •  Molnár F. (1963) •  Kovács S. (1964) •  Fejes (1965) •  Dombóvári (1966) •  Németh J. (1967) •  Lyka A. (1968–69) •  Lenner (1969) •  Vass J. (1969–70) •  Varga B. (1971–75) •  Máté (1975–76) •  Bánáti (1976–77) •  Bánhidi (1977) •  Vereb (1978) •  Gacs (1978–79) •  Vereb (1979–82) •  Czimmermann (1982–83) •  Sz. Tóth (1984–85) •  Losonczi (1986) •  Bende (1986–87) •  Linka (1987–88) •  Sz. Tóth (1988–91) •  Dezsőfi (1991) •  Ádám (1991–93) •  Bánhidi (1993–94) •  Linka (1994–96) •  Dajka (1996) •  Somogyi (1996) •  Pataki (1996) •  Linka (1996–97) •  Kajtár (1997–98) •  Szabó Gy. (1998–99) •  Gracza (1999) •  Nagy L. (1999–2001) •  Gabala (2001–02) •  Kiprich (2002–03) •  Pătraşcu (2003) •  Gracza (2003–04) •  Glázer (2004) •  Gálhidi (2004) •  Leskó (2004–05) •  Gracza (2005) •  Pătraşcu (2005) •  Vági mb. (2005) •  Török (2006) •  Varga (2006–07) •  Nagy T. (2007) •  Török (2007) •  Sivić (2007–09) •  Csertői (2009–10) •  Urbányi (2010) •  Sivić (2010–11) •  Török (2011–12) •  Horváth F. (2012–13) •  Bekő (2013–15) •  Márton (2015) •  Némedi (2016–18) •  Szabó T.. (2018–19) •  Kuntić (2019) •  Gombos (2020–2021) •  Szabó I. (2021–)
knowledge1: David Bogue // David Bogue David Bogue (18 February 175025 October 1825) was a British nonconformist leader. He was born in the parish of Coldingham, Berwickshire, Scotland. After a course of study in Edinburgh, he was licensed to preach by the Church of Scotland, but made his way to London in 1771, to teach in schools at Edmonton, Hampstead and Camberwell. In 1777, he settled as minister of the Congregational church at Gosport in Hampshire. His predecessors at the Independent Chapel of Gosport were the Rev. James Watson (1770–76) and the Rev. Thomas Williams (1750–70). In 1771 he established an institution for preparing; David Bogue // with James Bennett, minister at Romsey, wrote a well-known "History of Dissenters" (3 vols., 1809). Another of his writings was an "Essay on the Divine Authority of the New Testament". He died at Brighton. David Bogue David Bogue (18 February 175025 October 1825) was a British nonconformist leader. He was born in the parish of Coldingham, Berwickshire, Scotland. After a course of study in Edinburgh, he was licensed to preach by the Church of Scotland, but made his way to London in 1771, to teach in schools at Edmonton, Hampstead and Camberwell. In 1777, he settled as minister of the [sep] knowledge2: David Bogue: David Bogue (18 February 1750 – 25 October 1825) was a British nonconformist religious leader. ; David Bogue: He was born at Hallydown Farm, in the parish of Coldingham, Berwickshire, Scotland, the son of John Bogue, farmer, and his wife, Margaret Swanston. He received his early education in Eyemouth.[1] ; David Bogue: After studying Divinity at Edinburgh University, he was licensed to preach by the Church of Scotland, but, failing to find a patron in Scotland, was sent by the Church to London in 1771, to teach in schools at Edmonton, Hampstead and then Mansion House Cottage in Camberwell. In 1777, he settled as minister of the independent Congregational church at Gosport in Hampshire.[2] His predecessors at the Independent Chapel of Gosport were James Watson (1770–76) and Thomas Williams (1750–70).[3] ; David Bogue: He was also involved in founding the British and Foreign Bible Society and the Religious Tract Society, and in conjunction with James Bennett, minister at Romsey, wrote a well-known History of Dissenters (3 vols., 1809). Another of his writings was an Essay on the Divine Authority of the New Testament.[6] ; David Bogue: In 1815 Yale University awarded him a doctor of divinity (DD).
knowledge1: Grayston Burgess // Grayston Burgess Grayston Burgess (Cheriton, Kent 7 April 1932) is an English countertenor and conductor. A former member of the Purcell Singers, Burgess formed the Purcell Consort of Voices in 1963. He also sang with the Studio der frühen Musik and the Musica Reservata Ensemble of Michael Morrow and John Beckett. Burgess premiered compositions including Michael Tippett's "Songs for Ariel". After moving to rural Herefordshire in the 1980s, he taught singing at Ellerslie School, Malvern, and, on its closure, at Malvern College. His pupils included ex.Swingle Singer Wendy Nieper. In 2000 he accepted an invitation to help form, and to; Grayston Burgess // actively discriminates against the inclusion of women and girls in Cathedral and church choirs. Countertenor - Soloist Conductor - Purcell Consort of Voices Grayston Burgess Grayston Burgess (Cheriton, Kent 7 April 1932) is an English countertenor and conductor. A former member of the Purcell Singers, Burgess formed the Purcell Consort of Voices in 1963. He also sang with the Studio der frühen Musik and the Musica Reservata Ensemble of Michael Morrow and John Beckett. Burgess premiered compositions including Michael Tippett's "Songs for Ariel". After moving to rural Herefordshire in the 1980s, he taught singing at Ellerslie School, Malvern, and, on [sep] knowledge2: Grayston Burgess: Grayston Burgess (Cheriton, Kent 7 April 1932 – 6 March 2019[1] was an English countertenor and conductor. ; Grayston Burgess: As a boy Burgess was a chorister in the choir of Canterbury Cathedral during the second world war. He then attended Cheltenham College before winning a choral scholarship to sing in the Choir of King's College, Cambridge under Boris Ord.[1]
knowledge1: Braulio Lara // Braulio Lara Braulio Armando Lara (born December 20, 1988) is a Dominican professional baseball player for the Generales de Durango of the Mexican Baseball League. He previously played in the KBO League for the SK Wyverns. Lara signed as an international free agent with the Tampa Bay Rays. The Miami Marlins selected Lara from the Rays in the 2012 Rule 5 draft, but returned him to the Rays before the 2013 season. In 2016, Lara signed with the SK Wyverns of the KBO League. Lara signed a minor league pact with the Washington Nationals in November 2016 with an invitation; Braulio Lara // to spring training. He elected free agency on November 6, 2017. On February 20, 2018, Lara signed with the Sultanes de Monterrey of the Mexican Baseball League. He was traded to the Generales de Durango on April 28, 2018. Lara was released on May 5, 2018. Braulio Lara Braulio Armando Lara (born December 20, 1988) is a Dominican professional baseball player for the Generales de Durango of the Mexican Baseball League. He previously played in the KBO League for the SK Wyverns. Lara signed as an international free agent with the Tampa Bay Rays. The Miami Marlins selected Lara from [sep] knowledge2: Braulio Lara: Braulio Armando Lara Peguero (December 20, 1988 – April 20, 2019)  was a Dominican professional baseball pitcher. He played in the KBO League for the SK Wyverns in 2016. ; Braulio Lara: Lara signed as an international free agent with the Tampa Bay Rays in 2008. He spent his first two professional seasons with the Dominican Summer League Rays, and logged a 7–5 record and 3.73 ERA in 30 total appearances.[1] On December 31, 2009, Lara was released by the Rays, but re–signed with the team on a minor league contract on June 18, 2010. He spent the remainder of the year with the rookie–level Princeton Rays, recording a 6–4 record and 2.18 ERA with 58 strikeouts across 13 starts.[2] ; Braulio Lara: Lara spent the 2011 season with the Single–A Bowling Green Hot Rods, starting 25 games and registering a 5–11 record and 4.94 ERA with 111 strikeouts in 120+1⁄3 innings pitched.[3] In 2012, Lara pitched in 25 games (starting 21) for the High–A Charlotte Stone Crabs, and went 6–10 with a 5.71 ERA and 82 strikeouts in 112.0 innings of work.[4] ; Braulio Lara: On December 6, 2012, the Miami Marlins selected Lara from the Rays in the Rule 5 draft,[5] On March 17, 2013, Miami returned him to the Rays organization.[6] That year, he spent the season with the Double–A Montgomery Biscuits, and also reached Triple–A for the first time, playing in one game for the Durham Bulls. In 45 games for Montgomery, he registered a 4.38 ERA with 53 strikeouts in 72.0 innings of work.[7] ; Braulio Lara: Lara again split the 2014 season between Durham and Montgomery. He appeared in 45 contests between the two affiliates, and pitched to a cumulative 5.77 ERA with 57 strikeouts and 3 saves in 57+2⁄3 innings pitched.[8]
knowledge1: Theophilus Annorbaah // Theophilus Annorbaah Theophilus Annorbaah (born 17 September 1989) is a Ghanaian professional footballer who currently plays for Medeama SC and the Ghana national football team. Theophilus Annorbaah played for Ghana Premier League club Ashanti Gold SC, prior to signing for Ghana Premier League club and Tarkwa based Medeama SC in May 2011. On 14 July 2013, Annorbaah won his first title with his club Medeama, after a 1–0 win over Asante Kotoko in the final of the Ghanaian FA Cup. In November 2013, coach Maxwell Konadu, invited Annorbaah to be a part of the Ghana national football team squad for; Theophilus Annorbaah // the 2013 WAFU Nations Cup. Annorbaah helped the Ghana national football team to a first-place finish after the Ghana national football team beat Senegal national football team by three goals to one. Annorbaah was part of the Ghana national football team squad that finished runner-up at the 2014 African Nations Championship. Theophilus Annorbaah Theophilus Annorbaah (born 17 September 1989) is a Ghanaian professional footballer who currently plays for Medeama SC and the Ghana national football team. Theophilus Annorbaah played for Ghana Premier League club Ashanti Gold SC, prior to signing for Ghana Premier League club and Tarkwa based Medeama SC [sep] knowledge2: Theophilus Annorbaah: Theophilus Annorbaah (born 17 September 1989) is a Ghanaian professional footballer who currently plays for Medeama SC and the Ghana national football team.[1] ; Theophilus Annorbaah: Theophilus Annorbaah played for Ghana Premier League club Ashanti Gold SC,[2] prior to signing for Ghana Premier League club and Tarkwa based Medeama SC in May 2011.[3] On 14 July 2013, Annorbaah won his first title with his club Medeama, after a 1–0 win over Asante Kotoko in the final of the Ghanaian FA Cup.[4] ; Theophilus Annorbaah: In November 2013, coach Maxwell Konadu invited Annorbaah to be included in the Ghana national football team for the 2013 WAFU Nations Cup.[5] He helped the Ghana national football team to a first-place finish after the Ghana national football team beat Senegal national football team by three goals to one.[6] Annorbaah was included in the Ghana national football team for the 2014 African Nations Championship that finished runner-up.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Dominique Blake // Dominique Blake Dominique Blake (born 15 February 1987) is a Jamaican track and field athlete. Blake won a gold medal at the 2010 Central American and Caribbean Games and was accidentally awarded with a bronze medal at the 2012 Summer Olympics. She was banned for years after testing positive for methylhexanamine and has returned to athletic competition in 2017. Blake was born on 15 February 1987 in Bronx, New York. She spent four years as an athlete for Penn State University starting in 2004 and graduated from Penn State with a communications degree. Blake started her athletic career for the; Dominique Blake // × 400 m event, Blake was accidentally awarded an Olympic bronze medal by the Jamaica Olympic Association. She did not return the medal, however. In 2013, Blake was suspended for six years after she tested positive for methylhexanamine. After her ban was lowered to years, Blake came back into competition in January 2017. Later that year, in compliance with International Association of Athletics Federations rules that mandate the return of all medals and prizes after positive testing for forbidden substances, Blake gave back her Olympic bronze medal to the Jamaica Olympic Association. Dominique Blake Dominique Blake (born 15 February 1987) [sep] knowledge2: Dominique Blake: Dominique Blake (born 15 February 1987) is a Jamaican track and field athlete. Blake won a gold medal at the 2010 Central American and Caribbean Games and was accidentally awarded a bronze medal at the 2012 Summer Olympics. She was banned for 4+1⁄2 years after testing positive for methylhexanamine and returned to athletic competition in 2017. ; Dominique Blake: Blake was born on 15 February 1987 in Bronx, New York. She began her career as an indoor track and field athlete in 2002 before she started to compete in outdoor track and field events the following year.[1][2] Blake spent four years as an athlete for Penn State University starting in 2004[3] and graduated from Penn State with a communications degree.[4] ; Dominique Blake: As a NCAA athlete, Blake was 12th in the 4x400 meter relay with Penn State at the 2006 NCAA Division I Indoor Track and Field Championships.[5] The following year, Blake and her 4x400 meter relay team was 4th at the 2007 NCAA Division I Indoor Track and Field Championships. During the 2007 indoor championships, Blake and her three teammates finished in 13th in the distance medley event.[6] At the 2008 NCAA Division I Indoor Track and Field Championships, Blake and her teammates were 5th in the 4x400 meter relay. At individual events for the 2008 NCAA Indoor Championships, Blake did not advance past the 400 meters heats and finished 17th overall.[7] ; Dominique Blake: At the 2006 USA Outdoor Track and Field Championships, Blake was disqualified after she failed a drug test for ephedrine. Following the event, Blake was banned from competitions for nine months.[8] During the 2008 United States Olympic Trials, Blake was 23rd overall in the 400 meters after she did not advance farther than the preliminaries.[9] ; Dominique Blake: For Jamaica, Blake participated at the 2010 Central American and Caribbean Games where she won a gold medal in the 4 x 400 meters relay.[10] At the 2010 Commonwealth Games, Blake was 12th in the 4 x 400 meters relay with the Jamaican team that did not reach the final.[11][12] For the 400 meters at that year's Commonwealth Games, Blake got to the semi-finals and finished overall in 18th place.[13][11] She also was at the 2012 IAAF World Indoor Championships but did not win a medal.[14]
knowledge1: Pablo Ganet // Pablo Ganet Pablo Ganet Comitre (born 4 November 1994) is an Equatoguinean professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for CD San Roque de Lepe and the Equatorial Guinea national team. Born in Málaga, Andalusia, Ganet graduated from Real Betis' youth setup. In the 2013 summer he joined Málaga CF's reserve team, and made his senior debuts for the latter in Tercera División. On 20 August 2014 Ganet joined UD San Sebastián de los Reyes, also in the fourth level. After being available through his father, Ganet was included in Esteban Becker's Equatorial Guinea 23-men list for the 2015 Africa; Pablo Ganet // Cup of Nations on 4 January 2015. Three days later he made his full international debut, coming on as a second half substitute in a 1–1 friendly draw against Cape Verde. Pablo Ganet Pablo Ganet Comitre (born 4 November 1994) is an Equatoguinean professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for CD San Roque de Lepe and the Equatorial Guinea national team. Born in Málaga, Andalusia, Ganet graduated from Real Betis' youth setup. In the 2013 summer he joined Málaga CF's reserve team, and made his senior debuts for the latter in Tercera División. On 20 August 2014 Ganet joined [sep] knowledge2: Pablo Ganet: Pablo Ganet Comitre (born 4 November 1994) is a professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Primera Federación club CD Alcoyano. Born in Spain, he plays for the Equatorial Guinea national team. ; Pablo Ganet: Born in Málaga, Andalusia, Ganet graduated from Real Betis' youth setup. In the 2013 summer he joined Málaga CF's reserve team, and made his senior debuts for the latter in the Tercera División. ; Pablo Ganet: On 20 August 2014, Ganet joined UD San Sebastián de los Reyes, also in the fourth level.[1] ; Pablo Ganet: After being eligible through his father, Ganet was included in Esteban Becker's 23-man Equatoguinean squad for the 2015 Africa Cup of Nations on 4 January 2015.[2] Three days later he made his full international debut, coming on as a second half substitute in a 1–1 friendly draw against Cape Verde.[3] ; Pablo Ganet: Pablo Ganet Cómitre (Málaga, España, 4 de noviembre de 1994) es un futbolista hispano-ecuatoguineano que juega como centrocampista en el C. D. Alcoyano de la Primera Federación.
knowledge1: Lucas Moura // Lucas Moura Lucas Rodrigues Moura da Silva (born 13 August 1992), known as Lucas Moura () or simply Lucas, is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as a right winger for English club Tottenham Hotspur and the Brazil national team. Lucas started his football career at São Paulo FC in 2005. Having had prominence at youth level, he was promoted to play professionally by Milton Cruz. Lucas made his debut with the São Paulo first-team in 2010, scoring 4 goals and providing four assists in 25 appearances. In the same year, he stated his desire to be known for his [sep] knowledge2: João Lucas (footballer, born 1991): This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football defender born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Daniel Ndambuki // Magazine (DJ Shitii) and Dr. Kingori. Daniel Ndambuki aka Churchill is one of the lucky Kenyans to be on Who Is Who List where according to the website whoswho.co.ke, the Machakos County born comedian studied at Mumbuni High School. Among the films he has featured in include: "The First Grader" (2010) and (2007). Chuchill, together with KJ, Kajairo, Mudomo Baggy, and Nyambane, created “Red Kona”. This increased their fan-base. Churchill went to co-present with Maina Kageni on Classic 105 FM (Which he still does today) doubling up as “the Tea Lady-... Philigona” and as mwalimu King’angi . He is rated [sep] knowledge2: Josiah Maduabuchi: Josiah Maduabuchi (born 16 April 1988 in Lagos) is a Nigerian football player currently with Lobi Stars F.C.[1] ; Josiah Maduabuchi: Maduabuchi began his career with Wikki Tourists F.C.[2] and joined 2007 to Enyimba International F.C. He joined Lobi Stars in 2015[3] ; Josiah Maduabuchi: He plays as a versatile central attacking midfielder.[4] ; Josiah Maduabuchi: On 15 April 2010 he earned his first call-up for the Super Eagles and was part of the Training Camp for the 2010 FIFA World Cup in South Africa.[5] ; Josiah Maduabuchi: This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Nigeria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Esteban Espíndola // He scored in the aforementioned tournament, converting a penalty in a group stage match against Germany. Esteban Espíndola Esteban Ezequiel Espíndola López (born 22 March 1992) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a defender for Olimpia. Espíndola began his career with Argentine Primera División club River Plate, appearing on the bench twice in the league prior to making his debut in the 2012–13 Copa Argentina against Estudiantes. In July 2013, Espíndola joined fellow top-flight team Atlético de Rafaela on loan. Over the course of the 2013–14 Argentine Primera División season he made just three appearances for Rafaela. 2014 [sep] knowledge2: Esteban Espíndola: After twenty appearances in all competitions in his first three seasons with Belgrano, Espíndola was loaned out to Primera B Nacional team San Martín in August 2017.[1][5] His campaign with the club ended with promotion to the top division.[1] Olimpia of the Liga Nacional in Honduras completed the signing of Espíndola on 18 August 2018.[1] He participated in fourteen fixtures for Olimpia, before terminating his contract in December.[1][6] In January 2019, Espíndola agreed to sign for Racing de Córdoba in Argentina's Torneo Federal A.[7] He suffered relegation with them.[1] Espíndola then went back to Honduras with Marathón.[8]
knowledge1: Nancy Onyango // Nancy Onyango Nancy Asiko Onyango, commonly known as Nancy Onyango, is a Kenyan accountant, businesswoman and corporate executive, who is the Director of the Office of Internal Audit and Inspection at the International Monetary Fund. She was appointed on 4 December 2017, with the appointment to take effect on 1 February 2018. Before her appointment, she served as the CEO of Reliance Risk Advisory Solutions, a Nairobi-based consultancy firm. She was born in Kenya, attending local schools for her pre-university education. In 1984, she was admitted to the University of Nairobi (UoN), graduating in 1987, with a Bachelor of Commerce; Nancy Onyango // risk & compliance for the African continent, until August 2016. In December 2017, she was appointed to lead the Internal Audit unit at the IMF, effective February 2018. She holds several board appointments, including as (a) Non-executive director of Kenya Commercial Bank Group (b) Non-executive director of Cytonn Investments (c) Fairtrade Africa, where she chairs the board's audit and finance committee. Nancy Onyango Nancy Asiko Onyango, commonly known as Nancy Onyango, is a Kenyan accountant, businesswoman and corporate executive, who is the Director of the Office of Internal Audit and Inspection at the International Monetary Fund. She was appointed on [sep] knowledge2: Nancy Onyango: Nancy Asiko Onyango, commonly known as Nancy Onyango, is a Kenyan accountant, businesswoman and corporate executive, who is the Director of the Office of Internal Audit and Inspection at the International Monetary Fund. She was appointed on 4 December 2017, with the appointment to take effect on 1 February 2018.[1] Before her appointment, she served as the CEO of Reliance Risk Advisory Solutions, a Nairobi-based consultancy firm.[1][2] ; Nancy Onyango: For a period of nearly four years, from July 1995 until December 1998, she worked as a manager at PricewaterhouseCoopers, at their location in Uxbridge, London, United Kingdom. Following that, she was promoted to senior manager at the same firm, where she worked for another three and half years until August 2002. In July 2005, she was appointed Partner at PwC, leading the consulting unit at PwC East Africa, based in Nairobi, Kenya, specializing in technology, governance risk and compliance, serving in that capacity until June 2012. In July 2012, she was named the head of the then newly created Risk Assurance Services Unit at PwC East Africa, serving there until October 2014.[3] ; Nancy Onyango: In January 2015, for a period of 20 months, she was appointed partner at Ernst & Young, serving as the head of governance, risk & compliance for the African continent, until August 2016.[3] In December 2017, she was appointed to lead the Internal Audit unit at the IMF, effective February 2018.[1][2] ; Nancy Onyango: Nancy Onyango is a married mother of three sons.[4] ; Nancy Onyango: A mụrụ ya na Kenya, ọ gàrà ụlọ akwụkwọ dị na mpaghara maka agụmakwụkwọ ya tupu mahadum. Na 1984, a nabatara ya na Mahadum Nairobi (UoN), ọ gụsịrị akwụkwọ na 1987, ma nweta nzere bachelọ nke Commerce (BCom) na Akaụntụ na ihe gbasara ego. Ọ gara n'ihu na akwụkwọ ya na UoN, ọ gụsịrị akwụkwọ na 1989, nweta nzere Master of Business Administration (MBA). Mgbe e mesịrị n'afọ 2013, ọ debanyere aha na United States International University Africa, ebe ọ gụrụ wee gụsịe akwụkwọ na 2016 wee nweta nzere Dọkịta nke Business Administration (DrBA). Dị ka akụkụ nke ọmụmụ doctoral ya, ọ gụrụ akwụkwọ na Columbia Business School, na New York City. [3]
knowledge1: Salome Maswime // Salome Maswime Salome Maswime is a South African clinician and health expert. She is an Obstetrician and Gynaecologist at the Chris Hani Baragwanath Hospital and Director of the University of the Witwatersrand Obstetrics and Gynaecology Clinical Research Division. Maswime is from Limpopo. Maswime graduate in medicine from the University of KwaZulu-Natal in 2005. During her medical internship, Maswime saw two deaths in Greytown, KwaZulu-Natal. She secured a PhD position supported by the Carnegie Corporation of New York and the South African Medical Research Council that allowed her to find ways to improve the lives of mothers and infants. She completed; Salome Maswime // Fellowship in 2018. Her fellowship allows her to research the causes of stillbirths in HIV-positive people. The fellowship is worth R2.1 million. Salome Maswime Salome Maswime is a South African clinician and health expert. She is an Obstetrician and Gynaecologist at the Chris Hani Baragwanath Hospital and Director of the University of the Witwatersrand Obstetrics and Gynaecology Clinical Research Division. Maswime is from Limpopo. Maswime graduate in medicine from the University of KwaZulu-Natal in 2005. During her medical internship, Maswime saw two deaths in Greytown, KwaZulu-Natal. She secured a PhD position supported by the Carnegie Corporation of New York and [sep] knowledge2: Salome Maswime: Salome Maswime is a South African clinician and global health expert. She is an Obstetrician and Gynaecologist and the Head of Global Surgery at the University of Cape Town.[1][2] She advocates for women's health rights,  equity in surgical and maternal care, and providing adequate health services to remote and underserved populations.[3]  She advises and consults for many institutions, including the World Health Organization.[4] In 2017, she was honored with the Trailblazer and Young Achiever Award. She is a member of the Academy of Science of South Africa.[5] ; Salome Maswime: Salome Maswime is from Limpopo.[6] Her father was a theology professor at the University of Venda.[2] She graduated in medicine from the University of KwaZulu-Natal in 2005.[7] During her medical internship, she saw two mothers die in a maternity ward in Greytown, KwaZulu-Natal.[8] This experience inspired her to train as a specialist obstetrician and gynecologist, as she feared she would "remain part of the problem that was leading to many preventable and unjust maternal deaths."[2] ; Salome Maswime: Maswime spent a decade at the University of the Witwatersrand in Johannesberg and at the Chris Hani Baragwanath Academic Hospital in Soweto.[2] During this time, she realized she wanted to continue her formal education to understand the underlying causes of negative outcomes for mothers and neonates in childbirth. ; Salome Maswime: Maswime is an executive member of the South African Perioperative Research Group.[10] She is a member of the International Network of Obstetric Survey Systems.[6] She was a lecturer and Director of the University of the Witwatersrand Obstetrics and Gynaecology Clinical Research Division and an obstetrician at the Chris Hani Baragwanath Hospital Academic Hospital.[11] She works with women with high risk pregnancies.[12] Her research considers maternal near miss and mortality.[9][13] She found that maternal deaths from bleeding during caesarean sections have increased in South Africa.[14] She compared the preparedness of hospitals for surgical complications in caesarean sections in southern Gauteng.[13] ; Salome Maswime: In 2019 she was appointed as a Professor of Global Surgery at the University of Cape Town.[1] In 2020, she was announced as one of the World Economic Forum's Class of 2020 Young Scientists, a group of 25 notable researchers who are "at the forefront of scientific discovery."[25]
knowledge1: Christian Almeida // División following relegation in 2013–14 - Liverpool won instant promotion back in 2014–15 as champions. He made his Copa Sudamericana bow in 2017 against Fluminense. In January 2018, Argentine Primera División side Defensa y Justicia signed Almeida. Two goals, against Racing Club (A) and Mitre (cup), in sixteen matches followed in his first season. Christian Almeida Christian Andrés Almeida Rodríguez (born 25 December 1989) is a Uruguayan professional footballer who plays as a defender for Defensa y Justicia. Liverpool were Almeida's first senior team, beginning in his homeland of Uruguay and subsequently remaining for six years with Liverpool. His debut [sep] knowledge2: Christian Almeida: In January 2018, Argentine Primera División side Defensa y Justicia signed Almeida.[1][5][6] Two goals, against Racing Club (A) and Mitre (cup), in sixteen matches followed in his first season.[1] Almeida departed in January 2019 to join Belgrano.[7] He remained for twelve months as Belgrano suffered relegation to Primera B Nacional.[1] Almeida left in January 2020, as he agreed terms with Godoy Cruz.[8][9] ; Christian Almeida: In October 2020, Almeida returned to his former club Liverpool.[10] He left the club again at the end of the year.[11] On 9 April 2021, Almeida signed with Nacional.[12]
knowledge1: Leon Stanislaw Jablecki // Leon Stanislaw Jablecki Leon Jablecki (born June 26, 1916) is an American rocket scientist. He was born June 26, 1916 in Central Falls, Rhode Island as the last son of a Polish immigrant. His parents died while he was very young so he was raised by his older brother Kasmir. Leon Jablecki graduated from Central Falls High School in 1934 then graduated from University of Rhode Island in 1938 with a degree in civil engineering. He worked with various state public works departments as a highway bridge designer. In 1939 he joined the US Army as an officer to become [sep] knowledge2: León Dujovne: León Dujovne (15 November 1898 – 16 January 1984) was an Argentine writer, philosopher, essayist and journalist.
knowledge1: Francisco Aguirre de la Hoz // From April 1978 until June 1979 he served as Minister for Economics and Manufacturing in the Valencian Regional Administration. He did not stand at the 1982 election, retiring from politics and moving to Barcelona where he founded a Business Association. Francisco Aguirre de la Hoz Francisco Aguirre de la Hoz (born 1943, in Ávila, Spain) is a Spanish lawyer and former politician. After qualifying as a lawyer at the University of Valladolid and University of Valencia, together with Emilio Attard, he helped to found the Valencian Regional Party and later, the Democratic Popular Party (PDP). Subsequently, the PDP, together with [sep] knowledge2: Francisco Urroz (rugby union): Urroz signed for Súper Liga Americana de Rugby side Selknam ahead of the 2020 Súper Liga Americana de Rugby season, and re-signed ahead of the 2022 Súper Liga Americana de Rugby season.[2] ; Francisco Urroz: Francisco Urroz may refer to: ; Francisco Urroz (footballer): Francisco Urroz Martínez (14 December 1920 – 22 January 1992) was a Chilean football defender. ; Francisco Urroz (footballer): Urroz played for Unión Española, becoming team captain and won the 1947 Primera División de Chile along with Colo-Colo.[1][2] ; Francisco Urroz (footballer): Urroz made 11 appearances for the Chile national team,[3] playing also in the 1950 FIFA World Cup.[4]
knowledge1: Roel Campos // Roel Campos Roel Clark Campos (born 1949) is a Hispanic-American business lawyer. He served as Securities and Exchange Commissioner between 2002–07 and is now a partner with the law firm Hughes Hubbard & Reed LLP. Campos was named to President-elect Barack Obama's economic advisory board and was considered a possible successor to former SEC chairman Christopher Cox. He is a current member of the Committee on Capital Markets Regulation, an independent and nonpartisan 501(c)(3) research organization dedicated to improving the regulation of U.S. capital markets. In 2008 Campos was appointed a member of the Board of Trustees of the International [sep] knowledge2: Rui Campos: Rui Campos or Rui (2 August 1922 – 2 January 2002) was a Brazilian football player.[1] He played for the Brazil in the 1950 FIFA World Cup.[1] ; Rui Campos: Born in São Paulo, He played for Bonsucesso, Fluminense, Bangu, São Paulo and Palmeiras during his career.[2] At São Paulo, he formed a successful midfield trio with José Carlos Bauer and Alfredo Noronha. ; Rui Campos: Rui Campos played 30 matches for the Brazil national team between 1944 and 1950, including 1950 FIFA World Cup matches. ; Rui Campos: This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football midfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Rui Campos: Rui Campos (born 2 August, 1922 – 2 January 2002) was a retired Brazilian football player. He has played for Brazil national team. He played as a defender, more precisely as a free, at the beginning of his career and had good technique, but following his transfer to the São Paulo, he turned into a midfielder, a role he played with a certain offensive propensity, which allowed him to score several goals. He formed an excellent understanding with Bauer and Noronha, nicknamed the "Golden Trio," which made the São Paulo midfield one of the best in the world at the time. Rui was regarded as one of the best ever football players.
knowledge1: Guillermo W. Méndez // Guillermo W. Méndez Guillermo W. Méndez (born 1955) is a Guatemalan theologian, educated in Guatemala, Central America, and in North America. After two decades serving as a Theology Professor in Guatemala, deeply challenged by Liberation Theology, he researched Law, Economics and Politics. Former member of the Latin American Theological Fraternity and the theological commission of the World Evangelical Fellowship, he developed a concern for the poor and engaged in the transformation of the Civil Law system of his native Guatemala, to undermine the privileges of the ruling political class and reform, through political and legal means, the State of Guatemala. [sep] knowledge2: Los Zetas: On 9 February 2018, Mexican authorities arrested the new leader José María Guízar Valencia alias "Z-43" in Mexico City in Roma neighbourhood. US offered $5m reward for his capture, he is responsible for importing thousands of kilograms of cocaine and methamphetamine to the US every year and murdered an untold number of Guatemalan civilians during the systematic takeover of the Guatemalan border region.[105]
knowledge1: Alfredo Lopez // involved in the leadership of both United States Social Forums, the World Social Forum, and, as MF/PL rep, the Association of Progressive Communications. Alfredo Lopez Alfredo Jose Miguel Lopez (born 1949) is an activist, writer, media producer, teacher and organizer in Brooklyn, New York. He is currently a well-known Internet activist and the Co-Director of May First/People Link, a progressive Internet users' organization and the Internet's oldest progressive provider. Lopez is the author of six books and thousands of articles. He was a top leader of the Puerto Rican Socialist Party during the 1970s. The main organizer of the Day [sep] knowledge2: Iván López Rodríguez: Marcó su primer gol con el conjunto tijuanense el 28 de enero de 2020 en el partido de vuelta de octavos de final ante el Atlético de San Luis en la Copa MX, al final con este gol su equipo terminó llevándose la victoria por la mínima y clasificando a la siguiente ronda.
knowledge1: Felipe Guréndez // Felipe Guréndez Felipe Guréndez Aldanondo (born 18 November 1975), sometimes known as just Felipe, is a Spanish retired professional footballer. Mainly a defensive midfielder, he could also operate as a defensive-minded right back. He played in 146 La Liga games over the course of 11 seasons (three goals), almost exclusively for Athletic Bilbao. Born in Vitoria-Gasteiz, Álava, Felipe was a product of Athletic Bilbao's prolific youth system. He made his debut for the first team on 3 January 1996 in a 1–0 home win against Real Zaragoza where he came on as a 46th-minute substitute for Bolo, but was never [sep] knowledge2: Felipe (footballer, born 1977): Felipe Jorge Loureiro (born 2 September 1977), known as Felipe, is a Brazilian football coach and former player who is head coach of Volta Redonda. ; Felipe (footballer, born 1977): A left-footed midfielder and left-back, Felipe is known for his playmaking style, that nicknamed him as Maestro, with his excellent ball control, dribbling skills, and vision for orchestrating offensive plays and providing precise passes. ; Felipe (footballer, born 1977): Felipe arrives in Vasco da Gama as a futsal player in 1984 at 6 years old. There, he met Pedrinho, who would be his profession colleague and also personal friend. Times later, in 1990 at 12 years old, Felipe came up through the ranks of Vasco da Gama as a youth player. In 1996, Felipe received his first chance between the professionals, playing as a left back. Until 1999, Felipe stood in Vasco da Gama, getting chances in the Brazil national team and consecrating himself as one of the greatest idols of the club. After an unsuccessful negotiation to Roma and injuries in 2000, Felipe in 2001, already playing as a left side midfielder since 1999, was loaned to Palmeiras, returning to play as a left back, and, posteriorly, to Atlético Mineiro. In 2002, returns to Vasco da Gama for a short time, playing as an left side midfielder, before a negotiated and goes to a mid-season spend in Galatasaray. In 2003, Felipe returns to Brazil, playing two seasons as a right winger for Flamengo. In 2005, after polemics, made a quickly move to Fluminense after goes to Al Sadd, spending five seasons in Middle East. In 2010, Felipe returns to Vasco da Gama, 14 years after his professional debut in the club. Felipe finished his playing career at Fluminense in 2013. ; Felipe (footballer, born 1977): He has seven caps with the Brazil national team, the first one on 23 September 1998. He won the Copa América in 2004. ; Felipe (footballer, born 1977): Years after his retirement as a footballer, Felipe started his career as a coach, debuting at Tigres do Brasil.[1]
knowledge1: Mateo Correa Magallanes // Mateo Correa Magallanes Saint Mateo Correa Magallanes (also known as Mateo Correa, Fr. Correa; 23 July 1866 – 6 February 1927) was a Knight of Columbus, of Council 2140. Correa was born at Tepechitlán, Zacatecas, Mexico. He attended the seminary at Zacatecas on a scholarship, in 1881. He was ordained as priest in 1893 at the age of 27. As a young priest, he gave first communion to Miguel Pro who also became a priest and was later martyred. Fr. Correa was assigned as a parish priest to Concepción del Oro in 1898, and then to Colotlán in 1908. Following; Mateo Correa Magallanes // during the Jubilee of Mexico. Mateo Correa Magallanes Saint Mateo Correa Magallanes (also known as Mateo Correa, Fr. Correa; 23 July 1866 – 6 February 1927) was a Knight of Columbus, of Council 2140. Correa was born at Tepechitlán, Zacatecas, Mexico. He attended the seminary at Zacatecas on a scholarship, in 1881. He was ordained as priest in 1893 at the age of 27. As a young priest, he gave first communion to Miguel Pro who also became a priest and was later martyred. Fr. Correa was assigned as a parish priest to Concepción del Oro in 1898, and then; Mateo Correa Magallanes // the government's repression of the Catholic Church in 1910, he went into hiding. He was assigned to Valparaíso in 1926. In 1927, during the government’s continuing persecution of the Church, Fr. Correa was arrested by soldiers as he was bringing Viaticum to a woman invalid. Accused of being part of the armed Cristero defense, he was jailed in Zacatecas, and then in Durango. On 5 February 1927, Fr. Correa was asked by General Eulogio Ortiz, to hear the confessions of some imprisoned members of the Cristeros, an uprising of Catholic men who decided to fight back against the persecution of [sep] knowledge2: Mateo Correa Magallanes: Mateo Correa Magallanes (also known as Mateo Correa, Fr. Correa; July 23, 1866 – February 6, 1927) was a Knight of Columbus, of Council 2140.[1] ; Mateo Correa Magallanes: Correa was born at Tepechitlán, Zacatecas, Mexico.  He attended the seminary at Zacatecas on a scholarship, in 1881. He was ordained as priest in 1893 at the age of 27. As a young priest, he gave first communion to Miguel Pro who also became a priest and was later martyred. Correa was assigned as a parish priest to Concepción del Oro in 1898, and then to Colotlán in 1908. Following the government's repression of the Catholic Church in 1910, he went into hiding. He was assigned to Valparaíso in 1926. ; Mateo Correa Magallanes: In 1927, during the government's continuing persecution of the church, Correa was arrested by soldiers as he was bringing Viaticum to a woman who was an invalid. Accused of being part of the armed Cristero defense, he was jailed in Zacatecas, and then in Durango. On February 5, 1927, Correa was asked by General Eulogio Ortiz to hear the confessions of some imprisoned members of the Cristeros, an uprising of Catholic men who decided to fight back against the persecution of the church led by Mexico's president Plutarco Elias Calles. Correa agreed to administer the Sacrament of Reconciliation to these prisoners, but afterward Ortiz demanded to know what the condemned prisoners had confessed. Correa refused. Ortiz then pointed a gun at Correa's head and threatened him with immediate death. Correa continued to refuse, and at dawn on February 6, 1927, he was taken to the cemetery on the outskirts of Durango and shot through the head.[2] ; Mateo Correa Magallanes: Mateo Correa Magallanes was canonized as a saint by Pope Francis on October 15, 2016, along with six other blesseds from different parts of the world. The canonization ceremony took place in St. Peter's Square at the Vatican and was attended by thousands of pilgrims from Mexico and other parts of the world. ; Mateo Correa Magallanes: In his homily, Pope Francis praised Saint Mateo Correa Magallanes for his heroic witness of faith and love, and for his willingness to give his life for the sake of the Gospel. He urged the faithful to follow the example of the new saints and to be witnesses of Christ in their daily lives, especially in the face of persecution and violence. Saint Mateo Correa Magallanes is remembered as a symbol of courage and fidelity to Christ, and his canonization is an important moment for the Catholic Church in Mexico and around the world. [3]
knowledge1: Nadia Bolz-Weber // Nadia Bolz-Weber Nadia Bolz-Weber (born 1969) is a Lutheran minister and public theologian. She served as the founding pastor of House for All Sinners and Saints, a congregation of the Evangelical Lutheran Church in America in Denver, Colorado, until July 8, 2018. She is also a two-time "New York Times" bestselling author. Bolz-Weber is known for her unusual approach to reaching others through her church. Heavily tattooed, she is considered a "performative pastor". Her work in the church is considered part of "a new Reformation" by scholar and writer Diana Butler Bass. Bolz-Weber grew up in Colorado Springs with a [sep] knowledge2: Ana Cláudia Bolzan: Ana Cláudia Bolzan (født 15. juli 1996) er en brasiliansk håndboldspiller. Hun spiller for EC Pinheiros og det brasilianske landshold. [1][2]
knowledge1: Essam Marzouk // engineer in Cairo, Marzouk grew up in a 5th-storey apartment at 2 Doctor El-Mahroky Street in the suburban Mohandeseen district of Cairo. Following his service in the Egyptian Army, he told his father he wanted to study in the United States, but instead moved to the Federally Administered Tribal Areas along the Pakistan-Afghanistan border at the age of 19. In 1986-87, he worked as an ambulance driver at the Red Crescent hospital in Peshawar, Pakistan where he met Egyptian-Canadian Ahmed Khadr, and later worked with the Muslim World League. From 1988-1993 he is alleged to have run an Afghan training [sep] knowledge2: Tarik Marzouk: Tarik Merzouk is a Moroccan footballer, who played for Sheikh Russel KC and other clubs.[1] ; Tarik Marzouk: The midfielder played in his homeland for FAR Rabat, KAC Kenitra, and MAT Tétouan.[2] ; Tarik Marzouk: Marzouk played for FAR in the 2007 CAF Champions League group stages.[3] ; Tarik Marzouk: This biographical article related to association football in Morocco, about a forward, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Tarik Marzouk: Pour les articles homonymes, voir Marzouk.
knowledge1: Dan Ariely // Dan Ariely Dan Ariely (; born April 29, 1967) is the James B. Duke Professor of Psychology and Behavioral Economics at Duke University and is the founder of The Center for Advanced Hindsight and co-founder of Kayma BEworks, Timeful, Genie and Shapa. Ariely is also associated with Qapital and Lemonade in the capacity of Chief Behavioral Economist and Chief Behavioral Officer, respectively. Ariely's TED talks have been viewed over 10 million times. He is the author of "Dollars and Sense", "Predictably Irrational", "The Upside of Irrationality", and "The Honest Truth about Dishonesty". All three books became "New York Times" best [sep] knowledge2: Ariel Behar: Ariel Behar (Spanish pronunciation: [aˈɾjel βeˈaɾ];[1][a] born November 12, 1989) is a Uruguayan professional tennis player.  He specializes in men's doubles and has won three ATP titles with Ecuadorian partner Gonzalo Escobar. His career-high doubles ranking is World No. 39 achieved on 31 January 2022. He has taken part of the Uruguay Davis Cup team since 2009.[2] ; Ariel Behar: Behar played tennis for the first time at 3 years old and began playing seriously aged 10. Growing up, he admired Roger Federer and Andre Agassi. He is from a Jewish family but is "not a big fan" of religion.[3] ; Ariel Behar: Since the mid 2010s, Behar competed primarily on the ATP Challenger Tour, where he has won 22 doubles titles. ; Ariel Behar: Partnering with Aliaksandr Bury, he was a semi-finalist at the 2017 Estoril Open, an ATP 250 tournament. ; Ariel Behar: He entered the main draw at the 2017 Wimbledon Championships, his first appearance at a Grand Slam.
knowledge1: Robin del Castillo // the first time that both talents were re-united on the same stage. Numerous media and newspapers related the event (Latin and British newspapers alike). Time out London described the event with terms as laudatory as: "a live set from acclaimed Dominican Republic salsa singer, Bello, with sumptuous backing from Robin del Castillo and his orchestra" Robin del Castillo Robin del Castillo was born in Cali Colombia. Robin has a real passion for Music and has been dreaming about music ever since the age of 7. Robin grew up in a country where music is all around in its purest and; Robin del Castillo // a couple of months, he became Robin del Castillo. He created his own Latin band and recorded 3 tropical albums: 2 of them were made with very well known cover songs and the third one, from his own inspiration, is called “ Pa’ Mi Tierra ”. Over the past 7 years, Robin Del Castillo has been playing and taking part in the most successful Latin events in London. In addition, he did musical accompaniment for singers like: David Pabon, Pedro Conga, Paquito Guzman, Luisito Carrion, Jose Bello, Mariano Civico, Roberto Blades among others. They also regularly perform in private parties,; Robin del Castillo // birthdays, Embassies (i.e. Panama, Australia, Peru, Mexico, Spain) and weddings, as for example Mr. Martin Campbell's wedding, Director of Casino Royal 007, in Geneva, Switzerland. His success went beyond UK’s frontiers, and extended to countries like: Spain, Italy, France, Switzerland, Dubai, Cyprus, Netherlands, Belgium where many people witnessed his talent and charisma on stage. Robin del Castillo was one of the artists nominated for the "GSD Media and Latin American Music award UK 2009", in the following categories: Best Latin song of the year with '"Aquella Mujer"', Best Latin music Video also with '"Aquella Mujer"', and the "Revelation Latino". 2009: [sep] knowledge2: Robin del Castillo:  Robin del Castillo  is a Colombian musician who is becoming internationally famous for his salsa music. Since 2001, Robin Del Castillo has been based in London (UK). His most famous song is perhaps "Aquella Mujer"[1] which he recorded in 2006 in Colombia. ; Robin del Castillo: Robin del Castillo was born in Cali, Colombia. Robin has a real passion for Music and has been dreaming about music ever since the age of 7.  Robin grew up in a country where music is all around in its purest and most divers form; he remembers listening, playing, and dancing to many kinds of rhythms. The richness of this background gave him the ability to sing any kind of music. However over the past years, working as a professional singer, he specialized in Latin Tropical Music (Salsa, Merengue, Cumbia, Bachata, Reggaeton, and Latin pop). ; Robin del Castillo: In the 90s in Cali, Colombia, a popular TV program SONEROS 4 was offering the chance to amateurs impassioned by music to perform in public. Singing has always been his passion. Therefore, in 1994, at the age of 15, Robin decided to participate in this TV Show. This was his first time performing in front of cameras and such a big crowd. Following the show, he received calls from numerous salsa bands in Cali. From this moment on, Robin took part in many well known bands in Colombia such as  Cali Sabor, The Metropolitan Police band (during his military service), Los Gomelos under the label of Sony Music Entertainment, the Merengue Band under the label of "Los lideres de Venezuela", and the Matacena Orchestra[2] under the label of FM Records. His career as a singer offered him the opportunity to visit many countries like: Ecuador, Peru, Venezuela, Spain, Italy, France, and England. ; Robin del Castillo: In 2001 Robin finally decided to take base in London (UK) to work and start a new life style. In the same year, he had the pleasure to meet Mr. Roberto Pla;[3] the leader of one of the most well known Latin jazz and Salsa band in the UK. ; Robin del Castillo: Over the past 7 years, Robin Del Castillo has been playing and taking part in the most successful Latin events in London. In addition, he did musical accompaniment for singers like: David Pabon, Pedro Conga, Paquito Guzman, Luisito Carrion, Jose Bello, Mariano Civico, Roberto Blades among others.
knowledge1: Amr Shabana // (4–6), 11–7, 11–10 (3–1), 11–7, Shabana stormed back to the top of his game in 2005. Over a short period, he acquired a new coach, Ahmed Tahir; a new manager, the former Egyptian international Omar Elborolossy; and a wife, Nadjla. ""All I have to worry about now is playing my matches – everything else is looked after for me now"", said Shabana. And the effect was plain to see as a week after winning the Heliopolis Open in his home town Cairo, the seventh-seeded Shabana beat David Palmer and James Willstrop, before defeating Anthony Ricketts in the final to claim [sep] knowledge2: Abdelhamid Shabana: *Club domestic league appearances and goals, correct as of 05:00, 7 April 2014 (UTC)‡ National team caps and goals, correct as of 1 June 2012 ; Abdelhamid Shabana: Abdelhameed Shabana (Arabic: Abd elhamed mostafa shapana ;born 2 October 1985) is an Egyptian footballer who is currently a free agent.[5] He is an electrifying attacking midfielder, who can also play as a striker or a winger. ; Abdelhamid Shabana: Abdelhameed Shabana is well known for crashing the top clubs of Egypt with his famous goals against Zamalek, Al-Ahly and Ismaily. ; Abdelhamid Shabana: He has been a regular international for the Egypt U20 and Egypt U23 team, and played in the African Games qualifiers, as well as winning the Qatar U23 Cup. ; Abdelhamid Shabana: This biographical article related to a midfielder from Egypt is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Hadja Fatimata Ouattara // Hadja Fatimata Ouattara Hadja Fatimata Ouattara (nee Sanon) is a Burkina Faso politician who has been Minister of Digital Economy and Postal Development since February 2017. Ouattara attended Sainte-Marie College in the Bobo-Dioulasso neighbourhood of Tounouma and has a degree in computer engineering from the Polytechnic University of Bobo-Dioulasso and a Masters in computer network and multimedia from the International Centre for Applied Advanced Studies at Humber College in Canada. In 2005, Ouattara became the webmaster of the Burkina Knowledge Management Network and created the Burkinabè Association for Linux and Free Software. She was Technical Advisor to the ICT Ministry. [sep] knowledge2: Zié Ouattara: Cresciuto nel settore giovanile dell'ASEC Mimosas, nel 2018 è stato acquistato dal Vitória Guimarães che lo ha aggregato per due stagioni alla propria seconda squadra. Il 19 ottobre 2020 ha debuttato in prima squadra giocando l'incontro di Primeira Liga vinto 1-0 contro il Boavista; termina la stagione 2020-2021 con complessive 10 presenze nella prima divisione portoghese.
knowledge1: Juan Nepomucino Goetz // Juan Nepomucino Goetz Juan Nepomucino Goetz () was an Austrian Catholic priest whose arrival in Cuba led to two extraordinary controversies. Goetz became Professor of Philosophy and Morality at the Imperial and Royal University of Vienna, and then, desiring to travel, was appointed music chaplain of the Cathedral of Santo Domingo in Hispaniola (Dominican Republic). Later, as priest and rector, he moves to San Fernando de Monte Cristi, and then to the wealthy parish of Môle Saint-Nicolas in Haiti. There he witnessed the slave uprising and the occupation of his parish by the British. When Toussaint-Louverture drives out the British; Juan Nepomucino Goetz // he rings the church bells and celebrates. But, all too soon! War flares up throughout the country, voodoo drums throb through the night, and white faces are none too popular. Deprived of alms and suffering from yellow fever, Goetz flees to Santiago de Cuba, where his knowledge of languages gives him a place as the 'foreigners' priest. When Esteban Salas y Castro, choirmaster in the Cathedral of Santiago de Cuba, died in 1803, the election of the new Maestro de Capilla was an extraordinary event. It had been a foregone conclusion that Francisco José Hierrezuelo, long-time assistant of Salas, would; Juan Nepomucino Goetz // half-scared smiles" (Carpentier, p136). After looking, listening and questioning, he wrote a first report to the town council full of acute assessments of key members of the choir: As a good musician preferring quality of sound to quantity, he reduced the number of positions, moved good young singers up in status, and recommended that any reduced in rank should retake the exam, both theoretical and practical. In 1806, under his plan, the singers and musicians were: choirmaster, four sopranos, two contraltos, two tenors, a baritone; two clarinets, two bassoons, two horns, four violins, bass viol, and bass. Juan Nepomucino Goetz [sep] knowledge2: Juan Nepomucino Goetz: Juan Nepomucino Goetz (German: Johannes Nepomuk Goetz) was an Austrian Catholic priest whose arrival in Cuba led to two extraordinary controversies. ; Juan Nepomucino Goetz: Goetz became Professor of Philosophy and Morality at the Imperial and Royal University of Vienna, and then, desiring to travel, was appointed music chaplain of the Cathedral of Santo Domingo in Hispaniola (Dominican Republic). Later, as priest and rector, he moved to San Fernando de Monte Cristi, and then to the wealthy parish of Môle Saint-Nicolas in Haiti. There he witnessed the slave uprising and the occupation of his parish by the British.  ; Juan Nepomucino Goetz: When Toussaint-Louverture drove out the British, he rang the church bells and celebrated. However, in the following period, Goetz fled to Santiago de Cuba, where his knowledge of languages gave him a place as the 'foreigners' priest.[1] ; Juan Nepomucino Goetz: When Esteban Salas y Castro, choirmaster in the Cathedral of Santiago de Cuba, died in 1803, the election of the new Maestro de Capilla was an extraordinary event. It had been a foregone conclusion that Francisco José Hierrezuelo, long-time assistant of Salas, would be elected. Came the day, and Hierrezuelo spotted a certain well-qualified German priest in the choir. Blind with rage, and fearing the bishop had planned a conspiracy to thwart him, Hierrezuelo refused to take the examination, picked up his pen and wrote infuriated letters. The bishop persuaded the German, none other than Goetz, to renounce his candidacy, but Hierrezuelo had so offended the bishop and the town council by his irate letters that, despite grovelling apologies, he got only a minor position in the chapel. He was never to become a maestro. The competent and hard-working Juan París was appointed, and Goetz moved on to Havana, where his arrival also had remarkable consequences. ; Juan Nepomucino Goetz: All were set for the examination when a letter, written on 29 July, 1803, arrived at the cathedral. It was from Goetz, offering his service.
knowledge1: Lodewicus du Plessis // Lodewicus du Plessis Lodewicus Johannes du Plessis was a South African academic, alternative Afrikaner political philosopher, and Calvinist. He was born on 10 February 1897 at Burgersdorp, Cape Province, South Africa. He was the son of Jacobus Albertus du Plessis and Laurika Postma. He married Engela Susanna van der Merwe on 12 January 1926. He died on 19 February 1968 at Potchefstroom, Transvaal, South Africa. Du Plessis matriculated in 1912 on Potchefstroom Gimnasium. He received his BA, BA Hons (Classical languages) and MA (Classical languages) at the University of Pretoria. Later he also received a Master degree in Economics, as; Lodewicus du Plessis // of Calvinism, Marxism and other possible beliefs. He was actively participating in Afrikaner politics, although he never stood for office. He was chairman of the Afrikaner Broederbond from 1930-1932. He was not scared to differ from political leaders such as J.B.M. Hertzog, DF Malan and J. G. Strijdom. His biggest clash was with H.F. Verwoerd, which caused him to be expelled from the National Party. Then, he also left the Afrikaner Broederbond. He was not in favour of Verwoerd’s racial policy and his definition of an Afrikaner. Lodewicus du Plessis Lodewicus Johannes du Plessis was a South African academic, alternative; Lodewicus du Plessis // well as a LLB (law degree). In 1918 he started as a senior lecturer in Classical languages at The Theological Centre of the Reformed Church in Potchefstroom. After obtaining the economics and law qualifications, he was offered a professorship in economics, political science and ethics at the Potchefstroom University for Christian Higher Education. In later years he focused on law. He was secretary of the commission who translated the Bible in Afrikaans and was Totius advisor. He was an alternative Calvinist, in the sense that he believed that only Calvinism is not the answer. He was open to a combination [sep] knowledge2: Lodewicus du Plessis: Lodewicus Johannes du Plessis (1897-1968) was a South African academic, alternative Afrikaner political philosopher, and Calvinist. ; Lodewicus du Plessis: He was born on 10 February 1897 in Burgersdorp, Cape Colony.[1] He was the son of Jacobus Albertus du Plessis and Laurika Postma. He married Engela Susanna van der Merwe on 12 January 1926. He died on 19 February 1968 in Potchefstroom, Transvaal, South Africa.[2] ; Lodewicus du Plessis: Du Plessis matriculated in 1912 from Potchefstroom Gimnasium. He received his BA, BA Hons (Classical languages) and MA (Classical languages) at the University of Pretoria.[3] Later he also received a master's degree in Economics, as well as an LL.B. (law degree).[4] ; Lodewicus du Plessis: In 1918 he started as a senior lecturer in Classical languages at The Theological Seminar of the Reformed Church (Afrikaans: Gereformeerde Kerke in Suid-Afrika) in Potchefstroom. After obtaining the economics and law qualifications, he was offered a professorship in economics, political science and ethics at the Potchefstroom University for Christian Higher Education. In later years he focused on law. He was secretary of the commission who translated the Bible in Afrikaans and was an advisor to Totius.[5] ; Lodewicus du Plessis: He was an alternative Calvinist, in the sense that he believed that only Calvinism is not the answer. He was open to a combination of Calvinism, Marxism and other possible beliefs.[6]
knowledge1: Worranit Thawornwong // Worranit Thawornwong Worranit Thawornwong (วรนิษฐ์ ถาวรวงศ์), better known as Mook (มุก) is a Thai actress and singer. She is best known as Junior in the 2015 Thai television series "Ugly Duckling Series: Perfect Match". Worranit Thawornwong was born on 9 October 1996 in Bangkok, Thailand. She is the second child in the family. Her brother, Jirakit Thawornwong, is also a actor. She attended high school at Satriwitthaya 2 School and currently studying in Kasetsart University. Worranit started her acting in 2014 through Channel Bang for the drama "Rukjing Pinker" as Bew. Later, she starred in another drama, Room Alone 401-410,; Worranit Thawornwong // drama. Notably "Mah Tun Welah Por Dee", "Kon Jao Choo" ("Bee Dup Bee Doo") for Ugly Duckling: Perfect Match and "Poot Wah Ruk Nai Jai" for Roon Pee Secret Love. Worranit Thawornwong Worranit Thawornwong (วรนิษฐ์ ถาวรวงศ์), better known as Mook (มุก) is a Thai actress and singer. She is best known as Junior in the 2015 Thai television series "Ugly Duckling Series: Perfect Match". Worranit Thawornwong was born on 9 October 1996 in Bangkok, Thailand. She is the second child in the family. Her brother, Jirakit Thawornwong, is also a actor. She attended high school at Satriwitthaya 2 School and [sep] knowledge2: Worranit Thawornwong: Worranit Thawornwong (วรนิษฐ์ ถาวรวงศ์), better known as Mook (Thai: มุก) is a Thai actress and singer. She is the most famous actress in GMMTV. She is best known for her role in the 2015 Thai television series Ugly Duckling Series: Perfect Match as Junior and in My Dear Loser as  Namkhing.[1] She is also the Brand Ambassador of Idolo Thailand. ; Worranit Thawornwong: Worranit Thawornwong was born on 9 October 1996 in Bangkok, Thailand.[2] She is the second child in the family. Her brother, Jirakit Thawornwong, is also an actor.[3] She attended high school at Satriwitthaya 2 School and graduated from the Faculty of Humanities at Kasetsart University. ; Worranit Thawornwong: Worranit started her acting career in 2014 through Channel Bang for the drama Rukjing Pinker as Bew. Later, she starred in another drama, Room Alone 401–410, as Snow. ; Worranit Thawornwong: In 2016, she became part in another drama, Kiss The Series, where she was paired with Sattaphong Phiangphor. She was also paired with March Chutavuth Pattarakampol in another series, U-Prince where they took part in "Ambitious Boss".[5] ; Worranit Thawornwong: In 2019, she was paired with Krissada Pornweroj in "Mia Noi" series. She was paired with Oil Thana Suttikamol in another series, "Plara Song Krueng".
knowledge1: S. Olvah Alhamid // S. Olvah Alhamid Syarifah Olvah Alhamid (; ; born March 24, 1990) or beter known as S. Olvah Alhamid is an Indonesian model from Kaimana Regency and became the first Papuan women who advanced to the Top 5 of Puteri Indonesia, precisely at the beauty pageant of Puteri Indonesia 2015. For his victory in the Top 5 Puteri Indonesia 2015, Olvah then appointed by the Puteri Indonesia Foundation to represent Indonesia in the Miss Eco Universe 2016 beauty pageant held in Egypt. At the pageant, he managed to occupy the Top 16 position and also won best national costume with [sep] knowledge2: Muhammad Alhamid: Muhammad Alhamid (Arabic: محمد الحامد, romanized: Muḥammad al-Ḥāmid, Arabic pronunciation: [(ʔ)mʊˈħæmmæd al-ħaːmid]; born September 17, 1971) is an Indonesian professor, academician, lecturer, and civil servant. Muhammad was the chairman of the Election Supervisory Agency (Bawaslu) for the period 2012–2017, after completing his duties as chairman of the Bawaslu, he was later appointed as a member of the Election Organization Ethics Council of the Republic of Indonesia (DKPP RI) for the period 2017–2022 and was inaugurated on 12 June 2017 by Indonesian President Joko Widodo. ; Muhammad Alhamid: As an academician, he completed his doctoral education at Airlangga University in 2007. Three years later, he was appointed chairman of the Political Science Department of the Faculty of Social and Political Sciences of the Hasanuddin University from 2010 to 2012. On February 28, 2015, he was confirmed as a professor in the field of Sociology in the Faculty of Social and Political Sciences, Hasanuddin University. ; Muhammad Alhamid: Muhammad was born in Makassar from a married couple who came from an Arab Indonesian family of the Ba 'Alawi sada clan named Sayyid Alhamid and Syarifah Aisyah Sadiq Alaydrus. He married an Indonesian Arab women with the surname Alhaddad named Lubena Umar Alahaddad. From his marriage to Lubena, he has 5 children named Fatimah Zahra, Jakfar Sodiq, Khadijah, Aisyah, and Umar Muchdar.[2] ; Muhammad Alhamid: Muhammad completed his elementary school in 1984 in Makassar. After that he went to junior high school in SMP Negeri 7 in Ujung Tanah sub-district, Makassar and graduated in 1987. In 1990, he graduated from SMA Negeri 4 Makassar and the following year immediately continued his undergraduate education to Hasanuddin University, he graduated with Sarjana Ilmu Pemerintahan degree (Bachelor of Science in Government; abbreviated as SIP in Indonesia) in 1994. While he obtained the Master of Science (in Indonesia abbreviated as MSi) degree in 1999 at the same university.[2] For the doctoral program, he completed it at Airlangga University in 2007.[3] ; File:Muhammad Alhamid.jpg: There shall be no infringement of Copyright for:
knowledge1: Laron Profit // SAT exam. From 1995 to 1999, Profit attended the University of Maryland, College Park. With the Maryland Terrapins basketball team, Profit played as a small forward and earned all-conference all four seasons: Honorable Mention All-ACC as a freshman then for his other three seasons third-team All-ACC. In his junior year, Profit led the ACC in steals with 2.7 steals per game and led the Terrapins in scoring with 15.8 points per game. Profit was an honorable mention All-American as a junior. In his senior year, Profit averaged 12.6 points, 4.6 rebounds, and 2.3 assists per game. In the 1999 NBA [sep] knowledge2: Profit (gamer): Park Joon-yeong (Korean: 박준영, born November 19, 1999), better known by his online alias Profit, is a professional South Korean Overwatch player for the Seoul Dynasty of the Overwatch League (OWL). Prior to the OWL's inception, he played for GC Busan, winning OGN APEX Season 4 was named the APEX Finals most valuable player. In the Overwatch League, Park signed with the London Spitfire of the OWL in its inaugural season. He won the league's first Grand Finals with the Spitfire, after they defeated the Philadelphia Fusion, and was named the Grand Finals most valuable player. ; Profit (gamer): Park was born on November 19, 1999, in Jinju, South Korea.[1][2] ; Profit (gamer): Park began his Overwatch career with Korean team GC Busan in April 2017.[1] The team competed in OGN APEX Season 4, a premier Overwatch tournament series in South Korea. After defeating Cloud 9 KongDoo in the semifinals, they were set to take on RunAway in the best-of-seven finals.[3] Park amassed 134 kills, 44 more than any other player, to only 55 deaths in the series, and led his team to a close 4–3 victory to win the championship. He was named the APEX Finals most valuable player for his performance throughout the series.[4] He picked up another major championship after GC Busan defeated RunAway in the 2017 APAC Premier finals in China.[2][5] ; Profit (gamer): As a member of the inaugural season champions, the Spitfire retired Park's number 13 jersey on January 15, 2020.[11] ; Profit (gamer): On October 22, 2019, the Spitfire agreed to transfer Park, along with teammates Hong "Gesture" Jae-hee and Choi "Bdosin" Seung-tae, to the Seoul Dynasty.[12] During 2020 the season, Park became the first OWL player to claim 10,000 total eliminations.[13] With Park as a consistent starter, the Dynasty made a deep playoff run in the 2020 playoffs, but they lost in the Grand Finals to the San Francisco Shock, 4–2.[14]
knowledge1: Enamul Haque (engineer) // Enamul Haque (engineer) Enamul Haque (এনামুল হক) is a Bangladesh Awami League politician and the incumbent Member of Parliament from Rajshahi-4. Haque was born on 21 October 1969. He completed his undergraduate in engineering and also has a MBA. Haque was elected to Parliament from Rajshahi-4 in 2008 and on 5 January 2014 as a Bangladesh Awami League candidate. On 16 September 2014, Bangladesh Anti-Corruption Commission recommended charging him with corruption regarding his company, Ena Enterprise. On 28 September 2017, local Awami League leaders in Rajshahi accused him of fermenting divisions in the Awami League and creating fractional feuds. He; Enamul Haque (engineer) // criticized Iqbal Sobhan Chowdhury, editor of The Daily Observer, after a report in the newspaper accused Haque of being involved with the drug trade. Enamul Haque (engineer) Enamul Haque (এনামুল হক) is a Bangladesh Awami League politician and the incumbent Member of Parliament from Rajshahi-4. Haque was born on 21 October 1969. He completed his undergraduate in engineering and also has a MBA. Haque was elected to Parliament from Rajshahi-4 in 2008 and on 5 January 2014 as a Bangladesh Awami League candidate. On 16 September 2014, Bangladesh Anti-Corruption Commission recommended charging him with corruption regarding his company, Ena Enterprise.; Enamul Haque (actor) // Manchester in 1976 in the field of synthetic organic chemistry. He worked as a post-doctoral research fellow in medicinal chemistry in the same university from June 1976 to May 1977. He is promoted to assistant professor, associate professor and professor in 1970, 1979 and 1987 respectively. He served as the chairman of the department for 15 years. He also acted as the dean of the faculty of engineering for 2 years. Enamul is married to actress Lucky Enam. Together they have two daughters Hridi Haque and Proitee Haque. Enamul Haque (actor) Enamul Haque (born 7 March 1943) is a Bangladeshi [sep] knowledge2: Enamul Haque (engineer): Enamul Haque (Bengali: এনামুল হক) is a Bangladesh Awami League politician and member of parliament for Rajshahi-4. ; Enamul Haque (engineer): Haque was born on 21 October 1969. He completed his undergraduate in engineering and also has a MBA.[1] ; Enamul Haque (engineer): Haque was elected to Parliament from Rajshahi-4 in 2008 and on 5 January 2014 as a Bangladesh Awami League candidate.[2] On 16 September 2014, Bangladesh Anti-Corruption Commission recommended charging him with corruption regarding his company, Ena Enterprise.[3] On 28 September 2017, local Awami League leaders in Rajshahi accused him of fomenting divisions in the Awami League and creating fractional feuds.[4] He criticized Iqbal Sobhan Chowdhury, editor of The Daily Observer, after a report in the newspaper accused Haque of being involved with the drug trade.[5] ; Enamul Haque (actor): Enamul Haque, sometimes Enamul Huq (29 May 1943 – 11 October 2021),[1] was a Bangladeshi actor, academician and playwright.[2][3] He acted in stage, television and film mediums.[4] He was a professor at the Department of Chemistry of Bangladesh University of Engineering and Technology (BUET).[5] He was awarded Ekushey Padak in 2012 by the government of Bangladesh for his contribution to fine arts.[6] ; Enamul Haque (actor): Haque was born to Obaidul Haque and Razia Khatun in  Motobi area in Feni District in the then Bengal Presidency in British India.[2] He completed his SSC from Feni Pilot High School, and HSC from Notre Dame College, Dhaka.[2] He earned his bachelor's and master's in chemistry in 1963 and 1964 respectively from the University of Dhaka.[3] He joined the department of chemistry, BUET in 1965 as a lecturer.[1] He earned his Ph.D. degree from the University of Manchester in 1976 in the field of synthetic organic chemistry. He worked as a post-doctoral research fellow in medicinal chemistry in the same university from June 1976 to May 1977. Back at BUET, he was promoted to assistant professor, associate professor and professor in 1970, 1979 and 1987, respectively.[3] He served as the chairman of the department for 15 years. He also acted as the dean of the faculty of engineering for two years.[3]
knowledge1: Diggeress Te Kanawa // the Arts Foundation of New Zealand Icons award in 2003. In 2007 Te Kanawa received an honorary doctorate from the University of Waikato. Diggeress Te Kanawa Diggeress Rangituatahi Te Kanawa (9 March 1920 – 30 July 2009) was a New Zealand Māori tohunga raranga (master weaver) of Ngati Maniapoto and Ngati Kinohaku descent. At the time of her death she was regarded as New Zealand's most renowned weaver. Born in Te Kuiti in 1920 to Dame Rangimārie Hetet and Tuheka Taonui Hetet, Te Kanawa was named "Diggeress" in honour of the World War I diggers after her father served in; Kiri Te Kanawa // of Chicago, Auckland (New Zealand) and Waikato. She is an honorary fellow of Somerville College, Oxford, and Wolfson College, Cambridge. She is also patron of Ringmer Community College, a school in the South-East of England situated not far from Glyndebourne. She was selected as Artist of the Year by Gramophone Magazine in 1982. On 10 June 2008 she received the Edison Classical Music Award during the Edison Classical Music Gala (formerly: 'Grand Gala du Disque') in the Ridderzaal in The Hague. In 2012, Te Kanawa was awarded a World Class New Zealand award in the Iconic New Zealander category. Te [sep] knowledge2: Rangi Te Kanawa: Rangituatahi Te Kanawa MNZM (married name Warnes) is a New Zealand textile conservator and weaver.[1] She is affiliated with the Ngāti Maniapoto iwi.[1] ; Rangi Te Kanawa: Te Kanawa received a scholarship from the Department of Internal Affairs to train in conservation of textiles. The committee of the Aotearoa Moananui a Kiwa Weavers were keen for Māori to be involved in the conservation of Māori textile artefacts held by museums and other cultural institutions. Her introductory training on conservation of cultural material was in Canberra, after which she completed a year of pre-training at the conservation unit of the National Museum in Wellington. As a prerequisite of the three-year Conservation in Cultural Materials course at Canberra University, she also had to pass sixth-form chemistry, which she did through a Wellington secondary school. The degree was followed by a six-month internship at the Textile Conservation Centre, Hampton Court Palace, and time at the British Museum.[2] ; Rangi Te Kanawa: Te Kanawa works at the Museum of New Zealand Te Papa Tongarewa (Te Papa) and specialises in the conservation of and research about Māori textiles.[3][4]  She has been collaborating with a GNS forensic scientist on a project called the 'Whakapapa of Paru' to identify the provenance of cloaks in Te Papa's archives.[5] Weaving by Te Kanawa has also been collected by Te Papa.[6] Te Kanawa is a member of the New Zealand conservators of cultural materials association.[7] ; Rangi Te Kanawa: In the 2023 King's Birthday and Coronation Honours, Te Kanawa was appointed a Member of the New Zealand Order of Merit, for services to Māori art and heritage preservation.[8] ; Rangi Te Kanawa: Te Kanawa is the daughter of Diggeress Te Kanawa and the granddaughter of Dame Rangimarie Hetet.[9]
knowledge1: R. Selvaraj // R. Selvaraj R. Selvaraj was a Member of the Legislative Assembly (MLA) representing Neyyattinkara constituency, Thiruvananthapuram, Kerala, India. He was a member of the Communist Party of India (Marxist), the present opposition party in Kerala, but resigned from the Kerala Legislature and the party on 9 March 2012 and joined Indian National Congress party. His resignation was attributed to rampant factionalism in his party. After joining the Indian National Congress, he contested the by-election from Neyyattinkara on "Hand" symbol and romped home with a margin of 6,334 votes, pushing up the ruling UDF’s slender majority in the 140-member Kerala Assembly; R. Selvaraj // to 73. R. Selvaraj was born to Shri. Varghese Nadar and Smt. Ruthe Nadar at Dhanuvachapuram near Neyyattinkara on 5 March 1949.He had a sister and a brother. He married Smt. Mary Valsala, have two daughters and lives near Dhanuvachapuram, Thiruvananthapuram. Selvaraj entered politics through the student wing of CPI(M), S.F.I and K.S.Y.F. He was elected for the first time to the Kerala Legislative Assembly on 2006 from Parassala constituency in Thiruvananthapuram. Later in the 2011 state election, he was elected from Neyyattinkara Constituency. On 9 March 2012, Selvaraj submitted his resignation from the post of MLA as well as; R. Selvaraj // the membership in the CPI(M) district committee, citing growing factionalism in the party and on being targeted by a section in the district party leadership. On April 2012, he joined the ruling party of the state, Indian National Congress. Selvaraj was fielded in by the Congress party in the by-election and was re-elected from the same constituency on 14-06-2012 by a margin of 6334 votes after a fierce triangular battle for the seat. Other Positions held R. Selvaraj R. Selvaraj was a Member of the Legislative Assembly (MLA) representing Neyyattinkara constituency, Thiruvananthapuram, Kerala, India. He was a member of the [sep] knowledge2: R. Selvaraj (politician): R. Selvaraj was a Member of the Legislative Assembly (MLA) representing Neyyattinkara constituency, Thiruvananthapuram, Kerala, India. He was a member of the Communist Party of India (Marxist), the present ruling party in Kerala but resigned from the Kerala Legislature and the party on 9 March 2012 and joined Indian National Congress party. His resignation was attributed to rampant factionalism in his party.[1][2][3] After joining the Indian National Congress, he contested the by-election from Neyyattinkara on "Hand" symbol and romped home with a margin of 6,334 votes, pushing up the ruling UDF's slender majority in the 140-member Kerala Assembly to 73. He again contested from the same constituency in 2016 and 2021. but he got defeated in both elections, i.e. for 9543 votes in 2016 and it increased to 14262 votes in 2021. He was defeated by K. Ansalan of CPI(M) in both elections. ; R. Selvaraj (politician): R. Selvaraj was born to Shri. Varghese Nadar and Smt. Ruthe Nadar at Dhanuvachapuram near Neyyattinkara on 5 March 1949. He has an elder sister, R.Sarojam and an elder brother, R.Chinnappan. He married Smt. Mary Valsala, they have two daughters Divya.M.S and Deepthi.M.S and live near Dhanuvachapuram, Thiruvananthapuram. ; R. Selvaraj (politician): Selvaraj entered politics through the student wing of CPI(M), S.F.I and K.S.Y.F.[4] He was elected for the first time to the Kerala Legislative Assembly on 2006 from Parassala constituency in Thiruvananthapuram. Later in the 2011 state election, he was elected from Neyyattinkara Constituency. ; R. Selvaraj (politician): On 9 March 2012, Selvaraj submitted his resignation from the post of MLA as well as the membership in the CPI(M) district committee, citing growing factionalism in the party and on being targeted by a section in the district party leadership.[5] In April 2012, he joined the ruling party of the state, Indian National Congress. Selvaraj was fielded in by the Congress party in the by-election and was re-elected from the same constituency on 14 June 2012 by a margin of 6334 votes after a fierce triangular battle for the seat. ; R. Selvaraj (politician): Other Positions held
knowledge1: Suzuran Yamauchi // Suzuran Yamauchi Aside from being an idol, Yamauchi is an avid golfer and has been part of several golf television shows. Her best score so far is 80. She has played from a young age and aimed to become a professional golf player in the future like her parents; Masahiro Kuramoto, a pro golfer who was partnered with her in a pro-am tournament in 2011, commented that she had the potential. One of her mentors was former pro golfer Miho Koga. As of December 2017, Yamauchi is also a member of drone enthusiast idol project Drone Venus, formed by Horipro [sep] knowledge2: Sayuri Yamauchi: Sayuri Yamauchi (山内 小百合, Yamauchi Sayuri, May 28, 1956 – March 6, 2012), also known by the stage name Sayuri (紗ゆり), was a Japanese voice actress. Yamauchi voiced Itchy and Maude Flanders on the Japanese dub of The Simpsons. Sayuri was formerly affiliated with Kyu Production and affiliated with Aigumi at the time of her death. On March 6, 2012, Yamauchi died of cancer and was 55 years old at the time of her death.[1][2] ; Sayuri Yamauchi: This biographical article about a Japanese voice actor is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Shin Dong-hyuk // human rights violations in North Korea. They then fundraised to bring Mr. Shin to Halifax, where his speech to an over-capacity crowd drew international attention." Shin Dong-hyuk Shin Dong-hyuk (born Shin In Geun, 19 November 1981 or 1980 ) is a North Korean-born human rights activist. He is reputed to be the only known prisoner to have successfully escaped from a "total-control zone" grade internment camp in North Korea. He was the subject of a biography, "Escape from Camp 14: One Man's Remarkable Odyssey From North Korea to Freedom in the West", by former "Washington Post" journalist Blaine Harden. Shin [sep] knowledge2: Shin Jea-hwan: Shin Jea-hwan (Hangul: 신재환; born March 3, 1998) is a South Korean artistic gymnast. He is the 2020 Summer Olympic champion on vault. He is a two-time World Cup champion on vault (2020 Melbourne, 2020 Baku). ; Shin Jea-hwan: Shin was born on March 3, 1998, in Seoul. He attended the Korea National Sport University and graduated in 2020.[1] Shin relocated to Jecheon in 2021.[2] He looks up to teammate Yang Hak-seon. ; Shin Jea-hwan: Shin made his senior international debut at the 2019 Zhaoqing World Cup, where he won silver on vault and finished fourth on floor.[3] ; Shin Jea-hwan: In 2021, the International Gymnastics Federation decided at the last minute to hold the final event in the qualification process, the 2021 Doha World Cup; Shin chose to attend to preserve his series lead over Japanese gymnast Hidenobu Yonekura.[4] Despite placing fifth to Yonekura's first in Doha, Shin was able to win the overall series on a tiebreaker and qualify as an individual for the Olympic Games in Tokyo.[5] ; File:Shin Jea-hwan.jpg: Original file ‎(421 × 603 pixels, file size: 40 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg)
knowledge1: Leo Ku // Leo Ku Leo Ku Kui-Kei is a Hong Kong Cantopop and Mandopop singer, actor, TV host, model, cartoonist, MV director, and producer and designer. He employs falsetto as a singing technique. Joining TVB in 1991, he has released over 35 albums and he has won nearly 300 male singer and music awards since kicking off his music career in 1994, including: In addition to Ku's career in Hong Kong, between 2000 and 2003, he played the male lead in two television drama series in mainland China, namely "Romance in the Rain" and "My Fair Princess III: Heavenly Earth". In his [sep] knowledge2: Leo Kokubo: Leo Brian Kokubo (小久保 玲央 ブライアン, Kokubo Reo Buraian, born 23 January 2001) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for Portuguese team Benfica B. ; Leo Kokubo: Kokubo was born in Japan to a Nigerian father and Japanese mother. He is a youth international for Japan, having represented the Japan U16s and U18s.[1] ; Leo Kokubo: This biographical article related to a Japanese association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Leo Kokubo: Leo Brian Kokubo (小久保 玲央 ブライアン, Kokubo Reo Buraian, Prefectura de Chiba, Japón, 23 de enero de 2001) es un futbolista japonés que juega como portero en el S. L. Benfica "B" de la Segunda División de Portugal. ; Leo Kokubo: Nació en Japón, de padre nigeriano y madre japonesa. Es internacional juvenil por Japón, habiendo representado a Japón sub-16 y sub-18.[1]​
knowledge1: Sadhana Sargam // in Marathi. She has sung about 6000 songs in Malayalam. She has sung 15,000 songs in 34 Indian languages. She has won all topmost awards in India. Sargam made her playback debut in "Kanku Pagli", a Gujarati film. Her first Hindi song was the solo "Door Nahin Rehna" from the film "Rustom". However, Rustom was delayed and was released only in 1985, and Sargam ’s first released film was Subhash Ghai’s "Vidhaata" (1982) in which she sang the song "Saat Saheliyan" for actress Padmini Kolhapure. The song, composed by Kalyanji-Anandji, also had the voices of Kishore Kumar and Alka Yagnik. [sep] knowledge2: Neha Sargam: Neha Dubey also known by her stage name Neha Sargam is an Indian actress and singer. Known for her participation on Indian Idol 4 and her shows like Chand Chupa Badal Mein on Star Plus,  Ramayan on Zee TV,  Mahabharat on Star Plus, Doli Armano Ki on Zee TV,  Mirzapur and theatre musical Mughal-E-Azam (musical)[1][2] ; Neha Sargam: Neha had auditioned in Indian Idol 2, but she forgot the lyrics in the second audition and was rejected. Neha had appeared in Indian Idol 4 in 2009.[3] She appears in the cast for Chand Chupa Badal Mein, as well as  Ramayan as Sita.[4] She played the part of Lakshmi in Paramavatar Shri Krishna. She has also worked in the serials, she did a cameo in Punar Vivaah - Zindagi Milegi Dobara and Doli Armaano Ki, as main lead post leap as Diya[5] Iss Pyaar Ko Kya Naam Doon? Ek Baar Phir,[6] and Yeh Hai Aashiqui.[7]  Neha Sargam has been a part of 2 musical plays as actor and singer in the lead Mughal-E-Azam the musical directed by Feroz Abbas Khan,  produced by Shapoorji Pallonji Group.[8] and Raunaq and Jassi musical produced by BookMyShow and directed by Feroz Abbas Khan. ; Neha Sargam: In 2020 she played the role of Saloni Tyagi in  Mirzapur season 2. ; Neha Sargam: This article about an Indian television actor is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Sandra Pisani // Sandra Pisani Sandra (Sandy) Pisani OAM (born 23 January 1959) is an Australian former field hockey player who played 85 international games for Australia and was the captain from 1985 to 1987. She competed in the 1984 Summer Olympics and was part of the team that won Australia's first Olympic Gold Medal at the 1988 Summer Olympics. She was a National Women’s Senior Selector for the Hockeyroos Australia women's national field hockey team from 1993 to 2000 and the Head Selector during the peak of their success when the team won two Olympic Gold medals in Field hockey at the; Sandra Pisani // the gold medal winning team at the 1988 Summer Olympics. This was the first Olympic Gold ever won by an Australian hockey Team, the gold medal being considered the highest achievement in Hockey. It was the start of an astonishing era of success for Women’s hockey in Australia. She has twice been a finalist in the Caltex SA Sports Star of the Year Award. Sandra Pisani Sandra (Sandy) Pisani OAM (born 23 January 1959) is an Australian former field hockey player who played 85 international games for Australia and was the captain from 1985 to 1987. She competed in the [sep] knowledge2: Sandra Pisani: Sandra Pisani OAM (23 January 1959 – 19 April 2022) was an Australian field hockey player who played 85 international games for Australia and was the captain from 1985 to 1987. She competed in the 1984 Summer Olympics and was part of the team that won Australia's first Olympic gold medal at the 1988 Summer Olympics.[2][3] ; Sandra Pisani: She was a National Women's Senior Selector for the Hockeyroos Australia women's national field hockey team from 1993 to 2000 and the Head Selector during the peak of their success when the team won two Olympic gold medals in Field hockey at the 1996 Summer Olympics – Women's tournament and Field hockey at the 2000 Summer Olympics – Women's tournament under coach Ric Charlesworth. ; Sandra Pisani: Pisani was awarded the Medal of the Order of Australia (OAM) for service to the sport of hockey in 1989 and was inducted to the South Australian Sport Hall of Fame in 2015.[4][5] ; Sandra Pisani: Pisani lived in Adelaide, South Australia. She died from cancer on 19 April 2022, at the age of 63.[6] ; Sandra Pisani: In 1976, Pisani first played A grade club hockey for Burnside Hockey Club when she was 17 years old. She played in eight (8) winning A grade Premiership teams over 15 years (including four in five years) for Burnside in 1976, 1977, 1979, 1980, 1982, 1985, 1986 and 1990. She won Burnside Hockey Club's Best and Fairest in 1985 and 1987 and received Life Membership of Burnside Hockey Club in 2002.[7]
knowledge1: Harry Cave // Harry Cave Henry Butler "Harry" Cave (10 October 1922 – 15 September 1989) was a New Zealand cricketer who captained New Zealand in nine of his 19 Tests. He played for Wellington from 1945–46 to 1949–50, then when the Central Districts side was formed he played for them from 1950–51 to 1958–59, captaining the side from 1953–54 until he retired. In 1952–53 he and Ian Leggat added 239 for the ninth wicket for Central Districts against Otago in Dunedin. He toured England in 1949 and 1958, and Pakistan and India in 1955–56, when he captained the side in all eight; Harry Cave // Tests. He was captain in the First Test against the West Indies in 1955–56, missed the Second Test, then returned for the Third and Fourth Tests under the captaincy of John Reid. In the Fourth Test in Auckland, he took four wickets in each innings (match figures of 40.4–26–43–8) to help New Zealand to its first ever Test victory. Harry Cave Henry Butler "Harry" Cave (10 October 1922 – 15 September 1989) was a New Zealand cricketer who captained New Zealand in nine of his 19 Tests. He played for Wellington from 1945–46 to 1949–50, then when the Central Districts [sep] knowledge2: Harry Cave: Henry Butler Cave (10 October 1922 – 15 September 1989) was a New Zealand cricketer who captained New Zealand in nine of his 19 Test matches.[1] His Test career extended from 1949 to 1958, and he played first-class cricket from 1945 to 1959.[2] ; Harry Cave: Harry Cave was born into a family of farmers and cricketers from the Wanganui area. His father had a farm at Westmere, north of Wanganui.[3] His uncle Ken Cave umpired all four matches in New Zealand's first Test series in 1929–30.[4] Harry went to school at Westmere before attending Wanganui Collegiate School. He took up farming after leaving school.[3] ; Harry Cave: Cave was one of the leading players in Central Districts' inaugural season in the Plunket Shield in 1950–51, when they finished second.[7][8] In 1952-53 he and Ian Leggat added 239 for the ninth wicket for Central Districts against Otago in Dunedin, setting a New Zealand ninth-wicket record that still stands.[9][10] A few days later, Cave captured 13 wickets in one day, taking 7 for 31 and 6 for 33 in Central Districts' innings victory over Auckland in Palmerston North.[7] ; Harry Cave: After a break of five years, Cave returned to the Test team for the two-match series against England in 1954-55. He was then appointed to captain the New Zealand team on an eight-Test tour of Pakistan and India from October 1955 to January 1956.[12] The tour was demanding for the whole team. Extreme heat, sub-standard accommodation and facilities, unfamiliar pitches, constant stomach upsets and other illness, as well as dubious umpiring in India, made it difficult for the New Zealanders to play at their best.[13][3] Cave remained diplomatic throughout, and bowled more overs than any other player: 333 overs for 623 runs and 13 wickets.[12] Always of trim build, he nevertheless lost about 11 kilograms in weight on the tour, and it took him two years to recover full fitness.[3] ; Harry Cave: When the team returned to New Zealand, Cave was captain in the First Test against the West Indies a few weeks later. He was unable to play in the Second Test, then returned for the Third and Fourth Tests under the captaincy of John Reid.[7] In the Fourth Test in Auckland, he had his best Test figures, taking four wickets in each innings to help New Zealand to its first Test victory. He had match figures of 40.4–26–43–8, and took the wicket to end the match when he had Alf Valentine stumped by Sammy Guillen.[14]
knowledge1: Noel Gugliemi // Noel Gugliemi Noel Albert Gugliemi (also known as Noel G.) is an American actor, best known for his portrayals of Southern Californian gangsters. Noel Gugliemi was abandoned by his parents, so he became homeless and entered into a criminal life. In 2001, Noel played Hector in "The Fast and the Furious", which boosted his career. He reprised his role in "Furious 7" and in the "Fast & Furious" music video, the latter alongside Chingy, iRome, Neil Brown Jr., Ray Lavendar, Sarayah Love "Empire", & Chloe Riley. Gugliemi is a Christian, and regularly delivers motivational speeches at churches, schools and businesses. [sep] knowledge2: Noel Malicdem: Noel Malicdem (born 10 January 1977) is a Filipino darts player who plays in Professional Darts Corporation events. ; Noel Malicdem: Malicdem qualified for the 2019 World Championship.[1] In his first round he defeated Jeffrey de Graaf 2:3, but lost in the second round to Kyle Anderson.  A year later he again managed to qualify for the 2020 World Championship as a qualifier from Asian Tour, where he finished on 4th place overall.[2] In the first round of the championship, he quite easily won 3:0 over Rowby-John Rodriguez. In the second round he was leading and had match darts against Peter Wright, but in the end he wasn't able to check-out and eventually lost in sudden death leg.[3] ; Noel Malicdem: In 2019 he represented the Philippines alongside Lourence Ilagan in the PDC World Cup of Darts, but they lost in the first round against England. ; Noel Malicdem: Noel Malicdem (* 10. Januar 1977 in Quezon City) ist ein philippinischer Dartspieler. ; Noel Malicdem: Noel Malicdem sorgte 2017, als er das Achtelfinale der Malaysian Open erreichte, für Aufsehen. Im darauffolgenden Jahr spielte er die ganze Saison auf der neu gegründeten PDC Asian Tour mit, über die vier asiatische Vertreter für die Weltmeisterschaft ermittelt werden. In seinem ersten Turnier erreichte er bereits das Finale, welches er gegen Royden Lam zwar verlor, jedoch konnte er das zweite Leg mit einem Nine dart finish beenden. Mit zwei Turniersiegen auf der Asian Tour, unter anderem gegen Paul Lim in einem Finale, beendete er die Tour unter den besten vier und war demnach für die Weltmeisterschaft 2019 qualifiziert. In der ersten Runde konnte er mit 3:2 gegen den Niederländer Jeffrey de Graaf gewinnen. Gegen Kyle Anderson aus Australien hatte er jedoch in der zweiten Runde mit 1:3 das Nachsehen. Beim World Cup of Darts 2019 trat er für die Philippinen zusammen Lourence Ilagan an, jedoch unterlag das Duo gegen England, vertreten durch Rob Cross und Michael Smith mit 1:5. Auch für die Weltmeisterschaft 2020 konnte er sich erneut über die Asian Tour qualifizieren. Auch dieses Mal konnte er in der ersten Runde seine Partie gewinnen, sein Gegner war der Österreicher Rowby-John Rodriguez. In der zweiten Runde konnte Malicdem erneut gut mit dem favorisierten Schotten und späteren Weltmeister Peter Wright mithalten. So hatte Malicdem sogar einen Matchdart auf das Bullseye, welchen er jedoch daneben warf. Wright rettete sich durch ein 140er Finish ins Sudden Death Leg, das er schließlich gewann.[2]
knowledge1: Sayaka Miki // part of myself and pulling in a different direction." Sayaka is Madoka's classmate and best friend, a second-year at Madoka's school. She is a lively tomboy with strong ideals of love and lawfulness. After helping Madoka rescue Kyubey, she contracts with him to grant her wish to heal the wounded hand of Kyosuke Kamijo, a young violinist that she is infatuated with, visiting him daily in the hospital. As a magical girl, Sayaka's weapon of choice is a cutlass, being able to produce multiples of them at a time. She also has an extraordinary regenerative ability due to the healing [sep] knowledge2: Sayaka Ando: Sayaka Ando (安藤 沙耶香, Andō Sayaka, born 24 May 1981 in Takasaki, Gunma and raised in Sendai, Japan) is a Japanese gravure idol and fashion model. She made her debut in Eternal in 2004. ; Sayaka Ando: She is a graduate of Miyagi Gakuin Women's University. ; Sayaka Ando: She delivered her first child in September 2012,[1] and her second in November 2014.[2] ; Sayaka Ando: This biographical article related to Japan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Sayaka Ando: This biographical article about a model is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
knowledge1: Tappaya Sit-Or // Tappaya Sit-Or Tappaya Sit Or, or Mit Klinmee, is a former Rajadamnern and WMC champion with past rankings at Lumpini and Channel 7. Tappaya is currently retired from competition and runs the eponymous Sor Klinmee Gym in Pattaya, Thailand. Tappaya is the youngest of 11 children and began training and fighting regularly at the age of 6 along with his brother, Yokthai Sit Or, and nephew, Rambaa Somdet. The three would train before and after school. In the evenings, they would compete in a local bar for tips. Tappaya was fighting in Bangkok by age 12. The three moved from; Tappaya Sit-Or // Sangpet Sor Klinmee is an orthodox fighter competing at 45.5 kg at Rajadamnern and Lumpini. Sudsakorn Sor Klinmee is the best known active fighter currently out of Sor Klinmee. There are a number of younger boxers based out of the gym. Tappaya Sit-Or Tappaya Sit Or, or Mit Klinmee, is a former Rajadamnern and WMC champion with past rankings at Lumpini and Channel 7. Tappaya is currently retired from competition and runs the eponymous Sor Klinmee Gym in Pattaya, Thailand. Tappaya is the youngest of 11 children and began training and fighting regularly at the age of 6 along with [sep] knowledge2: Tappaya Sit-Or: Tappaya Sit Or (Thai: ทัพยา ศิษย์อ อ; born February 1, 1976) or Mit Klinmee, is a former Rajadamnern and WMC champion with past rankings at Lumpini and Channel 7.[1] Tappaya is currently retired from competition and runs the eponymous Sor Klinmee Gym in Pattaya, Thailand. ; Tappaya Sit-Or: Tappaya is the youngest of 11 children and began training and fighting regularly at the age of 6 along with his brother, Yokthai Sit-Or, and nephew, Rambaa Somdet. The three would train before and after school. In the evenings, they would compete in a local bar for tips. Tappaya was fighting in Bangkok by age 12. The three moved from Petrungruang gym in Pattaya to join the original Sit Or camp in Pattaya at its founding and were the first name fighters produced by the gym. Sit Or has since moved to Bangkok and been home to such fighters as Nong-O Sit-Or and Petchmankong Petfergus.[2] ; Tappaya Sit-Or: In 1997, he challenged and defeated Ankandet BaoBaoin for the 61.5 kg Rajadamnern belt.[3] The bout was televised on Channel 5 in Thailand. Tappaya would hold the Rajadamnern belt for three consecutive years. Also in 1997, on August 10, he would win the WMC belt from Panmongkon Carryboy at 61.5 kg.[4] He was ranked first at Lumpini Stadium, though he did not win the belt there. Tappaya became a high-profile fighter on Channel 7 during this time.[5] ; Tappaya Sit-Or: He ended his career with a record of 200 wins, 36 losses, and five draws, with a Rajadamnern and WMC belt at 61.5 kg, and a no.1 ranking at Lumpini.[6] ; Tappaya Sit-Or: Toward the end of his fight career, he traveled to China, Japan, and the United Kingdom to teach and compete in Muay Thai.[7][8][9] When he lived in Japan he competed in both kickboxing and MMA. He defeated Hayato in kickboxing rules fight as a representant of the Crosspoint Gym.
knowledge1: Annie Landouw // Annie Landouw Annie Landouw (also Landauw, 1913 – 17 August 1982) was an Indonesian "keroncong" singer and film actress. Landouw was born in Surakarta, Central Java, in 1913. She lost her sight following an extended illness as a child, and was not long afterwards adopted by her aunt and uncle. In 1927 she competed in – and won – her first singing competition, a Concours concert at a night fair in Surakarta. As a result, she was approached by Beka, a recording company, which signed her. She moved to Batavia (now Jakarta), the capital of the Dutch East Indies, soon; Annie Landouw // for eye surgery. Her fans organised a fundraising campaign to help her pay for it, although ultimately Landouw refused the charity. After Indonesia's independence, Landouw continued singing; however, she acted in no further films. She died on 17 August 1982. Music scholar Peter Keppy suggests that, because of her popularity as a "keroncong" singer, Landouw may have influenced the character of Yah in Armijn Pane's 1940 novel "Belenggu"; in the novel, Yah is famous as a "keroncong" singer under the stage name Siti Hayati. Annie Landouw Annie Landouw (also Landauw, 1913 – 17 August 1982) was an Indonesian "keroncong" singer [sep] knowledge2: Annie Landouw: Annie Landouw (also Landauw, 1913 – 17 August 1982) was an Indonesian keroncong singer and film actress. ; Annie Landouw: Landouw was born in Surakarta, Central Java, in 1913. She lost her sight following an extended illness as a child, and was not long afterwards adopted by her aunt and uncle. In 1927 she competed in – and won – her first singing competition, a Concours concert at a night fair in Surakarta. As a result, she was approached by Beka, a recording company, which signed her. She moved to Batavia (now Jakarta), the capital of the Dutch East Indies, soon afterwards and quickly rose in popularity.[1] ; Annie Landouw: By 1938 Landouw had joined the NIROM radio troupe, singing keroncong. The following year she joined Hugo Dumas' troupe Lief Java.[1] During this period she became active in film. In 1938 she provided vocals for Fatima, a production by Tan's Film;[2] she provided vocals again for Tan's 1939 film Gagak Item (Black Raven).[3] She made her onscreen debut later that year, with Siti Akbari. In 1940 she appeared in two further films, Sorga Ka Toedjoe (Seventh Heaven) and Roekihati.[4] ; Annie Landouw: Landouw's prowess singing keroncong rendered her immensely popular. In 1940, the blind singer was scheduled for eye surgery.[5] Her fans organised a fundraising campaign to help her pay for it, although ultimately Landouw refused the charity.[5] ; Annie Landouw: After Indonesia's independence, Landouw continued singing; however, she acted in no further films.[1] She died on 17 August 1982.[1]
knowledge1: Nuh Omar // Nuh Omar Nuh Omar (born June 5, 1988) is a Pakistani filmmaker who has worked globally in film and advertising. Nuh was born into the prominent Indian/ Pakistani Kureishi family as the 2nd grandson of Sattoo Kureishi (MBE), older brother of Omar Kureishi. Famous family alumni also include Imran Kureishi, Hanif Kureishi and Maki Kureishi. He was educated early at Karachi Grammar School, a classmate of Bilawal Bhutto Zardari. His family frequently traveled on business with his father, a business man, until his parents separated when Nuh was 11. He has an older sister and a younger brother. His mother; Nuh Omar // He is currently developing his first feature film, a family film about imaginary friends, as well as a 12-issue fantasy-mystery comic book mini series titled 'I'm Here' he created and is writer on A short film, titled 'The Porter & The Stone', a contemporary homage to the Oscar Wilde tale 'The Happy Prince', he has written and is directing is currently in pre-production, set to shoot in Los Angeles. Nuh Omar Nuh Omar (born June 5, 1988) is a Pakistani filmmaker who has worked globally in film and advertising. Nuh was born into the prominent Indian/ Pakistani Kureishi family as [sep] knowledge2: Nuh Omar: Nuh Omar (born June 5, 1988) is a director and screenwriter, originally from Pakistan. ; Nuh Omar: Nuh was born in Karachi, Pakistan into the prominent Indian/Pakistani Kureishi family as the grandson of Sattoo Kureishi (MBE), older brother of Omar Kureishi.[1] Famous family members also include Hanif Kureishi, Maki Kureishi, Bilquis Nasrullah, Imran Kureishi, and Nusrat Nasrullah.[2][1] He received his early educated at Karachi Grammar School, a classmate of Bilawal Bhutto Zardari.[3] He has an older sister and a younger brother. His mother was Pakistan’s first female sports photojournalist.[4] ; Nuh Omar: Nuh decided to make films after seeing Jurassic Park when he was 5.[5][6] He spent his earlier years writing short stories, and with a camera at his hip. Photography became his hobby.[7][4][1] He went to the New York Film Academy in 2006, where he participated and played a part in the creation of their first ever 2nd Year Film Program. He then went to Full Sail University where he received his bachelor's degree in The Science of Film, and was named Valedictorian.[2] ; Nuh Omar: After graduating from Full Sail, Nuh interned for Scott Gardenhour at The Institute.[8] He worked as a freelance assistant director, having worked on a number of award-winning shorts, as well as working behind the scenes as a documentarian. He wrote and produced the short film We're Americans, Eh?, which received the Audience Award and the award for Best Wardrobe in 2011 at the 24 Hour Film Festival. ; Nuh Omar: In 2012, Nuh returned to Pakistan. In collaboration with Y Productions and producer Ayesha Jalil, he directed a series of short films for Engro Corporation Excellence Awards. His Engro film on the late renowned sculptor Shahid Sajjad, Mojiza-e-Fun (The Miracle of Art), was the final project to feature Sajjad before he passed away.[8][9][10]
knowledge1: Date Narikuni // Date Narikuni Narikuni was the son of Date Munemitsu of the Tome-Date clan, a subsidiary branch of the main Date can, and was the grandson of Date Yoshimura, the 5th "daimyō" of Sendai. His childhood name was Kōgorō (幸五郎) later Tosaburō (藤三郎) and become Sojirō (総次郎). In 1828, with the death of Date Nariyoshi, Sendai Domain faced a major crisis. His son, the future Date Yoshikuni was only two-years-old. The Tokugawa shogunate had taken extraordinary measures to ensure the continuation of the Date line in the case of his predecessors Date Chikamune and Date Narimune; however, the patience of "shōgun"; Date Narikuni // literature. However, during the "sankin-kōtai" to Edo in 1840 he fell ill, and died in Edo the following year at the age of 25. Date Narikuni Narikuni was the son of Date Munemitsu of the Tome-Date clan, a subsidiary branch of the main Date can, and was the grandson of Date Yoshimura, the 5th "daimyō" of Sendai. His childhood name was Kōgorō (幸五郎) later Tosaburō (藤三郎) and become Sojirō (総次郎). In 1828, with the death of Date Nariyoshi, Sendai Domain faced a major crisis. His son, the future Date Yoshikuni was only two-years-old. The Tokugawa shogunate had taken extraordinary measures; Date Narikuni // Tokugawa Ienari had worn thin over Sendai Domain succession problems, and the domain faced the possibility of attainder. The "rōjū", Mizuno Tadaakira, proposed a solution whereby Nariyoshi’s 4-year-old daughter, Masahime would be married to Date Narikuni, who would then become "daimyō" of Sendai. Date Narikuni would then adopted the infant Date Yoshikuni as his heir. Events went as planned and in 1828 Narikuni received Court rank of Junior Fourth, Lower Grade and the courtesy title of "Mutsu-no-kami". His ranks were raised to Junior Fourth, Upper Grade and "Sakonoe-chūshō" in 1831. Narikuni was noted for his scholarly disposition and knowledge of [sep] knowledge2: Date Narikuni: Date Narikuni (伊達斉邦, 6 November 1817 – 9 September 1841) was an late-Edo period Japanese samurai, and the 12th daimyō of Sendai Domain in the Tōhoku region of northern Japan, and the 28th hereditary chieftain of the Date clan. ; Date Narikuni: Narikuni was the son of Date Munemitsu of the Tome-Date clan, a subsidiary branch of the main Date clan, and was the grandson of Date Yoshimura, the 5th daimyō of Sendai. His childhood name was Kōgorō (幸五郎) later Tosaburō (藤三郎) and become Sojirō (総次郎). ; Date Narikuni: Narikuni was noted for his scholarly disposition and knowledge of literature. However, during the sankin-kōtai to Edo in 1840 he fell ill, and died in Edo the following year at the age of 25. ; File:Date Narikuni.jpg: Original file ‎(1,048 × 1,066 pixels, file size: 531 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Date Narikuni.jpg: Click on a date/time to view the file as it appeared at that time.
knowledge1: Lo Kuo-chong // Lo Kuo-chong Lo Kuo-Chong (; born September 16, 1965 in Hsinchu, Taiwan, also spelled Lo Kuo-chang) is a retired Taiwanese professional baseball player and currently a baseball coach. He had been well known for his excellent fielding ability, which was demonstrated by setting CPBL's record of did not error in a streak of continuous 153 fielding chances during his rookie 1994 season, and was a frequent member of the Chinese Taipei national baseball team from mid-1980s to early 1990s, participating the 1988 and 1992 Summer Olympics where he won a silver medal in 1992. After the 1992 Olympics Lo joined [sep] knowledge2: Loo Kum Zee:  Loo Kum Zee (born 2 December 1974) is a Malaysian high jumper. His personal best jump is 2.24 metres, achieved in December 1995 in Chiangmai. ; Loo Kum Zee: He won bronze medals at the Asian Championships in 1995, 1998, 2002 and 2003. He also competed at the 1996 Olympic Games, but did not reach the final. ; Loo Kum Zee: He attended secondary school in SMJK Sam Tet, Ipoh, Perak. ; Loo Kum Zee: Loo Kum Zee (s. 2. joulukuuta 1974) on malesialainen entinen yleisurheilija, joka kilpaili korkeushypyssä.[1] ; Loo Kum Zee: Loo voitti Aasian-mestaruuskilpailuista neljä pronssimitalia, vuosina 1995, 1998, 2002 ja 2003.[2] Hän osallistui Atlantan olympialaisiin 1996, joissa hän hyppäsi 215 senttimetriä ja karsiutui finaalista.[1]
knowledge1: Ushoshi Sengupta // Ushoshi Sengupta Ushoshi Sengupta (; born 30 July 1988) is an Indian beauty pageant contestant who won the title of I Am She – Miss Universe India and represented India in Miss Universe 2010 held at Mandalay Bay, Las Vegas, Nevada, on 23 August. Born in Kolkata, Sengupta is the daughter of an official in the Indian Air Force. She graduated from Kendriya Vidyalaya, Ballygunje, Kolkata, where she excelled at mathematics and was offered a scholarship to an engineering college, but decided to pursue liberal arts and professional modeling. She has a bachelor's degree in Humanities from the St. Xavier’s; Ushoshi Sengupta // who vied for the crown of eventual winner, Ximena Navarrete of Mexico. Ushoshi Sengupta Ushoshi Sengupta (; born 30 July 1988) is an Indian beauty pageant contestant who won the title of I Am She – Miss Universe India and represented India in Miss Universe 2010 held at Mandalay Bay, Las Vegas, Nevada, on 23 August. Born in Kolkata, Sengupta is the daughter of an official in the Indian Air Force. She graduated from Kendriya Vidyalaya, Ballygunje, Kolkata, where she excelled at mathematics and was offered a scholarship to an engineering college, but decided to pursue liberal arts and professional; Ushoshi Sengupta // College of the University of Calcutta, and worked as a model before becoming Miss Universe India. Sengupta is also making her debut in the Bengali movie industry with "Egoler Chokh" slated for release in August 2016 directed by Arindam Sil. Ushoshi won the first edition of I am She - Miss Universe India, a national pageant organized by Tantra Entertainment Private limited, in collaboration with former Miss Universe Sushmita Sen. As the official representative of her country to the 2010 Miss Universe pageant held in Las Vegas, Nevada on 23 August 2010, she participated as one of the 83 delegates [sep] knowledge2: Ushoshi Sengupta: Ushoshi Sengupta (born 30 July 1988)[2] is an Indian model who won the title of I Am She – Miss Universe India and represented India in Miss Universe 2010 held at Mandalay Bay, Las Vegas, Nevada, on 23 August 2010.[3] ; Ushoshi Sengupta: Ushoshi won the first edition of I am She - Miss Universe India, a national pageant organized by Tantra Entertainment Private limited, in collaboration with former Miss Universe Sushmita Sen. As the official representative of her country to the 2010 Miss Universe pageant held in Las Vegas, Nevada on 23 August 2010, she participated as one of the 83 delegates who vied for the crown of eventual winner, Ximena Navarrete of Mexico. ; File:Ushoshi Sengupta.jpg: Original file ‎(585 × 1,149 pixels, file size: 253 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Ushoshi Sengupta.jpg: Caution: Before removing a watermark from a copyrighted image, please read the WMF's analysis of the legal ramifications of doing so, as well as Commons' proposed policy regarding watermarks. ; File:Ushoshi Sengupta.jpg: The Wikimedia Foundation has received an e-mail confirming that the copyright holder has approved publication under the terms mentioned on this page. This correspondence has been reviewed by a Volunteer Response Team (VRT) member and stored in our permission archive. The correspondence is available to trusted volunteers as ticket #2008030310010794.
knowledge1: Stephen J. Mackwell // Stephen J. Mackwell Stephen J. Mackwell (born June 5, 1956) is an internationally recognized researcher in geophysics, specializing in laboratory-based studies of the physical, chemical and mechanical properties of geological materials. He is also interested in the transport of fluid components in mantle and crustal rocks on the microscopic and macroscopic scales, and on the effects of such components on mechanical properties. He has authored or co-authored over 80 articles in international scientific journals and is an editor of a book on comparative climatology of terrestrial planets published by the University of Arizona Press. Stephen J. Mackwell received a B.Sc.; Stephen J. Mackwell // of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine. Mackwell has also been an Adjunct Professor in the Department of Earth Science at Rice University in Houston, Texas from July 2005 to present. Stephen J. Mackwell has been the recipient of numerous honors, including Fellow of the American Association for the Advancement of Science in 2017; Fellow of the American Geophysical Union in 2010; Stipendiat der Alexander von Humboldt-Stiftung in Bayreuth, Germany in 1996; Ministère de L'Education Nationale, Academie de Lille, Nommé Professeur in 1996; and Fellow of the Mineralogical Society of America in 1996. In 2016, Mackwell was honored by the International Astronomical; Stephen J. Mackwell // Olivine." Stephen J. Mackwell worked as a Postdoctoral Fellow in the Department of Materials Science and Engineering at Cornell University in Ithaca, New York from 1984 to 1987, and then moved to the Pennsylvania State University in University Park, Pennsylvania as an Assistant Professor in 1987 and subsequently Associate Professor of Geosciences in 1992. He was Program Director for Geophysics in the Earth Sciences Division at the National Science Foundation in Washington, D.C. from 1993-1994, and spent 1996 as an Alexander von Humboldt Fellow at the Bayerisches Geoinstitut in Bayreuth, Germany. In 1998, Mackwell became a Full Professor for Experimental; Stephen J. Mackwell // lithosphere: Constraints imposed by laboratory experiments. "Journal of Geophysical Research–Solid Earth", 100(B9), 17587–17602, DOI: 10.1029/95JB01460. Stephen J. Mackwell Stephen J. Mackwell (born June 5, 1956) is an internationally recognized researcher in geophysics, specializing in laboratory-based studies of the physical, chemical and mechanical properties of geological materials. He is also interested in the transport of fluid components in mantle and crustal rocks on the microscopic and macroscopic scales, and on the effects of such components on mechanical properties. He has authored or co-authored over 80 articles in international scientific journals and is an editor of a book on comparative climatology of; Stephen J. Mackwell // planetary science journals, including serving as editor-in-chief for the journal "Geophysical Research Letters" from 2002 to 2004. He currently serves on the advisory board for the journal "Physics and Chemistry of Minerals". Mackwell is a respected senior member of the planetary science community and has participated in numerous NASA review and advisory panels and National Research Council committees, including the 2013–2022 Planetary Science Decadal Survey Steering Group and Inner Planets Panel. He is also a current member of the Committee on Astrobiology and Planetary Science of the Space Studies Board, Division on Engineering and Physical Sciences, of the National Academies [sep] knowledge2: Stephen J. Mackwell: Stephen J. Mackwell is a researcher in geophysics, specializing in laboratory-based studies of the physical, chemical and mechanical properties of geological materials. He is also interested in the transport of fluid components in mantle and crustal rocks on the microscopic and macroscopic scales, and on the effects of such components on mechanical properties.[1]  He has authored or co-authored over 80 articles in international scientific journals and is an editor of a book on comparative climatology of terrestrial planets published by the University of Arizona Press.[2] ; Stephen J. Mackwell: Stephen J. Mackwell received a B.Sc. in Physics and Mathematics in August 1978 at the University of Canterbury in Christchurch, New Zealand. He continued his studies at the University of Canterbury and earned his M.Sc. in Physics in August 1979. His master's thesis was titled "Excitation Temperatures for Late Type Stars." He went on to receive his Diploma of Education at Christchurch Teachers College in New Zealand in November 1979. He earned his Ph.D. in Geophysics in March 1985 from the Research School of Earth Sciences of the Australian National University, Canberra, Australia. His dissertation was titled "Diffusion and Weakening Effects of Water in Quartz and Olivine."[3] ; Stephen J. Mackwell: Stephen J. Mackwell worked as a postdoctoral fellow in the Department of Materials Science and Engineering at Cornell University in Ithaca, New York, from 1984 to 1987, and then moved to the Pennsylvania State University in University Park, Pennsylvania, as an assistant professor in 1987 and subsequently associate professor of geosciences in 1992. He was program director for geophysics in the Earth Sciences Division at the National Science Foundation in Washington, D.C., from 1993 to 1994, and spent 1996 as an Alexander von Humboldt Fellow at the Bayerisches Geoinstitut in Bayreuth, Germany. In 1998, Mackwell became a full professor for experimental geophysics at the Bayerisches Geoinstitut at the University of Bayreuth. In January 2000 he was appointed director of the Bayerisches Geoinstitut and served there until December 2002.[4] ; Stephen J. Mackwell: Mackwell returned to the United States in late 2002 as director of the Lunar and Planetary Institute (LPI) in Houston, Texas, a division of the Universities Space Research Association (USRA).[5] In addition, Mackwell managed USRA's Houston facility and education programs including the NASA Internships Program and the Air Force Research Laboratory Intern Program. In 2016, Louise Prockter became the Director of the LPI, and Mackwell was named as the USRA Corporate Director of Science Programs.[6] ; Stephen J. Mackwell: Mackwell has served on the editorial board of several planetary science journals, including serving as editor-in-chief for the journal Geophysical Research Letters from 2002 to 2004. He served on the advisory board for the journal Physics and Chemistry of Minerals from 1996 to 2004.[7] Mackwell has participated in the 2013–2022 Planetary Science Decadal Survey Steering Group and Inner Planets Panel.[8] Since 2018, he is a member of the Space Studies Board, Division on Engineering and Physical Sciences, of the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and Medicine.[9]
knowledge1: Muhammad Al-Hafiz // Muhammad Al-Hafiz Muhammad Al-Hafiz Hamzah (born 15 March 1984 in Pendang, Kedah) is a Malaysian professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for Penang in the Malaysia Premier League. He was a product of Kedah's youth system ( team), and started in the junior squad during the 2002 season, but it was not until 2004 that he debuted in the senior side, replacing Megat Amir Faisal Al Khalidi Ibrahim. In 2004, where Malaysian football was introduced with the Malaysia Super League, Al-Hafiz became a second choice goalkeeper behind Megat Amir Faisal after Mirandinha brought him into the senior squad. However,; Muhammad Al-Hafiz // goalkeeper throughout the season. Muhammad Al-Hafiz Muhammad Al-Hafiz Hamzah (born 15 March 1984 in Pendang, Kedah) is a Malaysian professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper for Penang in the Malaysia Premier League. He was a product of Kedah's youth system ( team), and started in the junior squad during the 2002 season, but it was not until 2004 that he debuted in the senior side, replacing Megat Amir Faisal Al Khalidi Ibrahim. In 2004, where Malaysian football was introduced with the Malaysia Super League, Al-Hafiz became a second choice goalkeeper behind Megat Amir Faisal after Mirandinha brought him into; Muhammad Al-Hafiz // he had been given a chance and made his debut in the first league match against Selangor Public Bank FC on 14 February 2004 after Megat Amir Faisal had a serious back injury during the pre-season preparations. Al-Hafiz joined Premier league side, USM FC, in the 2012 season. Al-Hafiz joined the star-studded squad, Johor Darul Takzim F.C., in 2013, after USM FC management cited financial difficulties as the reason for the decision to pull out of the Malaysia Premier League. He got off to a mixed start for the 2013 season but managed to cement his place as a first-choice [sep] knowledge2: Muhammad Al-Hafiz: Al-Hafiz Hamzah (born 15 March 1984) is a former Malaysian professional footballer who plays as a goalkeeper. ; Muhammad Al-Hafiz: He was a product of Kedah's youth system (President Cup team), and started in the junior squad during the 2002 season, but it was not until 2004 that he debuted in the senior side, replacing Megat Amir Faisal Al Khalidi Ibrahim. ; Muhammad Al-Hafiz: In 2004, where Malaysian football was introduced with the Malaysia Super League, Al-Hafiz became a second choice goalkeeper behind Megat Amir Faisal after Mirandinha brought him into the senior squad. However, he had been given a chance and made his debut in the first league match against Selangor Public Bank FC on 14 February 2004 after Megat Amir Faisal had a serious back injury during the pre-season preparations. ; Muhammad Al-Hafiz: Al-Hafiz joined Premier league side, USM FC, in the 2012 season. ; Muhammad Al-Hafiz: Al-Hafiz joined the star-studded squad, Johor Darul Takzim F.C., in 2013, after USM FC management cited financial difficulties as the reason for the decision to pull out of the Malaysia Premier League. He got off to a mixed start for the 2013 season but managed to cement his place as a first-choice goalkeeper throughout the season.
knowledge1: Shirase Nobu // Shirase Nobu Shirase Nobu was born in Konoura, in Dewa Province (now Nikaho in Akita Prefecture) in July 20, 1861, the eldest child. According to his autobiography that he wrote after his Antarctic expedition, he was "impudent" during his childhood . In his schooling years he read the Chinese classics and stories about the adventures of Christopher Columbus, Ferdinand Magellan, and John Franklin, and the latter third explorer inspired him to become an explorer of the Arctic. At that time, his teacher Sasaki Sasasei taught him to follow five commitments: He enrolled in elementary school in 1877, and graduated in [sep] knowledge2: Nobuhiro Shimatani: Nobuhiro Shimatani (島谷常寛, Shimatani Nobuhiro, born February 27, 1996), also known by his ring name Check Shimatani (チェック・島谷, Chekku Shimatani), is a Japanese professional wrestler currently working as a freelancer and is best known for his tenure with the Japanese promotion DDT Pro-Wrestling.[3] As of July 2022, he predominantly works for Gleat as a member of the BULK Orchestra stable. ; Nobuhiro Shimatani: As a freelancer, Shimatani works for various promotions. At NOAH Great Voyage In Yokohama Vol. 2, an event promoted by Pro Wrestling Noah on December 16, 2018, he teamed up with Kazusada Higuchi and Kota Umeda in a losing effort to Atsushi Kotoge, Kenoh and Masa Kitamiya.[4] At a house show promoted by Big Japan Pro Wrestling on July 22, 2021, he teamed up with Takato Nakano and Kota Sekifuda to defeat Alejandro, Kazuki Hashimoto and Kosuke Sato.[5] ; Nobuhiro Shimatani: Shimatani made his professional wrestling debut at Judgement 2016: DDT 19th Anniversary on March 21 where he teamed up with Kouki Iwasaki and Rainbow Kawamura, losing to Shunma Katsumata, Guanchulo and Mao Inoue in a six-man tag team match.[6] He often wrestled in unusual matches such as a 28-person battle royal in which the winner was granted the general manager position for one night at DDT/Saki Akai Produce DDT Collection on March 14, 2018, match which also involved Danshoku Dino, Harashima, Mao, Yuko Miyamoto and others.[7] ; Nobuhiro Shimatani: He is known for competing in various of the promotion's signature events just as DDT Judgement. After his debut match at the event, he continued making appearances. One year later at Judgement 2017: DDT 20th Anniversary on March 20, he teamed up with Naomi Yoshimura and Dai Suzuki to defeat Rekka, Daiki Shimomura and Yuki Ueno.[8] At Judgement 2018: DDT 21st Anniversary on March 25, Shimatani teamed up with Daiki Shimomura as "Gran MilliMeters", Takato Nakano and Rekka in a losing effort to Tomomitsu Matsunaga, Hoshitango, Mad Paulie, Cherry and Gota Ihashi as a result of a Ten-person tag team match.[9] At Judgement 2020: DDT 23rd Anniversary on March 20, he teamed up with his fellow Damnation stablemates Tetsuya Endo and T-Hawk in a losing effort against Eruption (Kazusada Higuchi, Yukio Sakaguchi and Saki Akai).[10] ; Nobuhiro Shimatani: As for the DDT Peter Pan branch of events, Shimatani made his first appearance at Ryōgoku Peter Pan 2016 on August 28 where he teamed up with Chikara and Mitsuo Momota in a losing effort to Tomomitsu Matsunaga, Hoshitango and Rekka as a result of a six-man tag team match for Chikara's King of Dark Championship where had any opponent got pinned by him, they would have become the new champion.[11] At Ryōgoku Peter Pan 2018 on October 21, he won a Rumble rules match by lastly eliminating Gorgeous Matsuno and also competing against Self-Proclaimed Tiger Mask V, Gota Ihashi and others.[12] At Wrestle Peter Pan 2019 on July 15, Shimatani teamed up with Disaster Box (Yuki Ueno and Naomi Yoshimura) in a losing effort against All Out (Shunma Katsumata and Yuki Iino) and Mizuki Watase.[13]
knowledge1: Umika Kawashima // Umika Kawashima Umika Kawashima was born in the Saitama Prefecture. She was scouted in Shibuya when she was in 6th grade and joined Lespros Entertainment. The actresses she idolizes are Aoi Miyazaki, Yui Aragaki and Kou Shibasaki. She has stated that she would like to collaborate with Masaharu Fukuyama. She graduated from the Faculty of Arts and Letters at Meiji University with a degree in psychology in 2016. Since 2006, Kawashima has appeared in numerous television dramas and movies. In 2007 she joined the female idol group 9nine, however she announced her graduation from the group in 2016 to focus; Umika Kawashima // on her acting career. She appeared for her final performance with the group during "9nine LIVE 2016," BEST 9 Tour" after being with the group for nine and a half years. Early 2016, it was announced that Kawashima would become a regular alongside Masu Taichi on the television program ZIP!. Kawashima commented, "Now is the time to move forward. I want to present an exciting program without any accidents." She receives her first leading role as a voice actress in the 2017 summer anime series, Nana Maru San Batsu. Umika Kawashima Umika Kawashima was born in the Saitama Prefecture. She [sep] knowledge2: Umika Kawashima: Umika Kawashima (川島 海荷, Kawashima Umika, born March 3, 1994) is a Japanese actress, voice actress and singer from Saitama Prefecture, Japan.[1][2] She is a former member of the Japanese girl group 9nine. Her solo single "Maji de Koi Suru 5 Byō Mae/Ichigo Iro no Kimochi", on the Watashi no Yasashikunai Senpai soundtrack, reached #46 on the Oricon chart.[3] As an actress, she played in numerous Japanese TV series and movies. ; Umika Kawashima: Umika Kawashima was born in the Saitama Prefecture. She was scouted in Shibuya when she was in 6th grade and joined Lespros Entertainment. The actresses she idolizes are Aoi Miyazaki, Yui Aragaki and Kou Shibasaki. She has stated that she would like to collaborate with Masaharu Fukuyama.[4] She graduated from the Faculty of Arts and Letters at Meiji University with a degree in psychology in 2016.[5] ; Umika Kawashima: Since 2006, Kawashima has appeared in numerous television dramas and movies. In 2007 she joined the female idol group 9nine, however she announced her graduation from the group in 2016 to focus on her acting career. She appeared for her final performance with the group during "9nine LIVE 2016," BEST 9 Tour" after being with the group for nine and a half years.[6] Early 2016, it was announced that Kawashima would become a regular alongside Masu Taichi on the television program ZIP!. Kawashima commented, "Now is the time to move forward. I want to present an exciting program without any accidents."[7] She receives her first leading role as a voice actress in the 2017 summer anime series, Nana Maru San Batsu.[8]
knowledge1: Sun Wenguang // Sun Wenguang Sun Wenguang (; born August 26, 1934) is an activist and vocal critic of Chinese government. He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired. Sun Wenguang was born in Rongcheng City on August 26, 1934. His father was a naval officer of the National Government. Sun joined the Navy in his early years. He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired. Sun has a history of criticizing the Chinese government, being one of the original signatories of Charter; Sun Wenguang // Sun Wenguang Sun Wenguang (; born August 26, 1934) is an activist and vocal critic of Chinese government. He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired. Sun Wenguang was born in Rongcheng City on August 26, 1934. His father was a naval officer of the National Government. Sun joined the Navy in his early years. He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired. Sun has a history of criticizing the Chinese government, being one of the original signatories of Charter [sep] knowledge2: Sun Wenguang: Sun Wenguang (simplified Chinese: 孙文广; traditional Chinese: 孫文廣; born August 26, 1934) is an activist and vocal critic of the Chinese government. He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired.  ; Sun Wenguang: Sun Wenguang was born in Rongcheng City on August 26, 1934. His father was a naval officer of the National Government. Sun joined the Navy in his early years.[citation needed] ; Sun Wenguang: He was a professor of Physics at Shandong University in Jinan from 1982 until 1994 when he retired.[1] ; Sun Wenguang: Sun has a history of criticizing the Chinese government, being one of the original signatories of Charter 08 and has been harassed for relations with critics of Communist China.[2] ; Sun Wenguang: On April 5, 2009, Sun and a university student left to go to a local cemetery called Heroes’ Mountain (Yingxiong Shan; 英雄山) on a holiday to honor the dead. He was to visit the grave of Zhao Ziyang, a former Chinese Premier and Communist Party general secretary who died in 2005. When Sun entered the cemetery in Jinan, four or five men attacked him and beat him severely. He was admitted shortly after to Jinan hospital with three broken ribs and injuries to his spine, head, back, arms and legs. Later in 2010, Sun's passport application was rejected shortly before the Nobel Peace Prize ceremony for Liu Xiaobo.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Wil Nieves // Wil Nieves Wilbert "Wil" Nieves (born September 25, 1977) is a Puerto Rican former professional baseball catcher. He played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the San Diego Padres, New York Yankees, Washington Nationals, Milwaukee Brewers, Colorado Rockies, Arizona Diamondbacks, and Philadelphia Phillies. Nieves was selected by the Padres in the 47th round of the 1995 MLB draft. He made his major league debut on July 21, 2002, for the San Diego Padres, and played 28 games with them during their 2002 season. Nieves was selected off waivers by the Anaheim Angels on December 20, 2002. He was traded to; Wil Nieves // signed Nieves to a minor league contract, and he batted .238 for AAA Gwinnett, but the Braves released him on June 22. Wil Nieves Wilbert "Wil" Nieves (born September 25, 1977) is a Puerto Rican former professional baseball catcher. He played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the San Diego Padres, New York Yankees, Washington Nationals, Milwaukee Brewers, Colorado Rockies, Arizona Diamondbacks, and Philadelphia Phillies. Nieves was selected by the Padres in the 47th round of the 1995 MLB draft. He made his major league debut on July 21, 2002, for the San Diego Padres, and played 28 games with; Wil Nieves // the New York Yankees for pitcher Bret Prinz. Nieves won a spot on the Yankees 2007 roster by beating out Todd Pratt and Raul Chavez during spring training. He served as the back-up catcher to Jorge Posada, but was primarily considered Mike Mussina's "personal catcher." Joe Torre experimented with using Nieves to help bolster Mussina out of a rough stretch with good results. Nieves made his first career non-catching appearance in the ninth inning of a game on July 8, 2007, against the Angels; he played first base when the Yankees ran low on position players. Following an impressive 2-for-3; Wil Nieves // He elected free agency on August 6. Nieves signed with the Arizona Diamondbacks on August 6, 2012. Nieves scored a two-run homer on his debut August 9, 2012 at the Pittsburgh Pirates in a 6 to 3 win. On December 4, 2013, Nieves signed with the Philadelphia Phillies. Nieves made the Phillies Opening Day roster in 2014 as the backup catcher to Carlos Ruiz. On June 18, he injured his leg while running the bases during a start against Atlanta. He exited the game, and the Phillies recalled catcher Cameron Rupp to serve as Ruiz's backup while Nieves healed. Nieves [sep] knowledge2: Wil Nieves: Wilbert "Wil" Nieves (born September 25, 1977) is a Puerto Rican former professional baseball catcher and current minor league coach. He played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the San Diego Padres, New York Yankees, Washington Nationals, Milwaukee Brewers, Colorado Rockies, Arizona Diamondbacks, and Philadelphia Phillies. ; Wil Nieves: Nieves was selected by the Padres in the 47th round of the 1995 MLB draft.[1] He made his major league debut on July 21, 2002, for the San Diego Padres, and played 28 games with them during their 2002 season. ; Wil Nieves: Nieves was selected off waivers by the Anaheim Angels on December 20, 2002. ; Wil Nieves: He was traded to the New York Yankees for pitcher Bret Prinz. Nieves won a spot on the Yankees 2007 roster by beating out Todd Pratt and Raul Chavez during spring training. He served as the back-up catcher to Jorge Posada, but was primarily considered Mike Mussina's "personal catcher." Joe Torre experimented with using Nieves to help bolster Mussina out of a rough stretch with good results.[2] ; Wil Nieves: Nieves made his first career non-catching appearance in the ninth inning of a game on July 8, 2007, against the Angels; he played first base when the Yankees ran low on position players.
knowledge1: Robert Guthrie // Robert Guthrie Robert Guthrie, MD, Ph.D. (June 28, 1916 – June 24, 1995) was an American microbiologist, best known for developing the bacterial inhibition assay used to screen infants for phenylketonuria at birth, before the development of irreversible neurological damage. Guthrie also pioneered the collection of whole blood on specially designed filter paper, commonly known as "Guthrie cards" as a sample medium that could be easily collected, transported and tested. Although Guthrie is best known for developing the test for phenylketonuria, he worked tirelessly to raise awareness of the need to screen for treatable conditions and adapted his method to; Robert Guthrie // of Horst Bickel, was taken up to launch the International PKU Day. Robert Guthrie Legacy Project Robert Guthrie Robert Guthrie, MD, Ph.D. (June 28, 1916 – June 24, 1995) was an American microbiologist, best known for developing the bacterial inhibition assay used to screen infants for phenylketonuria at birth, before the development of irreversible neurological damage. Guthrie also pioneered the collection of whole blood on specially designed filter paper, commonly known as "Guthrie cards" as a sample medium that could be easily collected, transported and tested. Although Guthrie is best known for developing the test for phenylketonuria, he worked tirelessly [sep] knowledge2: Robert Guthrie: Robert Guthrie, MD, Ph.D. (June 28, 1916 – June 24, 1995) was an American microbiologist, best known for developing the bacterial inhibition assay used to screen infants for phenylketonuria at birth, before the development of irreversible neurological damage.[1]  Guthrie also pioneered the collection of whole blood on specially designed filter paper, commonly known as "Guthrie cards" as a sample medium that could be easily collected, transported and tested.[2]  Although Guthrie is best known for developing the test for phenylketonuria, he worked tirelessly to raise awareness of the need to screen for treatable conditions and adapted his method to early screening tests for galactosemia and maple syrup urine disease. ; Robert Guthrie: Guthrie received his doctorate from the University of Minnesota,[3] although his education took a circuitous route, as he eventually earned six degrees in six years, including both a medical doctorate and a doctor of philosophy.[4]  While in school, Guthrie married Margaret, a fellow student, and they eventually had six children together.[3]  His early research into bacterial inhibition assays came while he was employed by the Staten Island Public Health Hospital, testing antibiotic sensitivity.[5] ; Robert Guthrie (disambiguation): Robert Guthrie (1916–1995) was an American microbiologist. ; Robert Guthrie (disambiguation): Robert Guthrie may also refer to: ; Guthrie Robert Packer Hospital: Robert Packer Hospital was dedicated on July 13, 1885, the house surgeon being Dr. Franklin M. Stephens, with the first patient, Alonzo House, arriving two weeks later.[2] The majority of the patients in the first years were injured while working for the Lehigh Valley Railroad and Sayre Locomotive Shops.[9] The hospital was known for its use of aseptic techniques, only resorting to amputation for infection once in the first five years. Despite the fact that patients generally feared hospitals, in 1893 and 1894 that the hospital often went over capacity and had to turn away admissions. Some patients would wait weeks for admission.[9]
knowledge1: Ernestine Eckstein // Ernestine Eckstein Ernestine Eckstein (April 23, 1941 – July 15, 1992) was an African-American woman who helped steer the United States Lesbian and Gay rights movement during the 1960s. She was a leader in the New York chapter of Daughters of Bilitis (DOB). Her influence helped the DOB move away from negotiating with medical professionals and towards tactics of public demonstrations. Her understanding of, and work in, the Civil Rights Movement lent valuable experience on public protest to the lesbian and gay movement. Eckstein worked among activists such as Phyllis Lyon and Del Martin, Barbara Gittings, Franklin Kameny, and Randy; Ernestine Eckstein // 1992. Ernestine Eckstein Ernestine Eckstein (April 23, 1941 – July 15, 1992) was an African-American woman who helped steer the United States Lesbian and Gay rights movement during the 1960s. She was a leader in the New York chapter of Daughters of Bilitis (DOB). Her influence helped the DOB move away from negotiating with medical professionals and towards tactics of public demonstrations. Her understanding of, and work in, the Civil Rights Movement lent valuable experience on public protest to the lesbian and gay movement. Eckstein worked among activists such as Phyllis Lyon and Del Martin, Barbara Gittings, Franklin Kameny, and; Ernestine Eckstein // was one of the most progressive thinkers of her time in the gay and lesbian political movement as well as in the Black Feminist movement. Her understanding of the successes of the Civil Rights Movement influenced her beliefs about political organizing. She saw demonstrations as, “one of the very first steps towards changing society". In 1966, three years before the Stonewall Rebellion in 1969 that sparked annual Gay Pride marches beginning in 1970, while many white gay and lesbian activists were still struggling with direct action as a feasible tactic Eckstein said, “Picketing I regard as almost a conservative act; Ernestine Eckstein // 1963 at the age of twenty-two. Upon moving she came into a lesbian identity and her activism as a lesbian began. Eckstein says of her sexual orientation: Eckstein began attending meetings of the New York Mattachine Society soon after she arrived in New York City, which led her to its sister organization DOB. In 1965, debates around the direction of the homophile movement were heating up. That same year Eckstein marched in Philadelphia at the first Annual Reminder Day and in front of the White House as the only woman and person of color demonstrating. The Mattachine Society’s “old guard”; Ernestine Eckstein // was one of the most significant figures in the American gay rights movement, co-founding the Mattachine Society of Washington (MSW), and, inspired by Stokely Carmichael’s creation of the phrase Black is beautiful, created the slogan “Gay is Good” for the gay civil rights movement. In late 1965 and early 1966, Ernestine Ecsktein and Frank Kameny corresponded by letters about Eckstein’s wish to bring Kameny to speak on April 17, 1966 at DOB headquarters in New York City. Eckstein wanted Kameny’s help to reinforce to DOB officers and members the need for activism and activist strategies and tactics in moving forward [sep] knowledge2: Ernestine Eckstein: Ernestine Eckstein  (April 23, 1941 – July 15, 1992) was an African-American woman who helped steer the United States Lesbian and Gay rights movement during the 1960s. She was a leader in the New York chapter of Daughters of Bilitis (DOB). Her influence helped the DOB move away from negotiating with medical professionals and towards tactics of public demonstrations. Her understanding of, and work in, the Civil Rights Movement lent valuable experience on public protest to the lesbian and gay movement. Eckstein worked among activists such as Phyllis Lyon and Del Martin, Barbara Gittings, Franklin Kameny, and Randy Wicker. In the 1970s she became involved in the black feminist movement, in particular the organization Black Women Organized for Action (BWOA). ; Ernestine Eckstein: Eckstein was born in Indiana in 1941.[1] Her given name was Ernestine Delois Eppenger, though all her lesbian and gay activist work was done under the name Eckstein to protect herself from being outed in circles where it was not safe to be open.[2]  She graduated from Indiana University in Bloomington, Indiana in 1963.[3] Her undergraduate degree was in Magazine Journalism with a minor in Psychology and Russian.[4] She moved to New York City soon after graduation in 1963 at the age of twenty-two. Upon moving she came into a lesbian identity and her activism as a lesbian began.[5][6] Eckstein says of her sexual orientation: ; Ernestine Eckstein: Frank Kameny was one of the most significant figures in the American gay rights movement, co-founding the Mattachine Society of Washington (MSW), and, inspired by Stokely Carmichael's creation of the phrase Black is beautiful, created the slogan “Gay is Good” for the gay civil rights movement. ; Ernestine Eckstein: After three years in New York with the DOB Eckstein moved to Northern California to “focus on social justice issues…[she] joined Black Women Organized for Action…in the early 1970s".[16] Much less is known about Eckstein after she left New York. Interviews with previous DOB members revealed, “Eckstein had gotten tired of all the political wrangling and disagreements within DOB over strategies and tactics” and wanted “more political organization.” She left the movement on the East Coast for other political work advocating for women of color in California.[17] ; Ernestine Eckstein: Eckstein's involvement with political activism started in the Civil Rights Movement at Indiana State, as a NAACP chapter officer.[18] But Eckstein understood organizations like NAACP as, “structured with the white liberals in mind” and joined more progressive organizations like Congress on Racial Equality (CORE) once she moved to New York.[19]
knowledge1: Sheldon T. Mills // member of the Channel City Club, the Cosmopolitan Club, the Council on Foreign Relations, the American Foreign Service Association and Diplomatic and Consular Officials, Retired. He was a frequent contributor of op-ed articles on foreign affairs to local newspapers. Sheldon T. Mills Sheldon Tibbetts Mills (August 13, 1904 – July 15, 1988) was a United States diplomat, who served as a career Foreign Service officer of the U.S. Department of State from 1928 to 1961. Sheldon Tibbetts Mills was born on August 13, 1904, in Seattle, Washington and died on July 15, 1988, in Santa Barbara, California. Mills' parents were; Sheldon T. Mills // Sheldon T. Mills Sheldon Tibbetts Mills (August 13, 1904 – July 15, 1988) was a United States diplomat, who served as a career Foreign Service officer of the U.S. Department of State from 1928 to 1961. Sheldon Tibbetts Mills was born on August 13, 1904, in Seattle, Washington and died on July 15, 1988, in Santa Barbara, California. Mills' parents were Harry Edward Mills, a Protestant minister and poet, best known for his book, "The Sod House in Heaven, and Other Poems," and Mary Brewster Tibbetts Mills, a direct descendant of Elder William Brewster who arrived in America on the; Sheldon T. Mills // (Marcel K. Richter), Linda Mills Sipprelle (Dudley G. Sipprelle) and Mary Mills Presby (James Melvin Presby). Mr. and Mrs. Mills' grandchildren include Dwight Dudley Sipprelle (Susan Leary), Keith Andrew Sipprelle, Esq., Scott Mills Sipprelle (Tracy Huntzinger), Mark Sheldon Sipprelle, Cindy Mills Richter, Leila Richter Fiester and Shannon Scott Presby. Sheldon Mills graduated from Reed College in Portland, Oregon with a B.A. degree in 1927. He then traveled to Washington, D.C., where he studied for the Foreign Service exams with Angus Crawford, who tutored 90 percent of the aspiring Foreign Service officers of that era. Sheldon Mills passed the exams and; Sheldon T. Mills // were clients of one super power or the other. In Jordan, Ambassador Mills enjoyed a good personal interaction with King Hussein which enhanced the United States-Jordanian relationship. According to Nigel Ashton's, "King Hussein of Jordan, a Political Life," (page 83) the King told Ambassador Mills in early 1960 that, 'the Arab legend,' that Israel should be pushed into the sea should be abandoned, and that "It was time to put aside emotionalism and take steps toward a final settlement between Israel and the Arabs." After leaving the Foreign Service and retiring to Santa Barbara, California, Sheldon Mills was an active; Sheldon T. Mills // Mayflower in 1620. On January 23, 1932, Sheldon Mills married Francesca Dekum of Portland, Oregon, the daughter of Adolph Andrew Dekum and Linda Andrews Dekum. Adolph Dekum was in the hardware business. Linda Andrews Dekum was originally from Warren, Ohio, where her father, Francis Newell Andrews, was a prosperous merchant whose family had arrived in America in the 17th century. Francesca Dekum's grandfather, Frank Dekum, was born in Bavaria, Germany and was a prominent 19th century fruit merchant, banker and real estate investor in Portland, Oregon. Sheldon Mills and Francesca Mills were the parents of three daughters: Sheila Mills Richter [sep] knowledge2: Sheldon T. Mills: Sheldon Tibbetts Mills (August 13, 1904 – July 15, 1988) was a United States diplomat, who served as a career Foreign Service officer of the U.S. Department of State from 1928 to 1961.[1] ; Sheldon T. Mills: Mills was born on August 13, 1904, in Seattle, Washington and died on July 15, 1988, in Santa Barbara, California. Mills' parents were Harry Edward Mills, a Protestant minister and poet, best known for his book, "The Sod House in Heaven, and Other Poems," and Mary Brewster Tibbetts Mills, a direct descendant of Elder William Brewster who arrived in America on the Mayflower in 1620.    ; Sheldon T. Mills: On January 23, 1932, Sheldon Mills married Francesca Dekum of Portland, Oregon, the daughter of Adolph Andrew Dekum and Linda Andrews Dekum. Adolph Dekum was in the hardware business. Linda Andrews Dekum was originally from Warren, Ohio, where her father, Francis Newell Andrews, was a prosperous merchant whose family had arrived in America in the 17th century.    ; Sheldon T. Mills: Francesca Dekum's  grandfather, Frank Dekum, was born in Bavaria, Germany and was a prominent 19th century fruit merchant, banker and real estate investor in Portland, Oregon.  ; Sheldon T. Mills: Sheldon Mills and Francesca Mills were the parents of three daughters.
knowledge1: W. Clark Still // W. Clark Still W. Clark Still (born 1946) is an American organic chemist. As a distinguished professor at Columbia University, Clark Still made significant contributions to the field of organic chemistry, particularly in the areas of natural product synthesis, reaction development, conformational analysis, macrocyclic stereocontrol, and computational chemistry. Still and coworkers also developed the purification technique known as flash column chromatography which is widely used for the purification of organic compounds. In 1979, Still reported the first total synthesis of periplanone B, the potent sex pheromone of the American cockroach. Although the structural connectivity of this compound had been established; W. Clark Still // Born model augmented with the hydrophobic solvent accessible surface area term). The GB/SA model simulated solvent interactions with organic molecules by incorporating a continuous solvent field instead of including explicit individual solvent molecules in the computation. Still disclosed a full description of MacroModel in the Journal of Computation Chemistry in 1990, and the rights to this software were later acquired by Schrodinger, Inc. in 1998. W. Clark Still W. Clark Still (born 1946) is an American organic chemist. As a distinguished professor at Columbia University, Clark Still made significant contributions to the field of organic chemistry, particularly in the areas [sep] knowledge2: W. Clark Still: William Clark Still (born 1946) is an American organic chemist.  As a distinguished professor at Columbia University, Clark Still made significant contributions to the field of organic chemistry, particularly in the areas of natural product synthesis, reaction development, conformational analysis, macrocyclic stereocontrol, and computational chemistry.  Still and coworkers also developed the purification technique known as flash column chromatography which is widely used for the purification of organic compounds.[1] ; W. Clark Still: In 1979, Still reported the first total synthesis of periplanone B, the potent sex pheromone of the American cockroach.[2]  Although the structural connectivity of this compound had been established spectroscopically, Still's synthesis confirmed the relative stereochemical relationships present in this natural product.[3]  A key step in this synthesis makes use of an anionic oxy-Cope rearrangement to form the macrocyclic 10-membered ring found in periplanone B.  In this transformation, the initial tertiary alcohol was treated with potassium hydride and 18-crown-6 at elevated temperature to induce the rearrangement, and the resulting enolate was trapped with chlorotrimethylsilane to form the macrocyclic silyl enol ether as a single diastereomer.  This intermediate was then transformed into a key enone substrate over the course of five steps including Rubottom oxidation, TBS protection of the secondary alcohol, and formation of the exocyclic alkene via a selenoxide rearrangements. ; W. Clark Still: These transformations set the stage for the introduction of both epoxide groups, which were formed with high levels of diastereoselectivity based on the principles of macrocyclic stereocontrol.  The first epoxide was introduced via nucleophilic epoxidation of the enone using potassium hydride and tert-butylhydroperoxide; this led to the formation of a 4:1 mixture of diastereomeric epoxides, favoring the desired isomer in which attack had occurred from the peripheral face of the enone.  At this stage, the ketone was transformed into the second epoxide group using the Johnson-Corey-Chaykovsky reaction; notably, the product was formed as a single diastereomer, again due to initial peripheral attack of the dimethylsulfonium methylide nucleophile on the ketone.  Subsequent removal of the TBS protecting group and Sarett oxidation of the resulting secondary alcohol completed the total synthesis of racemic periplanone B. ; W. Clark Still: In 1980, Still and coworkers reported the total synthesis of monensin, a complex polyether natural product that acts as an ionophore.[4][5]    One of the key steps in this route is the late-stage union of two advanced fragments via an intermolecular aldol reaction.  In this reaction, low-temperature deprotonation of the methyl ketone with lithium diisopropylamide formed the kinetic enolate which then underwent transmetalation upon the addition of magnesium bromide.  Subsequent addition of the aldehyde component initiated a diastereoselective aldol reaction, forming the desired beta-hydroxyketone in 75% yield as a 3:1 mixture of diastereomers.  Notably, this instance of acyclic stereocontrol is consistent with the Cram-Felkin-Anh model for the addition of nucleophiles to an aldehyde bearing an existing stereocenter in the alpha position.  ; W. Clark Still: Having united these two complex fragments, Still was able to complete the synthesis of monensin in three additional steps.  First, hydrogenolysis of the benzyl group afforded the free primary alcohol under standard conditions.  Next, cleavage of the triethylsilyl (TES) protecting groups was achieved in the presence of para-toluenesulfonic acid; the resulting free secondary alcohols then engaged the ketone in a spontaneous cyclization reaction to form the thermodynamic spiroketal linkage.  Finally, hydrolysis of the methyl ester under basic conditions furnished the sodium salt of monensin, completing the synthesis of this challenging natural product.
knowledge1: Jonathan Roy // in Toronto. Jonathan Roy Jonathan Piuze-Roy (born 1989) is a Canadian pop singer and songwriter. Son of hockey great Patrick Roy, he initially pursued hockey in junior leagues, but abandoned that path in favour of music while still a teenager. Having previously released three albums, his major-label debut, "Mr. Optimist Blues", was released in 2017, and includes several songs written by 1980s pop star Corey Hart. Roy's father is famed Montreal Canadiens goaltender Patrick Roy. He moved with his family from Montreal to Colorado when he was six years old, due to his father being traded. Roy was influenced by; Jonathan Roy // Jonathan Roy Jonathan Piuze-Roy (born 1989) is a Canadian pop singer and songwriter. Son of hockey great Patrick Roy, he initially pursued hockey in junior leagues, but abandoned that path in favour of music while still a teenager. Having previously released three albums, his major-label debut, "Mr. Optimist Blues", was released in 2017, and includes several songs written by 1980s pop star Corey Hart. Roy's father is famed Montreal Canadiens goaltender Patrick Roy. He moved with his family from Montreal to Colorado when he was six years old, due to his father being traded. Roy was influenced by his mother's; Jonathan Roy // frequent piano playing for the family as he was growing up. He wrote poetry from the age of 13 or 14, and began putting his poems to music around age 16. At age 17, Roy played hockey for the Quebec Remparts, with his father coaching the team at the time. Although he enjoyed goaltending, he dreamed of a music career, and was listening to the Backstreet Boys, John Mayer, and Ray LaMontagne. At 18, when his father told him that his future would not be in hockey and that he needed to plan an education, Roy told his father that; Jonathan Roy // he wanted to be a musician and songwriter. Roy's album "What I've Become" came out in 2009. His second album, "Found My Way", came out in 2010. He released his French-language debut album, "La route", in 2011. The title track, a duet with Natasha St-Pier, received the most attention. Roy had a critically acclaimed role in the 2012 revival of the musical "Don Juan". In 2012, his father helped him set up a meeting with 1980s pop singer Corey Hart, who runs Siena Records, an affiliate of Warner Music. Hart offered to sign him to his label after Roy performed; Avik Roy // a debating society that he founded after losing the race for the Chairmanship of the Party of the Right. Between 2001 and 2004, Roy worked as an analyst and portfolio manager at investment firm Bain Capital, later working in a similar position for JPMorgan Chase, which he left to found a healthcare-focused hedge fund. In 2009, Roy was working as the managing partner at the New York-based hedge fund Mymensingh Partners, later working for the securities firm Monness, Crespi, Hardt & Co., Inc. In early 2012, Roy founded Roy Healthcare Research, an investment research firm located in New York. In [sep] knowledge2: Jonathan Roy: Jonathan Piuze-Roy (born March 15, 1989) is a Canadian pop singer and songwriter. Son of Hockey Hall of Fame goaltender Patrick Roy, he initially pursued hockey in junior leagues, but abandoned that path in favour of music while still a teenager. Having previously released three albums, his major-label debut, Mr. Optimist Blues, was released in 2017, and includes several songs written by 1980s pop star Corey Hart. ; Jonathan Roy: Roy's father is famed Montreal Canadiens goaltender Patrick Roy. He moved with his family from Montreal to Colorado when he was six years old, due to his father being traded.[1] Roy was influenced by his mother's frequent piano playing for the family as he was growing up.[2] He wrote poetry from the age of 13 or 14, and began putting his poems to music around age 16.[3] At age 17, Roy played hockey for the Quebec Remparts, with his father coaching the team at the time.[2] Although he enjoyed goaltending, he dreamed of a music career, and was listening to the Backstreet Boys, John Mayer, and Ray LaMontagne.[4] At 18, when his father told him that his future would not be in hockey and that he needed to plan an education, Roy told his father that he wanted to be a musician and songwriter.[2] In 2009 Roy was charged with assault following an incident during a hockey brawl where he skated the length of the ice and attacked the opposing goaltender, punching him several times.[5] ; Jonathan Roy: Roy's album What I've Become came out in 2009.[3] His second album, Found My Way, came out in 2010.[6] He released his French-language debut album, La route, in 2011.[7] The title track, a duet with Natasha St-Pier, received the most attention. ; Jonathan Roy: Roy had a critically acclaimed role in the 2012 revival of the musical Don Juan.[8] ; Jonathan Roy: In 2012, his father helped him set up a meeting with 1980s pop singer Corey Hart, who runs Siena Records, an affiliate of Warner Music. Hart offered to sign him to his label after Roy performed a Teddy Thompson song for him at Hart's home in Nassau, Bahamas. Roy and Hart had a hit holiday release in 2016 when they duetted on the Chris Rea song "Driving Home for Christmas".[2]
knowledge1: Jimmy Weldon // Jimmy Weldon Jimmy Weldon (born September 23, 1923) is an American voice actor, ventriloquist, and former television host. He is best known as the voice of the Hanna-Barbera cartoon character Yakky Doodle and the host and ventriloquist in the locally produced television series "The Webster Webfoot Show". Born Ivy Laverne Shinn on September 23, 1923, in Dale, Texas, he began his career in 1946 as a disc jockey at KWCO, the radio station which began its operations shortly after he returned home following WWII. He was the first announcer hired at this new radio station. While there, he developed a; Jimmy Weldon // "Dallas", and "Diff'rent Strokes". He also continues to do voice-overs for various television shows and cartoons. Weldon has also played some supporting characters on the popular radio drama "Adventures in Odyssey" and in classic serials and TV series. He is currently a member of the Premiere Speakers Bureau. Jimmy Weldon Jimmy Weldon (born September 23, 1923) is an American voice actor, ventriloquist, and former television host. He is best known as the voice of the Hanna-Barbera cartoon character Yakky Doodle and the host and ventriloquist in the locally produced television series "The Webster Webfoot Show". Born Ivy Laverne Shinn on [sep] knowledge2: Jimmy Weldon: Jimmy Weldon (born Ivy Laverne Shinn, September 23, 1923 – July 6, 2023) was an American actor, ventriloquist, and television host. He was best known as the voice of the Hanna-Barbera cartoon character Yakky Doodle and the host and ventriloquist in the locally produced television series The Webster Webfoot Show. He also had a YouTube channel titled Jimmy's Lecture, where he documented stories of his time in World War II. ; Jimmy Weldon: Born Ivy Laverne Shinn on September 23, 1923, in Dale, Texas,[1] he began his career in 1946 as a disc jockey at KWCO, the radio station which began its operations shortly after he returned home following WWII. He was the first announcer hired at this new radio station. ; Jimmy Weldon: While there, he developed a character named Webster Webfoot, a little duck who visited him while he was playing record requests from listeners calling in. Often they just wanted to talk to little Webster. They thought Webster was someone other than Weldon, and so he became an important part of Weldon's disc jockey presentations. ; Jimmy Weldon: In 1948, Weldon (and Webster Webfoot) moved to Duncan, Oklahoma, where they performed on another 250-watt AM station, KRHD, for two more years. The big 50,000-watt radio station WFAA in Dallas, Texas, recruited Webster and Weldon as entertainers, and Webster became a real person on television on April 4, 1950, on The Webster Webfoot Show, produced locally by station WFAA-TV. ; Jimmy Weldon: They moved to California on September 5, 1952, joining KCOP-TV, Channel 13, in Hollywood and continued their television careers. During an appearance at a middle school in Brentwood, Jeff Chandler and Randolph Scott collected the tickets from the children and parents who came to see the show. These two movie stars made Weldon feel very lucky indeed when they commented, "Our children think more of little Webster than they do OUR movie careers." Also, Ralph Edwards was there, and he later gave Webster and Weldon the positions as co-hosts of a new children's game show titled Funny Boners, a junior version of his famous Truth or Consequences radio and television shows, which aired on ABC.
knowledge1: William M. Brodhead // William M. Brodhead William McNulty Brodhead (born September 12, 1941) is a lawyer and former politician from the U.S. state of Michigan. Brodhead was born in Cleveland, Ohio and attended elementary and secondary schools in Cleveland. He received a B.A. from Wayne State University in Detroit, in 1965 and a J.D. from the University of Michigan Law School, Ann Arbor, in 1967. He was admitted to the Michigan Bar in 1968 and commenced practice in Detroit. He was elected to Michigan House of Representatives in 1970 and was reelected in 1972, from a district in Detroit. In 1974, Martha W.; William M. Brodhead // became a partner in the Detroit law firm, Plunkett & Cooney, where he practiced from 1983 to 2003. Retiring from the law firm in October, 2003, he practiced on his own until 2006, when he retired completely. While in law practice in Detroit, Brodhead served on many non-profit boards including Detroit Public Television, Mt. Carmel Hospital, Michigan's Children and the Citizen's Research Council. He served at various times as Board Chair of the Skillman Foundation, Covenant House Michigan, Focus:Hope and the Oakland Mediation Center. In 1994, he was an unsuccessful candidate for U.S. Senator, losing in the primary to Bob; William M. Brodhead // Carr, who went on to lose in the general election to Spencer Abraham. Brodhead now lives with his wife Kathleen, to whom he has been married since 1965, in Northern California. They have two adult children and a granddaughter who also live in Northern California. He serves on the board of directors of Covenant House, California. William M. Brodhead William McNulty Brodhead (born September 12, 1941) is a lawyer and former politician from the U.S. state of Michigan. Brodhead was born in Cleveland, Ohio and attended elementary and secondary schools in Cleveland. He received a B.A. from Wayne State University [sep] knowledge2: William M. Brodhead: William McNulty Brodhead (born September 12, 1941) is an American lawyer and former politician from Michigan who served four terms in the United States House of Representatives from 1975 to 1983. ; William M. Brodhead: Brodhead was born in Cleveland, Ohio and attended elementary and secondary schools in Cleveland. He received a B.A. from Wayne State University in Detroit, in 1965 and a J.D. from the University of Michigan Law School, Ann Arbor, in 1967. ; William M. Brodhead: He was admitted to the Michigan Bar in 1968 and commenced practice in Detroit. He was elected to Michigan House of Representatives in 1970 and was reelected in 1972, from a district in Detroit. ; William M. Brodhead: In 1974, Martha W. Griffiths, Democratic incumbent for Michigan's 17th District to the United States House of Representatives was not a candidate for renomination. Brodhead won nomination as the Democratic candidate and was elected to the Ninety-fourth and to the three succeeding Congresses, serving from January 3, 1975 to January 3, 1983. While in Congress, Brodhead served on the House Ways and Means Committee and on the Budget Committee. Brodhead also served as Chair of the Democratic Study Group which was then the liberal caucus in the House. ; William M. Brodhead: He declined to run for reelection in 1982 and returned home to the Detroit area.
knowledge1: Kelli White // Kelli White Kelli White (born April 1, 1977, in Oakland, California) is an American former sprinter. She won two gold medals in the World Championships in Paris in 2003. However, on June 18, 2004, she was stripped of her medals, because she tested positive on a drug test. She retired from professional track in 2006. White was born to parents who had both been sprinters. Her mother, Debbie Byfield, competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics. She attended James Logan High School in Union City, California, where she was on the track team. In 1994, when she was 17, a fellow; Kelli White // two years by the United States Anti-Doping Agency, effective May 17, 2004. Her doping was linked to the BALCO doping scandal. After returning from college to the San Francisco Bay Area in 2000, White's long-time coach, Remi Korchemny, introduced her to BALCO head Victor Conte. White has reported that Conte provided her with products that he identified as supplements and vitamins at first; when he informed her that one was a steroid, she declined to use it then and did not begin doping until after an injury-plagued, losing year in 2002. After being confronted with evidence seized from BALCO, she; Kelli White // student slashed her face with a knife; 300 stitches were required to close the wounds. White continued competing that season. Although she never won a state championship, at the time of her graduation in 1995 she held the top time in the 200 meters and the second best time in the 100 meters in the North Coast Section. She received a scholarship to the University of Tennessee, graduating in 1999. After her positive test, White admitted guilt and testified before the Court of Arbitration for Sport (CAS). All her performances since December 15, 2000, were annulled. She was banned for; Kelli White // admitted using tetrahydrogestrinone (THG) and erythropoietin (EPO) in addition to modafinil. White has since given lectures on drug abuse in sports around the world. She became the first athlete to work directly with the United States Anti-Doping Agency to help it understand the system and culture of doping at the elite competition level. While banned from competition, she has taught at track clinics at James Logan High. She announced her retirement in May 2006. Kelli White Kelli White (born April 1, 1977, in Oakland, California) is an American former sprinter. She won two gold medals in the World Championships in [sep] knowledge2: Kelli White: Kelli White (born April 1, 1977, in Oakland, California) is an American former sprinter. She won two gold medals in the World Championships in Paris in 2003. However, on June 18, 2004, she was stripped of her medals, because she tested positive on a drug test. She retired from professional track in 2006.[1] ; Kelli White: White's parents had both been sprinters. Her mother, Debbie Byfield, competed at the 1972 Summer Olympics.[2] She attended James Logan High School in Union City, California, where she was on the track team. In 1994, when she was 17, a fellow student slashed her face with a knife; 300 stitches were required to close the wounds. White continued competing that season. Although she never won a state championship, at the time of her graduation in 1995 she held the top time in the 200 meters and the second best time in the 100 meters in the North Coast Section. She received a scholarship to the University of Tennessee, graduating in 1999.[3][4] ; Kelli White: After her positive test, White admitted guilt and testified before the Court of Arbitration for Sport (CAS). All her performances since December 15, 2000, were annulled. She was banned for two years by the United States Anti-Doping Agency, effective May 17, 2004. ; Kelli White: Her doping was linked to the BALCO doping scandal. After returning from college to the San Francisco Bay Area in 2000, White's long-time coach, Remi Korchemny, introduced her to BALCO head Victor Conte. White has reported that Conte provided her with products that he identified as supplements and vitamins at first; when he informed her that one was a steroid, she declined to use it then and did not begin doping until after an injury-plagued, losing year in 2002. After being confronted with evidence seized from BALCO, she admitted using tetrahydrogestrinone (THG) and erythropoietin (EPO) in addition to modafinil.[5] ; Kelli White: White has since given lectures on drug abuse in sports around the world.[6] She became the first athlete to work directly with the United States Anti-Doping Agency to help it understand the system and culture of doping at the elite competition level.[7]
knowledge1: John Morris (curler) // John Morris (curler) John Morris (born December 16, 1978; nicknamed "Johnny Mo") is a Canadian curler, and two-time Olympic gold medalist. Morris played third for the Kevin Martin team until April 24, 2013. Morris, author of the book "Fit to Curl", is the son of Maureen and Earle Morris, inventor of the "Stabilizer" curling broom. Morris grew up in Gloucester, Ontario (now part of Ottawa) and at the age of five began curling at the Navy Curling Club. As a junior curler, Morris skipped his Ottawa Curling Club rink to three-straight Ontario provincial junior Men's titles from 1997 to 1999,; John Morris (curler) // Macdonald Brier. On March 27th 2018, John and his wife Maggie welcomed a baby boy named Jack. John Morris (curler) John Morris (born December 16, 1978; nicknamed "Johnny Mo") is a Canadian curler, and two-time Olympic gold medalist. Morris played third for the Kevin Martin team until April 24, 2013. Morris, author of the book "Fit to Curl", is the son of Maureen and Earle Morris, inventor of the "Stabilizer" curling broom. Morris grew up in Gloucester, Ontario (now part of Ottawa) and at the age of five began curling at the Navy Curling Club. As a junior curler, Morris [sep] knowledge2: John Morris (curler): John C. Morris[3] (born December 16, 1978; nicknamed "Johnny Mo") is a Canadian curler, and two-time Olympic gold medallist from Canmore, Alberta.[4] Morris played third for the Kevin Martin[5] team until April 24, 2013. Morris, author of the book Fit to Curl,[6] is the son of Maureen and Earle Morris, inventor of the "Stabilizer" curling broom. Morris grew up in Gloucester, Ontario[7] (now part of Ottawa) and at the age of five began curling at the Navy Curling Club. ; John Morris (curler): As a junior curler, Morris skipped his Ottawa Curling Club rink to three-straight Ontario provincial junior Men's titles from 1997 to 1999,[8] and won the 1998 and 1999 Canadian and World Junior Championships, setting records for most wins by a skip along the way. ; John Morris (curler): Morris and his rink of Craig Savill, Matt St. Louis and Mark Homan would represent Ontario at the 1997 Canadian Junior Curling Championships. His team would finish the round robin with a 7–5 record, in a five-way tie for third place. He would go on to beat British Columbia's T. J. Perepolkin, New Brunswick's Tommy Sullivan in tiebreakers, the Northwest Territories' Jamie Koe in the semifinal before losing to Alberta's Ryan Keane in the final. ; John Morris (curler): The following season, Morris brought in a new front end for his junior team, adding Andy Ormsby and Brent Laing to replace St. Louis and Homan. At the 1998 Canadian Junior Curling Championships, he led his Ontario Team to a 9–3 round robin record in a 4-way tie for first place.   The team beat New Brunswick's Rob Heffernan in a tiebreaker before beating Manitoba's Mike McEwen in the semifinal and then Alberta's Carter Rycroft in the final. Their win qualified the team to represent Canada at the 1998 World Junior Curling Championships. There, the team would go 9–0 in the round robin before defeating Switzerland's Ralph Stöckli in the semifinal and Garry MacKay of Scotland in the final to win the gold medal. ; John Morris (curler): For their third championship run, Team Morris replaced Ormsby with Jason Young at second. At the 1999 Canadian Junior Curling Championships, Morris led the team to an 8–4 round robin record in a three-way tie for second. He again had to fight through a tiebreaker to win the championship, downing Alberta's Jeff Erickson before defeating Newfoundland's Brad Gushue in the semifinal and British Columbia's Jeff Richard in the final. At the 1999 World Junior Curling Championships, he led Canada to an 8–1 round robin record (first place) and beat Sweden's Patric Håkansson in the semifinal and Christian Haller of Switzerland in the final to win the gold medal.[9]
knowledge1: William G. Angel // William G. Angel William Gardner Angel (July 17, 1790 – August 13, 1858) was an American politician and a U.S. Representative for New York's thirteenth district. Angel was born in New Shoreham, on Block Island, in Rhode Island, the son of William and Susannah (Gardner) Angel. In 1792, he moved with his parents to a farm in that part of Richfield, New York, which was in 1799 separated as the Town of Exeter, and attended the common schools while working on the family farm. In 1807, he began attending Dr. Buckingham's Grammar School, and the next year began the study; William G. Angel // 1843. From 1843 to 1847, he practiced law in partnership with his son Wilkes Angel. He was a delegate to the New York State Constitutional Convention of 1846. Becoming First Judge and Surrogate of the Allegany County Court, he served from 1847 to 1851. Angel died on August 13, 1858, in Angelica, Allegany County, New York; and was buried at the Until the Day Dawn Cemetery there. [confuses Richfield with Litchfield (in Herkimer Co.)] [gives wrong death month "August"] William G. Angel William Gardner Angel (July 17, 1790 – August 13, 1858) was an American politician and a U.S. Representative [sep] knowledge2: William G. Angel: William Gardner Angel (July 17, 1790 – August 13, 1858) was an American politician and lawyer who served two terms as a U.S. Representative for New York's 13th congressional district from 1825 to 1827, and from 1829 to 1833. ; William G. Angel: Angel was born in New Shoreham, Rhode Island, the son of William and Susannah (Gardner) Angel. In 1792, he moved with his parents to a farm in that part of Richfield, New York, which was separated as the Town of Exeter in 1799, and attended the common schools while working on the family farm. In 1807, he began attending Dr. Buckingham's Grammar School. Angel also briefly studied medicine. ; William G. Angel: After the death of his first wife, Angel married Clarissa English and they had ten children, among them James R. Angel (1836–1899) and Texas Angel (1839–1903, a lawyer in Hailey, Idaho, and a Populist contender for U.S. Senator from Idaho in 1897). ; William G. Angel: Angel was elected as a Jacksonian to the 19th, 21st and 22nd United States Congresses, holding office from March 4, 1825, to March 3, 1827, and from March 4, 1829, to March 3, 1833. Afterwards he removed to Hammondsport and resumed the practice of law in partnership with Morris Brown. At this time, Martin Grover studied law with Angel, first in Burlington, then in Hammondsport. Grover was admitted to the bar, and commenced practice in Angelica, New York. In 1835, Angel followed Grover to Angelica, and practiced law in partnership with Grover until 1843. From 1843 to 1847, he practiced law in partnership with his son Wilkes Angel. He was a delegate to the New York State Constitutional Convention of 1846. Becoming First Judge and Surrogate of the Allegany County Court, he served from 1847 to 1851. ; William G. Angel: In 1812, Angel married Emily P. English (1790–1822) and they had several children, among them William P. Angel (1813–1869) and Wilkes Angel (1817–1889).
knowledge1: Andy Middleton // Andy Middleton Andy Middleton (born May 22, 1962) is an American tenor & soprano saxophonist whose music derives from American jazz, classical music, European jazz and ethnic music. Since 1991 he has recorded 9 albums as a leader featuring Ralph Towner, Dave Holland, Kenny Wheeler, Renee Rosnes, Jamey Haddad, Joey Calderazzo and Alan Jones. Born in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, Middleton grew up in a musical family and began playing the alto sax at the age of 9. He attended the University of Rochester from 1980 to 1982, then the University of Miami from 1982 - 1987. He first met Dave Holland,; Andy Middleton // of the City of Vienna. Andy Middleton Andy Middleton (born May 22, 1962) is an American tenor & soprano saxophonist whose music derives from American jazz, classical music, European jazz and ethnic music. Since 1991 he has recorded 9 albums as a leader featuring Ralph Towner, Dave Holland, Kenny Wheeler, Renee Rosnes, Jamey Haddad, Joey Calderazzo and Alan Jones. Born in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, Middleton grew up in a musical family and began playing the alto sax at the age of 9. He attended the University of Rochester from 1980 to 1982, then the University of Miami from 1982 - 1987. [sep] knowledge2: Andy Middleton: Andy Middleton (born May 22, 1962) is an American tenor and soprano jazz saxophonist. He has recorded with Ralph Towner, Dave Holland, Kenny Wheeler, Renee Rosnes, Jamey Haddad, Joey Calderazzo, and Alan Jones. ; Andy Middleton: Born in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, Middleton grew up in a musical family and began playing the alto sax at the age of 9. He attended the University of Rochester from 1980 to 1982, then the University of Miami from 1982 to 1987. He met Dave Holland, Kenny Wheeler, Steve Coleman, John Abercrombie, Richie Beirach and David Liebman at the Banff Centre in Alberta, Canada in 1985 and 1986. ; Andy Middleton: Middleton moved to the New York City area in 1987, playing with the Bob Mintzer Big Band, the Lionel Hampton Big Band (who recorded a composition he wrote with his brother Rob Middleton entitled "Two Brothers" on "Cookin' in the Kitchen") and the Maria Schneider Jazz Orchestra. He founded his long-running quartet featuring at various times guitarist Ben Monder, drummers John Hollenbeck, Owen Howard, bassists Scott Colley and Peter Herbert, and pianists Henry Hey, Andy Ezrin, and David Berkman. ; Andy Middleton: Middleton's first album, Acid Rain, featuring Joey Calderazzo, was released in 1991 by the French label Owl Records. His second, Terra Infirma was released in 1995 by EMI France, produced by David Liebman, and featuring the quartet of Middleton, pianist Renee Rosnes, bassist Paul Imm, and drummer Alan Jones augmented by a horn section. ; Andy Middleton: The Fensters was a two saxophone, bass and drums formation featuring Middleton, Alan Jones, the saxophonist and composer François Theberge, and bassist Paul Imm. The Fensters recorded 2 CDs, "Jazz Music, Vol. 1" in 1992 for the Czech label Arta Records, and "Jazz Music, Vol. X" for the Dutch label Challenge Records sub-label A Records in 1996. In 1999 Middleton recorded his 3rd CD as a leader "Nomad's Notebook" with ECM Records guitarist Ralph Towner on acoustic guitars and piano, Dave Holland on bass, Alan Jones on drums, Noah Bless on trombone and Jamey Haddad on percussion. "Nomad's Notebook" was followed by his 2nd production for the German label Intuition Music and Media featuring trumpeter Kenny Wheeler and trombonist Nils Wogram entitled "Reinventing the World".
knowledge1: Guy Reid // Guy Reid Captain Guy Patrick Spence Reid (18 May 1897 – 16 October 1917) was a British World War I flying ace credited with five aerial victories. Reid was born in Puerto de la Cruz, Tenerife, the son of Thomas Miller Reid and his wife Lisette (née Livings). His father was the British Vice-Consul there. After passing out from the Royal Military College, Sandhurst, he was commissioned as a second lieutenant in the Seaforth Highlanders (Ross-shire Buffs, The Duke of Albany's) regiment on 11 August 1915. Reid was granted Royal Aero Club Aviators' Certificate No. 1693 on 4 September, after [sep] knowledge2: Benjamin Lawrence Reid: Benjamin Lawrence Reid (May 3, 1918 — November 30, 1990) was an American professor in English from the 1940s to 1980s. During his career, Reid primarily taught at Sweet Briar College from 1951 to 1957 and Mount Holyoke College from 1957 to 1983. Outside of academics, Reid wrote multiple books, and won a Pulitzer Prize and other honors.  ; Benjamin Lawrence Reid: Reid was born on May 3, 1918, in Louisville, Kentucky, and briefly lived in Texas growing up. During his childhood, Reid played baseball during his childhood and switched to basketball during his teens.[1][2] For his post-secondary education, Reid first received a Bachelor of Arts from the University of Louisville in the 1940s. In the 1950s, Reid obtained a Master of Arts from Columbia University and a Doctor of Philosophy from the University of Virginia.[3] ; Benjamin Lawrence Reid: As a conscientious objector throughout World War II, Reid was a bridge constructor and a psychiatric hospital orderly.[1] After the war, Reid started his academics tenure as an English lecturer at Iowa State College from 1946 to 1948. Upon continuing his English teaching career at Smith College from 1948 to 1951, Reid became an instructor at Sweet Briar College in 1951. At Sweet Briar, Reid remained as an instructor until he spent his last years at the college as an assistant English professor from 1956 to 1957.[4] ; Benjamin Lawrence Reid: For the last part of his career, Reid joined Mount Holyoke College as an assistant professor in 1957. While at Mount Holyoke, he was promoted to associate professor in 1959, professor in 1963, and English professor in 1970. Reid stayed at Mount Holyoke until ending his academic career in 1983.[3] Outside of academics, Reid published his first books in the late 1950s to early 1960s using his university theses he wrote on Gertude Stein and William Butler Yeats. He moved on to biographies about New York lawyer John Quinn in 1968 and Irish politician Roger Casement in 1976. While he wrote essays between the two biographies, his last publications were his autobiographies between 1988 and 1990.[2] ; Benjamin Lawrence Reid: Reid won the 1969 Pulitzer Prize for Biography or Autobiography for The Man from New York: John Quinn and His Friends.[5] Years later, Reid was a finalist of the 1977 National Book Award for Biography and Autobiography for The Lives of Roger Casement.[6] In 1963, Reid received a research grant from the Fulbright Program to study at the University of London.[7] For his book on Russell, Reid was given a fellowship from the National Endowment for the Humanities in 1971.[8]
knowledge1: David Galloway (writer) // David Galloway (writer) David Darryl Galloway (born 5 May 1937) is an American novelist, curator, journalist and academic. A graduate of Harvard University, he is the founding curator of the Tehran Museum of Contemporary Art, a longtime contributor to the "International Herald Tribune", an emeritus professor at the Ruhr University Bochum and a fellow of the Royal Society of Arts. He currently resides in both France and Germany. David Galloway was born on 5 May 1937 in Memphis, Tennessee. In 1955 he enrolled in Harvard University, where he was mentored by Leonard Bernstein and Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr. There Galloway; David Galloway (writer) // years, David Galloway has contributed to over a hundred books on the subjects of art, design, literature and architecture, while curating, reporting and teaching worldwide. He has been a fellow of the Royal Society of Arts since 1988. David Galloway (writer) David Darryl Galloway (born 5 May 1937) is an American novelist, curator, journalist and academic. A graduate of Harvard University, he is the founding curator of the Tehran Museum of Contemporary Art, a longtime contributor to the "International Herald Tribune", an emeritus professor at the Ruhr University Bochum and a fellow of the Royal Society of Arts. He currently; David Galloway (writer) // artists including Pina Bausch, Keith Haring, Yoko Ono and Andy Warhol, contacts much coveted by his editors. Alongside his journalism, Galloway published three more novels: "A Family Album", "Lamaar Ransom: Private Eye" and "Tamsen". After leaving the Ruhr University in 2002, Galloway served as a guest curator at venues including the Venice Biennale and the Moscow Museum of Modern Art while continuing to write for "Art in America", "ARTnews" and the "IHT". In 2011, he opened exhibitions at both Art Basel in Miami Beach and the Kunsthalle Wien of paintings by singer Marilyn Manson. In a career spanning some fifty-five; David Galloway (writer) // met Radcliffe student Sally Gantt, whom he married in 1959, relocating to the University at Buffalo where their son was born two years later. David Galloway first worked as a publications editor for the Albright-Knox Art Gallery. Leaving the United States, he taught at Trinity College Dublin and the University of Sussex, freelancing as a journalist for "The Daily Telegraph", "The Times" and "The Guardian". In 1967 Galloway returned to the U.S. to assist in founding the New Gallery (later renamed the Museum of Contemporary Art Cleveland). He then moved to Germany in 1972 after being appointed as chairman of; David Galloway (writer) // outside of the Western world, including pieces by Salvador Dalí, Claude Monet, Pablo Picasso, Vincent van Gogh and Andy Warhol, exhibited alongside works by Iranian artists such as Parviz Tanavoli. Several months before the Iranian Revolution, Galloway left Tehran for Wuppertal, Germany, to resume his professorship in Bochum. While visiting Forcalquier, France, he purchased the town’s former episcopal residence, known as the Maison de Chapitre, which he transformed into an informal retreat for artists and students. In 1979, Galloway began writing for the "International Herald Tribune". Throughout his many years at the paper, he maintained a close professional relationship with [sep] knowledge2: David Galloway (writer): David Darryl Galloway FRSA (born 5 May 1937 – 28 December 2019) was an American novelist, curator, journalist and academic. A graduate of Harvard University, he was the founding curator of the Tehran Museum of Contemporary Art, a longtime contributor to the International Herald Tribune, an emeritus professor at the Ruhr University Bochum and a fellow of the Royal Society of Arts. The last decades of his life he resided in both France (Forcalquier) and Germany. ; David Galloway (writer): David Galloway was born on 5 May 1937 in Memphis, Tennessee. In 1955 he enrolled in Harvard University, where he was mentored by Leonard Bernstein and Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr.[1][2] There Galloway met Radcliffe student Sally Gantt, whom he married in 1959, relocating to the University at Buffalo where their son was born two years later.[3] ; David Galloway (writer): David Galloway first worked as a publications editor for the Albright-Knox Art Gallery.[4] Leaving the United States, he taught at Trinity College Dublin and the University of Sussex, freelancing as a journalist for The Daily Telegraph, The Times and The Guardian.[5] In 1967 Galloway returned to the U.S. to assist in founding the New Gallery (later renamed the Museum of Contemporary Art Cleveland).[6] He then moved to Germany in 1972 after being appointed as chairman of American studies at the newly established Ruhr University Bochum, meanwhile publishing his first novel, Melody Jones, to wide critical acclaim.[7][8] ; David Galloway (writer): While teaching at the Ruhr University, Galloway lectured extensively throughout Europe, North Africa and the Middle East, including regular visits to the Iran-America Society in Tehran.[9] In 1977 he first met Farah Pahlavi, Empress consort of Iran, whose staff was preparing to open the Tehran Museum of Contemporary Art in commemoration of the tenth anniversary of the Empress' coronation. Galloway was hired as chief curator and with his staff assembled what is widely considered the most important collection of Western art outside of the Western world, including pieces by Salvador Dalí, Claude Monet, Pablo Picasso, Vincent van Gogh and Andy Warhol, exhibited alongside works by Iranian artists such as Parviz Tanavoli.[10][11] ; David Galloway (writer): Several months before the Iranian Revolution, Galloway left Tehran for Wuppertal, Germany, to resume his professorship in Bochum. While visiting Forcalquier, France, he purchased the town's former episcopal residence, known as the Maison de Chapitre, which he transformed into an informal retreat for artists and students.[12]
knowledge1: Stan Marple // Stan Marple Stan Marple or Stanislaus Henry Marple, is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player and coach. Marple played twelve seasons in various British leagues, most notably for the Guildford Flames, for whom he later served as head coach. He is currently the general manager for the University of Alberta's men's hockey team, the Alberta Golden Bears. Note: Stan Marple could not play regularly after 2005 because of the EPL 4 import rule, therefore he could only play when other imports were injured. Stan had his Number 3 Retired to the rafters never to be worn again in Guildford.; Stan Marple // The Flames gained 10 Titles while Stan was HC & GM. Year by Year Record "Note: GP = Games played; G = Goals; A = Assists; Pts = Points; PIM = Penalty Minutes" Stan's Coaching Record at Guildford is as follows: Wins 396, Losses 174, Ties and Overtime Losses 42. The record of the U of A while Stan has been GM is as follows: Wins 213, Losses, 55 Stan's Titles for his clubs as head coach & or general manager are as follows: Stan Marple Stan Marple or Stanislaus Henry Marple, is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player [sep] knowledge2: Stan Marple: Stanislaus Henry Marple is a Canadian former professional ice hockey player and coach. Marple played twelve seasons in various British leagues, most notably for the Guildford Flames, for whom he later served as head coach. He is currently the general manager for the University of Alberta's men's hockey team, the Alberta Golden Bears. ; Stan Marple: Note: Marple could not play regularly after 2005 because of the EPL 4 import rule, therefore he could only play when other imports were injured. ; Stan Marple: Marple had his number 3 retired by Guildford. The Flames gained ten titles while Marple was head coach and general manager. ; Stan Marple: Marple's coaching record at Guildford is as follows: 396 wins, 174 losses, 42 ties and overtime losses. His record during his time as GM is as follows: 213 wins, 55 losses. ; Stan Marple: Marple's titles for his clubs as head coach & or general manager are as follows:
knowledge1: Caitlin Lowe // Caitlin Lowe Caitlin Faith Lowe-Nagy (born February 6, 1985) is an American coach and former athlete. Lowe-Nagy was a four-time collegiate First Team All-American and medal winning Olympian, retired three-time pro All-Star, left-handed hitting softball player in the outfield and current Assistant Coach originally from Tustin, California. She played for the University of Arizona Wildcats under head coach Mike Candrea and led her team in back-to-back NCAA Women's College World Series championships in 2006 and 2007. She won a silver medal at the 2008 Beijing Summer Olympics. Lowe played with National Pro Fastpitch's USSSA Pride for 6 seasons, winning three; Caitlin Lowe // helped other student athletes become acclimated to college through Arizona’s Peer Athletic Leaders (PAL). Her senior year, Caitlin was awarded the inaugural Lowe’s Senior CLASS Softball Award, which acknowledges personal qualities that define a complete student athlete, such as excellence in the classroom, character and community, as well as success in athletic competition. Lowe is one of only six Wildcat players to be named an NFCA All-American in each of her four years with the program and joined Leah Braatz (1994, 95, 97, 98) as the only player in Arizona history to be awarded first-team All-America all four years. Caitlin; Caitlin Lowe // began her national career in 2004 as a member of the USA Schutt Elite Team at the Canada and Champions Cups, where she scored a team-high 16 runs. In 2005, Caitlin joined the United States National Team and helped the team earn silver medals in the Japan and World Cups. She was one of the youngest members of the 2006 World Championship team. Caitlin also helped the team win the World Cup in 2006 and 2007, where she posted a team high 6 hits with three runs scored. She earned a gold medal at the 2007 Pan American games, and; Caitlin Lowe // and joined the coaching staff as the team’s volunteer assistant coach in 2013 after serving as the program’s director of operations in 2012. Lowe will be working with the slappers, the outfielders and base running. Lowe retired officially from softball in 2015. Caitlin Lowe Caitlin Faith Lowe-Nagy (born February 6, 1985) is an American coach and former athlete. Lowe-Nagy was a four-time collegiate First Team All-American and medal winning Olympian, retired three-time pro All-Star, left-handed hitting softball player in the outfield and current Assistant Coach originally from Tustin, California. She played for the University of Arizona Wildcats under head coach; Caitlin Lowe // titles and being named 2012 Player of The Year, before officially retiring in 2015. She is one of select players in NCAA Division I history to have accumulated over 300 hits, 200 runs and 100 stolen bases while batting .400 in her career. At Foothill High School in Tustin, California, Caitlin was selected as an All-American four years in a row, and helped lead her team to state and national championships in 2000. In addition, she led the school to league championships in 2001, 2002 and 2003. In 2001, she received the All-League and Foothill High School MVP Awards and [sep] knowledge2: Caitlin Lowe: Caitlin Faith Lowe-Nagy (born February 6, 1985) is the head coach of the Arizona Wildcats softball team. Lowe is a former collegiate four-time first team All-American and medal winning Olympian. She played college softball for Arizona and led her team in back-to-back Women's College World Series championships in 2006 and 2007. She won a silver medal at the 2008 Summer Olympics. Lowe played with National Pro Fastpitch's USSSA Pride for six seasons, winning three titles and being named 2012 Player of the Year, before officially retiring in 2015. ; Caitlin Lowe: She is one of select players in NCAA Division I history to have accumulated over 300 hits, 200 runs and 100 stolen bases while batting .400 in her career. Recently, she was only one of 3 named by both the fan vote and experts to the Greatest College Softball Team All-Time, in the outfield.[1] ; Caitlin Lowe: At Foothill High School in North Tustin, California, Caitlin was selected as an All-American four years in a row, and helped lead her team to state and national championships in 2000. In addition, she led the school to league championships in 2001, 2002 and 2003. In 2001, she received the All-League and Foothill High School MVP Awards and in 2003, she received the Orange County "Player of the Year" Award.[2] ; Caitlin Lowe: For her freshman season at the University of Arizona, Lowe earned First Team All-American status and was named the Pac-10 Newcomer of the Year and was a top-10 finalist for USA Softball Collegiate Player of the Year.[3][4][5] She jumped into top-10 rankings in Wildcat history for her run and stolen base totals and posted career highs in doubles and base on balls; Lowe also led the conference in stolen bases. ; Caitlin Lowe: The sophomore continued her success by earning all-season honors from both the NFCA and the Pac-10, including being named conference Player of the Year.[6][7][8] Her career best season batting average still ranks second all-time and her hits total top-10 at Arizona (both topped the conference year), leading to a finalist spot for the Honda and USA Softball National Collegiate Player of The Year.[9] She also set career highs in home runs, triples and slugging percentage.
knowledge1: Maddy Crippen // Maddy Crippen Madeleine Marie Crippen (born July 10, 1980), also known by her married name as Madeleine Plankey, is an American former competition swimmer. Crippen represented the United States at the 2000 Summer Olympics. In 1997 Crippen earned a silver medal as a part of Team USA at the Pan Pacific Championship in Fukuoka, Japan. She followed that performance with a fifth-place finish in the 400-meter individual medley and a sixth-place finish in the 200-meter individual medley at the 1998 World Aquatics Championships in Perth, Australia. She represented the United States at the Pan Pacific Championships in 1999 where she; Maddy Crippen // swam for the University of Florida. Crippen retired from swimming in 2004 and currently lives in Washington, D.C., and works as a marketing professional. She is a member of USA Swimming's Board of Directors and the Athletes Executive Committee. Crippen is married to Sean Plankey, a lieutenant commander in the U.S. Coast Guard. Maddy Crippen Madeleine Marie Crippen (born July 10, 1980), also known by her married name as Madeleine Plankey, is an American former competition swimmer. Crippen represented the United States at the 2000 Summer Olympics. In 1997 Crippen earned a silver medal as a part of Team USA; Maddy Crippen // (NCAA) and Big East Conference competition. During her college swimming career, Crippen won an NCAA championship in the 400-yard individual medley and ten Big East championships, and was named Big East "Swimmer of the Year" in 1999 and 2001. She was named Villanova "Swimmer of the Year" in 1999, 2001 and 2002. Crippen is the daughter of Peter and Patrica Crippen. She, her late brother Fran, and sisters Teresa and Claire were all members of the Germantown Academy swim team and swam for coach Richard "Dick" Shoulberg; all four have qualified for the U.S. Olympic Team Trials in swimming. Her; Maddy Crippen // placed fourth in the 400-meter individual medley. Crippen earned a spot on the 2000 Olympic Team by placing second in the 400-meter individual medley at the U.S. Olympic Trials. In the 2000 Summer Olympics, she placed sixth in the event. Following her Olympic showing, Crippen competed at the 2002 Pan Pacific Championships and 2003 World Championships in Barcelona, Spain. Crippen is a three-time U.S. national champion, winning two national titles in the 400-meter individual medley and one in the 200-meter breaststroke. While attending Villanova University, she swam for the Villanova Wildcats swimming and diving team in National Collegiate Athletic Association; Maddy Crippen // brother Fran won a bronze in the 10-kilometer open water race at the 2009 World Aquatics Championships. He swam for the University of Virginia where he was an 11-time All-American and two-time Atlantic Coast Conference (ACC) swimmer of the year in 2006 and 2008. He died on October 23, 2010 due to exhaustion after he did not pass the line during a race. Her sister, Claire Crippen, is a national finalist, an NCAA All-American, and swam for the University of Virginia. Her sister Teresa is a Pan American Games Champion in the 200-meter backstroke and U.S. National Team member; Teresa [sep] knowledge2: Maddy Crippen: Madeleine Marie Crippen (born July 10, 1980), also known by her married name as Madeleine Plankey, is an American former competition swimmer.  Crippen represented the United States at the 2000 Summer Olympics. ; Maddy Crippen: In 1997 Crippen earned a silver medal as a part of Team USA at the Pan Pacific Championship in Fukuoka, Japan.  She followed that performance with a fifth-place finish in the 400-meter individual medley and a sixth-place finish in the 200-meter individual medley at the 1998 World Aquatics Championships in Perth, Australia.  She represented the United States at the Pan Pacific Championships in 1999 where she placed fourth in the 400-meter individual medley. ; Maddy Crippen: Crippen earned a spot on the 2000 Olympic Team by placing second in the 400-meter individual medley at the U.S. Olympic Trials.  In the 2000 Summer Olympics, she placed sixth in the event.  Following her Olympic showing, Crippen competed at the 2002 Pan Pacific Championships and 2003 World Championships in Barcelona, Spain.  Crippen is a three-time U.S. national champion, winning two national titles in the 400-meter individual medley and one in the 200-meter breaststroke. ; Maddy Crippen: While attending Villanova University, she swam for the Villanova Wildcats swimming and diving team in National Collegiate Athletic Association (NCAA) and Big East Conference competition.  During her college swimming career, Crippen won an NCAA championship in the 400-yard individual medley and ten Big East championships, and was named Big East "Swimmer of the Year" in 1999 and 2001.  She was named Villanova "Swimmer of the Year" in 1999, 2001 and 2002. In 2019, Maddy was inducted into the Villanova Athletic Hall of Fame.[1] ; Maddy Crippen: Crippen is the daughter of Peter and Patrica Crippen. She, her late brother Fran, and sisters Teresa and Claire were all members of the Germantown Academy swim team and swam for coach Richard "Dick" Shoulberg; all four have qualified for the U.S. Olympic Team Trials in swimming.  Her brother Fran won a bronze in the 10-kilometer open water race at the 2009 World Aquatics Championships.  He swam for the University of Virginia where he was an 11-time All-American and two-time Atlantic Coast Conference (ACC) swimmer of the year in 2006 and 2008.  He died on October 23, 2010, due to exhaustion after he did not pass the line during a race with inadequate safety measures.  Her sister, Claire Crippen, is a national finalist, an NCAA All-American, and swam for the University of Virginia. Her sister Teresa is a Pan American Games Champion in the 200-meter backstroke and was a U.S. National Team member, competing at the 2011 FINA World Championships in Shanghai, CN;[2] Teresa swam for the University of Florida.
knowledge1: John Counter // John Counter John Counter (April 18, 1799 – October 29, 1862) was a Canadian businessman and political figure. He served as Mayor of the City of Kingston, Ontario for the terms 1841-43; 1846; 1850; 1852–53 and 1855. John Counter was born on April 18, 1799 came to Kingston from Devonshire, England with his parents in 1820. He had an older brother George and younger sister Susannah. His parents were John and Susannah. He began his career in the family business as a baker and confectioner, with a bakery located at the corner of Barrie and Clergy Streets. After securing major; John Counter // £17.10 and was paid for by the councilors personally, not from civic funds. He is depicted wearing a relatively simple Chain of Office and holding a scroll in left hand. It has been loaned to the Art Gallery of Ontario, where they made the existing slides of the painting that have been copied for archival institutions nationwide, and was stored at the City of Kingston facility at 19 Queen Street until it received restoration work in the late 1970s. It currently hangs in the John Counter meeting room at Kingston City Hall. John Counter John Counter (April 18, 1799 –; John Counter // local contracts to supply bread, he moved on to real estate investments and a variety of transportation and industrial enterprises with the goal to make Kingston a transportation hub. He married Hannah Rhode, aged 17 and they had four children. Within 10 years he lost his brother, two grandchildren, his two sons, and his wife, and finally he died, on October 29, 1862, in virtual obscurity and penniless, at the home of his son-in-law. John Counter was an avid businessman, and invested heavily in Kingston’s commercial district, was involved in the real estate and transportation industries, and owned both a [sep] knowledge2: John Counter: John Counter (April 18, 1799 – October 29, 1862) was a Canadian businessman and political figure. He served as Mayor of the City of Kingston, Ontario, for the terms 1841-43; 1846; 1850; 1852–53 and 1855. ; John Counter: John Counter was born on April 18, 1799, came to Kingston from Devonshire, England with his parents in 1820. He had an older brother George and younger sister Susannah.  His parents were John and Susannah. He began his career in the family business as a baker and confectioner, with a bakery located at the corner of Barrie and Clergy Streets.  After securing major local contracts to supply bread, he moved on to real estate investments and a variety of transportation and industrial enterprises with the goal to make Kingston a transportation hub. He married Hannah Rhode, aged 17 and they had four children.  Within 10 years he lost his brother, two grandchildren, his two sons, and his wife, and finally he died, on October 29, 1862, in virtual obscurity and penniless, at the home of his son-in-law. ; John Counter: He sought a council seat in the town’s first election but was defeated. Later, in 1841, he was among the first to propose building a new town hall in 1841. Architect George Brown was selected to design the new town hall, and he travelled to England to borrow £20,000 for its construction. In the same year he organized accommodations for government officials when Kingston became the home of the Parliament of the Province of Canada, giving up his own home to the vice-chancellor, R.S. Jameson, and renting the new offices of the Marine Railway to the government. Upon incorporation in 1846, Counter was elected the city’s first Mayor, and served an additional four terms due to his popularity and influence. He was instrumental in establishing the Board of Trade in 1839. He was among the people who donated their homes for the new government workers in 1841, and the people who donated the first clock in the City Hall Clock Tower. ; John Counter: He supported the Wesleyan Methodists, and donated generously to the building fund for the Victoria Street chapel in 1847.  He donated the land for Sydenham Street Church and laid the cornerstone on April 17, 1851.  However, he had borrowed heavily to support his numerous interests and also to open the first subdivision in Kingston.  He resigned from the office of mayor in June 1855 because his shares in the local gas company were considered to constitute a conflict of interest; and only a few months later, in October 1855, he could not meet a large mortgage payment and his financial obligations forced him into bankruptcy. His house was at Plymouth Square, at the corner of Ontario and Johnson Streets. It was torn down in 1973.
knowledge1: Jeffrey Satinover // Jeffrey Satinover Jeffrey Burke Satinover (September 4, 1947) is an American psychiatrist, psychoanalyst, and physicist. He is known for books on a number of controversial topics in physics and neuroscience, and on religion, but especially for his writing and public-policy efforts relating to homosexuality, same-sex marriage and the ex-gay movement. Satinover was born in Chicago, Illinois, on September 4, 1947, to Joseph and Sena Satinover. He lived in and around Chicago until moving to California at the beginning of his high school years. Satinover won a National Merit Scholarship. He earned his Bachelor of Science degree at the Massachusetts Institute; Jeffrey Satinover // the breakdown of modern society. His book "The Quantum Brain" explores current developments at the interface of physics, computation, artificial intelligence and neuroscience. It is written for a well-educated, general readership, but it has been cited in a number of scientific publications. Satinover's current scientific research, with Didier Sornette of the Swiss Federal Institute of Technology, centers on studies of game theory and in particular the minority game, attending to the "illusion of control" in these games. Jeffrey Satinover Jeffrey Burke Satinover (September 4, 1947) is an American psychiatrist, psychoanalyst, and physicist. He is known for books on a number; Jeffrey Satinover // 2007. Satinover is a member of the Scientific Advisory Committee of the National Association for Research & Therapy of Homosexuality. He conducts research in complex and agent-based systems theory (econophysics, the minority game). His former areas of physics research were in fundamental quantum theory and in its application to quantum information processing and computation. Presently he is investigating certain aspects of game theory in complex systems. Satinover is Jewish, but says he has an eclectic worldview. Satinover's book, "Homosexuality and the Politics of Truth" (1996), published by the evangelical Christian publisher Baker Books, debates the nature of homosexuality from psychological,; Jeffrey Satinover // his views on same sex marriage. In a hearing before the Massachusetts Judicial Committee in April 2003, he testified that homosexuality is not immutable and that the environment plays an important role in sexual orientation. Organizations that oppose the expansion of LGBT rights and protections have frequently cited his research in their position papers. Satinover's other writings include "Cracking the Bible Code", about information purportedly encrypted as a Bible code into the first five books in the Hebrew Bible. He is the author of articles, chapters, and books on topics ranging from brain neurophysiology to the psychology of narcissism to; Jeffrey Satinover // homosexuality is biological and genetic and if it can be changed. About one fifth of the book discusses human sexuality from Jewish and Christian perspectives. In the book's introduction, Satinover states that "[i]n the end the debate over homosexual behavior and its implications for public policy can only be decided conclusively on moral grounds, and moral grounds will ultimately mean religious grounds." In 1997, Satinover was called by the State of Florida as an expert witness in Amer v. Johnson, which challenged Florida's law prohibiting adoption by gays and lesbians. "Surprisingly, Satinover said in his testimony that 'if two homosexuals [sep] knowledge2: Jeffrey Satinover: Jeffrey Burke Satinover (September 4, 1947) is an American psychiatrist, psychoanalyst, and physicist. He is known for books on a number of controversial topics in physics and neuroscience, and on religion, but especially for his writing and public-policy efforts relating to homosexuality, same-sex marriage and the ex-gay movement. ; Jeffrey Satinover: Satinover was born in Chicago, Illinois, on September 4, 1947, to Joseph and Sena Satinover. He lived in and around Chicago until moving to California at the beginning of his high school years. Satinover won a National Merit Scholarship. He earned his Bachelor of Science degree at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology in 1971. He obtained a Master of Education degree in Clinical Psychology and Public Practice from Harvard University, a medical degree at the University of Texas, and a Master of Science in physics at Yale University. He received a diploma in analytical psychology from the C. G. Jung Institute of Zürich, becoming their youngest graduate. He trained there and became an accredited Jungian analyst.[1] He received a PhD in physics in the laboratory of Didier Sornette at the University of Nice in France, in 2009.[2] ; Jeffrey Satinover: He married for the second time in 1982, having previously divorced and is the father of three daughters.[1] According to two journalists,[3] in September 1991, during the confirmation hearings for U.S. Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas, Satinover suggested during dinner conversation with President Bush's nephew[4] that Anita Hill, if suffering from erotomania (a "delusional disorder"), might be entirely convinced that Thomas had sexually harassed her, even if he had not, just as a witness for Thomas, John Doggett, (now a conservative commentator) claimed had happened with him. She would even pass a lie detector test, as Hill had, convinced of the truth of what she was saying. Soon Satinover and another psychiatrist, Park Dietz were explaining this possibility to Thomas' Senate sponsor, John Danforth, and White House press secretary, Larry Thomas,[5] though as psychiatrists neither would testify about a patient they had not examined. (Psychiatrists brought in by the Democrats similarly refused to testify.[6]) Satinover was quoted as stating that once he saw the testimony of one of Hill's main critics, John Doggett, he concluded the idea was invalid.[7] ; Jeffrey Satinover: He has provided commentary for two documentary films, What the #$*! Do We (K)now!? (2004) and What the Bleep!?: Down the Rabbit Hole  (2006).[8] ; Jeffrey Satinover: In 2008, he completed a Ph.D. summa cum laude in physics at the University of Nice, France.[9]
knowledge1: DeAnna Bennett // DeAnna Bennett DeAnna Bennett (born 18 November 1984) in Fremont, California, is an American mixed martial artist who competed in the Strawweight division in Invicta FC since 2014. Bennett wrestled for American High School before graduating in 2002. She credits her "being a fat kid" for motivating her to join a kickboxing gym to stay in shape, and eventually competing in Muay Thai kickboxing. After a short amateur MMA career in 2011, Bennett made her professional MMA debut in February 2012 for Showdown Fights. She competed for the promotion four times over the next two years, winning all of her; DeAnna Bennett // and shares split custody of her dog Atlas, an American Staffordshire Terrier and Cane Corso mix. She worked at Vivint Home Security as a Smart Home Pro in the Channel Partner Department of the Inside Sales Department at the corporate headquarters in Provo, UT. DeAnna Bennett DeAnna Bennett (born 18 November 1984) in Fremont, California, is an American mixed martial artist who competed in the Strawweight division in Invicta FC since 2014. Bennett wrestled for American High School before graduating in 2002. She credits her "being a fat kid" for motivating her to join a kickboxing gym to stay in; DeAnna Bennett // bouts. Notably beating stand outs Sharon Jacobson, Colleen Schneider and Julianna Pena respectively. Bennett made her Invicta FC debut on September 6, 2014, at , where she defeated Michelle Ould by TKO in the second round. In her second fight for the promotion, Bennett faced Jennifer Maia on December 5, 2014, at . She won the fight by unanimous decision. Bennett next faced Norma Rueda Center on February 27, 2015, at . She again won the fight by unanimous decision. In August 2017, it was announced that Bennett would be one of the fighters featured on "The Ultimate Fighter 26", [sep] knowledge2: DeAnna Bennett: DeAnna Danielle Bennett  (born November 18, 1984)[1][2] is an American mixed martial artist who competes in the Flyweight division[7] in  Bellator.[2] As of December 13, 2022, she is #4 in the Bellator Women's Flyweight Rankings.[8] ; DeAnna Bennett: Bennett wrestled and played water polo for American High School before graduating in 2002.[9] Bennett briefly attended an art college, but dropped out.[10] She credits her "being a fat kid" for motivating her to join a kickboxing gym to stay in shape, and eventually competing in Muay Thai kickboxing.[3] ; DeAnna Bennett: After a short amateur MMA career in 2011, Bennett made her professional MMA debut in February 2012 for Showdown Fights.  She competed for the promotion four times over the next two years, winning all of her bouts. Notably beating stand outs Sharon Jacobson, Colleen Schneider and Julianna Peña respectively.[citation needed] ; DeAnna Bennett: Bennett made her Invicta FC debut on September 6, 2014, at Invicta FC 8, where she defeated Michelle Ould by TKO in the second round.[11] ; DeAnna Bennett: In her second fight for the promotion, Bennett faced Jennifer Maia on December 5, 2014, at Invicta FC 10.  She won the fight by unanimous decision.[12]
knowledge1: Emcee N.I.C.E. // Emcee N.I.C.E. Aulsondro "Novelist" Hamilton, better known by his stage name Emcee N.I.C.E., is an African American, Puerto Rican Christian Hip Hop rapper. Emcee N.I.C.E. is a multi-platinum producer, writer and recording artist, working with legendary artists and Grammy award-winning musicians. He was born in Los Angeles, California, of Puerto Rican descent, but was raised in El Paso, Texas and Topeka, Kansas. He has served as a producer, writer and recording artist, working with legendary artists such as 2 Pac, Nas, A Lighter Shade of Brown, Aaron Hall, K-Ci Hailey, Doctor Fink, Al B. Sure, Melissa Molinaro, and MC Lyte.; Emcee N.I.C.E. // made an appearance as Superman in the TV show "6 Degrees of Everything" by the Fine Brothers on TruTV A music video for "Thugz Mansion" was shot. The video was nominated at the 2003 MTV Video Music Awards for Best Rap Video. Tonight feat. Suhana Machete peaked at #8 on the US Billboard Hot Single Sales Chart in 2014 (Billboard Albums) Emcee N.I.C.E. Aulsondro "Novelist" Hamilton, better known by his stage name Emcee N.I.C.E., is an African American, Puerto Rican Christian Hip Hop rapper. Emcee N.I.C.E. is a multi-platinum producer, writer and recording artist, working with legendary artists and Grammy; Emcee N.I.C.E. // He is currently starring in Da Jammies as "Novelist" now on Netflix Since 2002, he has been credited on over 28 different records. This includes an association with the Academy Award-winning film "Crash", appearing on its blockbuster soundtrack as a lead vocalist/rapper of KansasCali. Their music video was included on the DVD's special features section, narrated by Paul Haggis. Emcee N.I.C.E. would also go on to appear on four more soundtracks, along with multiple guest features and theme songs for television shows. He is also a member of one of Los Angeles’s elite rap coalitions, The Massmen, put together by; Emcee N.I.C.E. // up in December with a Christmas release, "Christmas With U" feat. Who Am I?, donating a portion of the proceeds to anti-bullying and anti-hazing campaigns. As an actor in 2015, Emcee N.I.C.E. under his real name Aulsondro "Novelist" Hamilton made his debut. Starring as the character "Novelist" in the 3D animated music series entitled Da Jammies now on Netflix Executive Produced by Ralph Farquhar (Real Husbands of Hollywood, Moesha, The Parkers, Wendy Wu, etc...) in which he also serves as Co-Executive Producer alongside recording artist and business partner William "Dolla" Chapman II aka D.B.I.. in the same year, Emcee N.I.C.E.; Tonight (Emcee N.I.C.E.) // Emcee N.I.C.E. would not recover as an independent artist given the major blow back that was received when Stacey Dash (Actress, Fox News Correspondent) who was featured on his first single release Life of the Party (Emcee N.I.C.E. song) ran into a national firestorm over Mitt Romney as her political choice. However the record debut proved that the backlash was over as he entered the Billboard Charts. Tonight (Emcee N.I.C.E.) "Tonight" is a single by American/Puerto Rican rapper Emcee N.I.C.E.. It was released on October 4, 2014. It was produced by Kelly Keys, and features guest vocals from Suhana Machete. [sep] knowledge2: Emcee N.I.C.E.: Aulsondro "Novelist" Hamilton, better known by his stage name Emcee N.I.C.E., is an American Christian hip hop recording artist, rapper, singer, songwriter, record and film producer, record executive, actor, inventor, entrepreneur and former lead vocalist/rapper of the duo KansasCali. He is the co-creator of the animated music series Da Jammies, The co-founder of The Stellar Award winning radio station God’s House of Hip Hop Radio[1] powered by Dash Radio, A Best Selling Author for his book “Music Release University”.[2] He is president of two non-profit organizations, The iTL Foundation (Information, Technology & Literacy) of Los Angeles [3] and Urbanomics 101,[4] the Managing Editor for RYZE Magazine,[5][6] a christian hip hop lifestyle magazine and an American Inventor.[7] He is the co-producer of 2 Pac's Thugz Mansion acoustic, the first single released from the certified triple platinum album Better Dayz and the Nas acoustic Thugz Mansion (N.Y.), off of the certified platinum album God's Son ; Emcee N.I.C.E.: Emcee N.I.C.E.’s debut recording as a Christian Hip Hop Recording artist came when the album Praise was released in 2017 and became his first solo project to reach No. 1 on the Billboard Top Gospel Albums and “Billboard Gospel Album Sales” the album would yield Five No. 1 hit records on the Billboard charts in "I Got Angels"[8][9] claiming two positions along with "Glory to God" (ft. Fred Hammond)[10] & Nielsen BDS including a No. 1 gospel album in Praise.[11] ; Emcee N.I.C.E.: Emcee N.I.C.E. received nominations for Rap Hip-Hop Gospel CD of the Year and Gospel Hip Hop Radio Station of Year at the 34th Annual Stellar Awards, the last of which he won. He is also a 12 time "The Gospel Spin Awards" winner, in the categories of "Internet Radio Personality of the Year," 2 time "Best Radio Show 2 or More – (God's Calamari w/ Emcee N.I.C.E. & The God Squad)," 2 time "Voice of the Year, Station Manager/Program Director of the Year" are the notables, he received a total of 17 Nominations in Gospel radio from the Gospel Spin Award and in 2021 Emcee N.I.C.E. was honored as "Radio Man of the Year."[citation needed] ; Emcee N.I.C.E.: Emcee N.I.C.E. also known as Novelist with the duo KansasCali, has been on six motion picture soundtracks, Oscar Award Winning film Crash song "If I...", Mr. & Mrs. Smith (International Soundtrack)[12] song "If I Never See You Again", Haven Original Soundtrack song "Uuuh", Kickin' It Old Skool[13] song "The Life", Once in a Lifetime: The Extraordinary Story of the New York Cosmos song "U Gotta Fight!" ; Emcee N.I.C.E.: In 2015, under his real name Aulsondro Hamilton, he voiced the character "Novelist" in a 3D animated music series entitled Da Jammies.[14]
knowledge1: Karyn Pugliese // Karyn Pugliese Karyn Pugliese is an award-winning Canadian broadcast journalist and communications specialist, of Algonquin and Italian descent. She is member of the Algonquins of Pikwàkanagàn First Nation in Ontario. She has been recognized by the Canadian Association of Journalists with a Charles Bury Award for her leadership supporting journalists and fighting for media rights, and by the Academy of Canadian Cinema and Television, receiving the Gordon Sinclair Award for her exceptional body of work in television journalism. Pugliese is best known for her work as a journalist/Executive Director of news and current affairs at the Aboriginal Peoples Television Network,; Karyn Pugliese // journalism, APTN punches above its weight," said Taylor-Vaisey. "They fight for press freedom in the courts..." In her acceptance speech Pugliese reccounted some of the early struggles of setting up the "first aboriginal broadcaster in the world" adding: "Yes. We punched above our weight, how could we not with so much at stake?" Karyn Pugliese Karyn Pugliese is an award-winning Canadian broadcast journalist and communications specialist, of Algonquin and Italian descent. She is member of the Algonquins of Pikwàkanagàn First Nation in Ontario. She has been recognized by the Canadian Association of Journalists with a Charles Bury Award for her; Karyn Pugliese // later rebranded into the nightly APTN National News. From 2000-2006 Pugliese was a member of the Press Gallery and APTN’s Parliamentary Reporter. She also travelled to many Indigenous communities, mostly in Ontario, Quebec and Nunavut. During her time at APTN Pugliese won 3 Native American Journalism Awards and was nominated for a Canadian Association of Broadcasters Gold Ribbon Award. Pugliese left APTN in 2006. In 2006, Pugliese joined Vision TV's investigative and current affairs show 360 Vision then led by Sadia Zaman and John Scully. That year the series was a nominee for Best News and Information Series at the; Karyn Pugliese // and as the host of ichannel’s #FAQMP. However, she also worked briefly at CBC, Vision TV and as a Communications Director for the Assembly of First Nations. Pugliese sits on the Canadian Association of Journalists Ethics Committee. Pugliese has acted as a co-chair for the Night for Rights Gala, an event which raises approximately $140,000 annually for rights-based journalism programming, and is organized by Journalist for Human Rights, JHR. Pugliese is an ambassador for Journalist for Human Rights, and works with them to train young indigenous journalists. She frequently speaks in support of the organization. In October 2017, the Academy; Karyn Pugliese // of Canadian Cinema and Television announced that Pugliese will be presented with the organization's annual Gordon Sinclair Award for distinguished achievement in journalism at the 6th Canadian Screen Awards. Pugliese was born and raised in Ottawa Ontario, but frequently visited Pikwàkanagàn in her youth. Most of her close family lived off-reserve in Ottawa. Pugliese dropped out of high school three times, eventually enrolling in an alternative high school where she earned her diploma. Although she was a bright student, Pugliese had no intention of attending university, and wanted to be a bartender, until a high school teacher coaxed her into [sep] knowledge2: Karyn Pugliese: Karyn Pugliese (Pabàmàdiz)  is a Canadian broadcast journalist and communications specialist, of Algonquin descent. She is member of the Algonquins of Pikwàkanagàn First Nation in Ontario.[1] She is a Nieman Fellow, Class of 2020, Harvard University[2] and has been recognized by the Canadian Association of Journalists with a Charles Bury Award for her leadership supporting journalists and fighting for media rights.[3] In 2018 the Academy of Canadian Cinema and Television presented Pugliese with the organization's annual Gordon Sinclair Award for distinguished achievement in journalism at the 6th Canadian Screen Awards.[4][5] In 2019 Pugliese received the Hyman Solomon Award for Public Policy Journalism [6] and was the co-recipient with journalist Justin Brake for the Native American Journalists Association  (NAJA) 2019 Elias Boudinot Free Press Award.[7] She was chosen for the twenty-fifth Martin Wise Goodman Canadian Nieman Fellowship at Harvard University.[8] She won a National Newspaper Award for a series of columns written for the National Observer in 2021,[9] where she was editor-in-chief. She is a frequent commentator on Rosemary Barton Live and the podcast Canadaland.[10] ; Karyn Pugliese: Pugliese is best known for her work as a journalist/executive director of news and current affairs at the Aboriginal Peoples Television Network,[11] and as the host of ichannel's #FAQMP.[12] Pugliese was also the Managing Editor of CBC's Investigative unit, overseeing television programming for the Fifth Estate and Marketplace.[13]  She also worked at  Vision TV and as a Communications Director for the Assembly of First Nations.[14] Pugliese is president of the Canadian Association of Journalists (2018-2020) and previously sat on the CAJ Ethics Committee. Pugliese has acted as a co-chair for the Night for Rights Gala, an event which raises approximately $140,000 annually for rights-based journalism programming, and is organized by Journalist for Human Rights, JHR. Pugliese is an ambassador for Journalist for Human Rights,[15] and works with them to train young indigenous journalists.[16] She frequently speaks in support of the organization.[17] She is also a board member for Canadian Journalists for Free Expression (CJFE). ; Karyn Pugliese: In May 2023, she was appointed editor in chief of Canadaland after Jesse Brown announced that he was stepping down from the role. She also hosts the podcast canadaLANDBACK. [18] ; Karyn Pugliese: Pugliese was born and raised in Ottawa, Ontario, but frequently visited Pikwàkanagàn in her youth. Most of her close family lived off-reserve in Ottawa.[19] ; Karyn Pugliese: Pugliese dropped out of high school three times, eventually enrolling in an alternative high school where she earned her diploma.  Although she was a bright student, Pugliese had no intention of attending university, and wanted to be a bartender, until a high school teacher coaxed her into applying to Carleton University's journalism program.  She enrolled and graduated with a combined honours in Journalism and History in 1998.[20]
knowledge1: Michael L. MacDonald // Michael L. MacDonald Michael L. MacDonald (born May 4, 1955) is a Canadian politician and a Conservative member of the Canadian Senate. He was appointed on the advice of Stephen Harper to the Senate on January 2, 2009. MacDonald was born in Louisbourg, the youngest of 10 children. In 1977, he graduated from University of King's College in Halifax with an Honours degree in political science. MacDonald worked as a researcher for the Progressive Conservative Party of Canada Research Office from 1978 to 1980. He then worked in the office of MLA Gerald Sheehy from 1980 to 1982 and then; Michael L. MacDonald // federally in 2004 in the riding of Dartmouth—Cole Harbour, placing third with 8,739 votes. MacDonald lives in Dartmouth, Nova Scotia, with his wife Marilyn, and their two sons, Lauchlan and Liam. Michael L. MacDonald Michael L. MacDonald (born May 4, 1955) is a Canadian politician and a Conservative member of the Canadian Senate. He was appointed on the advice of Stephen Harper to the Senate on January 2, 2009. MacDonald was born in Louisbourg, the youngest of 10 children. In 1977, he graduated from University of King's College in Halifax with an Honours degree in political science. MacDonald worked as [sep] knowledge2: Michael L. MacDonald: Michael L. MacDonald (born May 4, 1955) is a Canadian politician and a Conservative member of the Canadian Senate. He was appointed on the advice of Stephen Harper to the Senate on January 2, 2009.[1] ; Michael L. MacDonald: MacDonald was born in Louisbourg, the youngest of 10 children.[2] In 1977, he graduated from University of King's College in Halifax with an Honours degree in political science. ; Michael L. MacDonald: MacDonald worked as a researcher for the Progressive Conservative Party of Canada Research Office from 1978 to 1980. He then worked in the office of MLA Gerald Sheehy from 1980 to 1982 and then as Executive Assistant to Premier John Buchanan from 1982 to 1984. He was also Executive Assistant to Thomas McMillan from 1984 to 1985, and then to Stewart McInnes from 1985 to 1987.[2] ; Michael L. MacDonald: He has been the owner of the Fortress Inn in Louisbourg since 1988.[2] ; Michael L. MacDonald: In 1988, he ran for federal office in Cape Breton—East Richmond, placing second with 7,173 votes. In 1993, he ran provincially for the Progressive Conservative Association of Nova Scotia in the riding of Dartmouth-Cole Harbour, placing second with 2,905 votes. He ran in Dartmouth-Cole Harbour again in 1998, placing third with 2,084 votes. He ran federally in 2004 in the riding of Dartmouth—Cole Harbour, placing third with 2,084 votes.[2]
knowledge1: Ingo Titze // Ingo Titze Ingo R. Titze is a voice scientist and executive director of the National Center for Voice and Speech and Adjunct Professor in the Department of Otolaryngology/Head and Neck Surgery at the University of Utah in Salt Lake City. He also teaches at the Summer Vocology Institute, also housed at the University of Utah. He is a Distinguished Professor at the Department of Communication Sciences and Disorders at the University of Iowa and has written several books relating to the human voice. Titze received a B.S. in Electrical Engineering from the University of Utah, and then an M.S.E.E. in; Ingo Titze // prolific, with over 160 research articles listed at the NIH, alone. Ingo Titze Ingo R. Titze is a voice scientist and executive director of the National Center for Voice and Speech and Adjunct Professor in the Department of Otolaryngology/Head and Neck Surgery at the University of Utah in Salt Lake City. He also teaches at the Summer Vocology Institute, also housed at the University of Utah. He is a Distinguished Professor at the Department of Communication Sciences and Disorders at the University of Iowa and has written several books relating to the human voice. Titze received a B.S. in Electrical; Ingo Titze // served as the Director of Research for the Recording and Research Center, also housed at the Denver Center for the Performing Arts, and from 1989–1994 he was adjunct professor in the Westminster Choir College at Princeton, New Jersey. Titze was a consultant to the Department of Linguistics/Speech Analysis at Bell Laboratories, Murray Hill, a visiting Lecturer at the Department of Hearing/Speech Science at the University of Maryland, and an associate professor for the Department of Speech Pathology and Audiology for the University of Iowa from 1979–1995. His early career positions included associate professor in the Department of Physics at the; Ingo Titze // Electrical Engineering, with a minor in Physics from the University of Utah. He graduated with a Ph.D. in physics from Brigham Young University in 1972. In 1976 he went to Gallaudet University, where he received his first of many grants from the National Institutes of Health. Prior to his conjoint positions at the Universities of Utah and Iowa (for which he began in 2009 and 1990, respectively) he was the Chief Scientist and Executive Director for the National Center for Voice and Speech from 1994-2009, which was then housed at the Denver Center for the Performing Arts. From 1983-1994 he; Ingo Titze // King Fahd University of Petroleum and Minerals, Dhahran, Saudi Arabia, assistant professor for the Sensory Communication Research Laboratory at Gallaudet College from 1976–1979, lecturer in physics and electrical engineering at California State Polytechnic University, physics instructor at Pomona College from 1973–1974, and Brigham Young University from 1972–1973. Before accepting a position to work as a research engineer at the Boeing Company of Seattle from 1968–1969, he worked at the National Reactor Test Station (1965–1966) and as a research engineer at North American Aviation in Tulsa, Oklahoma, Titze began his career as a summer research engineer for Argonne National Laboratory in [sep] knowledge2: Ingo Titze: Ingo R. Titze is a voice scientist and executive director[1] of the National Center for Voice and Speech and Adjunct Professor in the Department of Otolaryngology/Head and Neck Surgery at the University of Utah in Salt Lake City. He also teaches at the Summer Vocology Institute, also housed at the University of Utah. He is a Distinguished Professor[2] at the Department of Communication Sciences and Disorders at the University of Iowa and has written several books relating to the human voice.[3][4][5][6] ; Ingo Titze: Titze received a B.S. in Electrical Engineering from the University of Utah, and then an M.S.E.E. in Electrical Engineering, with a minor in Physics from the University of Utah. He graduated with a Ph.D. in physics from Brigham Young University in 1972. In 1976 he went to Gallaudet University, where he received his first[7] of many grants from the National Institutes of Health. ; Ingo Titze: Prior to his conjoint positions at the Universities of Utah and Iowa (for which he began in 2009 and 1990, respectively) he was the Chief Scientist and Executive Director for the National Center for Voice and Speech from 1994–2009, which was then housed at the Denver Center for the Performing Arts. ; Ingo Titze: From 1983–1994 he served as the Director of Research for the Recording and Research Center, also housed at the Denver Center for the Performing Arts, and from 1989–1994 he was adjunct professor in the Westminster Choir College at Princeton, New Jersey. ; Ingo Titze: Titze was a consultant to the Department of Linguistics/Speech Analysis at Bell Laboratories, Murray Hill, a visiting Lecturer at the Department of Hearing/Speech Science at the University of Maryland, and an associate professor for the Department of Speech Pathology and Audiology for the University of Iowa from 1979–1995.
knowledge1: Kathleen A. McGrath // Kathleen A. McGrath Kathleen Anne McGrath (4 June 1952 – 26 September 2002) was the first woman to command a United States Navy warship. McGrath graduated from California State University at Sacramento in 1975. She worked in the United States Forestry Service until 1980 when she joined the US Navy. McGrath was deployed to the Western Pacific, the Persian Gulf and the Mediterranean and Caribbean seas. She commanded the rescue and salvage ship USS Recovery in 1993 and 1994. In December 1998, Captain McGrath became commander of the frigate USS "Jarrett". She was one of the group of five women,; Kathleen A. McGrath // the National Naval Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland, from lung cancer. She is buried in Arlington National Cemetery: section 66, site 7274 Kathleen A. McGrath Kathleen Anne McGrath (4 June 1952 – 26 September 2002) was the first woman to command a United States Navy warship. McGrath graduated from California State University at Sacramento in 1975. She worked in the United States Forestry Service until 1980 when she joined the US Navy. McGrath was deployed to the Western Pacific, the Persian Gulf and the Mediterranean and Caribbean seas. She commanded the rescue and salvage ship USS Recovery in 1993 and; Kathleen A. McGrath // including Michelle J. Howard, Maureen Farren, Ann O'Connor, and Grace Mehl, chosen to be the first female combatant commanders in the United States Navy. In the spring of 2000, during her command of the "Jarrett", and just six years after Congress revoked rules prohibiting women from serving on combat aircraft and warships, the ship deployed to the northern reaches of the Persian Gulf, hunting boats suspected of smuggling Iraqi oil in violation of United Nations sanctions. Following her tour as commander of the "Jarrett", McGrath served at the Joint Advanced Warfighting Unit in Alexandria, Virginia. She died (aged 50) at [sep] knowledge2: Kathleen A. McGrath: Kathleen Anne McGrath (June 4, 1952 – September 26, 2002) was the first woman to command a United States Navy warship. ; Kathleen A. McGrath: On June 4, 1952, McGrath was born in Columbus, Ohio. McGrath's father is Colonel James H. McGrath. McGrath's mother is Martha McGrath.[1][2] ; Kathleen A. McGrath: In 1975, McGrath earned a Bachelor of Science degree in Environmental Science from California State University, Sacramento. McGrath attended Officer Candidate School in Rhode Island. In 1987, McGrath earned a Master of Arts degree in Educational Management from Stanford University.[3][4] ; Kathleen A. McGrath: McGrath worked in the United States Forestry Service until 1980 when she joined the US Navy. McGrath was deployed to the Western Pacific, the Persian Gulf and the Mediterranean and Caribbean seas.[1] ; Kathleen A. McGrath: McGrath commanded the rescue and salvage ship USS Recovery in 1993 and 1994.  She was the first woman to command was US Navy ship.
knowledge1: Sergei Bodrov // Bodrov currently has an apartment in Los Angeles and a ranch in Arizona. He is married to American film consultant Carolyn Cavallaro. Sergei Bodrov Sergei Vladimirovich Bodrov (; born June 28, 1948) is a Russian film director, screenwriter, and producer. In 2003 he was the President of the Jury at the 25th Moscow International Film Festival. Bodrov was born in Khabarovsk, Russian SFSR, USSR (now Russia). In the post-Soviet period he emigrated to the United States. His son, actor Sergei Bodrov, Jr. was killed in an avalanche in the mountains of the North Caucasus on September 20, 2002 while shooting; Sergei Bodrov // Sergei Bodrov Sergei Vladimirovich Bodrov (; born June 28, 1948) is a Russian film director, screenwriter, and producer. In 2003 he was the President of the Jury at the 25th Moscow International Film Festival. Bodrov was born in Khabarovsk, Russian SFSR, USSR (now Russia). In the post-Soviet period he emigrated to the United States. His son, actor Sergei Bodrov, Jr. was killed in an avalanche in the mountains of the North Caucasus on September 20, 2002 while shooting his film which was tentatively titled "The Messenger". Bodrov's grandmother was ethnic Buryat, which influenced his decision to make the movie "Mongol".; Sergei Bodrov Jr. // becoming a famous actor and television host he completed and defended (in 1998) his graduate thesis entitled "Architecture in Venetian Renaissance Painting" and received the Candidate of Science degree. In 1991, while still a student, Bodrov studied art in Italy, where he found work as a lifeguard and earned money to support his travels around the country. When he was asked in an interview if his education was useful in his life, he answered: Of course. So you come to a city. What do you usually know about it? That there is a central square, some shops... And I know; Sergei Bodrov Jr. // Nikolaevna was a fine art expert. Sergei Bodrov Jr. believed that "childhood is the most important and the most amazing time in life." and what you'll become happens in the first sixteen years". Various publications report that Bodrov wanted to become a garbageman and drive an orange car. Bodrov wrote about his early years and events which influenced his worldview in a "Composition on the Theme: Eight Events which Influenced Me, or How I Grew Up to Be a Good Person." Sergei Bodrov attended the special French-language School No. 1265. In December 2012, a memorial plaque was installed in the [sep] knowledge2: Sergei Bodrov: Sergei Vladimirovich Bodrov (Russian: Серге́й Влади́мирович Бодро́в, IPA: [sʲɪrˈɡʲej bɐˈdrof]; born 28 June 1948) is a Russian film director, screenwriter, and producer.[1] In 2003 he was the President of the Jury at the 25th Moscow International Film Festival.[2] ; Sergei Bodrov: Bodrov was born in Khabarovsk, Russian SFSR, Soviet Union (now Russia). In the post-Soviet period he emigrated to the United States. His son, actor Sergei Bodrov, Jr. was killed in an avalanche in the mountains of the North Caucasus on 20 September 2002, while shooting a film titled The Messenger. ; Sergei Bodrov: Bodrov currently has an apartment in Los Angeles and a ranch in Arizona. He is married to American film consultant Carolyn Cavallaro. ; Sergei Bodrov: This article about a Russian film director is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.; Sergei Bodrov Jr.: Bodrov wrote about his early years and events which influenced his worldview in a "Composition on the Theme: Eight Events which Influenced Me, or How I Grew Up to Be a Good Person."
knowledge1: Diana Ivanova // Diana Ivanova Diana Ivanova (Bulgarian Диана Иванова; born March 19, 1968 in Montana, Bulgaria) is a Bulgarian journalist, author and documentary filmmaker. In her professional work she is interested in intercultural dialogue between people in Bulgaria and other countries, preferably Germany. As cultural manager and curator, she is committed to international understanding and cultural exchange and organizes every year in northwestern Bulgaria an international cultural festival. As a group analyst in Sofia and Bonn she deals with traumas that have been suffered due to the political situation in both countries in the time before the political change in Europe -; Diana Ivanova // Dictatorship. Since 2012 Ivanova organizes and since 2013 she conducts self-awareness-groups in Bonn and Sofia. As method she applies the technique of group analysis. Her interest in this context is it, to give a place to the suffering of people inflicted due to political circumstances on which it could be heard and may be alleviated. Diana Ivanova Diana Ivanova (Bulgarian Диана Иванова; born March 19, 1968 in Montana, Bulgaria) is a Bulgarian journalist, author and documentary filmmaker. In her professional work she is interested in intercultural dialogue between people in Bulgaria and other countries, preferably Germany. As cultural manager and; Diana Ivanova // the region and their often traumatic stories. With the intention to create a space “for words, phrases, images, faces that convey a sense of the area”, a “collection of fragments” emerged with portraits and stories of 50 inhabitants in eight villages. 2010 the project was presented to the public with an exhibition at the Institut für die Wissenschaften vom Menschen (IWM) in Vienna and in the National Art Gallery in Sofia. Other presentations followed, from 2016 also in Germany. Ivanova participated in various film projects. For the 2009 released film "The Town of Badante Women" by Stephan Komandarev she wrote; Diana Ivanova // information about the historical roots of the present and the actual experiences of the people. After her cycle "Hello Melancholy" was published in "Capital weekly", she was awarded on August 16, 2005 by the "Austria Press Agency" in Vienna with the price "Writing for Central and Eastern Europe (CEE)" – for her text "Mrs. Bulgarian, Ivan Milev and Gustav Klimt". In December 2013 Ivanova for the second time was invited on a scholarship for one month in the "Künstlerhaus Villa Waldberta" in Feldafing. Among other things, she there showed the "Films of the Bulgarian Ministry of State Security", which were; Diana Ivanova // in Germany primarily by citizens of the GDR. When Diana Ivanova went to school her birthplace still was wearing the name Mihajlovgrad. It was given up in 1993 in favor of the original name Montana. On the local German school, which maintained friendly relations with the Thuringian school in Schmalkalden as part of a twinning, she passed the Abitur. She lives and works in Bonn and Sofia. Ivanova studied Cultural anthropology and Mass communication at the University of Sofia, where she 1991 obtained a Master in Journalism. After that she worked as a journalist until 1995, including as reporter and [sep] knowledge2: Diana Ivanova: Diana Ivanova (Bulgarian Диана Иванова; born in Montana, Bulgaria) is a Bulgarian journalist, author and documentary filmmaker. In her professional work she is interested in intercultural dialogue between people in Bulgaria and other countries, preferably Germany. As cultural manager and curator, she is committed to international understanding and cultural exchange and organizes every year in northwestern Bulgaria an international cultural festival. As a group analyst in Sofia and Bonn she deals with traumas that have been suffered due to the political situation in both countries[1] in the time before the political change in Europe - in Germany primarily by citizens of the GDR.[citation needed] ; Diana Ivanova: When Diana Ivanova[2] went to school her birthplace still was wearing the name Mihajlovgrad. It was given up in 1993 in favor of the original name Montana. On the local German school, which maintained friendly relations with the Thuringian school in Schmalkalden as part of a twinning, she passed the Abitur. She lives and works in Bonn and Sofia. ; Diana Ivanova: Ivanova studied Cultural anthropology and Mass communication at the University of Sofia, where she 1991 obtained a Master in Journalism. After that she worked as a journalist until 1995, including as reporter and moderator at Bulgarian National Television. She then until 2003 was Radio journalist at Radio Free Europe in Prague. That same year she completed her training as a cultural manager on International Centre for Culture and Management (ICCM)[3] at Prof. Herwig Poeschl[4] in Salzburg. In 2005, she was Milena Jesenská scholarship holder[5] at the Institute of Human Sciences. 2014 she completed her training as a group analyst at the International Association for Group Analysis (IAG)[6] in Altaussee. Her dissertation focuses on the relationship between elderly Italians and Bulgarian women who had to leave their villages in regions with hopeless labor market situation to make money with the care of the elderly in Italy, but by that lost contact with their homeland.[7] Since 2003 she is a freelance journalist, among others, for n-ost, Dnevnik, Capital (Bulgaria), Abitare and Foreign Policy. She is also manager of the New Culture Foundation[8] and researched the film heritage of the Bulgarian secret services in Sofia, Berlin and Munich.[citation needed] ; Diana Ivanova: From 2004 to 2006 Ivanova worked with the poet and writer Georgi Gospodinov and the psychiatrist Rumen Petrov. The focus of their joint project was the question of which traces socialism had left in the souls of men and what influence had these marks on their lifestyle and identity. 171 stories of Bulgarians of different ages were collected. The website on which they were presented, no longer exists; yet they are preserved in a book bearing – in Bulgarian – the title of the project.[32] An online article of The Sofia Echo provides some of the shortened stories.[33] ; Diana Ivanova: Ivanova was invited along with Boris Deliradev by the British Council in Bulgaria,[35] to develop a concept for workshops with young people on the topic The EU and ME.[36] From the desire to avoid general and superficial conversations on the subject, and under the influence of the then current waste crisis the idea for the project My street took shape. After My street Bulgaria[37] having been successful, the project later in Cuba found its continuation.
knowledge1: Arthur Ewert // Arthur Ewert Arthur Ernest Ewert (1890-1959) was a German communist political activist and functionary of the Communist International (Comintern). Ewert is best remembered as an official Comintern representative to the United States, China, Argentina, and Brazil during the late 1920s and 1930s. After being subjected to torture and sentenced to 13 years in prison for his political activity in Brazil, Ewert lost his sanity. He was granted amnesty in May 1945 and ultimately returned to East Germany, where he lived out the rest of his life in a series of medical facilities. Arthur Ernest Ewert was born November 13, 1890; Arthur Ewert // was forced to be hospitalized in a sanatorium for the rest of his life. Ewert died in July 3, 1959 in Ebertswalde. In 1981 the government of the German Democratic Republic issued a postage stamp in Ewert's honor. Arthur Ewert Arthur Ernest Ewert (1890-1959) was a German communist political activist and functionary of the Communist International (Comintern). Ewert is best remembered as an official Comintern representative to the United States, China, Argentina, and Brazil during the late 1920s and 1930s. After being subjected to torture and sentenced to 13 years in prison for his political activity in Brazil, Ewert lost; Arthur Ewert // the 8th Enlarged Plenum of ECCI, held in Moscow in May 1927, where he chaired the American Commission, which attempted to resolve the ongoing factional war inside the Workers (Communist) Party of America. This was followed that same summer by his dispatch to the United States as the Comintern's Representative to the 5th Convention of the Workers (Communist) Party, during which time he used the pseudonym "Grey." By 1928 Ewert was regarded as one of the top leaders of the KPD, reckoned by historian Patrick Major to have been the number two figure in the Communist Party of Germany after; Arthur Ewert // in the town of Heinrichswalde, East Prussia (today's Slavsk, Russia). He was the son of an ethnic German poor peasant family. Largely self-educated, Ewert completed only a primary school education in a one-room rural schoolhouse. Anxious to escape the drudgery of rural life, at the age of 14 Ewert accepted a position as an apprentice in an uncle's saddle-making factory in the urban center of Berlin. The growth of the automotive industry convinced the young Ewert that there was little future in saddle-making, however, so he left that trade to take a job as a worker in a Berlin steel; Arthur Ewert // Communist Party of Germany (KPD) and became active in its work preparing the ground for a revolutionary overthrow of the German government. To support himself he went to work in Berlin as a laborer at the giant electrical corporation AEG "(Allgemeine Elektricitäts-Gesellschaft)," becoming one of the leading KPD activists among that company's workers. This period was marked by economic chaos, strikes, and streetfighting, in which the KPD frequently played the role of provocateur. Ewert was involved in this activity as a leading member of the loosely organized Greater Berlin Revolutionary Action Committee, established to organize urban workers into fighting groups [sep] knowledge2: Arthur Ewert: Arthur Ernest Ewert (30 November 1890 – 3 July 1959) was a German communist political activist and functionary of the Communist International (Comintern). Ewert is best remembered as an official Comintern representative to the United States, China, Argentina, and Brazil during the late 1920s and 1930s. After being subjected to torture and sentenced to 13 years in prison for his political activity in Brazil, Ewert lost his sanity. He was granted amnesty in May 1945 and ultimately returned to East Germany, where he lived out the rest of his life in a series of medical facilities. ; Arthur Ewert: Arthur Ernest Ewert was born November 13, 1890, in the town of Heinrichswalde, East Prussia (today's Slavsk, Russia). He was the son of a poor peasant family.[1] Largely self-educated, Ewert completed only a primary school education in a one-room rural schoolhouse.[2] ; Arthur Ewert: Anxious to escape the drudgery of rural life, at the age of 14 Ewert accepted a position as an apprentice in an uncle's saddle-making factory in the urban center of Berlin.[2] The growth of the automotive industry convinced the young Ewert that there was little future in saddle-making, however, so he left that trade to take a job as a worker in a Berlin steel works.[3] Earning low wages to perform difficult and sometimes dangerous work in the steel plant proved to be a radicalizing experience for Ewert. Influenced by his older sister, Minna, who was an activist in the social democratic youth movement, Ewert himself joined the Social Democratic Party of Germany (SDP) in 1908 at the age of 18.[4] ; Arthur Ewert: In addition to socialist politics, Ewert's sister introduced him to a friend from work, the Polish-born Elise Saborovsky Ewert — known to her friends as "Szabo" — who was herself a committed Marxist.[5] The pair began living together and would remain a couple for 25 years.[5] ; Arthur Ewert: Early in 1914 Ewert and Szabowski moved to Canada, where they began to achieve fluency in the English language. At the time of Canada's entry into World War I in the summer of that year Ewert and Szabowski were required as citizens of an enemy power to report to the legal authorities for internment for the duration of the war.[6] Instead the couple chose to disappear into the political underground, where they were aided by Canadian Marxist opponents of the war.[6] The couple traveled extensively through Canada and the United States in this period, interacting with others of like political mind and joining the new Socialist Party of North America (SPNA), a small revolutionary socialist organization launched in Canada in 1915.[7] During this period the couple used the party pseudonyms "Gustav" and "Elsie" and procured false identity documents under the names "Arthur Brown" and "Annie Bancourt" to better avoid law enforcement officers.[8]
knowledge1: Sami Shalom Chetrit // Sami Shalom Chetrit Sami Shalom Chetrit (; born 1960) is a Moroccan- born Hebrew poet an inter-disciplinary scholar and teacher, and Israeli social and peace activist. Sami Shalom Chetrit was born in Errachidia, Morocco. His family moved to Israel when he was 3 years old. He grew up in Ashdod. He received his BA (Literature), MA (political science) and PhD (political science) from the Hebrew University of Jerusalem, and his MA in International Affairs from Columbia University in New York. Chetrit lives in New York City. He teaches Hebrew language, literature and culture, and Middle Eastern studies at Queens College; Sami Shalom Chetrit // Ronny Scwartz. August 8, 2007. Kol Hazman, Jerusalem weekly. By Yaron Avituv. August 10, 2007. Ynet, Israeli daily online. Culture Supplement. July 11, 2007. Haaretz, Literature and Culture weekly. By Oren Kakon. August 16, 2007. Sabih, J. ( 2009) Politisk poesi: Sami, S. Chetrit og "vævet identitet", in Naqd, pp. 51–70 Sami Shalom Chetrit Sami Shalom Chetrit (; born 1960) is a Moroccan- born Hebrew poet an inter-disciplinary scholar and teacher, and Israeli social and peace activist. Sami Shalom Chetrit was born in Errachidia, Morocco. His family moved to Israel when he was 3 years old. He grew up in [sep] knowledge2: Sami Shalom Chetrit: Sami Shalom Chetrit (Hebrew: סמי שלום שטרית; born 1960) is a Moroccan-born Hebrew poet[1] an inter-disciplinary scholar and teacher,[2] and Israeli social and peace activist.[3] ; Sami Shalom Chetrit: Sami Shalom Chetrit was born in Errachidia, Morocco. His family moved to Israel when he was 3 years old. He grew up in Ashdod. He received his BA (Literature), MA (political science) and PhD (political science) from the Hebrew University of Jerusalem, and his MA in International Affairs from Columbia University in New York. ; Sami Shalom Chetrit: Chetrit lives in New York City. He teaches Hebrew language, literature and culture, and Middle Eastern studies at Queens College in Flushing, New York. ; Sami Shalom Chetrit: Chetrit was a Mizrahi activist and one of the founders of Kedma, an alternative school system that advocated equal opportunities for all students and a multi-cultural curriculum. He was among the founders of HaKeshet HaDemokratit HaMizrakhit (Mizrahi Democratic Rainbow Coalition) for social justice and cultural freedom. ; Sami Shalom Chetrit: Chetrit is the author of numerous articles and books on culture, society and politics in Israel, a novel and four books of poetry. He produced two documentary films. Chetrit is the founder of the democratic Mizrahi blog for social justice and peace in Israel-Palestine.[4]
knowledge1: Robbie Horgan // Robbie Horgan Robbie Horgan (born 7 June 1968) is an Irish former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. Born in Dublin, Horgan started his career at Shamrock Rovers, making his League of Ireland debut on 14 April 1987. He was the last goalkeeper to play for Shamrock Rovers at Glenmalure Park (Milltown) in a game that decided the League of Ireland B Division title in 1987. He then moved to Drogheda United in 1988 making his debut on 4 September in a 2-1 home win over Bray Wanderers. He kept 12 clean sheets in 26 league games as Drogheda; Robbie Horgan // Sporting Fingal until they went out of business. Horgan made history in August 2009 when he became the only player to have played at Milltown and Tallaght Stadium. He went to Drogheda United in February 2011, as an assistant to Mick Cooke. Drogheda won the League of Ireland Cup in 2012. Cooke left Drogheda in November 2013 and Horgan was confirmed as his replacement shortly afterwards. "Irish Football Handbook" by Dave Galvin & Gerry Desmond () Robbie Horgan Robbie Horgan (born 7 June 1968) is an Irish former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. Born in Dublin, Horgan started; Robbie Horgan // won the League of Ireland First Division title in 1989. In the 1990/1991 season Horgan kept 15 clean sheets as Drogheda again won the First Division. After four and a half years at United Park he then moved to Shelbourne in November 1992. He then signed back for Rovers in July 1994 where he spent another eight years. Horgan played in 2 European games for Shamrock Rovers against Djurgårdens IF in the 2002–03 UEFA Cup. He made his last League of Ireland appearance in the last game of the 2007 League of Ireland season. Horgan was the goalkeeping coach at [sep] knowledge2: Robbie Horgan: Robbie Horgan (born 7 June 1968) is an Irish former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. ; Robbie Horgan: Born in Dublin, Horgan started his career at Shamrock Rovers, making his League of Ireland debut on 14 April 1987. He was the last goalkeeper to play for Shamrock Rovers at Glenmalure Park (Milltown) in a game that decided the League of Ireland B Division title in 1987. ; Robbie Horgan: He then moved to Drogheda United in 1988 making his debut on 4 September in a 2–1 home win over Bray Wanderers. He kept 12 clean sheets in 26 league games as Drogheda won the League of Ireland First Division title in 1989. In the 1990/1991 season Horgan kept 15 clean sheets as Drogheda again won the First Division. ; Robbie Horgan: After four and a half years at United Park he then moved to Shelbourne in November 1992. He then signed back for Rovers in July 1994 where he spent another eight years. Horgan played in 2 European games for Shamrock Rovers against Djurgårdens IF in the 2002–03 UEFA Cup.[1][2] ; Robbie Horgan: He made his last League of Ireland appearance in the last game of the 2007 League of Ireland season.[3]
knowledge1: Tanel Ingi // Tanel Ingi Tanel Ingi (born 26 November 1976) is an Estonian stage and film actor who performs primarily at the Ugala theatre. Tanel Ingi was born in Tallinn. In 1995, he began attending the Kopli-Tallinn Art School. He attended the University of Tartu Viljandi Culture Academy, graduating in 1999. He began appearing in stage roles while still a student. In 1998, he joined the Ugala theatre in Viljandi, where he still performs at present. He has performed in a variety of stage productions, including works by: William Shakespeare, A. A. Milne, Anton Chekhov, Leo Tolstoy, Robert Louis Stevenson, Mark Twain,; Tanel Ingi // "Kättemaksukontor", the Kanal 2 crime series "Kelgukoerad" and the ETV political satire series "Riigimehed". In 2017 he joined the cast of the ETV ten-part drama series "Pank" as the character Aivar, which follows the rise and subsequent misfortunes of a new bank that which emerges in Estonia in the 1990s. Tanel Ingi resides in Viljandi with his wife Kätlin. The couple have a summer home in Koeru Parish near the village of Preedi in Järva County. Tanel Ingi Tanel Ingi (born 26 November 1976) is an Estonian stage and film actor who performs primarily at the Ugala theatre. Tanel Ingi; Tanel Ingi // August Gailit, Jules Verne, Tom Stoppard, Friedrich Schiller, Victor Hugo and Oskar Luts, among many others. In addition to his work in the theatre, Ingi has appeared in several film and television roles. He made his film debut in the 1999 Valentin Kuik directed drama "Lurjus" (English release title: "An Affair of Honour"), starring Taavi Eelmaa. One of his more notable performances was as Tõnu in the 2005 Ilmar Raag directed ETV television film "August 1991"; a dramatization of the failed Soviet attempt to suppress the Singing Revolution independence movement in Estonia. He has also appeared on the TV3 series [sep] knowledge2: Tanel Ingi: Tanel Ingi (born 26 November 1976)[1] is an Estonian stage and film actor who performs primarily at the Ugala theatre. ; Tanel Ingi: Tanel Ingi was born in Tallinn.[2]   In 1995, he began attending the Kopli-Tallinn Art School. He attended the Viljandi Culture Academy, graduating in 1999. He began appearing in stage roles while still a student.[3] ; Tanel Ingi: In 1998, he joined the Ugala theatre in Viljandi, where he still performs at present. He has performed in a variety of stage productions, including works by: William Shakespeare, A. A. Milne, Anton Chekhov, Leo Tolstoy, Robert Louis Stevenson, Mark Twain, August Gailit, Jules Verne, Tom Stoppard, Friedrich Schiller, Victor Hugo and Oskar Luts, among many others.[4] ; Tanel Ingi: In addition to his work in the theatre, Ingi has appeared in several film and television roles. He made his film debut in the 1999 Valentin Kuik directed drama Lurjus (English release title: An Affair of Honour), starring Taavi Eelmaa. One of his more notable performances was as Tõnu in the 2005 Ilmar Raag directed ETV television film August 1991; a dramatization of the failed Soviet attempt to suppress the Singing Revolution independence movement in Estonia.[5] He has also appeared on the ETV children's television series Nöbinina, the TV3 series Kättemaksukontor, the Kanal 2 crime series Kelgukoerad and the ETV political satire series Riigimehed.[6] In 2015, he joined the cast of the Kanal 2 television drama series Pilvene all as the character Andres Kroon. In 2017 he joined the cast of the ETV ten-part drama series Pank as the character Aivar, which follows the rise and subsequent misfortunes of a new bank that which emerges in Estonia in the 1990s.[7] In 2020, he co-directed the comedy feature film Asjad, millest me ei räägi with Andrejs Ekis.[8] ; Tanel Ingi: Tanel Ingi resides in Viljandi with his wife Kätlin.[9] The couple have a summer home in Koeru Parish near the village of Preedi in Järva County.[10]
knowledge1: Joseph Jaquet // Joseph Jaquet Joseph Jaquet, sometimes written Joseph Jacquet, (30 January 1822 - 9 June 1898) was a Belgian sculptor. Joseph Jaquet, born in Antwerp in Belgium, was the son of a baker. He studied with Guillaume Geefs at the Brussels Académie Royale des Beaux-Arts and was the friend of Peter Ludwig Kühnen (1812–1877), a painter originating from Aachen, specialised in painting romantic landscapes. He called from Antwerp to Brussels his brother Jacques (1830 - 1898) who assisted him throughout his lifetime. Jacques actively took part in sculpture by his own productions for the Brussels art salons of 1843, 1854, 1860,; Joseph Jaquet // Brussels-Capital Region. Joseph Jaquet Joseph Jaquet, sometimes written Joseph Jacquet, (30 January 1822 - 9 June 1898) was a Belgian sculptor. Joseph Jaquet, born in Antwerp in Belgium, was the son of a baker. He studied with Guillaume Geefs at the Brussels Académie Royale des Beaux-Arts and was the friend of Peter Ludwig Kühnen (1812–1877), a painter originating from Aachen, specialised in painting romantic landscapes. He called from Antwerp to Brussels his brother Jacques (1830 - 1898) who assisted him throughout his lifetime. Jacques actively took part in sculpture by his own productions for the Brussels art salons of 1843,; Joseph Jaquet // second commission for the decoration of the national monument in The Hague Willemspark (). The equestrian statue of Baldwin I of Constantinople was created in 1868 in Mons, then the pediment and lions on the Brussels Stock Exchange in 1872. In 1879, Joseph Jaquet designed a statue of Louise of Orléans, first Queen of the Belgians: this statue was on the "Place d'Armes" in Philippeville then was moved to the old "École moyenne", Namur street. He was a professor at the Brussels Académie Royale des Beaux-Arts and a master of Charles Samuel. He died in 1898 in Schaerbeek in the [sep] knowledge2: Joseph Jaquet: Joseph Jaquet, sometimes written Joseph Jacquet, (30 January 1822 - 9 June 1898) was a Belgian sculptor. ; Joseph Jaquet: Joseph Jaquet, born in Antwerp in Belgium, was the son of a baker.[1] ; Joseph Jaquet: He studied with Guillaume Geefs at the Brussels Académie Royale des Beaux-Arts and was the friend of Peter Ludwig Kühnen (1812–1877), a painter originating from Aachen, specialised in painting romantic landscapes. ; Joseph Jaquet: He called from Antwerp to Brussels his brother Jacques (1830 - 1898) who assisted him throughout his lifetime. Jacques actively took part in sculpture by his own productions for the Brussels art salons of 1843, 1854, 1860, 1866, 1872 and 1873.[note 1] ; Joseph Jaquet: For the 1842 Brussels Art Salon,[2] Joseph Jaquet exhibited a marble bust, three plaster busts, a Moses Saved from the Waters and a Meditating Saint Paul which brought him notoriety.
knowledge1: Alen Omić // with Gran Canaria. He made a good impression with Gran Canaria right from the start, and was named to the season's All-EuroCup First Team. On June 28, 2016, Omić signed a two-year deal with Turkish club Anadolu Efes. On January 16, 2017, he left Efes, and signed with Spanish club Unicaja, for the rest of the season. In April 2017, he won the EuroCup with Unicaja after beating Valencia Basket in the Finals. On July 28, 2017, Omić signed with Israeli club Hapoel Jerusalem for the 2017–18 season. On January 20, 2018, he left Hapoel and signed with Serbian club [sep] knowledge2: Alen Omić: Altri progetti
knowledge1: James Theodore Bent // James Theodore Bent James Theodore Bent (30 March 1852 – 5 May 1897) was an English explorer, archaeologist and author. James Theodore Bent was the son of James Bent of Baildon House, near Bradford, Yorkshire, where he was born. He was educated at Repton School and Wadham College, Oxford, where he graduated in 1875. In 1877 he married Mabel, daughter of R. W. Hall-Dare of Newtownbarry, Co. Wexford, and she became his companion in all his travels. He went abroad every year and became thoroughly acquainted with Italy and Greece. In 1879 he published a book on the republic of; James Theodore Bent // Bent arrived as to the Semitic origin of the ruins in Mashonaland have not been accepted by archaeologists. Bent is commemorated in the scientific name of a species of Arabian lizard, "Uromastyx benti". James Theodore Bent James Theodore Bent (30 March 1852 – 5 May 1897) was an English explorer, archaeologist and author. James Theodore Bent was the son of James Bent of Baildon House, near Bradford, Yorkshire, where he was born. He was educated at Repton School and Wadham College, Oxford, where he graduated in 1875. In 1877 he married Mabel, daughter of R. W. Hall-Dare of Newtownbarry, Co.; James Theodore Bent // San Marino, entitled "A Freak of Freedom", and was made a citizen of San Marino; in the following year appeared "Genoa: How the Republic Rose and Fell", and in 1881 a "Life of Giuseppe Garibaldi". He spent considerable time in the Aegean archipelago, of which he wrote in "The Cyclades; or, Life among the Insular Greeks" (1885). From this period Bent devoted himself particularly to archaeological research. The years 1885-1888 were given up to investigations in Asia Minor, his discoveries and conclusions being communicated to the "Journal of Hellenic Studies" and other magazines and reviews. In 1889 he undertook excavations; James Theodore Bent // of the African coast of the Red Sea, finding there the ruins of a very ancient gold-mine and traces of what he considered Sabean influence. While on another journey in South Arabia and Socotra (1896–1897), Bent was seized with malarial fever, and died in London on 5 May 1897, a few days after his return. Mabel, who had contributed by her skill as a photographer and in other ways to the success of her husband's journeys, published in 1900 "Southern Arabia, Soudan and Sakotra", which she recorded the results of their last expedition into those regions. The conclusions at which [sep] knowledge2: James Theodore Bent: James Theodore Bent (30 March 1852 – 5 May 1897) was an English explorer, archaeologist, and author. ; James Theodore Bent: James Theodore Bent was born in Liverpool on 30 March 1852,[1] the son of James (1807-1876) and Eleanor (née Lambert, c.1811-1873) Bent of Baildon House, Baildon, near Bradford, Yorkshire, where Bent lived in his boyhood. He was educated at Malvern Wells preparatory school, Repton School, and Wadham College, Oxford, where he graduated in 1875. His paternal grandparents were William (1769-1820) and Sarah (née Gorton) Bent;[2] it was this William Bent who founded Bent's Breweries, a successful business which, in various guises, was still in existence into the 1970s, and which helped generate the family's wealth.[3] One of Bent's uncles, Sir John Bent, the brewer, was Liverpool mayor in 1850–51. ; James Theodore Bent: In 1877, Bent married Mabel Hall-Dare (1847-1929) who became his companion, photographer, and diarist on all his travels. From the time of their marriage, they went abroad nearly every year, beginning with extended travels in Italy and Greece. In 1879, he published a book on the republic of San Marino, entitled A Freak of Freedom, and was made a citizen of San Marino; in the following year appeared Genoa: How the Republic Rose and Fell,[4] and in 1881 a Life of Giuseppe Garibaldi.[5] The couple's researches in the Aegean archipelago over the winters of 1882/3 and 1883/4 culminated in Bent's The Cyclades; or, Life among the Insular Greeks (1885).[6][7][8] ; James Theodore Bent: At the time of Bent's death in 1897, the couple resided at 13 Great Cumberland Place, London, and Sutton Hall, outside Macclesfield, Cheshire, UK. ; James Theodore Bent: From this period Bent concentrated particularly on archaeological and ethnographic research. The years 1883-1888 were devoted to investigations in the Eastern Mediterranean and Anatolia, his discoveries and conclusions being communicated to the Journal of Hellenic Studies and other magazines and reviews; his investigations on the Cycladic island of Antiparos are of note.[9] In 1889, he undertook excavations in the Bahrein Islands of the Persian Gulf, looking for evidence that they had been a primitive home of the Phoenician civilization; he and his wife returned to England via Persia (Iran), being introduced to Shah Naser al-Din Shah Qajar along the way.[10] After an expedition in 1890 to Cilicia Trachea, where he obtained a valuable collection of inscriptions, Bent spent a year in South Africa, with the object, by investigation of some of the ruins in Mashonaland, of throwing light on the vexed question of their origin and on the early history of East Africa. To this end, in 1891, he made, along with his wife and the Glaswegian surveyor Robert McNair Wilson Swan (1858-1904), a colleague from Bent's time on Antiparos in 1883/4,[11] the first detailed examination of the Great Zimbabwe. Bent described his work in The Ruined Cities of Mashonaland (1892). In 1893, he investigated the ruins of Axum and other places in northern Ethiopia, which had previously been made known in part by the researches of Henry Salt and others. His book The Sacred City of the Ethiopians (1893) gives an account of this expedition.[12][6]
knowledge1: Karl Eliasberg // Karl Eliasberg Karl Ilitch Eliasberg (; ) (10 June 1907 in Minsk – 12 February 1978 in Leningrad) was a Soviet conductor. Eliasberg graduated from the Leningrad Conservatory as a violinist in 1929, and was conductor of the Leningrad Theatre of Musical Comedy from 1929 to 1931 before joining Leningrad Radio as conductor. Eliasberg was conductor of the Leningrad Radio Orchestra and only second conductor of the Leningrad Philharmonic but played a part in one key event in society and culture in Saint Petersburg during the siege of Leningrad when Dmitri Shostakovich dedicated his Seventh Symphony to the city as; Karl Eliasberg // Anatoly Sobchak arranged for Eliasberg's ashes to be moved to a more suitable grave among the "Literatorskie Mostki" at the Volkovo Cemetery. The Leningrad Radio Orchestra's performance of Shostakovich's Seventh Symphony conducted by Karl Eliasberg is the subject of the 2011 novel "The Conductor" by New Zealand author Sarah Quigley. The concert during the Leningrad siege was featured in the documentary "Leningrad and the Orchestra that defied Hitler", broadcast on BBC Two on 2 January 2016. Earlier radio broadcasts by the BBC on the same subject include "Witness" and "Newshour". Karl Eliasberg Karl Ilitch Eliasberg (; ) (10 June 1907 [sep] knowledge2: Karl Eliasberg: Karl Ilitch Eliasberg (Belarusian: Карл Ілліч Эліасберг; Russian: Карл Ильич Элиасберг) (10 June 1907, in Minsk – 12 February 1978, in Leningrad) was a Soviet conductor. ; Karl Eliasberg: Eliasberg graduated from the Leningrad Conservatory as a violinist in 1929, and was conductor of the Leningrad Theatre of Musical Comedy from 1929 to 1931 before joining Leningrad Radio as conductor.[1][2][3][4] ; Karl Eliasberg: Eliasberg was conductor of the Leningrad Radio Orchestra and only second conductor of the Leningrad Philharmonic but played a part in one key event in society and culture in Saint Petersburg during the siege of Leningrad when Dmitri Shostakovich dedicated his Seventh Symphony to the city as the "Leningrad Symphony." The symphony had already been premiered in Kuibyshev on 5 March 1942 under Samuil Samosud, then performed in Moscow (29 March 1942), London (22 June 1942) and New York City (19 July 1942). When Eliasberg was asked to conduct the Leningrad première, only 15 members of the orchestra were still available; the others had either starved to death or left to fight the enemy. During the days of the siege of Leningrad, Eliasberg saved many lives by getting musicians to rehearsals and to feeding stations.[5] The concert was given on 9 August 1942 in the Leningrad Bolshoy Philharmonic Hall under the baton of Eliasberg, with artists he had gathered from the main orchestra, the reserve orchestra, and military bands. It was heard over the radio and lifted the spirits of the survivors. ; Karl Eliasberg: Eliasberg was recognised as a Meritorious Artist of the Russian Soviet Federative Socialist Republic in 1944, but after the war Yevgeny Mravinsky returned and blocked Eliasberg's career in Leningrad,[6] so he became a travelling provincial conductor. ; Karl Eliasberg: Between 1945 and 1975 Eliasberg headlined in Leningrad only three more times – each of them with the Seventh Symphony, each of them with the reserve orchestra. In 1961, he conducted the first movement only. In 1964, there was a reunion of Eliasberg and 22 of the original musicians before a performance in Shostakovich's presence on 27 January 1964; it was the first time they had been together in 22 years. The musicians played in their same seats. Eliasberg said the concert was dedicated to those who had performed then but died since, and the audience gave a standing ovation. Eliasberg later wrote:
knowledge1: F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre // twenties remembered that he still spoke with an American accent, and used the name Jeremy MacIntyre. An acquaintance remembers MacIntyre sharing the reason for the "Gwynplaine" in his name; it was, he said, from the film "The Man Who Laughs", based on the Victor Hugo novel, in which the title character, Gwynplaine, has had a permanent smile surgically carved on his face. MacIntyre stated that he identified with Gwynplaine and thus chose the name as part of his own. In 2000, MacIntyre was arrested after a neighbor said he duct-taped her to a chair, shaved her head, and spray-painted her; F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre // black. He wound up pleading guilty to third-degree misdemeanor assault. On 24 June 2010 he was removed from his apartment by police and taken to Coney Island Hospital for evaluation after sending a despondent email to friends, one of whom called 911. He was released hours later, and returned home, where he reportedly lit his apartment on fire. The fire "grew quickly into an 'all-hands' blaze that took 12 trucks and 60 firefighters more than an hour to extinguish". A body was removed from the apartment. No other residents of his apartment building were killed. Eventually, the body was positively [sep] knowledge2: F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre: Fergus (also Feargus) Gwynplaine MacIntyre (1948 – 25 June 2010),[1] also known as Froggy,[2] was a New York City-based journalist, novelist, poet and illustrator. MacIntyre's writings include the science-fiction novel The Woman Between the Worlds[3] and his anthology of verse and humour pieces MacIntyre's Improbable Bestiary.[4] As an uncredited "ghost" author, MacIntyre is known to have written or co-written several other books, including at least one novel in the Tom Swift IV series, The DNA Disaster,[5] published as by "Victor Appleton" (a house pseudonym) but with MacIntyre's name on the acknowledgements page. ; F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre: On 25 June 2010, MacIntyre set his Brooklyn apartment on fire and his body was later found there.[1][6] ; F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre: Although MacIntyre professionally published many works of non-fiction and literature, he is best known as an author of genre fiction: specifically, science fiction, fantasy, horror and mystery stories. His short stories were published in Weird Tales,[12] Analog, Asimov's Science Fiction, Amazing Stories, Absolute Magnitude, Interzone,[13] The Strand Magazine and numerous anthologies, including Terry Carr's Best Science Fiction of the Year #10,[14] Michael Reaves and John Pelan's mystery/horror anthology Shadows Over Baker Street,[15] James Robert Smith and Stephen Mark Rainey's horror anthology Evermore, and Stephen Jones's The Mammoth Book of Best New Horror. For Mike Ashley's The Mammoth Book of Historical Detectives (1995), MacIntyre wrote "Death in the Dawntime", a locked room mystery (or rather, sealed cave mystery) set in Australia around 35,000 BC, which editor Mike Ashley suggests is the furthest in the past a historical whodunnit has been set.[16] ; F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre: A characteristic of MacIntyre's writing (both fiction and non-fiction) is his penchant for coining new words and resurrecting obscure words. Language authority William Safire acknowledged MacIntyre's neologism of "Clintonym"[17][18] and quoted his historical etymology research.[19][20] ; F. Gwynplaine MacIntyre: In addition to publishing science fiction in Analog, MacIntyre also contributed to that magazine as an artist, illustrating his own stories and one by Ron Goulart.[21]
knowledge1: Carl Braun (obstetrician) // Carl Braun (obstetrician) Carl Braun (22 March 1822 – 28 March 1891), sometimes Carl Rudolf Braun alternative spelling: Karl Braun, or Karl von Braun-Fernwald, name after knighthood Carl Ritter von Fernwald Braun was an Austrian obstetrician. He was born 22 March 1822 in Zistersdorf, Austria, son of the medical doctor Carl August Braun. Carl Braun studied in Vienna from 1841 and, in 1847, took the position of "Sekundararzt" (assistant doctor) in the Vienna General Hospital. In 1849 he succeeded Ignaz Semmelweis as assistant to professor Johann Klein at the hospital's first maternity clinic, a position he held until 1853. In; Carl Braun (obstetrician) // rates of puerperal fever in the period April 1849 to end 1953 show. These results suggest that Braun continued, assiduously, to require hand disinfection before attending women and did not let mortality return to the high levels before Semmelweis introduced the chlorine washings. Carl Braun (obstetrician) Carl Braun (22 March 1822 – 28 March 1891), sometimes Carl Rudolf Braun alternative spelling: Karl Braun, or Karl von Braun-Fernwald, name after knighthood Carl Ritter von Fernwald Braun was an Austrian obstetrician. He was born 22 March 1822 in Zistersdorf, Austria, son of the medical doctor Carl August Braun. Carl Braun studied in; Carl Braun (obstetrician) // in 1877 became a Hofrat, a title reserved for very eminent professors. His name is associated with a disorder of pregnancy called the "Braun-Fernwald sign". This sign is described as an asymmetrical enlargement and softening of the uterine fundus at the site of implantation at 4–5 weeks. In full harmony with his contemporaries, Braun identified 30 causes of childbed fever opposing Ignaz Semmelweis's thesis that 'cadaverous poisoning' was the only cause of childbed fever. Despite this scholar opposition, Braun maintained a relatively low mortality rate in the First Division, roughly consistent with the rate Semmelweis himself achieved, as historical mortality [sep] knowledge2: Carl Braun (obstetrician): Carl Braun (22 March 1822 – 28 March 1891), sometimes Carl Rudolf Braun[1] alternative spelling: Karl Braun,[2] or Karl von Braun-Fernwald, name after knighthood Carl Ritter von Fernwald Braun[3] was an Austrian obstetrician.  He was born 22 March 1822 in Zistersdorf, Austria, son of the medical doctor Carl August Braun. ; Carl Braun (obstetrician): Carl Braun studied in Vienna from 1841 and, in 1847, took the position of Sekundararzt (assistant doctor) in the Vienna General Hospital.  In 1849 he succeeded Ignaz Semmelweis as assistant to professor Johann Klein at the hospital's first maternity clinic, a position he held until 1853. ; Carl Braun (obstetrician): In 1853, after Braun became a Privatdozent, he was appointed ordinary professor of obstetrics in Trient and vice-director of the Tiroler Landes-Gebär- und Findelanstalt.  In November 1856 he was called to Vienna to succeed Johann Klein as professor of obstetrics.  On Braun's recommendation, the hospital's first gynaecology clinic was created in 1858, under his direction.[4]  He is credited for establishing gynaecology as an independent field of study[5] ; Carl Braun (obstetrician): In 1867-1871 he was appointed dean of the medical faculty, and in the academic year 1868/69 was made rector of the University of Vienna.  He was knighted in 1872 (cf. the title Ritter) and in 1877 became a Hofrat, a title reserved for very eminent professors.[4] ; Carl Braun (obstetrician): His name is associated with a disorder of pregnancy called the "Braun-Fernwald sign".[6] This sign is described as an asymmetrical enlargement and softening of the uterine fundus at the site of implantation at 4–5 weeks.
knowledge1: Generoso Rossi // Generoso Rossi Generoso Rossi (born 3 January 1979) is an Italian footballer who is currently a free agent having most recently played for Sorrento in the Lega Pro Prima Divisione – B as a goalkeeper. Rossi started his career at A.S. Bari. he was on loan to Serie C1 teams, and returned to Bari in summer 2000. He made his Serie A debut on 30 September 2000, against Verona. In January 2001, he transferred to Venezia, and then transferred to Palermo, as Maurizio Zamparini, owner of Venezia, bought Palermo. He was on loan to U.S. Lecce, and signed by A.C.; Generoso Rossi // Tournament and called up to the under 21 squad for the 2002 UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship. Generoso Rossi Generoso Rossi (born 3 January 1979) is an Italian footballer who is currently a free agent having most recently played for Sorrento in the Lega Pro Prima Divisione – B as a goalkeeper. Rossi started his career at A.S. Bari. he was on loan to Serie C1 teams, and returned to Bari in summer 2000. He made his Serie A debut on 30 September 2000, against Verona. In January 2001, he transferred to Venezia, and then transferred to Palermo, as Maurizio; Generoso Rossi // Siena in summer 2003. He was banned from football due to betting scandal, he then signed an 18-month contract with Queens Park Rangers in January 2005. In summer 2005, he was signed by Triestina. In January 2008, he was on loan to Calcio Catania, with Babu moving in the opposite direction. Rossi became the third choice goalkeeper at Catania, behind Ciro Polito and Albano Bizarri, and was ahead of Raffaele Ioime. During 2008/2009 season, Rossi was transferred to Gallipoli in Lega Pro Prima Divisione – B. Although the club won Serie B promotion, the team faced financial difficulty, Rossi did [sep] knowledge2: Generoso Rossi: Generoso Rossi (born 3 January 1979) is an Italian former professional footballer who played as a goalkeeper. ; Generoso Rossi: Rossi started his career at A.S. Bari. he was on loan to Serie C1 teams, and returned to Bari in summer 2000. He made his Serie A debut on 30 September 2000, against Verona. ; Generoso Rossi: In January 2001, he transferred to Venezia, and then transferred to Palermo, as Maurizio Zamparini, owner of Venezia, bought Palermo. He was on loan to U.S. Lecce, and signed by A.C. Siena in summer 2003. ; Generoso Rossi: He was banned from football due to betting scandal,[1] he then signed an 18-month contract with Queens Park Rangers in January 2005.[2] ; Generoso Rossi: In summer 2005, he was signed by Triestina.
knowledge1: Kathinka Pasveer // Kathinka Pasveer Kathinka Pasveer (born 11 June 1959) is a Dutch flautist. Kathinka Pasveer was born in Zaandam, North Holland, the daughter of a conductor who also taught at the Amsterdam Conservatory . She studied with Frans Vester at the Royal Conservatory of The Hague, where she received her performer's diploma, with the distinction of the Nicolai Prize in 1983. During her final year of studies she was the principal flutist of the Gewestelijk Orkest Zuid-Holland . In December 1982 Karlheinz Stockhausen was invited to the Royal Conservatory for a series of concerts, master classes, and lectures, at which time; Kathinka Pasveer // Music . Kathinka Pasveer Kathinka Pasveer (born 11 June 1959) is a Dutch flautist. Kathinka Pasveer was born in Zaandam, North Holland, the daughter of a conductor who also taught at the Amsterdam Conservatory . She studied with Frans Vester at the Royal Conservatory of The Hague, where she received her performer's diploma, with the distinction of the Nicolai Prize in 1983. During her final year of studies she was the principal flutist of the Gewestelijk Orkest Zuid-Holland . In December 1982 Karlheinz Stockhausen was invited to the Royal Conservatory for a series of concerts, master classes, and lectures, at; Kathinka Pasveer // Opera 1996), as well as the concert premieres of "Orchester-Finalisten" (Carré, Amsterdam, 1996), "Michaelion" from "Mittwoch aus Licht" (Prinzregententheater, Munich, 1998), and Kathinka performed as one of the 4 soloists in the world première of "Licht-Bilder" (third scene of "Sonntag aus Licht" (Donaueschingen, 16 October 2004). After "Licht", Stockhausen composed for her the flute version of "Harmonien" (2006, premiered 13 July 2007 at the Sülztalhalle in Kürten) and "Paradies" (2007, premiered on 24 August 2009 at the Laeiszhalle in Hamburg), components of the chamber-music cycle "Klang". In addition to her activities as a flautist, in 1989 she learned the solo; Kathinka Pasveer // Pasveer worked with the composer and with Suzanne Stephens on his compositions "Zeitmaße", "Amour", and "In Freundschaft". Stockhausen invited her to work with him on a new work for flute and six percussionists, which was composed in February and March 1983 and premiered at the Donaueschinger Musiktage in October 1983. It took six months of rehearsals to prepare this work for performance. This was "Kathinkas Gesang", the second scene of the opera "Samstag aus Licht", which she also performed at the staged premiere of "Samstag" at La Scala in Milan in May 1984 (; ). The next year, Stockhausen made [sep] knowledge2: Kathinka Pasveer: Kathinka Pasveer (born 11 June 1959) is a Dutch flautist. ; Kathinka Pasveer: Kathinka Pasveer was born in Zaandam, The Netherlands, daughter of the conductor Jan Pasveer, who also taught at the Amsterdam Conservatory.[1] She studied with Frans Vester at the Royal Conservatory of The Hague, where she received her performer's diploma, with the distinction of the Nicolai Prize in 1983. During her final year of studies she was the principal flutist of the Gewestelijk Orkest Zuid-Holland.[2] ; Kathinka Pasveer: In December 1982 Karlheinz Stockhausen was invited to the Royal Conservatory for a series of concerts, master classes, and lectures, at which time Pasveer worked with the composer and with Suzanne Stephens on his compositions Zeitmaße, Amour, and In Freundschaft. Stockhausen invited her to work with him on a new work for flute and six percussionists, which was composed in February and March 1983 and premiered at the Donaueschinger Musiktage in October 1983. It took six months of rehearsals to prepare this work for performance. This was Kathinkas Gesang, the second scene of the opera Samstag aus Licht, which she also performed at the staged premiere of Samstag at La Scala in Milan in May 1984.[3][4] The next year, Stockhausen made a new version of the piece, for flute and six-channel electronic music, and Pasveer likewise gave its premiere at Ircam in Paris in May 1985.[5] As a result of this initial contact Stockhausen began featuring the flute in the Licht cycle.[6] She worked with Stockhausen for twenty-five years, up until his death in December 2007. He composed many works especially for her, all of which she premiered, and many of which are dedicated to her. These included parts in the operas Montag aus Licht (La Scala 1988), Dienstag aus Licht (Leipzig Opera 1993), and Freitag aus Licht (Leipzig Opera 1996), as well as the concert premieres of Orchester-Finalisten (Carré, Amsterdam, 1996), Michaelion from Mittwoch aus Licht (Prinzregententheater, Munich, 1998), and Pasveer performed as one of the 4 soloists in the world première of Licht-Bilder (third scene of Sonntag aus Licht (Donaueschingen, 16 October 2004). After Licht, Stockhausen composed for her the flute version of Harmonien (2006, premiered 13 July 2007 at the Sülztalhalle in Kürten) and Paradies (2007, premiered on 24 August 2009 at the Laeiszhalle in Hamburg), components of the chamber-music cycle Klang. ; Kathinka Pasveer: In addition to her activities as a flautist, in 1989 she learned the solo dancer-mime part for Stockhausen's Inori, which she performed for the first time on 27 May 1989 in the Kölner Philharmonie, with the Gürzenich Orchestra conducted by the composer. When pressed to name a favourite from all of Stockhausen's compositions, Pasveer named Inori as a "very special" piece that she privately "performs" almost every day, "as it is my form of meditation".[4] She also performs from memory the 83-minute-long Vortrag über HU (a sung and mimed lecture introducing Inori), in both German and English, and has made video recordings of both versions. She also performs the dancer-mime part in Vision (act 3 scene 2 of Donnerstag aus Licht). Pasveer also has recorded as a soprano singer in a number of Stockhausen's works, including the electronic music for both Dienstag aus Licht (Oktophonie) and Freitag aus Licht, as well as Die sieben Lieder der Tage (extracted from "Montag"), Zwei Paare (made as soundtrack music for the 2000 short film In Absentia by the Quay Brothers), and Urantia (the Nineteenth Hour from Klang). ; Kathinka Pasveer: From 1998 up to the present time, Pasveer has taught the interpretation of Stockhausen's works at the Stockhausen Courses for New Music held each summer in Kürten.[6] Beginning in 1983, she assisted Stockhausen in the production of recordings and learned from him the techniques of sound projection used in most of his works. Since the composer’s death, she has acted as sound projectionist in many live performances, and has produced and mixed down all the recordings in the Stockhausen Complete Edition. Stockhausen also entrusted her, together with Antonio Pérez-Abellán, with the production of the sound loops in the 24 individual layers of his electronic work Cosmic Pulses in 2006.
knowledge1: Yordanka Donkova // Yordanka Donkova Yordanka Donkova () (born 28 September 1961) is a Bulgarian former hurdling athlete, notable for winning an Olympic gold medal and bronze medal as well as 9 medals at European indoor and outdoor championships. Donkova set four 100 m hurdles world records in 1986. Her fifth world record, a time of 12.21 set in 1988, was beaten only in 2016 by Kendra Harrison. In total, Donkova has 16 medals from major athletics tournaments. Donkova suffered a childhood accident, which resulted in her losing two fingers on her right hand. She has three children. In 1991 she gave birth; Yordanka Donkova // to a son called Zhivko; twin girls Daniela and Desislava followed in 1996. After the 1988 Seoul Olympics, Donkova received an offer to compete for the United States, but refused to change her national allegiance and continued to represent Bulgaria. Five-time Bulgarian National Champion at 100 m hurdles, 1980, 82, 84, 86 & 94. CR = Championship Record Donkova set five world records for the 100 metres hurdles: <br> Yordanka Donkova Yordanka Donkova () (born 28 September 1961) is a Bulgarian former hurdling athlete, notable for winning an Olympic gold medal and bronze medal as well as 9 medals at [sep] knowledge2: Yordanka Donkova: Yordanka Lyubchova Donkova (Bulgarian: Йорданка Любчова Донкова; born 28 September 1961) is a Bulgarian former hurdling athlete, notable for winning an Olympic gold medal and bronze medal as well as nine medals at European indoor and outdoor championships. Donkova set four 100 m hurdles world records in 1986. Her fifth world record, a time of 12.21 set in 1988, stood for almost 28 years until broken in 2016 by Kendra Harrison. ; Yordanka Donkova: In total, Donkova has 16 medals from major athletics tournaments.[1] ; Yordanka Donkova: Donkova suffered a childhood accident, which resulted in her losing two fingers on her right hand. She has three children. In 1991 she gave birth to a son called Zhivko Atanasov - professional football player, currently playing for Cherno More; twin girls Daniela and Desislava followed in 1996. ; Yordanka Donkova: Five-time Bulgarian National Champion at 100 m hurdles, 1980, 82, 84, 86 & 94. ; Yordanka Donkova: CR = Championship Record
knowledge1: Arthur Wakefield // Arthur Wakefield Captain Arthur Wakefield (19 November 1799 – 17 June 1843) served with the Royal Navy, before joining his brother, Edward Gibbon Wakefield, in founding the new settlement at Nelson, New Zealand. Arthur Wakefield was born in Essex, a son of Edward Wakefield (1774–1854) and Susanna Crash (1767–1816); his other brothers were William Wakefield and Felix Wakefield. He joined the Royal Navy at age eleven. He saw action in the Dutch East Indies, and was part of the force that captured and burnt Washington, D.C. during the War of 1812. He took part in the bombardment of Algiers. In; Arthur Wakefield // Dudley Dobson, and the range and Mount Arthur were named by Dobson after Arthur Wakefield. Arthur Wakefield Captain Arthur Wakefield (19 November 1799 – 17 June 1843) served with the Royal Navy, before joining his brother, Edward Gibbon Wakefield, in founding the new settlement at Nelson, New Zealand. Arthur Wakefield was born in Essex, a son of Edward Wakefield (1774–1854) and Susanna Crash (1767–1816); his other brothers were William Wakefield and Felix Wakefield. He joined the Royal Navy at age eleven. He saw action in the Dutch East Indies, and was part of the force that captured and burnt Washington,; Arthur Wakefield // and bread". The subsequent government inquiry found the whole expedition had been illegal and exonerated the Māori. This did not sit well with the colonists, who immediately began a political campaign against Governor Robert FitzRoy that contributed to his early dismissal. Nelson is now a thriving city. The community of Wakefield south of Nelson is not believed to be named after him, but was renamed shortly before Arthur Wakefield's death, and it is believed that the Wairau Affray has assisted in the new name becoming established. The Arthur Range in what is now Kahurangi National Park was explored by Arthur [sep] knowledge2: Arthur Wakefield: Captain Arthur Wakefield (19 November 1799 – 17 June 1843) served with the Royal Navy, before joining his brother, Edward Gibbon Wakefield, in founding the new settlement at Nelson, New Zealand. ; Arthur Wakefield: Arthur Wakefield was born in Essex, a son of Edward Wakefield (1774–1854), a distinguished surveyor and land agent, and Susanna Crash[1] (1767–1816). His grandmother, Priscilla Wakefield (1751–1832), was a popular author for the young, and one of the introducers of savings banks.[2] He was the brother of Catherine Gurney Wakefield (1793-1873), Edward Gibbon Wakefield (1796–1862), Daniel Bell Wakefield (1798–1858), William Hayward Wakefield (1801–1848), John Howard Wakefield (1803–1862), Felix Wakefield (1807–1875), Priscilla Susannah Wakefield (1809–1887), Percy Wakefield (1810–1832), and an unnamed child born in 1813.[3] ; Arthur Wakefield: He joined the Royal Navy at age eleven. He saw action in the Dutch East Indies, and was part of the force that captured and burnt Washington, D.C. during the War of 1812. He took part in the bombardment of Algiers. In the post-Napoleonic period he was stationed off South America, involved in diplomatic duties during the various wars of independence. He then spent several years off the coast of West Africa as part of the flotilla engaged in the suppression of the slave trade. He also saw duty in the North Atlantic, the West Indies and the Mediterranean Sea. He was eventually given command of his own ship, the steam frigate Rhadamanthus. However, in 1837 he was passed over for promotion, so, recognising that his career was going nowhere, he resigned from the Navy in 1841.[4] ; Arthur Wakefield: Immediately after Arthur Wakefield left the Navy in 1841, his brother, Edward Gibbon Wakefield recruited him to join the New Zealand Company, tasking him to select settlers for a new settlement to be named Nelson, escort the party to New Zealand, and supervise the growth of the new town. Arthur Wakefield sailed from London on the Whitby in April 1841 and reached Wellington in September 1841.[5] The first immigrant ships arrived in Nelson in February 1842. ; Arthur Wakefield: Furthermore, the newly established British government of William Hobson in Auckland was not at all sympathetic to their problems.  One of the basic tenets of the Treaty of Waitangi (1840), between the British Crown and various Māori chiefs, was the understanding that the Crown would protect the Māori from attempts to defraud them of their land.
knowledge1: Felician of Foligno // Felician of Foligno Saint Felician(us) of Foligno () (c. 160–c. 250) is the patron saint of Foligno. According to Christian tradition, he was born in "Forum Flaminii" (present-day San Giovanni Profiamma), on the Via Flaminia, of a Christian family, around 160. He was the spiritual student of Pope Eleuterus and evangelized in Foligno, Spello, Bevagna, Assisi, Perugia, Norcia, Plestia, Trevi, and Spoleto. He was later consecrated bishop of Foligno by Pope Victor I around 204 (he was the first bishop to receive the pallium as a symbol of his office). He ordained Valentine of Terni as a priest. His episcopate; Felician of Foligno // over his grave at Foligno. His relics were transferred to Metz on October 4, 970. In 965 some relics were translated to Minden in Germany; Felician was thus erroneously considered a bishop of that German city (and he had a separate feast day of October 20), an error that entered the "Roman Martyrology". Some of his relics were later returned to Foligno in 1673-4. Foligno Cathedral preserves a statue of the saint, of silver and bronze, made by the sculptor Giovanni Battista Maini. Felician of Foligno Saint Felician(us) of Foligno () (c. 160–c. 250) is the patron saint of Foligno.; Felician of Foligno // lasted for more than 50 years; he was one of the first Christian bishops of northern Italy. He was arrested at the age of 94 for refusing to sacrifice to the Roman gods during the persecutions of Decius. He was tortured and scourged, and died outside Foligno while being conveyed to Rome for his execution. Saint Messalina was a consecrated virgin who had received the religious veil from Felician. She cared for him during his imprisonment, and for this she was also arrested and clubbed to death when she refused to sacrifice to the Roman gods. A church was built [sep] knowledge2: Felician of Foligno: Felician(us) of Foligno (Italian: San Feliciano di Foligno) (c. 160 – c. 250) is the patron saint of Foligno. ; Felician of Foligno: According to Christian tradition, he was born in Forum Flaminii (present-day San Giovanni Profiamma), on the Via Flaminia, of a Christian family, around 160.  He was the spiritual student of Pope Eleuterus and evangelized in Foligno, Spello, Bevagna, Assisi, Perugia, Norcia, Plestia, Trevi, and Spoleto.[1] ; Felician of Foligno: He was later consecrated bishop of Foligno by Pope Victor I around 204 (he was the first bishop to receive the pallium as a symbol of his office).[2]  He ordained Valentine of Terni as a priest.  His episcopate lasted for more than 50 years; he was one of the first Christian bishops of northern Italy.[1]  He was arrested at the age of 94 for refusing to sacrifice to the Roman gods during the persecutions of Decius. He was tortured and scourged, and died outside Foligno while being conveyed to Rome for his execution. ; Felician of Foligno: A church was built over his grave at Foligno. His relics were transferred to Metz on October 4, 970.  In 965 some relics were translated to Minden in Germany; Felician was thus erroneously considered a bishop of that German city (and he had a separate feast day of October 20), an error that entered the Roman Martyrology.[2]  Some of his relics were later returned to Foligno in 1673–4.[2] ; Felician of Foligno: Foligno Cathedral preserves a statue of the saint, of silver and bronze, made by the sculptor Giovanni Battista Maini.
knowledge1: Neil Sinclair // Neil Sinclair Neil Sinclair Sinky (born 23 February 1974 in Belfast, Northern Ireland) is a professional boxer. He usually fights at light middleweight or the divisions either side. Sinclair boxed for Ireland as an amateur and won a bronze medal at the World Junior Championships at Montreal in 1992 and also won a gold for Northern Ireland at the 1994 Commonwealth Games in Victoria, British Columbia, Canada. Sinclair turned professional in April 1995, winning his first fight at the Ulster Hall, Belfast, in which he knocked out Marty Duke on a card that included Darren Corbett and the final fight [sep] knowledge2: Neil Sinclair: Neil Sinclair (born 23 February 1974), is a Northern Irish former professional boxer who competed from 1995 to 2010. He challenged once for the WBO welterweight title in 2010. At regional level, he held the British welterweight title from 2001 to 2003 and challenged once for the EBU European Union title in 2008. As an amateur, he won a bronze medal representing Ireland at the 1992 Junior World Championships and gold while representing Northern Ireland at the 1994 Commonwealth Games. ; Neil Sinclair: Sinclair boxed for Ireland as an amateur and won a bronze medal at the World Junior Championships at Montreal in 1992 and also won a gold for Northern Ireland at the 1994 Commonwealth Games in Victoria, British Columbia, Canada.[1][2] ; Neil Sinclair: Sinclair turned professional in April 1995, winning his first fight at the Ulster Hall, Belfast, in which he knocked out Marty Duke on a card that included Darren Corbett and the final fight in the career of Damien Denny. ; Neil Sinclair: In May 2009, Sinclair won the Irish light-middleweight title with a stoppage victory over Henry Coyle at the Odyssey Arena, Belfast.
knowledge1: Jake Tilson // Jake Tilson Jake Tilson (born 14 February 1958 in London) is an English artist, graphic designer, writer and publisher. Author and designer of "A Tale of 12 Kitchens" (2006), he published the arts magazines "Cipher" (1979–1981) and "Atlas" (1985–1993), taught in the Communication Design department at the Royal College of Art (1987–1999) and also works as a journalist. A retrospective exhibition of his art work was held at the Museo Internacional de Electrografia in Cuenca, Spain (1997), part funded by The British Council. He was an early adopter of the World Wide Web as a medium for art, using his; Jake Tilson // born in London, the son of Joe Tilson and Joslyn Tilson (née Morton). His grandfather was Alastair Morton, who ran his father's business the Edinburgh Weavers, commissioning artists such as Ben Nicholson and Barbara Hepworth. Jake studied painting at Chelsea School of Art from 1976–79, and at the Royal College of Art from 1980–83. He won the Royal of Art Major Travelling scholarship and spent a year working in Paris, where he had his first one-person exhibition at Galerie J et J Donguy. In 1979 he set up the small independent press, The Woolley Dale Press, which enabled him to; Jake Tilson // residence at the Ruskin School of Drawing and Fine Art, Oxford University (1994–95) where he developed his website "TheCooker" (1994) as well as designing websites for the Laboratory at the Ruskin (1994) he designed websites for the Royal Institute of International Affairs (1995) and the Royal College of Art (1996). His most recent exhibition was at the Venice Architecture Biennale 2012, commissioned by Haworth Tompkins Architects as part of the Common Ground exhibition. No More Rules: Graphic Design and Postmodernism, Rick Poynor, 2013, Laurence King, . How To Survive Modern Art, Susie Hodge, Tate Publishing, 2009, . The Fundamentals of; Jake Tilson // publish limited edition book works and the arts/literary magazine "Cipher", helped by a grant from the Greater London Arts Association. After leaving college in 1983 he continued publishing, including the trilingual arts magazine, "Atlas", which sold in 15 countries. Atlas became the name of his next independent press in 1993 which published his audio works and books such as "3 Found Fonts" (2003). Throughout the 1990s Tilson exhibited widely and had a commercial dealer, the Nigel Greenwood Gallery in London. During this time his work was primarily collage based wall pieces and sculptural dioramas. He was Erna Plachte artist in [sep] knowledge2: Jake Tilson:  Jake Tilson (born 1958 in London) is an English artist,[1] graphic designer,[2] writer[3] and publisher.[4] ; Jake Tilson: Jake Tilson was born in London, the son of Joe Tilson and Joslyn Tilson (née Morton). His grandfather was Alastair Morton,[10] who ran his father's business the Edinburgh Weavers, commissioning artists such as Ben Nicholson and Barbara Hepworth.[10] Jake studied painting at Chelsea School of Art from 1976–79, and at the Royal College of Art from 1980–83. He won the Royal of Art Major Travelling scholarship and spent a year working in Paris, where he had his first one-person exhibition at Galerie J et J Donguy. ; Jake Tilson: His most recent exhibition was at the Venice Architecture Biennale 2012, commissioned by Haworth Tompkins Architects as part of the Common Ground exhibition.[11][12] ; Jake Tilson: Influences: a Lexicon of Contemporary Graphic Design, Anna Gerber and Amy Lutz, Gestalten Verlag, 2006, ISBN 3899551524. ; Jake Tilson: Vision: 50 Years of British Creativity, a Celebration of Art, Architecture and Design (Cutting Edge), Melvyn Bragg, Thames & Hudson, 1999, ISBN 0500019061.
knowledge1: Neil Googe // Neil Googe Neil Googe is a British comics artist. Googe's early comics work include a "Shotgun Mary" mini-series and work on "2000 AD", including a number of "Judge Dredd" stories. He was one of the co-founders of the British independent comic publisher Com.x in 2000, where he wrote and drew "Bazooka Jules" and although only three issues were published Googe says he still has ideas for many more. However, since then he had steady work in the American comic book market since and the opportunity has never arisen. In the American market he is known for his work on "Welcome; Neil Googe // "Pathfinder" supplement. He has said that he will still be doing regular comic work alongside his other projects. Comics work includes: Neil Googe Neil Googe is a British comics artist. Googe's early comics work include a "Shotgun Mary" mini-series and work on "2000 AD", including a number of "Judge Dredd" stories. He was one of the co-founders of the British independent comic publisher Com.x in 2000, where he wrote and drew "Bazooka Jules" and although only three issues were published Googe says he still has ideas for many more. However, since then he had steady work in the American comic [sep] knowledge2: Neil Googe: Neil Googe is a British comics artist. ; Neil Googe: Googe's early comics work include a Shotgun Mary mini-series and work on 2000 AD, including a number of Judge Dredd stories. In 1999, Googe was hired as the artist for a graphic novel adaptation of Konami's Silent Hill, which had been released in early 1999. The novel was scheduled for release in November 1999. Despite being completed, advertised, and even receiving an ISBN, the novel never got published due to disputes with Konami and it's European branch, with only four screenshots of the novel remaining. Googe is said to have had a CD with the full, completed novel on it, but has since lost said CD.[1][2][3] ; Neil Googe: He was one of the co-founders of the British independent comic publisher Com.x in 2000, where he wrote and drew Bazooka Jules and although only three issues were published Googe says he still has ideas for many more. However, since then he had steady work in the American comic book market since and the opportunity has never arisen.[4] ; Neil Googe: In the American market he is known for his work on Welcome to Tranquility with Gail Simone for Wildstorm[5] where he'd previously worked on Majestic.[4] Following this he worked with Christos Gage on Wildcats: World's End.[6] and then with Mike Costa on the World of Warcraft hard back graphic novel Dark Riders which was released by DC Comics after the Wildstorm merge. ; Neil Googe: After this Neil continued working with DC Comics, lending his hand more to one shot issues like Rose and Thorn, the recent Detective Comics Harley Quinn #1 issue, the Legends of the Dark Knight Harley Quinn issue and most recently The Flash. Also returning to 2000 AD to work on Survival Geeks written by Gordon Rennie and Emma Beeby
knowledge1: Francis Nicholson (painter) // author, and married Thomas Crofton Croker. Francis Nicholson (painter) Francis Nicholson (14 November 1753 – 6 March 1844) was a British artist. He worked in watercolour and oil, and is mainly known as a landscape artist. Nicholson was born in Pickering, North Yorkshire. Nicholson studied with a local artist in Scarborough, before beginning his career in his native Pickering, producing sporting pictures and portraits for a variety of Yorkshire patrons. By the mid-1780s he was also making paintings of country houses, leading him to concentrate on landscapes in watercolour. From 1789, he contributed views of both Yorkshire and Scotland to; Francis Nicholson (painter) // Francis Nicholson (painter) Francis Nicholson (14 November 1753 – 6 March 1844) was a British artist. He worked in watercolour and oil, and is mainly known as a landscape artist. Nicholson was born in Pickering, North Yorkshire. Nicholson studied with a local artist in Scarborough, before beginning his career in his native Pickering, producing sporting pictures and portraits for a variety of Yorkshire patrons. By the mid-1780s he was also making paintings of country houses, leading him to concentrate on landscapes in watercolour. From 1789, he contributed views of both Yorkshire and Scotland to exhibitions at the Royal Academy. He; Francis Nicholson (painter) // "The practice of drawing and painting landscape from nature, in water colours", which was published in 1820. It sold out and a second edition followed in 1823. Nicholson died in London and is buried there in Brompton Cemetery. His c. 1837 self-portrait is in the National Portrait Gallery. He is known as the Father of water colour painting and also as an early pioneer of lithography, and was much admired by Turner. In October 2012 Pickering and district Civic Society erected a Blue Plaque in his memory on 3 Hungate Pickering. His daughter Marianne Croker was an artist, poet and [sep] knowledge2: Francis Nicholson (painter): Francis Nicholson (14 November 1753 – 6 March 1844) was a British artist. He worked in watercolour and oil, and is mainly known as a landscape artist.[1] ; Francis Nicholson (painter): Nicholson was born in Pickering, North Yorkshire. ; Francis Nicholson (painter): He contributed "Views of England",[2] in collaboration with the engraver Francis Jukes to "The Beauties of England and Wales", Author: Britton, John & Edward Wedlake Brayley - A book published in 18 volumes from 1801 to 1815.[3][4] ; Francis Nicholson (painter): He wrote a handbook, The practice of drawing and painting landscape from nature, in water colours, which was published in 1820. It sold out and a second edition followed in 1823.[5] Nicholson died in London and is buried there in Brompton Cemetery. ; Francis Nicholson (painter): His c. 1837 self-portrait is in the National Portrait Gallery. He is known as the Father of water colour painting and also as an early pioneer of lithography, and was much admired by Turner. In October 2012 Pickering and district Civic Society erected a Blue Plaque in his memory on 3 Hungate Pickering. His daughter Marianne Croker was an artist, poet and author, and married Thomas Crofton Croker.
knowledge1: Chris Duffield // Chris Duffield Christopher Paul Duffield (born 20 May 1952) is the former Town Clerk of London and Chief Executive of the Corporation of the City of London. He was succeeded by John Barradell in 2012. Duffield was born on 20 May 1952, the son of Jack and Irene Duffield. He was educated at St Albans School, a then all-boys independent school in Hertfordshire. He graduated from Newcastle University in 1973 with a Bachelor of Arts (BA Hons). He has served in local government for nearly 30 years and prior to joining the City of London was the Chief Executive of; Chris Duffield // include, but are not limited to: Duffield is a member of "The Chartered Institute of Public Finance and Accountancy (CIPFA)." Chris Duffield Christopher Paul Duffield (born 20 May 1952) is the former Town Clerk of London and Chief Executive of the Corporation of the City of London. He was succeeded by John Barradell in 2012. Duffield was born on 20 May 1952, the son of Jack and Irene Duffield. He was educated at St Albans School, a then all-boys independent school in Hertfordshire. He graduated from Newcastle University in 1973 with a Bachelor of Arts (BA Hons). He has served [sep] knowledge2: Chris Duffield: Christopher Paul Duffield (born 20 May 1952) is the former Town Clerk of London and Chief Executive of the Corporation of the City of London. He was succeeded by John Barradell in 2012. ; Chris Duffield: Duffield was born on 20 May 1952, the son of Jack and Irene Duffield.[1] He was educated at St Albans School, a then all-boys private school in Hertfordshire.[2] He graduated from Newcastle University in 1973 with a Bachelor of Arts (BA Hons).[1] ; Chris Duffield: He has served in local government for nearly 30 years and prior to joining the City of London was the Chief Executive of Bexley Council. He has also previously worked for the GLC, Redbridge and Essex.[3] ; Chris Duffield: He joined the corporation by appointment to the Town Clerk and Chief Executive position[4]  in September 2003 and has previously worked as the Chief Executive of a London Borough and as the assistant director of finance at the Greater London Council[5] ; Chris Duffield: Sample duties of the Town Clerk and Chief Executive include, but are not limited to:[7]
knowledge1: Aert van der Neer // Aert van der Neer Aert van der Neer, or Aernout or Artus (c. 16039 November 1677), was a landscape painter of the Dutch Golden Age, specializing in small night scenes lit only by moonlight and fires, and snowy winter landscapes, both often looking down a canal or river. He was a contemporary of Albert Cuyp and Meindert Hobbema, and like the latter he lived and died in comparative obscurity. Recent (2008) research by René van Dijk of the Gorinchem Regional Archive has established that Van Der Neer was born in Gorinchem. According to Arnold Houbraken, Van Der Neer lived in; Aert van der Neer // Hermitage at Saint Petersburg. In England paintings from his brush are to be found at the National Gallery and Wallace Collection. Aert van der Neer Aert van der Neer, or Aernout or Artus (c. 16039 November 1677), was a landscape painter of the Dutch Golden Age, specializing in small night scenes lit only by moonlight and fires, and snowy winter landscapes, both often looking down a canal or river. He was a contemporary of Albert Cuyp and Meindert Hobbema, and like the latter he lived and died in comparative obscurity. Recent (2008) research by René van Dijk of the Gorinchem; Aert van der Neer // by selling his landscapes, which were not highly valued. In 1659 it seemed necessary to supplement his income by keeping a wine tavern in the Kalverstraat, but two years later he went broke. He died in Amsterdam in abject poverty, and his art was so little esteemed that the pictures left by him were valued at about five shillings apiece. The earliest pictures in which Van Der Neer coupled his monogram of A.V. and D.N. interlaced with a date are a winter landscape in the Rijksmuseum at Amsterdam (dated 1639), and another in the Martins collection at Kiel (1642) immature; Aert van der Neer // in the darkness with varieties of warm brown and steel greys. Another of his fancies is to paint frozen water, and his daylight icescapes with golfers, sleighers, and fishermen are as numerous as his moonlights. But he always avoids the impression of frostiness, which is one of his great gifts. His pictures are not scarce. They are less valuable in the market than those of Cuyp or Hobbema; but, possessing a charm peculiarly their own, they are much sought after by collectors. Out of about one hundred and fifty pictures accessible to the public, the choicest selection is in the; Aert van der Neer // works both, of poor quality. Far better is the "Winter Landscape" (1643), and the "Moonlight Scene" (1644) once in the d'Arenberg collection in Brussels. In 1652 Van Der Neer witnessed the fire which consumed the old town-hall of Amsterdam. He made this accident the subject for two or three pictures, now in the galleries of Berlin and Copenhagen. Though Amsterdam appears to have been constantly Van Der Neer's domicile, his pictures tell that he was well acquainted with the canals and woods about Haarlem and Leiden, and with the reaches of the Meuse and Rhine. Dordrecht, the home of Albert [sep] knowledge2: Aert van der Neer: Aert van der Neer, or Aernout or Artus (c. 1603 – 9 November 1677),  was a landscape painter of the Dutch Golden Age, specializing in small night scenes lit only by moonlight and fires, and snowy winter landscapes, both often looking down a canal or river. He was a contemporary of Aelbert Cuyp and Meindert Hobbema, and like the latter he lived and died in comparative obscurity. ; Aert van der Neer: Van der Neer was born in Gorinchem.[1] According to Arnold Houbraken, he worked as a steward to the lords of Arkel, which would account for the absence of any pictures dating from his early years. He became an amateur painter possibly upon contact with the Amsterdam painters Rafael and Joachim Govertsz Camphuysen, whose sister Lysbeth he married in 1629. They had six children: Grietje (1629), Eglon (~1635), Cornelia (1642), Elisabeth (1645), Pieter (1648), and Alida (1650). Five were baptized in the Nieuwe Kerk, not far from Kalverstraat where he lived.  ; Aert van der Neer: The earliest pictures in which Van Der Neer coupled his monogram of A.V. and D.N. interlaced with a date are a winter landscape in the Rijksmuseum at Amsterdam (dated 1639), and another in the Martins collection at Kiel (1642) immature works both, of poor quality. Far better is the Winter Landscape (1643), and the Moonlight Scene (1644) once in the d'Arenberg collection in Brussels.[2] ; Aert van der Neer: Van Der Neer's favourite subjects were the rivers and watercourses of his native country either at sunset or after dark. His peculiar skill is shown in realizing translucence which allows objects even distant to appear in the darkness with varieties of warm brown and steel greys. Another of his fancies is to paint frozen water, and his daylight icescapes with golfers, sleighers, and fishermen are as numerous as his moonlights. But he always avoids the impression of frostiness, which is one of his great gifts.[2] ; Aert van der Neer: His pictures are not scarce. They are less valuable in the market than those of Cuyp or Hobbema; but, possessing a charm peculiarly their own, they are much sought after by collectors. Out of about one hundred and fifty pictures accessible to the public, the choicest selection is in the Hermitage at Saint Petersburg. In England paintings from his brush are to be found at the National Gallery and Wallace Collection.[2]
knowledge1: Michael Coulson (barrister) // Michael Coulson (barrister) (James) Michael Coulson (23 November 1927 – 18 June 2002) was a British barrister and judge, who also had a five-year parliamentary career. He was also an enthusiastic horse rider, huntsman and farmer, and was known at the Bar for his outstanding memory. Coulson was from an East Riding Yorkshire family in Driffield; his father was a wealthy wool merchant. He attended the independent Fulneck School in Leeds as a boarding pupil before going up to Merton College, Oxford. His National Service was spent in the East Riding Yeomanry in the Wenlock's Horse. In 1951 Coulson was; Michael Coulson (barrister) // a case establishing that a certain additional level of damages can be awarded for having been a victim of a vicious and highly organised campaign of making fun of his Irish accent. Coulson retired in 1998 at the age of 70. Michael Coulson (barrister) (James) Michael Coulson (23 November 1927 – 18 June 2002) was a British barrister and judge, who also had a five-year parliamentary career. He was also an enthusiastic horse rider, huntsman and farmer, and was known at the Bar for his outstanding memory. Coulson was from an East Riding Yorkshire family in Driffield; his father was; Michael Coulson (barrister) // Commonwealth affairs and served as a member of the executive committee of the Conservative Commonwealth Council. Losing his seat at the 1964 general election, Coulson received a promotion in his legal career as Assistant Recorder of Sheffield in 1965. He was made Deputy Chairman of the Northern Agricultural Land Tribunal in 1967, and served there for six years; from 1968 he was a Regional Chairman of Industrial Tribunals. His marriage under strain, in the 1970s Coulson moved to the East Midlands to become a full-time chairman of Industrial Tribunals. He became a member of the Belvoir Hunt and in 1977,; Michael Coulson (barrister) // Hull North, a seat the retiring Conservative MP, Austen Hudson held by a knife-edge majority of 590. After energetically campaigning, he won the seat at the 1959 general election with a majority which increased to 702. His maiden speech was regarded as outstandingly witty and was reported in "Punch". Coulson was a loyal supporter of Harold Macmillan and Sir Alec Douglas-Home, but made his contribution by introducing a successful Private Member's Bill to abolish the farthing as legal tender. In 1962 he was appointed Parliamentary Private Secretary to the Solicitor General, Sir Peter Rawlinson. He also had an interest in; Michael Coulson (barrister) // called to the Bar by the Middle Temple, and joined the North Eastern Circuit, although he also participated in London cases. At the same time he became active in the Young Conservatives and did much to improve their organisation in the north of England, including drafting their constitution. He was an active member of the Territorial Army in the Queen's Own Yorkshire Yeomanry where he received a commission as a Major. In 1955 he married Dilys Adair Jones, a marriage which also brought him a farm on the Jones estate at Bolton Percy near Tadcaster, North Yorkshire. Coulson enjoyed farming [sep] knowledge2: Michael Coulson (barrister):  (James) Michael Coulson (23 November 1927 – 18 June 2002) was a British barrister and judge, who also had a five-year parliamentary career. He was also an enthusiastic horse rider, huntsman and farmer, and was known at the Bar for his outstanding memory. ; Michael Coulson (barrister): Coulson was from an East Riding of Yorkshire family in Driffield; his father was a wealthy wool merchant. He attended the independent Fulneck School in Leeds as a boarding pupil before going up to Merton College, Oxford.[1] His national service was spent in the East Riding Yeomanry in the Wenlock's Horse. ; Michael Coulson (barrister): In 1951 Coulson was called to the Bar by the Middle Temple, and joined the North Eastern Circuit, although he also participated in London cases. At the same time he became active in the Young Conservatives and did much to improve their organisation in the north of England, including drafting their constitution. He was an active member of the Territorial Army in the Queen's Own Yorkshire Yeomanry where he received a commission as a Major. ; Michael Coulson (barrister): In 1955 he married Dilys Adair Jones, a marriage which also brought him a 400-acre (1.6 km2) farm on the Jones estate at Bolton Percy near Tadcaster, North Yorkshire.[1] Coulson enjoyed farming and trained at the Royal Agricultural College in Cirencester, but suffered an embarrassing failure while attempting to farm turkeys in a cold winter. He was forced to herd them into the farmhouse airing cupboard to keep them warm, and eventually the stockman poisoned the entire flock in a dispute with Coulson's father-in-law. Coulson also enjoyed horse riding, including fox hunting, and acted as secretary to meetings of the Bramham Moor and York and Ainsty Point to Point Race. ; Michael Coulson (barrister): Elected to Tadcaster Rural District Council, Coulson had higher ambitions and in 1958 was selected as Conservative Party candidate for Kingston upon Hull North, a seat the retiring Conservative MP, Austen Hudson held by a knife-edge majority of 590. After energetically campaigning, he won the seat at the 1959 general election with a majority which increased to 702. His maiden speech was regarded as outstandingly witty and was reported in Punch.
knowledge1: Ruth Fischer // Ruth Fischer Ruth Fischer (11 December 1895 – 13 March 1961) was an Austrian and German Communist and a co-founder of the Austrian Communist Party in 1918. She later became a staunch anti-Communist activist and, according to secret information declassified in 2010, was a key agent of the American intelligence service known as "The Pond". Fischer was born Elfriede Eisler in Leipzig in 1895, the daughter of Marie Edith Fischer and Rudolf Eisler, a professor of philosophy at Leipzig but of Austrian nationality. Her father was Jewish and her mother was Lutheran. She was the elder sister to noted film; Ruth Fischer // Berlin." In 1955, Fischer returned to Paris and published her books "Stalin and German Communism" and "Die Umformung der Sowjetgesellschaft". From eight years after the second World War, Fischer, code-named "Alice Miller", was a key agent for "The Pond". Fischer died in Paris in 1961, aged 65, from undisclosed causes. She had one child, Friedrich Gerhart Friedländer (F.G. Friedlander), born in Vienna 1917, later a mathematician, who died in the United Kingdom in 2001. The International Institute of Social History has an archive of her papers. Ruth Fischer Ruth Fischer (11 December 1895 – 13 March 1961) was an Austrian; Ruth Fischer // and concert composer Hanns Eisler and fellow communist activist Gerhart Eisler. She studied philosophy, economics and politics at University of Vienna, where her father was working. At an undisclosed time, before March 1921, she adopted her mother's maiden name as part of her writer's name, "Ruth Fischer." According to later records of the British Security Service (MI5), she spelled the name Fisher, and also used the names Maslow and Pleuchot. Fischer moved to Berlin in 1919. In 1921, she became leader of the Berlin branch of the Communist Party of Germany. The German authorities tried to forcibly repatriate her to; Ruth Fischer // Austria. Thus she married the fellow communist Gustav Golke (1889–1937, executed in the Soviet Great Purge), in order to be naturalised as a German. Heinrich Brandler was the national leader of the Communist Party of Germany. In the early months of 1923, Ruth Fischer and Arkadi Maslow urged Brandler to organize an uprising on the model provided by the Bolsheviks in 1917. Together they developed the "theory of the offensive". Fischer denounced the leadership for "making concessions to social democracy", for "opportunism" and for "ideological liquidationism and theoretical revisionism". Chris Harman, author of "The Lost Revolution" (1982) has pointed out: [sep] knowledge2: Ruth Fischer: Ruth Fischer (11 December 1895 – 13 March 1961) was an Austrian and German Communist, and a co-founder of the Austrian Communist Party (KPÖ) in 1918. Along with her partner Arkadi Maslow, she led the Communist Party of Germany (KPD) through both the May 1924 and December 1924 federal elections. After being removed from the KPD, she became involved with various anti-Stalinist left-wing groups, and would remain a staunch anti-Stalinist activist for the rest of her life. ; Ruth Fischer: Fischer was born Elfriede Eisler in Leipzig in 1895, the daughter of Marie Edith Fischer and Rudolf Eisler, a professor of philosophy at Leipzig but of Austrian nationality.[1] Her father was Jewish and her mother was Lutheran.[2][3][4] ; Ruth Fischer: She was the elder sister to noted film and concert composer Hanns Eisler and fellow communist activist Gerhart Eisler. She studied philosophy, economics and politics at University of Vienna, where her father was working.[5] ; Ruth Fischer: At an undisclosed time, before March 1921, she adopted her mother's maiden name as part of her writer's name, "Ruth Fischer."[1] According to later records of the British Security Service (MI5), she also used the names of her partner Maslow and husband Pleuchot.[6][7] ; Ruth Fischer: The Austrian Communist Party was founded on 3 November 1918 by Ruth Fischer and Paul Friedländer, a medical student she married in 1917, who later died in a Nazi prison or concentration camp.[8] She claimed in her memoir, Stalin and German Communism, that she was listed as member number one. Eight days later, she claimed, a crowd of rioters proclaimed her editor of Vienna's largest daily, the Neue Freie Presse, and she was arrested and charged with treason, but released under amnesty. She opposed the failed attempt to seize power in Austria in June 1919 instigated by the Hungarian communist Erno Bettelheim, and during the recriminations that followed, she left her husband and moved to Berlin. She visited the Comintern representative Karl Radek many times while he was interned in Moabit prison, acting as his contact with the Communist Party of Germany.[9] In a memoir of his year in Berlin, Radek commented: "She gave the impression of being a lively, if uneducated female .. I saw that she could grasp ideas easily, but that they didn't sink in very far, and she could easily fall under some other influence."[10]
knowledge1: Ameyaw Debrah // Ameyaw Debrah Ameyaw Kissi Debrah, known professionally as Ameyaw Debrah, is a Ghanaian celebrity blogger, freelance journalist, and reporter. He founded AmeyawDebrah.com, an entertainment website and blog that primarily publishes news about Ghanaian celebrities. He graduated from Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology with a bachelor's degree in Publishing. While at KNUST, he won the Best Publishing Student award in 2005. He has made significant contributions to several pan-African websites, including Jamati.com, Orijin-ent.com, and ModernGhana.com. In 2008, he joined GhanaWeb.com as the entertainment editor, and launched his own website in 2008. Through his work, Debrah has had the opportunity; Ameyaw Debrah // contributes to StarGist (an entertainment segment on Africa Magic) as a Skype correspondent. He also contributes to content on EbonyLife TV and "Glitz Africa Magazine". He is an ambassador for Malta Guinness' Africa Rising Campaign. The formulation of AmeyawDebrah.com was a result of Debrah's friend hosting and helping him get the domain. Since its inception, the website has found innovative ways to reach readers across the globe. In 2010, the website debuted its iPhone app with the help of MobBase, a web developer. In 2012, the website launched an internet-based talent hunt competition to discover and promote new musical talents; Ameyaw Debrah // to managing Coptic's interest in Ghana and Africa, Debrah is also in charge of scouting for new up and coming talents that can be signed to Rebel Musik, Coptic’s African music production branch. In an interview posted on Peace FM Online, Debrah said that he's grateful for the opportunity to work with Coptic, and for helping to advance the careers of Ghanaian/African artists. Ameyaw Debrah Media also assumed management of multiple-award-winning rapper Pappy Kojo in 2014. Ameyaw Debrah Ameyaw Kissi Debrah, known professionally as Ameyaw Debrah, is a Ghanaian celebrity blogger, freelance journalist, and reporter. He founded AmeyawDebrah.com, an entertainment; Ameyaw Debrah // in Ghana. In addition, Debrah launched the My Ghana Campaign, a platform where readers can record a one-minute video discussing relevant issues in Ghana. From September 2015, Ameyaw worked as the editor-in-chief of a newly established publication called yen.com.gh. He left the role in September 2017. Coptic, a Multi-Platinum award-winning Ghanaian music producer, appointed Debrah as his manager in Ghana and Africa. Coptic released "The Black Star Line Mixtape Vol 1" (2011), a mixtape that seeks to bring American rappers back to Africa and close to their roots. The mixtape is also Coptic's introduction to the African market. In addition; Ameyaw Debrah // industry. His writings were published for the publication's international audience. After completing his service with NSS, he became a columnist for "Star" newspaper. In 2007, he devoted his time to contributing to such pan-African websites as Jamati.com, Orijin-ent.com, and ModernGhana.com. Towards the end of 2007, he joined "Voices of Africa", a media project based in the Netherlands. During his time there, he submitted videos, photos and news from Ghana for Africanews.com. In 2008, he became the entertainment editor for GhanaWeb.com. Later that year, he fully launched his blog AmeyawDebrah.com. He left Ghanaweb in 2012 to pursue his blog full-time. He [sep] knowledge2: Ameyaw Debrah: Ameyaw Kissi Debrah, known professionally as Ameyaw Debrah, is a Ghanaian celebrity blogger, freelance journalist, and reporter.[1][2] He founded AmeyawDebrah.com, an entertainment website and blog that primarily publishes news about Ghanaian celebrities.[3] He graduated from Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology with a bachelor's degree in publishing. While at KNUST, he won the Best Publishing Student award in 2005. He has made significant contributions to several pan-African websites, including Jamati.com, Orijin-ent.com, and ModernGhana.com.[4] ; Ameyaw Debrah: In 2008, he joined GhanaWeb.com as the entertainment editor and launched his own website that same year.[5] ; Ameyaw Debrah: Debrah attended Adisadel College in Cape Coast, and became an editor for the school's magazine in 1999.[5] He graduated with a bachelor's degree in publishing from Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology (KNUST). After graduating from KNUST, Debrah completed his National Service Secretariat (NSS) programme at Ovation International Magazine in Accra. ; Ameyaw Debrah: While at Ovation, he primarily wrote about the Ghanaian entertainment industry. His writings were published for the publication's international audience. After completing his service with NSS, he became a columnist for Star newspaper. In 2007, he devoted his time contributing to the pan-African websites Jamati.com, Orijin-ent.com, and ModernGhana.com.[6] ; Ameyaw Debrah: Towards the end of 2007, he joined Voices of Africa, a media project based in the Netherlands. During his time there, he submitted videos, photos and news from Ghana for Africanews.com. In 2008, he became the entertainment editor for GhanaWeb.com. Later that year, he fully launched his blog AmeyawDebrah.com. He left Ghanaweb in 2012 to pursue his blog full-time. He contributes to StarGist, an entertainment segment on Africa Magic, as a Skype correspondent. He also contributes to content on EbonyLife TV and Glitz Africa Magazine.[7][8] He was an ambassador for Malta Guinness' Africa Rising Campaign.[9]
knowledge1: Félix María Zuloaga // Félix María Zuloaga Félix María Zuloaga Trillo (31 March 1813 – 11 February 1898) was a Mexican general and a Conservative leader in the War of Reform. In the late 1850s and early 1860s, Zuloaga served as unconstitutional interim conservative president of Mexico in opposition to the constitutional president Benito Juárez of the Liberal Party. Zuloaga was born in Álamos, Sonora. He attended primary school in Chihuahua before entering a seminary in Mexico City, which he left. He returned to Chihuahua, enlisting in the civil militia in 1834. He participated in campaigns against the Apaches and Comanches. He returned to [sep] knowledge2: Félix María Zuloaga: Seventy deputies reassembled in Querétaro and aired their protests.[11] A council of state was installed on 25 December in which skeptical voices opined that it was impossible to bring about the reconciliating that Comonfort sought.[12] On 30 December, the strategic state of Vera Cruz abandoned the Plan of Tacubaya, convincing Comonfor that his new government's position was precarious.[13] Comonfort would resign, passing the presidency over to Benito Juarez whom Comonfort had also released. He gathered his loyal troops and engaged in skirmishes with the Zuloaga government, but most of the loyal garrison eventually abandoned Comonfort, leading him to flee the capital, and eventually the nation.
knowledge1: Ahmed Mumin Warfa // Ahmed Mumin Warfa Ahmed Mumin Warfa (, ) is a Somali scientist specializing in botany, who with his colleague Mats Thulin discovered "Cyclamen somalense", the newest species to be described. Warfa was a professor at the Somali National University, where he taught biology and agriculture. He also regularly conducted research with colleagues in Somalia, where he jointly discovered several endemic species, notably in the northeastern Bari region. Professor Warfa is currently worth a total of $400 million as of 2017. Being a shareholder in The University Of Utah & Tech Giants in the US. Warfa is writing an autobiography currently; Ahmed Mumin Warfa // and "C. nevillii" (Boraginaceae), a widespread species pair in Africa and Asia. Ahmed Mumin Warfa Ahmed Mumin Warfa (, ) is a Somali scientist specializing in botany, who with his colleague Mats Thulin discovered "Cyclamen somalense", the newest species to be described. Warfa was a professor at the Somali National University, where he taught biology and agriculture. He also regularly conducted research with colleagues in Somalia, where he jointly discovered several endemic species, notably in the northeastern Bari region. Professor Warfa is currently worth a total of $400 million as of 2017. Being a shareholder in The University Of Utah; Ahmed Mumin Warfa // looking to increase his already high net worth to another 10 million US dollars. He was the 2012 candidate for president of Somalia. Warfa is rumored to have a past supercar collection of over $15 million and a current watch collection of $5 million as of late 2016. With the outbreak of the civil war in 1991 and the closure of the university, Ahmed became an important peacemaker, working as a translator for the United Nations and setting up councils for the reconciliation process in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia. His efforts brought him into conflict with several local militia leaders, and; Ahmed Mumin Warfa // was thereafter a marked man. In 1994, he narrowly escaped an assassination attempt when his car was sprayed with bullets at a checkpoint in, he took a bullet into the side of the stomach and to this day has the bullet inside. Warfa is a very wealthy and humble man. News say that his hometown home in Mogadishu is worth $30 million. His children are, Sumaya Mumin, Ismail Mumin, Daud Ahmed Mumin, Hibo Mumin, Farah Mumin, Mohamed Mumin, Aisha Mumin, Yusuf Mumin, Dahir Mumin, Halima Mumin, Fadumo Mumin, and Fadumo Mumin. Warfa subsequently left Somalia for Nairobi, Kenya, from where [sep] knowledge2: Ahmed Mumin Warfa: University of Camerino  ; Ahmed Mumin Warfa: Ahmed Mumin Warfa (Somali: Axmed Mumiin Warfa, Arabic: أحمد مومين وارفا) was a Somali scientist specializing in botany, who with his colleague Mats Thulin discovered Cyclamen somalense.[1] He served as president (rector) of the Zamzam University of Science and Technology from 2020 until his death. ; Ahmed Mumin Warfa: Warfa was a professor at the Somali National University, where he taught biology and agriculture. He also regularly conducted research with colleagues in Somalia, where he jointly discovered several endemic species, notably in the northeastern Bari region. ; Ahmed Mumin Warfa: With the outbreak of the civil war in 1991 and the closure of the university, Ahmed became a peacemaker,[clarification needed] working as a translator for the United Nations and setting up councils for the reconciliation process in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia. His efforts brought him into conflict with several local militia leaders. In 1994, he narrowly escaped an assassination attempt. ; Ahmed Mumin Warfa: His children are Sumaya Mumin, Ismail Mumin, Daud Ahmed Mumin, Hibo Mumin, Farah Mumin, Mohamed Mumin, Aisha Mumin, Yusuf Mumin, Dahir Mumin, Halima Mumin, Fadumo Mumin, and Fadumo Mumin.
knowledge1: Geraldo de Barros // Geraldo de Barros Geraldo de Barros (February 27, 1923 – April 17, 1998) was a Brazilian painter and photographer who also worked in engraving, graphic arts, and industrial design. He was a leader of the concrete art movement in Brazil, co-founding Grupo Ruptura and was known for his trailblazing work in experimental abstract photography and modernism. According to "The Guardian," De Barros was "one of the most influential Brazilian artists of the 20th century." De Barros was born in the city Chavantes, in the state of São Paulo in Brazil. When he was 16 years old, De Barros began taking; Geraldo de Barros // De Barros' daughter, Fabiana de Barros. Geraldo de Barros Geraldo de Barros (February 27, 1923 – April 17, 1998) was a Brazilian painter and photographer who also worked in engraving, graphic arts, and industrial design. He was a leader of the concrete art movement in Brazil, co-founding Grupo Ruptura and was known for his trailblazing work in experimental abstract photography and modernism. According to "The Guardian," De Barros was "one of the most influential Brazilian artists of the 20th century." De Barros was born in the city Chavantes, in the state of São Paulo in Brazil. When he was 16; Geraldo de Barros // a new era in the process of photography in Brazil. The title was influenced by Gestalt theory. In 1951, received a scholarship from the French government, and taking a one-year leave from his job at Banco do Brasil, he went to Paris to study lithography at the National Superior School of Fine Arts and engraving at Stanley William Hayter's atelier. He went on to attend the Ulm School of Design in Ulm, Germany, where he studied graphic arts with Otl Aicher and met Max Bill. At this point he abandoned his work in photography to focus on concrete art. In; Geraldo de Barros // as his base material in further exploring industrial design. Geraldo abandoned photography for over 30 years, devoting himself to focus on arts and design. In 1996, his daughter put together an exhibit of photographs from his archive that was held at Musée de l'Elysée in Lausanne, Switzerland, which led to an interest in De Barros' early work in photography. In 1996, after suffering several brain ischemia and with his motor functions totally debilitated, he resumed working in photography, and with the help of his assistant, the photographer Ana Moraes, made a last series of 250 works called "Sobras." It wasn't; Geraldo de Barros // until 1998 that De Barros' work was exhibited in the United States, at Sicardi-Sanders Gallery in Houston, Texas. De Barros died on April 17, 1998, in São Paulo at the age of 75. Following his death, the legacy of De Barros' work led to an increased coverage and academic and art history-based awareness of his importance and impact as a central figure in Brazil's recent art history. Retrospectives were held in Europe and North America. In 1999, a documentary on De Barros directed by Michel Favre called "Geraldo de Barros: Sobras em Obras" was released. The film was produced by [sep] knowledge2: Geraldo de Barros: Geraldo de Barros (February 27, 1923 – April 17, 1998) was a Brazilian painter and photographer who also worked in engraving, graphic arts, and industrial design.[1][2] He was a leader of the concrete art movement in Brazil, co-founding Grupo Ruptura and was known for his trailblazing work in experimental abstract photography and modernism.[3][4] According to The Guardian, De Barros was "one of the most influential Brazilian artists of the 20th century."[1] De Barros is best known for his Fotoformas (1946-1952), a series of photographs that used multiple exposures, rotated images, and abstracted forms to capture a phenomenological experience of Brazil's exponential urbanization in the mid-twentieth century.[5] ; Geraldo de Barros: De Barros was born in the city Chavantes, in the state of São Paulo in Brazil. ; Geraldo de Barros: When he was 16 years old, De Barros began taking pictures using a homemade camera that he built himself. At the time he was interested in experimenting with scratching and manipulating the negatives and images.[1] ; Geraldo de Barros: From 1945 to 1947, De Barros studied drawing and painting with Clóvis Graciano, Collete Pujol, and Yoshioka Takaoka, with a focus on figurative and landscape painting. He moved into the world of abstraction and studied European abstract constructivism and art of the 1920s and 1930s. He was particularly influenced by Piet Mondrian and Theo van Doesburg and the De Stijl movement. ; Geraldo de Barros: In 1946, De Barros began studying painting at the Associaçião Paulista de Belas Artes.[6]
knowledge1: Marcel Hernández // Marcel Hernández Marcel Hernández Campanioni (born 11 July 1989) is a Cuban professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Dominican club Cibao. On 10 January 2017. Hernández signed with the new champion team of Liga Dominicana de Fútbol side Barcelona Atlético. Before failing to join the Football Superleague of Kosovo side Trepça'89, he joined Liga Dominicana de Fútbol side Cibao. On 23 December 2017. Hernández joined Football Superleague of Kosovo side Trepça'89, but because of some bureaucratic problems it could not join with Trepça'89 even though it is registered by Football Federation of Kosovo as Trepça'89 player and it [sep] knowledge2: Marcel Hernández: A principios de 2018 fue traspasado al Cibao de República Dominicana.[11]​ Disputó su primer partido por competencia internacional de la Liga de Campeones de la Concacaf el 21 de febrero,[12]​ enfrentando al Guadalajara de México y donde participó 68' minutos de la derrota 0-2.[13]​ Para la Liga Dominicana, Marcel convirtió cinco goles.[14]​
knowledge1: Zewde Gebre-Sellassie // Zewde Gebre-Sellassie "Dejazmatch" Zewde Gebre-Sellassie (12 October 1926 – 15 December 2008) was a prominent nobleman, historian and former deputy Prime Minister of Ethiopia. He was born in the village of Galdu in the subdistrict of Mecca, to the north-west of Addis Ababa where his father was relegated. Zewde's father was "Dejazmatch" Gebre Selassie Baria Gabr (governor of Adwa) and his mother was "Leult" Wolete Israel Seyoum. His sister was "Leult" Ijigayehou Asfa Wossen, his grandfather was "Ras" Seyum Mengesha, and his wife was "Woizero" Alem Tsehai Araya. He received his rudimentary education in Addis Ababa under a tutor and; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie // which took place at the patriotic cemetery of the Trinity Cathedral, was attended by a huge crowd of mourners. The lawyer, "Ato" Tasoma Gebre Mariam who read out the eulogy, praised him for his contribution in making of the various Ethiopian codes of law. A week-long exhibition of his works and photos, accompanied by speeches of scholars and family members, was also held in his memory at the main campus of Addis Ababa University. Zewde Gebre-Sellassie "Dejazmatch" Zewde Gebre-Sellassie (12 October 1926 – 15 December 2008) was a prominent nobleman, historian and former deputy Prime Minister of Ethiopia. He was; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie // went to school in Jerusalem and Cairo respectively where his mother, stayed during the Fascist occupation of Ethiopia. After the liberation, he enrolled at the Haile Selassie I secondary school in Addis Ababa and subsequently joined the University of Exeter, England, where he studied English literature. This was followed by legal training at St. Anthony's College, Oxford where he became a senior member of the college from 1963 to 1971. At the conclusion of which he was called to the Bar, Lincoln's Inn, London. After a long interval, during which he held various public offices in Ethiopia, he returned to; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie // Oxford and earned his PhD in the composite field of history, politics and economics. Since his return home in the early 1950s, he held various offices, including that of deputy prime minister. Under the imperial government he held the following positions: In November 1974, the Provisional Military Administrative Council's (Derg) summary execution of high government officials of the previous regime force Zewde to go into exile. He eventually became vice-president of the United Nations Economic and Social Council, and subsequently worked for several years as advisor to the secretariat of the United Nations. Throughout his service, he received national honors [sep] knowledge2: Zewde Gebre-Sellassie: Dejazmatch Zewde Gebre-Sellassie (12 October 1926 – 15 December 2008) was a prominent nobleman, historian, and former deputy Prime Minister of Ethiopia.[1] He was born in the village of Galdu, in the subdistrict of Mecca, to the north-west of Addis Ababa where his father was relegated.[2] ; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie: Zewde's father was Dejazmatch Gebre Selassie Baria Gabr (governor of Adwa) and his mother was Leult Wolete Israel Seyoum. His sister was Leult Ijigayehou Asfa Wossen, his grandfather was Ras Seyum Mengesha, and his wife was Woizero Alem Tsehai Araya. He received his rudimentary education in Addis Ababa under a tutor, and went to school in Jerusalem and Cairo respectively where his mother stayed during the Fascist occupation of Ethiopia. After the liberation, he enrolled at the Haile Selassie I secondary school in Addis Ababa and subsequently joined the University of Exeter, England, where he studied English literature. This was followed by legal training at St. Anthony's College, Oxford where he became a senior member of the college from 1963 to 1971,[3] at the conclusion of which he was called to the Bar, Lincoln's Inn, London. After a long interval, during which he held various public offices in Ethiopia, he returned to Oxford and earned his PhD in the composite field of history, politics and economics. ; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie: After his return home in the early 1950s, he held various offices, including that of deputy prime minister. ; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie: Under the imperial government he held the following positions:[4] ; Zewde Gebre-Sellassie: In November 1974, the Provisional Military Administrative Council's (Derg) summary execution of high government officials of the previous regime forced Zewde to go into exile. He eventually became vice-president of the United Nations Economic and Social Council, and subsequently worked for several years as advisor to the secretariat of the United Nations. Throughout his service, he received national honors from at least seven sovereign states, including the Federal Republic of Germany. Together with some other prominent Ethiopians, he attempted to mediate between Ethiopia and Eritrea in 1998.
knowledge1: Mohamed Abdi Mohamed // Mohamed Abdi Mohamed Mohamed Abdi Mohamed (Gandhi) (, ) is a Somali geologist, anthropologist, historian and politician. He is the former Minister of Defense of Somalia, and the former President of Azania (Jubaland). In July 2014, Gandhi was appointed as Somalia's Ambassador to Canada. Professor Mohamed Abdi Xaji-Mohamed, nicknamed "Gandhi", is from Somalia. From childhood, Mohamed was a great student and managed to memorize the Koran at an early age. He excelled in his elementary schooling as well. He was accepted to the most prestigious high school at the time, Jamal Abdelnazer High School in the Somali capital of Mogadishu, [sep] knowledge2: Mohamed Abdi Mohamed: Professor Mohamed Abdi Xaji-Mohamed, nicknamed "Gandhi", was a candidate for Somali president 2021. He was a Somali politician, scholar, writer & double Ph.D., holder. He served as a Somali member of Parliament since 2009.  Professor Gandhi previously served as a Defense Secretary and Minister of Air and Transportation in the Somali Transitional Federal Government. ; Mohamed Abdi Mohamed: Prof. Mohamed Abdi Gandhi was an active participant in the Somali peace process and was a Lead Consultant in Mapping the Somali Civil Society. He chaired the Technical Committee at the Arta Somali Peace process in Arta, Djibouti, and Somali Peace and Reconciliation Conference held in Kenya. ; Mohamed Abdi Mohamed: Mohamed Abdi Mohamed was an accomplished author; he has published 12 books and more than 50 scientific articles in various academic journals. He has also edited three studies. ; Mohamed Abdi Mohamed: Gandhi recently announced that he would be contesting the upcoming President Election 2021 in Somalia. ; Mohamed Abdi Mohamed: Professor Gandhi was an Associate Member of the Institute of Science and Techniques of the Ancient World (ISTA), CNRS, ESA 6048 (since 1992), he was still a supervisor of the research.
knowledge1: Shaolin (humorist) // Shaolin (humorist) Francisco Jozenilton Veloso (8 May 1971 – 14 January 2016), better known by his pseudonym and stage name Shaolin, was a Brazilian cartoonist, caricaturist, humorist, comedian and media presenter. He was born in Coremas, Paraíba. He started his career at the "Teatro Municipal Severino Cabral" in Campina Grande. He also worked as a presenter on "Rádio Campina Grande" and drew cartoons for the newspapers "A Palavra", "Jornal da Paraíba" and "Revista Nordeste". His best-known shows are "Domingão do Faustão", "Show do Tom"; and most recently "Tudo è Possível" ("All is possible") with Ana Hickmann, in which he satirized; Shaolin (humorist) // following a myocardial infarction. Shaolin (humorist) Francisco Jozenilton Veloso (8 May 1971 – 14 January 2016), better known by his pseudonym and stage name Shaolin, was a Brazilian cartoonist, caricaturist, humorist, comedian and media presenter. He was born in Coremas, Paraíba. He started his career at the "Teatro Municipal Severino Cabral" in Campina Grande. He also worked as a presenter on "Rádio Campina Grande" and drew cartoons for the newspapers "A Palavra", "Jornal da Paraíba" and "Revista Nordeste". His best-known shows are "Domingão do Faustão", "Show do Tom"; and most recently "Tudo è Possível" ("All is possible") with Ana Hickmann,; Shaolin (humorist) // Brazilian celebrities, for example Leonardo, Joelma (singer in the duo Banda Calypso) and . On 19 January 2011, Shaolin was seriously injured in a traffic accident when his car collided with a truck in Campina Grande on the highway BR-230. Until May he remained in a coma in intensive care, and then left hospital to go home although he had not recovered from his injuries. In September 2012 he began communicating again using movements of his eyelid helped by a machine. In December 1994 he married Laudiceia Veloso, with whom he had two children. On 14 January 2016, Shaolin died [sep] knowledge2: Shaolin (humorist): Francisco Jozenilton Veloso (8 May 1971 – 14 January 2016), better known by his pseudonym and stage name Shaolin, was a Brazilian cartoonist, caricaturist, humorist, comedian and media presenter. ; Shaolin (humorist): He was born in Coremas, Paraíba. He started his career at the Teatro Municipal Severino Cabral in Campina Grande. He also worked as a presenter on Rádio Campina Grande[1] and drew cartoons for the newspapers A Palavra, Jornal da Paraíba and Revista Nordeste.[citation needed] ; Shaolin (humorist): His best-known shows are Domingão do Faustão,  Show do Tom; and most recently Tudo è Possível ("All is possible") with Ana Hickmann, in which he satirized Brazilian celebrities, for example Leonardo, Joelma (singer in the duo Banda Calypso) and Zezé di Camargo. ; Shaolin (humorist): On 19 January 2011, Shaolin was seriously injured in a traffic accident when his car collided with a truck in Campina Grande on the highway BR-230.[2][3] ; Shaolin (humorist): Until May he remained in a coma in intensive care,[4] and then left hospital to go home although he had not recovered from his injuries.
knowledge1: Jesse Chacón // Jesse Chacón Jesse Alonso Chacón Escamillo (born 9 November 1965) was a Venezuelan military officer, engineer and politician. Jesse Chacón graduated from the Military Academy in 1987 obtaining a degree in Military Arts and was among the best of the Class “Tomás Montilla Padrón”. In 1996 he received his degree in systems engineering from the Polytechnic University of the National Armed Forces (UNEFA) with the honors of Summa Cum Laude. He also completed a postgraduate study in Telematics at the National Institute of Telecommunications in France and the Simón Bolívar University in Caracas. He also took a basic and medium [sep] knowledge2: Jesse Chacón: En abril de 2009 es designado ministro para Ciencia, Tecnología e Industrias Intermedias; ocupa el cargo hasta el 6 de diciembre de 2009, cuando renunció luego de la detención de su hermano, Arné Chacón, por su vinculación con la investigación iniciada a raíz de la intervención de siete instituciones financieras de Venezuela.[3]​
knowledge1: Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan // Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan () (born January 1928) is a veteran Sudanese politician who was a member of parliament, a government minister and diplomat. Abdullahi was born in 1928 in the town of Barah in the state of North Kurdufan in Sudan. His family later moved and settled in Al-Ubayyid. At an early age he was sent to a Koranic school (خلوة) after which he followed the British education system in implementation by the British at the time. In 1947 he joined the newly established Hantoub Secondary School (مدرسة حنتوب الثانوية) and later went on to; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan // he became a Political Observer, Analyst, Lecturer, Author and Columnist. He lives in London but often spends time in Sudan. Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan () (born January 1928) is a veteran Sudanese politician who was a member of parliament, a government minister and diplomat. Abdullahi was born in 1928 in the town of Barah in the state of North Kurdufan in Sudan. His family later moved and settled in Al-Ubayyid. At an early age he was sent to a Koranic school (خلوة) after which he followed the British education system in implementation by the British at; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan // study at and graduate in May 1955 from the Faculty of Arts at the University College of Khartoum. After graduating he was posted as a history teacher in the town of Tonj in the south of Sudan. In August 1955 he was re-posted to as an history Teacher at Khour Taqatt Secondary School (مدرسة خور طقت الثانوية) just weeks before the first uprising of the Anyanya Movement in the South. In August 1958 he resigned his post as a teacher and moved to Khartoum where he started his business in commercial advertisements and feasibility studies. At this time he also [sep] knowledge2: Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan: Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan (Arabic: عبد الله محمد أحمد حسن; January 1928 – 22 June 2022) was a Sudanese politician who was a member of parliament, government minister and diplomat.[1] ; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan: Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan was born in 1928 in the town of Barah in the state of North Kurdufan in Sudan.  His family later moved and settled in Al-Ubayyid.  At an early age he was sent to a Koranic school (خلوة‎) after which he followed the British education system in implementation by the British at the time.  In 1947 he joined the newly established Hantoub Secondary School (مدرسة حنتوب الثانوية‎) and later went on to study at and graduate in May 1955 from the Faculty of Arts at the University College of Khartoum. ; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan: Hassan later chose to travel to the United Kingdom where he became a political observer, analyst, lecturer, author and columnist. He later lived in London but often spent time in Sudan. He died in the United Kingdom on 22 June 2022, at the age of 94.[2] ; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan: In 1954 two main political bodies were formed and later became a member of the Umma Party.  Sudan officially achieved its independence in 1956; the first prime minister was Ismail al-Azhari and later on Abdallah Khalil. The democratic government was overthrown in a coup d'état by Ibrahim Abboud in 1958.  Abdullahi joined the ranks of the opposition and in 1964 the students of the University of Khartoum, the civil servants and transport workers staged demonstrations and acts of civil disobedience that forced the government of Ibrahim Abboud to resign.   Abdullahi was elected a second time as a Member of Parliament in the second Sudanese democracy under the leadership of al-Azhari, and the government of al-Azhari was overthrown in 1969 by Gaafar Nimeiry.  Abdullahi again joined the opposition under the leadership of Sadiq al-Mahdi and was exiled to Saudi Arabia but later on moved to the United Kingdom.  He returned to Sudan in 1979 after a National Reconciliation took place between the leaders of the opposition and Nimeiry. ; Abdullahi Mohammad Ahmad Hassan: Upon his return to Sudan he was appointed in the newly established office that overlooked the affairs of the Ansar (Arabic: هيئة شئون الانصار).  In 1984 Abdullahi was among the few politicians who Nimeiry arrested and imprisoned in Kober Prison until 6 April 1985 when Nimeiry was ousted by Abdel Rahman Swar al-Dahab.  Swar Al-Dahab called upon the political parties to reform and elections took place a year later in 1986. Abdullahi was elected for the third time as a Member of Parliament representing the Umma Party.
knowledge1: Roxana Miranda // Roxana Miranda Roxana del Pilar Miranda Meneses (born 24 April 1967) is a Chilean activist and politician, candidate for President of Chile for the 2013 election, representing the Partido Igualdad. Miranda was born in Buin on 24 April 1967, to Francisco Miranda Araya, municipal worker, and Orfilia de las Mercedes Meneses Roa, seamstress. Her father died when she was six years old. She completed her secondary studies at the Liceo Comercial de San Bernardo, where she also held positions as student leader in the school's "student council". She married Iván Luis Vargas García in San Bernardo on 10 January 1994.; Roxana Miranda // capitalismo" (Overcoming capitalism), "Que el pueblo mande" (Let the people rule), "Recuperación de nuestros derechos" (recovering our rights), and "El buen vivir" (Good living). She lost the election. Roxana Miranda Roxana del Pilar Miranda Meneses (born 24 April 1967) is a Chilean activist and politician, candidate for President of Chile for the 2013 election, representing the Partido Igualdad. Miranda was born in Buin on 24 April 1967, to Francisco Miranda Araya, municipal worker, and Orfilia de las Mercedes Meneses Roa, seamstress. Her father died when she was six years old. She completed her secondary studies at the Liceo Comercial de; Roxana Miranda // the same position in the 2012 election, but obtained fewer votes than the previous municipal election (1,831 –2.77%– out of 65,944 votes). Later, she became president of the Partido Igualdad (Equality Party). She was proclaimed presidential candidate representing the party for the 2013 president election, on 20 January of that year. By the end of May of that year, it became known that the candidacies of Miranda and Marcel Claude were negotiating to "unify themselves" into only one candidacy, however, Miranda ruled out she was resigning her candidacy before the election. On 29 May 2013, Miranda gave the Electoral Service [sep] knowledge2: Roxana Miranda: Roxana del Pilar Miranda Meneses (born 24 April 1967) is a Chilean activist and politician, candidate for President of Chile for the 2013 election, representing the Partido Igualdad. ; Roxana Miranda: Miranda was born in Buin on 24 April 1967, to Francisco Miranda Araya, municipal worker, and Orfilia de las Mercedes Meneses Roa, seamstress.[1] Her father died when she was six years old.[2] She completed her secondary studies at the Liceo Comercial de San Bernardo, where she also held positions as student leader in the school's student council. ; Roxana Miranda: She married Iván Luis Vargas García in San Bernardo on 10 January 1994.[3][4] The couple have four children.[citation needed] ; Roxana Miranda: Miranda has been involved with the Asociación de Deudores Habitacionales (Association of House Debtors, ANDHA Chile), as national leader of the organization, which in recent times has been renamed ANDHA Chile a Luchar Democrático.[2] In 2009 she ran for a deputy seat representing the District No. 30; however, she lost the election, ending up in the seventh place, with 4,332 votes (2.85 per cent).[5] Miranda was a candidate for mayor of San Bernardo in 2008, as an independent, but lost the election, by only getting 3,558 votes (4.24%) out of 83,825.[6] She ran again for the same position in the 2012 election, but obtained fewer votes than the previous municipal election (1,831 –2.77%– out of 65,944 votes).[7] ; Roxana Miranda: Later, she became president of the Partido Igualdad (Equality Party). She was proclaimed presidential candidate representing the party for the 2013 president election, on 20 January of that year.[8] By the end of May of that year, it became known that the candidacies of Miranda and Marcel Claude were negotiating to "unify themselves" into only one candidacy,[9] however, Miranda ruled out she was resigning her candidacy before the election.[10] On 29 May 2013, Miranda gave the Electoral Service of Chile the requested signatures to legalize the Partido Igualdad, and as a consequence, formalizing her candidacy.[11]
knowledge1: Christian Benítez // in Brazil, due to FIFA regulations, Ecuador had to reinstate number 11 for the squad. El Nacional Santos Laguna Club América Christian Benítez Christian Rogelio Benítez Betancourt (May 1, 1986 – July 29, 2013), also known as Chucho, was an Ecuadorian footballer who played as a forward for El Jaish of the Qatar Stars League at the time of his death. He began his career with El Nacional in Ecuador and then joined Santos Laguna, with whom he won the award for Best Player of the Clausura 2008. He spent the 2009–10 season on loan to Premier League club Birmingham [sep] knowledge2: Chacho Gaytán: Gonzalo "Chacho" Gaytán is a Mexican music composer, producer, musical arranger, musical director and conductor. He is best known for being the co-founder and keyboardist of the Mexican pop band Sentidos Opuestos, along with colleague Alessandra Rosaldo. He is also the brother of actress and singer Bibi Gaytan and brother-in-law of actor and singer Eduardo Capetillo.[1][2]
knowledge1: Fernando da Costa Novaes // Fernando da Costa Novaes Fernando da Costa Novaes (April 6, 1927 – March 24, 2004) was a Brazilian ornithologist who worked on the Amazonian bird fauna. Novaes was based at the Museu Paraense Emílio Goeldi, in Belém, where he assembled the second largest bird skin and skeleton collection in Brazil. This collection has been renamed in his honor. His major contributions were in defining the Amazon region's faunal boundaries and affinities, as well as clarifying taxonomic problems. In 1954, Novaes was granted a Simon Guggenheim Memorial Foundation fellowship to study in the US, at the Museum of Vertebrate Zoology, of; Fernando da Costa Novaes // Azevedo, Mato Grosso, Brasil. Rev. Bras. Zool., São Paulo, 7(3): 351-381. NOVAES, F.C. & LIMA, M.F.C. 1991. Variação geográfica e anotações sobre morfologia e biologia de Selenidera gouldii (Piciformes: Ramphastidae). Ararajuba, Rio de Janeiro, 2: 59-63. NOVAES, F.C. 1992. Bird observations in the State of Piauí, Brazil. Goeldiana Zool., Belém, 17: 1-5. NOVAES, F. C., & LIMA, M. F. C. 1998. "Aves da grande Belém: municípios de Belém e Ananindeua, Pará". Belém, Pará: Museu Paraense Emílio Goeldi. Fernando da Costa Novaes Fernando da Costa Novaes (April 6, 1927 – March 24, 2004) was a Brazilian ornithologist who worked on the [sep] knowledge2: Fernando da Costa Novaes: Fernando da Costa Novaes (April 6, 1927 – March 24, 2004) was a Brazilian ornithologist who worked on the Amazonian bird fauna.[1] ; Fernando da Costa Novaes: In 1971 he was granted his doctorate from the State University of São Paulo at Rio Claro, with the thesis Estudo ecológico das aves em uma área de vegetação secundária do baixo rio Amazonas, Estado do Pará. ; Fernando da Costa Novaes: Novaes was based at the Museu Paraense Emílio Goeldi, in Belém, where he assembled the second largest bird skin and skeleton collection in Brazil. This collection has been renamed in his honor. His major contributions were in defining the Amazon region's faunal boundaries and affinities, as well as clarifying taxonomic problems. ; Fernando da Costa Novaes: In 1954, Novaes was granted a Simon Guggenheim Memorial Foundation fellowship to study in the US, at the Museum of Vertebrate Zoology, of the University of California at Berkeley, with the renowned ornithologist Alden H. Miller. ; Fernando da Costa Novaes: Novaes's many publications are listed in the obituaries by Oren and Silva.[2]
knowledge1: Luiz A. Rocha // Luiz A. Rocha Luiz Alvez Rocha is an Associate Curator and Follett Chair of Ichthyology at the California Academy of Sciences. He is also an adjunct professor at the University of California Santa Cruz and San Francisco State University. Rocha has obtained a PhD in Fisheries and Aquatic Sciences from the University of Florida, and a BS in Biology and Masters in Zoology from the Federal University of Paraiba in Brazil. He also conducted post-doctoral work at the Smithsonian Tropical Research Institute and the University of Hawaii. Rocha has authored one book and more than 100 scientific articles. He is [sep] knowledge2: Flávio Rocha: Em 2016, recebeu o prêmio de "empreendedor do ano", da revista IstoÉ Dinheiro, na categoria Varejo. Ex-deputado federal entre 1987 e 1995, foi um dos primeiros empresários a apoiar o impeachment da ex-presidente Dilma Rousseff e a candidatura de João Doria à Prefeitura de São Paulo.[19]
knowledge1: Santiago Vergini // Santiago Vergini Santiago Vergini (born 3 August 1988) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays for Argentine club Boca Juniors as a central defender. Born in Máximo Paz, Constitución Department, Santa Fe, Vergini was a Vélez Sársfield youth graduate, but only appeared with the reserves in the lower leagues. In June 2009 he signed a two-year deal with Paraguayan side Club Olimpia, and made his professional debut on 13 September, in a 0–2 home loss against Club Libertad. Vergini scored his first goal on 7 November, netting the second in a 2–1 home win against Sportivo Luqueño. He finished his; Santiago Vergini // Brown. Vergini made his first start on 22 February away to Arsenal. He was also an unused substitute as Sunderland lost the 2014 Football League Cup Final 3–1 to Manchester City at the Wembley Stadium on 2 March. After several games playing in central defence, manager Gus Poyet slotted Vergini into the right back position due to injuries. He helped Sunderland avoid relegation to finish 14th in the Premier League. On 7 August 2014, he re-signed for Sunderland on a season-long loan for the 2014–15 campaign, with the deal becoming a permanent two-year contract after the Black Cats avoided relegation.; Santiago Vergini // fee. Vergini earned his first cap for Argentina in a 1–2 Superclásico de las Américas loss at Brazil on 20 September 2012, after coming on as a 73rd-minute substitute for Lisandro López. He returned to the team on 14 October 2014, playing the entirety of a 7–0 friendly away win against Hong Kong and again in November 2014, starting in a 2–1 success over Croatia at the Boleyn Ground. Santiago Vergini Santiago Vergini (born 3 August 1988) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays for Argentine club Boca Juniors as a central defender. Born in Máximo Paz, Constitución Department, Santa; Santiago Vergini // first professional year with 12 appearances and one goal, as his side finished fifth. On 1 September 2010 Vergini was loaned to Lega Pro Prima Divisione team Verona, in a one-year deal. He appeared in 15 matches, scoring a goal against Bassano Virtus. On 26 July 2011 Vergini signed for Newell's Old Boys. He made his debut for the club on 2 September, playing the full 90 minutes in a 0–0 home draw against Colón de Santa Fe. An undisputed starter for "La Lepra", Vergini appeared in 32 matches and scored three goals in 2011–12 (against Olimpo, Banfield and Unión; Santiago Vergini // Santa Fe). He was again ever-present in the following campaign, as his side reached the semi-finals of 2013 Copa Libertadores. On 1 August 2013, after being linked to a possible move to FC Barcelona, Vergini joined Estudiantes de La Plata. He appeared in 17 matches, scoring one goal (against Godoy Cruz on 16 November). On 20 January 2014, Vergini secured a loan move to Premier League side Sunderland for the remainder of the 2013–14 season. He made his league debut on 8 February, replacing Fabio Borini in the first half against Hull City after the dismissal of regular centre-back Wes [sep] knowledge2: Santiago Vergini: Santiago Vergini (born 3 August 1988) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a centre-back. ; Santiago Vergini: Born in Máximo Paz, Constitución Department, Santa Fe, Vergini was a Vélez Sársfield youth graduate, but only appeared with the reserves in the lower leagues.[3] In June 2009, he signed a two-year deal with Paraguayan side Club Olimpia,[4] and made his professional debut on 13 September, in a 0–2 home loss against Club Libertad.[5] ; Santiago Vergini: Vergini scored his first goal on 7 November, netting the second in a 2–1 home win against Sportivo Luqueño.[6] He finished his first professional year with 12 appearances and one goal, as his side finished fifth. ; Santiago Vergini: On 1 September 2010, Vergini was loaned to Lega Pro Prima Divisione team Verona, in a one-year deal.[7] He appeared in 15 matches, scoring a goal against Bassano Virtus. ; Santiago Vergini: On 26 July 2011 Vergini signed for Newell's Old Boys.[8] He made his debut for the club on 2 September, playing the full 90 minutes in a 0–0 home draw against Colón de Santa Fe.[9]
knowledge1: Alexandre Hohagen // Alexandre Hohagen Alexandre Hohagen is a Brazilian executive with over 20 years of experience managing F500 companies in Latin America (Dow Chemical, HBO, UOL, Google, Facebook). Hohagen was responsible for starting 2 of the most important global technology companies in Latin America and the US Hispanic markets. He started the operations of Google in the region in 2015 and then Facebook in 2011. In 2010, Hohagen became one of the first international VPs at Google, managing operations of the company in over 8 countries in the region. Hohagen is currently the CEO of Nobox, investor and partner at Ampfy, Botmaker,; Alexandre Hohagen // Hohagen Moves to Miami Offices - Hispanicize Wire - November 7, 2013 Alexandre Hohagen Alexandre Hohagen is a Brazilian executive with over 20 years of experience managing F500 companies in Latin America (Dow Chemical, HBO, UOL, Google, Facebook). Hohagen was responsible for starting 2 of the most important global technology companies in Latin America and the US Hispanic markets. He started the operations of Google in the region in 2015 and then Facebook in 2011. In 2010, Hohagen became one of the first international VPs at Google, managing operations of the company in over 8 countries in the region. Hohagen; Alexandre Hohagen // post -graduate degrees in Business Administration from the International Institute for Management Development (IMD, Switzerland) and IIHR in the Netherlands. He began his career managing public relations for Dow Chemical Brazil In 1995, he coordinated the Human Resources department for Boehringer Ingelheim and later the ABN Amro Bank. Beginning in 2000, he held several positions at UOL (Universo Online) including the Human Resources Director, Vice-President of advertising and e-commerce, and Director of Electronic Commerce. He then became General Manager of HBO Brazil and oversaw the operations of the HBO Premium Channel and the Warner Channel. In 2008, he was nominated; Alexandre Hohagen // for Google” contest, in which children ages six to fifteen where invited to submit a remake of the Google logo inspired by the theme “Brazil’s Future”. For every entry Google received, the company planted a tree in a forest on the border of São Paulo and Paraná, Brazil. The winner of the contest received a laptop, a trip to the forest, and their design featured on Google for 24 hours. In 2011, Hohagen was hired as the first employee and Vice President of Facebook for Latin America and US Hispanics. 14. Facebook Launches Dedicated U.S. Hispanic Brand Offer - Alexandre [sep] knowledge2: Alexandre Hohagen: Alexandre Hohagen is a Brazilian executive with over 20 years of experience managing F500 companies in Latin America (Dow Chemical, HBO, UOL, Google, Facebook). ; Alexandre Hohagen: Hohagen was responsible for starting two global technology companies in Latin America and the US Hispanic markets. He started the operations of Google[1] in the region in 2005 and then Facebook[2] in 2011. In 2010, Hohagen became one of the first international VPs at Google, managing operations of the company in over 8 countries in the region. ; Alexandre Hohagen: Hohagen is currently the CEO of Nobox,[3] investor and partner at Ampfy,[4] Botmaker,[5] MarketUP,[6] investor at Hyper,[7] Busbud[8] and Everypost,[9] besides other investments VC funds and real estate in Brazil, US and Europe. Hohagen left the corporate world in 2015, after spending 5,5 years building Facebook in Latin America and US Hispanic markets. In his tenure, Hohagen was responsible to open and manage operations in more than 5 countries, with a team of 500 employees. ; Alexandre Hohagen: Hohagen has a degree in communications from Faculdades Integradas Alcantara Machado, masters in people management from the University of São Paulo and post -graduate degrees in Business Administration from the International Institute for Management Development (IMD, Switzerland) and IIHR in the Netherlands.[10] ; Alexandre Hohagen: He began his career managing public relations for Dow Chemical Brazil In 1995, he coordinated the Human Resources department for Boehringer Ingelheim and later the ABN Amro Bank.[11] Beginning in 2000,[11] he held several positions at UOL (Universo Online) including the Human Resources Director, Vice-President of advertising and e-commerce, and Director of Electronic Commerce.[12] He then became General Manager of HBO Brazil and oversaw the operations of the HBO Premium Channel and the Warner Channel.[13]
knowledge1: Ivan Toms // became director of the Students' Health and Welfare Centres Organisation in 1993, which is a non-governmental organization which runs medical clinics staffed by students in poor areas. He continued to work for non-governmental charities until 1996, when he became the Health Director in the City of Cape Town. His name is remembered in the Ivan Toms Centre for Men's Health (Cape Town) in Woodstock, Cape Town, which works in the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of sexually transmitted infections. South African President Thabo Mbeki awarded Ivan Toms with the Order of the Baobab in 2006 for his stance against Apartheid and; Ivan Toms // by hundreds of people including Archbishop Tutu, was held at St. George's Cathedral in Cape Town. Ivan Toms Ivan Toms (11 July 1952 – 25 March 2008) was a South African physician, who battled the Apartheid era government as a prominent anti-Apartheid and anti-conscription activist. At the time of his death in 2008, Toms was serving as the Director of Health for the city of Cape Town, South Africa. Ivan Toms was born in Cape Town on 11 July 1952. He received his medical degree from the University of Cape Town in 1976. Ivan attended Glenwood High School in Durban; Ivan Toms // Ivan Toms Ivan Toms (11 July 1952 – 25 March 2008) was a South African physician, who battled the Apartheid era government as a prominent anti-Apartheid and anti-conscription activist. At the time of his death in 2008, Toms was serving as the Director of Health for the city of Cape Town, South Africa. Ivan Toms was born in Cape Town on 11 July 1952. He received his medical degree from the University of Cape Town in 1976. Ivan attended Glenwood High School in Durban from 1965 to 1969. He was deputy Head Prefect in 1969. A eulogy to Ivan can; Ivan Toms // his public service for South Africans in need. Ivan Toms died unexpectedly of meningitis at his home in Mowbray on 25 March 2008, at the age of 54. He was honored by prominent South African political figures, including Archbishop Emeritus Desmond Tutu and the Mayor of Cape Town, Helen Zille. Archbishop Tutu described himself as "devastated" by the news of Toms' death and paid tribute to him saying, "I thank God that I knew him. Knowing him makes (one) feel proud. This is a prime example of someone who had ubuntu. He was utterly selfless." His funeral, which was attended; Ivan Toms // be found at: https://web.archive.org/web/20160916112842/http://www.glenwoodhighschool.co.za/node/3493. Toms was drafted into the national service in the South African Defence Force (SADF), as a non-combatant doctor in 1978. He opposed the goals of the SADF, but refused to leave South Africa. He spent much of his six months as a doctor in Namibia, which was then known as South West Africa and was controlled by South Africa. Once he returned to Cape Town, Toms set up a medical clinic in the squatter settlement of Crossroads, which is located about 15 km outside of the city in the Cape Flats area. He was the only [sep] knowledge2: Ivan Toms: Ivan Peter Toms (11 July 1952 – 25 March 2008) was a South African physician, who battled the Apartheid era government as a prominent anti-Apartheid and anti-conscription activist.[1] He opposed conscription by the South African Defence Force, and was a co-founder of the End Conscription Campaign. He ran a clinic in the Crossroads shanty town where he was the only physician for 60,000 people. He went on a hunger strike in 1985 after the government decided to bulldoze the settlement. Toms was also involved with gay rights activism in South Africa and was a founding member of the Lesbians and Gays Against Oppression. At the time of his death in 2008, Toms was serving as the Director of Health for the city of Cape Town, South Africa.[2] ; Ivan Toms: Ivan Toms was born in Johannesburg on 11 July 1952.[3] He attended Glenwood High School in Durban from 1965 to 1969. He was Deputy Head Prefect and captain of the second rugby team.[4] Toms was a medical student at the University of Cape Town (UCT). He participated in a demonstration against the Bantu Education system, during which he was beaten by police with batons and received a broken nose.[4] He received his MB ChB from UCT in 1976. He interned at Kimberley Hospital.[5][4] Later, Toms earned a BA in theology.[3] ; Ivan Toms: Toms was drafted into the national service in the South African Defence Force (SADF), as a non-combatant doctor in 1978.[2][5] He opposed the goals of the SADF, but refused to leave South Africa.[5] He spent much of his six months as a doctor in Namibia, which was then known as South West Africa and was controlled by South Africa.[2] ; Ivan Toms: Once he returned to Cape Town, Toms was asked by the South African Christian Leadership Assembly to set up a medical clinic in the squatter settlement of Crossroads,[3] which is located about 15 km outside of the city in the Cape Flats area.[2] He was the only doctor who served the Crossroads' population of approximately 60,000 people.[5] In September 1983, Toms witnessed a three-week-long confrontation between the Crossroads community and the South African police and security forces, who were trying to tear down "illegal" buildings in the settlement.[5] After witnessing the violence and brutality of the raid, Toms vowed never to serve in the SADF again, even in a non-combatant capacity.[2] He went public with his opinions on what he had witnessed and became a founding member of the End Conscription Campaign (ECC) in 1983.[5] Toms' co-founders of the ECC included other prominent anti-conscription activists including Nan Cross.[6] ; Ivan Toms: As part of the "Fast for a Just Peace" campaign,[3] Toms went on a three-week-long hunger strike in February 1985 to protest the government's decision to bulldoze the Crossroads shanty town.[1][2][5] The destruction of Crossroads resulted in violence and the deaths of several people as residents tried to resist the destruction.[5] Toms commented during his hunger strike that, "As a Christian, I am obliged to say no, to say never again will I put on that SADF uniform."[1]
knowledge1: Abdul Halik Hudu // Abdul Halik Hudu Abdul Halik Hudu (born 19 March 2000), commonly known as Rooney, is a Ghanaian footballer who plays as a midfielder for Hammarby IF in Allsvenskan. Halik Hudu started his professional football career with Inter Allies in the Ghana Premier League, getting promoted from their feeder club Accra Youth FC. During his debut season in 2016, Halik Hudu played 19 games and soon established himself as a starter. At the end of the season, he was crowned "Most Promising Player of the Year" in the Ghanaian Premier League, and also got voted as the "Fans' Player of the; Abdul Halik Hudu // Season" at Inter Allies. In early 2017, Halik Hudu went on a two month-trial with Hammarby IF, appearing in friendlies for the Swedish club. He returned to Inter Allies before the start of the season in March, and went on to win the prize as "Man of the Match" in three league games throughout the year. In total, he made 37 competitive appearances for Inter Allies across two full seasons, scoring twice. In early January 2018, Halik Hudu returned to Hammarby IF for a second trial. On 26 March, a week after his 18th birthday, Halik Hudu completed a permanent; Abdul Halik Hudu // transfer to the Allsvenskan club and signed a three and a half year-contract. On 23 August, Halik Hudu scored in his competitive debut for Hammarby, a 3–0 away win against Carlstad United in the Svenska Cupen. Halik Hudu has been capped by the Ghana national under-17 team. He also captained his country in an 8–0 victory against Namibia in March 2016. In 2018, Halik Hudu was called up to the Ghana national under-20 team ahead of a Africa Cup of Nations qualifier against Algeria on 11 May. Abdul Halik Hudu Abdul Halik Hudu (born 19 March 2000), commonly known as [sep] knowledge2: Abdul Halik Hudu: Abdul Halik Hudu (born 19 March 2000), commonly known as Rooney,[2] is a Ghanaian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Swedish club AFC Eskilstuna. ; Abdul Halik Hudu: Halik Hudu started his professional football career with Inter Allies in the Ghana Premier League, getting promoted from their feeder club Accra Youth FC.[3] ; Abdul Halik Hudu: During his debut season in 2016, Halik Hudu played 19 games and soon established himself as a starter.[4] At the end of the season, he was crowned "Most Promising Player of the Year" in the Ghanaian Premier League,[5] and also got voted as the "Fans' Player of the Season" at Inter Allies.[6] ; Abdul Halik Hudu: In early 2017, Halik Hudu went on a two month-trial with Hammarby IF, appearing in friendlies for the Swedish club.[2] He returned to Inter Allies before the start of the season in March,[7] and went on to win the prize as "Man of the Match" in three league games throughout the year.[8] In total, he made 37 competitive appearances for Inter Allies across two full seasons,[9] scoring twice.[4][10] ; Abdul Halik Hudu: In early January 2018, Halik Hudu returned to Hammarby IF for a second trial.[11] On 26 March, a week after his 18th birthday, Halik Hudu completed a permanent transfer to the Allsvenskan club and signed a three and a half year-contract.[12][13] On 23 August, Halik Hudu scored in his competitive debut for Hammarby, a 3–0 away win against Carlstad United in the Svenska Cupen.[14]
knowledge1: José Hernández Delgadillo // José Hernández Delgadillo José Hernández Delgadillo (1927 – December 26, 2000) was a Mexican painter and muralist best known for carrying on the traditions of Mexican muralism in the latter 20th century. He created over 160 murals in Mexico and the United States, with most of his work, especially after 1970, containing strong political messages. Many of these messages have been unpopular in Mexico, which has made the artist somewhat obscure and some of his murals have been destroyed. Hernández Delgadillo’s main recognition is membership in the Salón de la Plástica Mexicana honor society, but his home state has made [sep] knowledge2: José Hernández Delgadillo: His main recognition was membership in the Salón de la Plástica Mexicana (SPM), an honor society for Mexican artists, serving on its executive committee in the 1970s.[2] After his death, the SPM established the José Hernández Delgadillo Prize in categories such as painting, print making, sculpture, photography and art objects and held a retrospective of his work in 2009.[4][6] The Efrén Rebolledo Cultural Center in Pachuca has a gallery named after him.[7] However, his work has become obscure, mostly because they espouse unpopular and radical political ideas.[1][3] There was no biography written about him until 2008, when Hidalgo writer Guillermo Furlong Franco published a book called Muros de Insomnio, about the life and work of the artist. It was sponsored by the Fondo Estatal para la Cultura y las Artes of Hidalgo.[3][8]
knowledge1: David Oyite-Ojok // David Oyite-Ojok David Oyite Ojok (15 April 1940 – 2 December 1983) was a Ugandan military commander who held one of the leadership positions in the coalition between Uganda National Liberation Army and Tanzania People's Defence Force which removed strongman Idi Amin in 1979 and, until his death in a helicopter crash, served as the national army chief of staff with the rank of major general. Although there are few documented details regarding David Oyite Ojok's early years, he was initially noted in his late twenties as a junior army officer serving during the 1966–71 period of President Milton Obote's; David Oyite-Ojok // the '..newly created post of Assistant Military Secretary in the Ministry of Defence,' serving as a Major. His duties included '..planning, all policy matters, and control of Establishment.' When Idi Amin overthrew Obote in 1971, Oyite Ojok was amongst the military personnel who fled to neighbouring Tanzania and, eight years later, in the wake of Amin's 1979 invasion of the country, assumed a key role in the grouping of military exiles who, with the backing of Tanzanian troops, led the counteroffensive which resulted in the overthrow of Amin. Oyite Ojok became a member, along with Yoweri Museveni, Paulo Muwanga and; David Oyite-Ojok // participated in the overthrow of Idi Amin. Obote, nevertheless, appointed a junior Langi officer, Smith Apon-Achak. This further alienated the Acholi officers who overthrew Obote's government two years later. David Oyite-Ojok David Oyite Ojok (15 April 1940 – 2 December 1983) was a Ugandan military commander who held one of the leadership positions in the coalition between Uganda National Liberation Army and Tanzania People's Defence Force which removed strongman Idi Amin in 1979 and, until his death in a helicopter crash, served as the national army chief of staff with the rank of major general. Although there are few documented; David Oyite-Ojok // first government. He joined the Uganda Army in 1963. He was transferred from 1st Battalion to 4th Battalion on 7 February 1966 at Shaban Opolot's orders. However at the end of February 1966 he was transferred to Army Headquarters, to the important position of Deputy Assistant Adjutant and Quartermaster General (DAA&QMG). In September 1970, while Idi Amin was out of the country serving as the Ugandan representative at the funeral of President Nasser of Egypt, Obote appointed a new Chief of Defence Staff (Brigadier Suleman Hussein). In addition, Oyite-Ojok, described by Omara-Otunnu as 'Obote's principal military confidant' was appointed to [sep] knowledge2: David Oyite-Ojok: David Oyite Ojok (15 April 1940 – 2 December 1983) was a Ugandan military commander who held one of the leadership positions in the coalition between Uganda National Liberation Army and Tanzania People's Defence Force which removed strongman Idi Amin in 1979 and, until his death in a helicopter crash, served as the national army chief of staff with the rank of major general. ; David Oyite-Ojok: An ethnic Lango,[3] Oyite Ojok was born in Lira District[2] on 15 April 1940. Although there are few documented details regarding David Oyite Ojok's early years, he was initially noted in his late twenties as a junior army officer serving during the 1966–71 period of President Milton Obote's first government. ; David Oyite-Ojok: Oyite-Ojok joined the Uganda Army in 1963.[2][4] By 1965, he was teaching at a training course for officer cadets in Jinja.[2] He was transferred from 1st Battalion to 4th Battalion on 7 February 1966 at Shaban Opolot's orders.[4] However at the end of February 1966 he was transferred to Army Headquarters and made Deputy Assistant Adjutant and Quartermaster General. In September 1970, while Idi Amin was out of the country serving as the Ugandan representative at the funeral of President Nasser of Egypt, Obote appointed a new Chief of Defence Staff (Brigadier Suleman Hussein).[5] Oyite-Ojok was one of President Obote's most important followers in the military,[6] and was described by Omara-Otunnu as 'Obote's principal military confidant' was appointed to the '..newly created post of Assistant Military Secretary in the Ministry of Defence,' serving as a Major. His duties included '..planning, all policy matters, and control of Establishment.'[7] At some point, he was sent for training to Great Britain.[8] ; David Oyite-Ojok: It is not just a victory for us alone, but for the rest of Uganda. With our blood, we have served notice on other oppressive dictatorships in Africa that there comes a time when African people will rise and fight for their right to liberty. ; David Oyite-Ojok: —Oyite-Ojok on the overthrow of Amin, 1979[9]
knowledge1: Stephanus Swart // Stephanus Swart Stephanus Andries Johannes Swart (1890 – 6 May 1927) was a South African farmer and one of the first spree killers who killed at least 8 people and wounded 3 others in Charlestown, South Africa on 6 May 1927, before killing himself. Police pursued Swart one day after he fired a shot at his neighbour, Mr Lourens, on 3 May 1927 for no apparent reason. At some point Swart summoned his attorney and ordered him to write down Swart's 28-page suicide statement after setting his own car on fire and hiking 10 miles to his farm house. Swart; Stephanus Swart // on the location of the murder of Fanny Knight reads "Hierdie Gedenkteken is opgerigt ter gedagtenis aan Fannie Knight -nee Eksteen- en C. Roets, wat deaur S. Swart geskiet was op die 6de Mei 1927, terwyl hy van die polisie ontsnap het to Potters Hill" (This memorial is erected in memory of Fanny Knight -nee Eksteen- and G. Roets. Who were shot by S. Swart on 6 May 1927 while he had escaped from the police at Potter's Hill). Stephanus Swart Stephanus Andries Johannes Swart (1890 – 6 May 1927) was a South African farmer and one of the first; Stephanus Swart // was confronted by a police constable in the early hours of 6 May at his home with a warrant for Swart to give himself up. Swart replied that he simply wanted an oak coffin and wanted it to be zinc-lined, and he would shoot anyone who came through the road running near his property after 6:00 pm. The alarmed constable immediately started to gather a posse of a dozen policemen led by inspector Ashman to arrest Swart the next day. Swart killed five officers (including Ashman) and wounded another near his farm, taking the inspector's revolver and horse. He went; Stephanus Swart // to a nearby house to tell his neighbour that he intended to go into Charlestown to kill three more people before going to Volkrust to kill himself. The neighbour departed to warn police of Swart's coming. His neighbour, Swanepoel, when nearing Mount Prospect, was approached by a black person with a note from Swart saying he would return to kill him after he completed his "mission". By now Swart had killed two more people on the road, who had testified against him in a previous crime (incest) for which he had been convicted and sentenced to several months in prison.; Stephanus Swart // Swart arrived in Charlestown across from the train station at a house where his estranged wife was living. Swart gunned down his wife, then rode his stolen horse to the edge of town and fired at a passing automobile, wounding the driver and a passenger. At this point police all over the district had been notified and had formed a posse of local farmers along with police to hunt him down. Swart was spotted diving into a ditch after an officer fired at him. A final shot was heard, as Swart killed himself with the stolen Webley Revolver. A memorial [sep] knowledge2: Stephanus Swart: Stephanus Andries Johannes Swart (21 July 1888 – 6 May 1927) was a South African farmer and one of the first spree killers who killed at least 8 people and wounded 3 others in Charlestown, South Africa on 6 May 1927, before killing himself.[1] [2][3] ; Stephanus Swart: Stephanus Swart was born on 21 July 1888 in Ladismith in Cape Colony. He arrived in Charlestown in 1920. Little is known about him before this time. It is thought he had been a Horse Trader.[3] ; Stephanus Swart: On 1 December 1921 Swart aged 33 married a wealthy 64-year-old widow, Anna Eksteen. She owned the farm Potters hill west of Charlestown which Swart farmed and made productive again.[3] ; Stephanus Swart: A few years later Swart seriously assaulted Willie Knight, the husband of his stepdaughter Fannie Knight. They lived on a nearby farm Shorstcliff. Swart served 18 months imprisonment for the assault with a horse stirrup. [3] ; Stephanus Swart: After his time in prison Swart had been in a love affair with his 14-year-old niece Sarie Alberts and he brought her to come and live with him on his farm. His estranged wife Annie had left the farm to live with relatives in Potchefstroom and Charlestown.[3]
knowledge1: Amr Shabana // Amr Shabana Amr Shabana () (born 20 July 1979 in Cairo) is a former professional squash player from Egypt. He won the World Open in 2003, 2005, 2007 and 2009, and reached the World No. 1 ranking in 2006. He represented the winning Egyptian team in the 1999 Men's World Team Squash Championships held in Cairo and the 2009 Men's World Team Squash Championships held in Denmark. Shabana's accomplishments in professional squash lead many to regard him as one of the greatest players of all time. The talented left-hander from Cairo first showed his promise when he was the runner-up; Amr Shabana // 1 was ended by his countryman Karim Darwish. In 2014, Shabana became the oldest professional to win a World Series title by defeating Grégory Gaultier in the finals of Tournament of Champions. On the 27th of August 2015, Shabana announced his retirement from competitive professional squash. Listed below. All Results for Amr Shabana in PSA World's Tour tournament Note: (ret) = retired, min = minutes, h = hours "To prevent confusion and double counting, information in this table is updated only once a tournament or the player's participation in the tournament has concluded." Note: NA = Not Available Amr Shabana; Amr Shabana // (to compatriot Ahmed Faizy) in the British Under-14 Open in January 1993. Four years later he reached the final of the British Under-19 Open, where he again lost to Faizy. A PSA member since 1995, Amr claimed his first Tour title with the help of Bryan "Griffin" Knight in July 1999, winning the Puebla Open in Mexico. Seven days later he grabbed his second, the Mexico Open, again by beating Australia's Craig Rowland in the final. Amr Shabana crowned a remarkable year in 2003 when, as ninth seed, he forced his way through a star-studded field in the World Open; Amr Shabana // the St Louis Open crown in the United States. The next event saw the in-form Egyptian brush aside all opposition in the Hungarian Open in Budapest, winning his third title in as many weeks after beating Grégory Gaultier in the final. But the World Open in Hong Kong confirmed his renaissance beyond doubt. Seeded five, Amr crushed fourth seed Lee Beachill in the quarters, Peter Nicol in the semis, and, in his third successive straight games victory, powered past David Palmer 11–6 11–7 11–8 in the final to become the first player since the heyday of the Khans to win; Amr Shabana // the World Open title for the second time. The new year brought continuing rewards for Shabana with victories in the Canadian Classic in January, followed by the Tournament of Champions in New York in March, and the Bermuda PSA Masters in April – bringing his PSA Tour title tally to 12, and then in April 2006, Shabana became the first Egyptian player to reach the world number 1 ranking. In 2007, Shabana was crowned world champion for the third time in five years at the World Open in Bermuda and later in January 2009, Shabana's 33-month reign as World No. [sep] knowledge2: Amr Shabana: Amr Shabana (Arabic: عمرو شبانة; born 20 July 1979 in Cairo) is a former professional squash player from Egypt. He won the World Open in 2003, 2005, 2007 and 2009, and reached the World No. 1 ranking in 2006. ; Amr Shabana: He represented the winning Egyptian team in the 1999 Men's World Team Squash Championships held in Cairo and the 2009 Men's World Team Squash Championships held in Denmark. Shabana's accomplishments in professional squash lead many to regard him as one of the greatest players of all time. ; Amr Shabana: A PSA member since 1995, Amr claimed his first Tour title with the help of Bryan "Griffin" Knight in July 1999, winning the Puebla Open in Mexico. Seven days later he grabbed his second, the Mexico Open, again by beating Australia's Craig Rowland in the final. ; Amr Shabana: Amr Shabana crowned a remarkable year in 2003 when, as ninth seed, he forced his way through a star-studded field in the World Open in Pakistan. He dispatched title-holder David Palmer, the third seed, in five games in the third round. He then went on to take out Palmer's Australian teammate Anthony Ricketts in the last eight. After defeating Karim Darwish (the Egyptian No 1) in a four-game semi-final, Shabana clinched the historic title by beating Thierry Lincou in the final 15–14, 9–15, 15–11, 15–7, to become Egypt's first winner of the sport's premier title. ; Amr Shabana: But after a disappointing following year, in which his only final appearance was in the British Open Squash Championship in England, losing to David Palmer in four games 10–11 (4–6), 11–7, 11–10 (3–1), 11–7, Shabana stormed back to the top of his game in 2005. Over a short period, he acquired a new coach, Ahmed Tahir; a new manager, the former Egyptian international Omar Elborolossy; and a wife, Nadjla. "All I have to worry about now is playing my matches – everything else is looked after for me now", said Shabana.[1] And the effect was plain to see as a week after winning the Heliopolis Open in his home town Cairo, the seventh-seeded Shabana beat David Palmer  and James Willstrop, before defeating Anthony Ricketts in the final to claim the St Louis Open crown in the United States.
knowledge1: Vanda Pignato // Vanda Pignato Vanda Guiomar Pignato (born February 16, 1963) is a Brazilian-born Salvadoran lawyer, human rights activist, politician, women's rights activist, and former First Lady of El Salvador from 2009 until 2014. Pignato became First Lady of El Salvador on June 1, 2009, the same day that her husband, President Mauricio Funes appointed her as the country's Secretary of Social Inclusion from 2009 to 2014. The appointment made Pignato the first sitting First Lady in El Salvador's history to hold a political position. Funes's successor, President Salvador Sánchez Cerén, reappointed Pignato as Secretary of Social Inclusion when he took office; Vanda Pignato // for her arrest since he believes Mrs. Pignato poses a flight risk. Vanda Pignato Vanda Guiomar Pignato (born February 16, 1963) is a Brazilian-born Salvadoran lawyer, human rights activist, politician, women's rights activist, and former First Lady of El Salvador from 2009 until 2014. Pignato became First Lady of El Salvador on June 1, 2009, the same day that her husband, President Mauricio Funes appointed her as the country's Secretary of Social Inclusion from 2009 to 2014. The appointment made Pignato the first sitting First Lady in El Salvador's history to hold a political position. Funes's successor, President Salvador Sánchez [sep] knowledge2: Vanda Pignato: Vanda Guiomar Pignato (born 15 February 1961) is a Brazilian-born Salvadoran lawyer, human rights activist, politician, women's rights activist, and former First Lady of El Salvador from 2009 until 2014. Pignato became First Lady of El Salvador on 1 June 2009, the same day that her husband, President Mauricio Funes appointed her as the country's Secretary of Social Inclusion from 2009 to 2014. The appointment made Pignato the first sitting First Lady in El Salvador's history to hold a political position. Funes's successor, President Salvador Sánchez Cerén, reappointed Pignato as Secretary of Social Inclusion when he took office in June 2014. ; Vanda Pignato: Pignato was born in São Paulo, Brazil. She became an activist in the Workers' Party (PT) and served as an adviser to Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva, who would later serve as President of Brazil from 2003 to 2011. She reportedly remains close to both Lula da Silva and his successor, President Dilma Rousseff. ; Vanda Pignato: She began documenting human rights abuses in El Salvador during the Salvadoran Civil War, which was ended by the Chapultepec Peace Accords.[1] Pignato moved from Brazil to El Salvador in 1992, where she represented the Workers' Party in Central America.[2] She also became the Director of the Center for Brazilian Studies at the Embassy of Brazil in San Salvador in 1992.[1] She later married Mauricio Funes, a Salvadoran journalist and FMLN politician, with whom she had one son, Gabriel. ; Vanda Pignato: Pignato has promoted women's rights and gender equality during her tenures as First Lady and Secretary of Social Inclusion.[2] Pignato's Department of Social Inclusion oversees issues related to human rights and family affairs in El Salvador.[2] Pignato was first appointed as Secretary on 1 June 2009, by her husband, President Mauricio Funes.[3] She was reappointed to the post in 2014 by President Salvador Sánchez Cerén, who asked her to stay on as his Secretary of Social Inclusion.[3][4] ; Vanda Pignato: Pignato simultaneously served as the Salvadorian Institute for Women Development. Additionally, she was appointed as the first President Salvadorian National Council for the Youth.[1]
knowledge1: Lou Briel // Lou Briel Lou Briel (born October 19, 1964, Santurce, Puerto Rico) is a Puerto Rican singer, composer, comedian, producer, pianist, and host, among other things. Lou Briel started his career at a very young age as a singer, director and member of a pop musical group called "Anexo 3". Together they recorded four albums, the first two produced by Alfred D. Herger, and reached popularity with songs such as: "Oh, Cuanto te Amo" ("Oh, how much I love you"), "Contigo" (With you), & "Por eso estoy Preso", (That's why I'm a prisoner), among others. For two consecutive years, "Anexo 3"; Lou Briel // presently featured as an MC and singer in the "Puerto Rican Folkloric Revue", (designed for tourists), and including native folkloric music and dance, for English-speaking audiences. This spectacle is staged throughout the island and it also has a Spanish version. This performance is produced by "Entertainment Concepts Inc". As of 2008, Briel is featured, along Yoyo Boing, Shorty Castro, Dreuxilla Divine, Jose Miguel Class, and Francisco Rosa, at the "La Receta de la Abuela Tour" (Grandma's Recipe Tour), throughout the island of P.R., sponsored by MCS Classic Care, and produced & MC'd, by Luisito Vigoreaux. Lou Briel Lou Briel (born; Lou Briel // Grupo Marfil (band) (from Costa Rica). Lou Briel has also created works for television programs and telenovelas, as opening & title songs. among many other variety shows, mini series, TV station promotions, movie soundtracks, television commercials, and so forth. In 1985, Lou Briel starred, hosted and was the script-writer of a television musical-comedy show in Telemundo called "En Broma y en Serio", ("Joking & Seriously") together with Puerto Rican comedian and singer Dagmar, produced by Paquito Cordero. He also produced, wrote and hosted a children's television series called: Teatrimundo, broadcast by Telemundo alongside Sandra Zaiter. He characterized himself as "Lubrielito",; Lou Briel // a 7 year old child, whose best pal and "puppy love" was "Dagmarita", a fellow child role, portrayed by Dagmar. In 1991, he played the leading role as an actor-comedian in the TV sitcom called "Cara o Cruz", ("Heads or Tails"), broadcast by WAPA-TV, opposite singer & actor, "Edgardo Huertas", ("whose first daughter Ambar, is Lou Briel's goddaughter"). This show was written and directed by Spanish comedian, Joaquín Monserrat ("Pacheco"). As an actor-comedian, Lou Briel has starred in various Zarzuelas & Operettas in Centro de Bellas Artes in Santurce. Some of them are: He has also interpreted Sancho Panza from; Lou Briel // video clip "Dios Alumbra a Puerto Rico" ("God Enlightens Puerto Rico"). It was the first time that 40 Latin pop and christian gospel music celebrities joined for a laudable purpose, the eradication of child abuse. In 2006, Lou Briel carried out a nine-month engagement at the "Show Time" nightspot, with his club act, "Bohemia Live". As of 2007, Lou Briel has been performing in "Solo para Hombres.. y para Mujeres tambien", in New York City, Puerto Rico, and Santo Domingo, as a singer, pianist, and musical director alongside, Nancy Alvarez, host of "¿Quién Tiene La Razón?", broadcast by Telefutura. Briel's [sep] knowledge2: Lou Briel: Lou Briel (born October 19 Santurce, Puerto Rico) is a Puerto Rican singer, composer, comedian, record producer, pianist, and host, among other things.[1] ; Lou Briel: Lou Briel started his career at a very young age as a singer, director and member of a pop musical group called Anexo 3. Together they recorded four albums, the first two produced by Alfred D. Herger, and reached popularity with songs such as: "Oh, Cuanto te Amo" ("Oh, how much I love you"), "Contigo" (With you), & "Por eso estoy Preso", (That's why I'm a prisoner), among others. For two consecutive years, Anexo 3 won the second prize of the local OTI Festival in Telemundo with the songs: "Tengo Vida" ("I'm full of life"), and "Más Allá de mis Canciones" ("Beyond my songs"). Both songs were written by Lou Briel and his group partner, Julio Ortiz-Teissonniere.  They produced and hosted a television variety show titled Contigo... Anexo 3, (With you... Anexo 3) broadcast by Rikavisión (Channel 7).  See:Anexo 3 ; Lou Briel: Anexo 3 broke up and Lou Briel started working on his solo career. In 1984, Briel reached popularity with the song:  "Yo puedo"[2] ("I Can"), a song written specially for Puerto Rico's Diva Yolandita an inspirational song about perseverance. He toured throughout Latin American countries such as Mexico, Colombia, Peru, Santo Domingo, and also toured the United States. He also reached one of the first places, in the song festival called "Festi-Buga" in Buga, Colombia, with this song. ; Lou Briel: Lou Briel has represented Puerto Rico four times at the International OTI Festival as a composer: ; Lou Briel: See Lou Briel video singing "Represento": [1]
knowledge1: Diego Suarez (garden designer) // Diego Suarez (garden designer) Diego Suarez (1888 in Bogotá, Colombia – 14 September 1974 in New York City, New York) was a garden designer known for his work at James Deering's Villa Vizcaya in Miami, Florida. He also served as a press attaché and minister counselor for Chile in Washington, D.C. from 1948 until 1952 and counselor to the Colombian delegation to the United Nations. A son of Roberto Suarez, a Colombian diplomat and historian, and his Italian wife, the former Maria Costa (1870–1949), Suarez and his sisters, Camelia and Lucia, and brother, Roberto, spent their childhood in their mother's; Diego Suarez (garden designer) // baroque taste, contrasts of sun and shade, and many slight changes of level to enliven the essentially flat site. In 1937, in Monterey, California, Diego Suarez married Evelyn Marshall Field (1888–1979), the first wife of department-store heir Marshall Field III and a sister-in-law of the future Brooke Astor. By that marriage, Suarez had three stepchildren: Barbara, Bettine, and Marshall Field IV. He is interred at Woodlawn Cemetery in The Bronx, New York City. Diego Suarez (garden designer) Diego Suarez (1888 in Bogotá, Colombia – 14 September 1974 in New York City, New York) was a garden designer known for his; Diego Suarez (garden designer) // garden ideals that were being revived in the late nineteenth century by designers such as Achille Duchêne. Through Acton, whose wife was an American heiress, Suarez was introduced into the Anglo-American community of Florence, where he began to lay out gardens, notably, he remembered years later, one at Villa Schifanoia for Lewis Einstein and another for Charles Loeser, one of the first collectors of Paul Cézanne. In May 1914, when James Deering, the International Harvester heir, and his travelling companion and long-term artistic advisor Paul Chalfin, a decorative painter and interior decorator who once worked for Elsie de Wolfe, were; Diego Suarez (garden designer) // native country after the death of their father. Suarez took courses as an architectural designer at the Accademia delle Belle Arti in Florence. There the young man was taken up by Arthur Acton of the well-known English expatriate family, who was engaged in restoring the gardens of the Acton villa outside Florence, Villa La Pietra, where the formal terraced plan had been swept away in the early nineteenth century by the fashion for English landscape gardens in the naturalistic manner. Acton passed to Suarez, who went four or five days a week to the villa, some of the formal Renaissance; Diego Suarez (garden designer) // side axes that offer glimpses of the lake beyond their ends. The main garden element, which had been purchased on one of Deering and Chalfin's trips before the villa was laid out, was the fountain from the main piazza of Bassano di Sutri, near Viterbo, which Deering and Chalfin were convinced was by Vignola. Rather than displaying it in the central axis, Suarez sited it at the end of its own cross-axis, not to be discovered until the visitor had penetrated deep into the plan. The design was richly patterned on the ground, with "parterres en broderie" in the French [sep] knowledge2: Diego Suarez (garden designer): Diego Suarez  (1888 in Bogotá, Colombia – 14 September 1974 in New York City, New York)[1] was a garden designer best known for his work at James Deering's Villa Vizcaya in Miami, Florida.[2] He also served as a press attaché and minister-counselor for Chile in Washington, D.C. from 1948 until 1952 and counselor to the Colombian delegation to the United Nations. ; Diego Suarez (garden designer): A son of Roberto Suarez, a Colombian diplomat and historian, and his Italian wife, the former Maria Costa (1870–1949), Suarez and his sisters, Camelia and Lucia, and brother, Roberto, spent their childhood in their mother's native country after the death of their father. Suarez took courses as an architectural designer at the Accademia delle Belle Arti in Florence. There the young man was taken up by Arthur Acton of the well-known English expatriate family, who was engaged in restoring the gardens of Villa La Pietra, Acton's villa outside Florence, where the formal terraced plan had been swept away in the early nineteenth century by the fashion for English landscape gardens in the naturalistic manner. Acton passed to Suarez, who went four or five days a week to the villa, some of the formal Renaissance garden ideals that were being revived in the late nineteenth century by designers such as Achille Duchêne. ; Diego Suarez (garden designer): Through Acton, whose wife was an American heiress, Suarez was introduced into the Anglo-American community of Florence, where he began to lay out gardens, notably, he remembered years later, one at Villa Schifanoia for Lewis Einstein and another for Charles Loeser, one of the first collectors of Paul Cézanne. ; Diego Suarez (garden designer): In May 1914, when James Deering, the International Harvester heir, and his travelling companion and long-term artistic advisor Paul Chalfin, a decorative painter and interior decorator who once worked for Elsie de Wolfe, were lent one of the smaller casinas at La Pietra, Acton commissioned Suarez to take them around and show them some villas they would not otherwise have had access to. Among the Anglo-Americans in Florence was Lady Sybil Cutting,[3] who had the Villa Medici in Fiesole, and who suggested that Suarez accompany her to America. ; Diego Suarez (garden designer): The outbreak of war marooned Suarez in New York, where he met a likable young Italian with whom he roomed cheaply in Brooklyn[4] but kept up his connections. Thus it was lunching at the Ritz with Mrs. Albert Gallatin that he ran into Deering and Chalfin, and through the old connection he was invited to design the garden for Villa Vizcaya.
knowledge1: A Town Where You Live // to Kōchi. Unable to sustain their relationship, the two break up; two years later, Haruto is transferred back to Tokyo and reunites with Yuzuki, who had been waiting for his return. The two are married shortly after. Haruto is a high school student in Shōbara, Hiroshima. He has an earnest personality and chastises others when they are in the wrong. Because he often cooks for his family and friends, Haruto is skilled at cooking and considers it as a possible career. His older sister lives in Tokyo in the dorm room next to the Akitsukis from "Suzuka". He has a [sep] knowledge2: Haruto Takahashi: Haruto Takahashi (髙橋 遥人, Takahashi, Haruto, born November 7, 1995) is a Japanese professional baseball pitcher who currently plays for the Hanshin Tigers of Nippon Professional Baseball.[1] ; Haruto Takahashi: Influenced by his older brother, Haruto played softball at an early age, then played little league baseball for the Nishina Shonen Baseball Club in his hometown in Shizuoka.[2]。 ; Haruto Takahashi: He entered Tokoha University Tachibana Integrated High, where doubling as a pitcher and right fielder, he helped his school win the national junior high softball tournament.[3] In his 2nd year in high school, he pitched as a reliever in the 2012 Summer Koshien, but his team lost in the 1st round.[4] The next year, despite declaring his intentions to become a professional baseball player after graduation, none of the teams drafted him, so he entered Asia University in Tokyo instead.[5] He became a regular starter as his team participated in the Tohto University Baseball League, and even made it all the way to the 2016 Japan National Collegiate Baseball Championship Tournament where he was awarded Best 8.[6] He finished with 5 wins, 7 losses and a 3.57 ERA in 31 league appearances.[7] ; Haruto Takahashi: He was the Tiger's 2nd round pick during the 2017 NPB draft.[3] He signed a 70 million yen contract with Hanshin, for an estimated annual salary of 12 million yen.[8] He was assigned jersey number 29.[5] ; Haruto Takahashi: The coaches made him undergo strength training during spring camp to improve his weak pitching arm as they've seen its potential.[9] Shortly into the season, he was given the opportunity to debut as the starter for the April 11 match against the Carps. He pitched seven shutout innings and allowed only 2 hits and no runs, earning him his first career win. This victory made him the first Hanshin rookie pitcher in 6 decades to win his debut match in Koshien Stadium (since Minoru Murayama won against the Swallows in April 1959).[10] Despite his starts having wider rest intervals than the team's other starting pitchers due to his weak arm, his continuous starts took its toll in June, prompting the coaches to stop him from pitching any further before his arm gets worse. His season ended with a 2–3 win loss record, and a 3.63 ERA.[11] He received a 1 million raise in November, bringing his total annual salary to 13 million yen. [12]
knowledge1: Karni Liddell // Karni Liddell Karni Liddell (born 1 March 1979) is a Paralympic swimming competitor from Australia. Liddell was born on 1 March 1979 in Rockhampton, Queensland. She is a radio presenter for 4BC. At twelve months old, Liddell was diagnosed with muscular dystrophy. She attended school in Rockhampton, Queensland. Her parents were told by doctors that she would never be able to walk and that she would not live past her teens. As a youngster, from the age of two to sixteen, she rode horses as part of physical therapy. Liddell, alongside Branka Pupovac, Hamish MacDonald and Charmaine Dalli, was one; Karni Liddell // She won a bronze medal at the 2000 Sydney Games in the Women's 4x50 m Freestyle 20 pts event. Liddell is part of a mentoring programme for Australian Paralympians. She is an ambassador for Riding for the Disabled. In 2010, she tried to raise for Muscular Dystrophy Queensland to research muscular dystrophy. At the 2011 North Queensland Athletics Carnival for Students with Disabilities (The Challenge Games), Liddell gave one of the opening speeches to kick off the event. Karni Liddell Karni Liddell (born 1 March 1979) is a Paralympic swimming competitor from Australia. Liddell was born on 1 March 1979; Karni Liddell // of eighteen Australian Paralympians photographed by Emma Hack for a nude calendar. Liddell's photography depicts her wearing sunglasses and a covered in body paint made to look like a polka-dotted bikini. In 2008, she was one of several Queenslanders to have their images painted by Ludmila Clark to have the picture go on display at the Customs House in Rockhampton. By the age of 14, Liddell had broken a swimming world record. She has competed at two Paralympic Games: 1996 and 2000. She won a bronze medal at the 1996 Atlanta Games in the Women's 50 m Freestyle S6 event. [sep] knowledge2: Karni Liddell: Karni Liddell (born 1 March 1979) is a Paralympic swimming competitor from Australia. ; Karni Liddell: Liddell was born on 1 March 1979 in Rockhampton, Queensland.[1] [2]  She is a radio presenter for 4BC.[3] ; Karni Liddell: At twelve months old, Liddell was diagnosed with Spinal Muscular Atrophy a rare neuromuscular wasting disease. Karni was misdiagnosed for 40 years and has recently been diagnosed with Congenital Titinopathy which is also a neuromuscular wasting disease.[4] Karni was diagnosed via a whole genome sequencing test performed in Europe in 2019 and Karni and her family had been looking for a diagnosis for the past 12 years and this has been a lengthy, traumatic and expensive process for her family. Her parents were told by doctors that she would never be able to walk and that she would not live past her teens. ; Karni Liddell: Liddell, alongside Branka Pupovac, Hamish MacDonald and Charmaine Dalli, was one of eighteen Australian Paralympians photographed  by Emma Hack for a nude calendar.[5] Liddell's photography depicts her wearing sunglasses and a covered in body paint made to look like a polka-dotted bikini.[5] In 2008, she was one of several Queenslanders to have their images painted by Ludmila Clark to have the picture go on display at the Customs House in Rockhampton.[6] ; Karni Liddell: By the age of 14, Liddell had broken a swimming world record.[7] She has competed at two Paralympic Games: 1996 and 2000.[8] She won medals at both Games and was the Australian Swimming Team Captain at the Sydney 2000 Paralympic Games.
knowledge1: Douglas Wood (engineer) // Douglas Wood (engineer) Douglas Wood (born 30 June 1941), is an Australian construction engineer who had worked with the American military, and was held hostage in Iraq for six weeks between May and June 2005, before being rescued. Wood was born in Whyalla, South Australia in 1941. He moved to Geelong where he attended the Geelong College and the Gordon Institute of TAFE, graduating as a mechanical engineer. In 1973 he left Australia to work in the United States, moving to Alamo, California, where he lived with his American wife and daughter, and employed by construction company Bechtel Corporation for; Douglas Wood (engineer) // for nuclear power production in Australia, Wood stated that he would happily live next door to a nuclear power plant, and would assist in development of an Australian nuclear energy industry. However, he stated his concerns that Australia's engineers and industrial suppliers are under-qualified to build a local plant. Douglas Wood (engineer) Douglas Wood (born 30 June 1941), is an Australian construction engineer who had worked with the American military, and was held hostage in Iraq for six weeks between May and June 2005, before being rescued. Wood was born in Whyalla, South Australia in 1941. He moved to Geelong [sep] knowledge2: Douglas Wood (engineer): Douglas Wood (30 June 1941 – 31 December 2019) was an Australian construction engineer who had worked with the American military, and was held hostage in Iraq for six weeks between May and June 2005, before being rescued.[1] ; Douglas Wood (engineer): Wood was born in Whyalla, South Australia in 1941. He moved to Geelong where he attended the Geelong College and the Gordon Institute of TAFE, graduating as a mechanical engineer. In 1973 he left Australia to work in the United States,[2] moving to Alamo, California, where he lived with his American wife and daughter, and employed by construction company Bechtel Corporation for 25 years. He later[when?] formed his own company and moved from his Californian home to Iraq.[3][4] His work involved project management, and building nuclear plants; including the Palo Verde Nuclear Generating station in Arizona.[5] ; Douglas Wood (engineer): In 2005, Wood was kidnapped along with two Iraqi business associates and forced into a cell, while at a home in Baghdad, Iraq where he was organising a business deal.[6] On 2 May 2005, Arabic television network al-Jazeera broadcast footage of Wood being held by armed captors, identified as the Shura Council of the Mujahideen of Iraq.[7] Wood is shown pleading for his life, and urges Australia and the United States to withdraw their troops from the country. ; Douglas Wood (engineer): On 4 May 2005, Al-Jazeera broadcast an appeal by Foreign Minister Alexander Downer and Wood's brothers for the insurgents to free Wood.[8] By 7 May 2005, new footage emerged showing Wood, having sustained injuries, with machine guns held to his head. In the video, he read aloud an order to withdraw troops from Iraq within 72 hours. In response, Imam Sheik Alhilali flew to Iraq on 9 May 2005 to attempt to assist with Wood's release.[8] It is during this time that Alhilali claims to have seen Wood, confirming that he was still alive.[9] ; Douglas Wood (engineer): In response to suggestions that the Australian government or Wood's family might make payments to the kidnappers, Prime Minister John Howard stated that Australia will neither pull troops out, nor pay any ransom that might be demanded. Downer added that any concession to demands could encourage further kidnappings.[3] Wood's family conducted a public relations campaign in both Australia and Iraq, to convince Mr Wood's captors that he was a family man who sympathises with their cause.[10] On 10 May 2005, the deadline given by the kidnappers expired at 5pm Australian time, however there was no indication that Wood had been killed.[8]
knowledge1: Aditya Kalyanpur // Aditya Kalyanpur Aditya Kalyanpur (born 21 July 1978) is an Indian Tabla player. He belongs to the Punjab gharana. Aditya Kalyanpur was born in Mumbai, India. He began his studies at the age of five under the guidance of Tabla Maestro late Alla Rakha Khan and his son Zakir Hussain. He is a commerce graduate from Mithibai College. Aditya Kalyanpur was initially known for his debut performance with his guru Zakir Hussain for the Wah Taj! commercial when he was 11 years old. His style consists of bold and clear execution of syllables, pinpoint precision in rhythm coupled with a; Aditya Kalyanpur // colossal repertoire of compositions and improvisational technique. He has accompanied artists including Shivkumar Sharma, Amjad Ali Khan, Prabha Atre, N. Rajam, Sultan Khan, Shahid Parvez, Vishwa Mohan Bhatt, Satish Vyas, Shujaat Khan, and Nayan Ghosh. He has also accompanied Carnatic performers including T. N. Krishnan, N. Ramani, U. Shrinivas, and Lalgudi Krishnan. Kalyanput went on tour with A.R. Rahman for his JAI HO World Tour! He can be heard on Katy Perry's "Legendary Lovers" from her album "Prism," has recorded with Keith Richards of The Rolling Stones. Aditya Kalyanpur Aditya Kalyanpur (born 21 July 1978) is an Indian Tabla player. [sep] knowledge2: Aditya Kalyanpur: Aditya Kalyanpur (born 21 July 1978) is an Indian Tabla Maestro.[1][2][3] He belongs to the Punjab gharana.[4] ; Aditya Kalyanpur: Aditya Kalyanpur was born in Mumbai, India. ; Aditya Kalyanpur: He began his studies at the age of five under the guidance of Tabla Maestro late Alla Rakha Khan and his son Zakir Hussain.[5] ; Aditya Kalyanpur: Aditya Kalyanpur was initially known for his debut performance with his guru Zakir Hussain for the Wah Taj! commercial when he was 11 years old.[8] ; Aditya Kalyanpur: His style consists of bold and clear execution of syllables, pinpoint precision in rhythm coupled with a colossal repertoire of compositions and improvisational technique.[citation needed]
knowledge1: D. B. Nihalsinghe // D. B. Nihalsinghe Dr. Diongu Badaturuge Nihalsingha (known as "D. B. Nihalsinghe", 27 May 1939 – 21 April 2016) was an accomplished Sri Lankan film director, cinematographer, editor, producer. He was noted for his versatility : as a film cameraman, as a film director, as a (pioneering) television director, as an administrator, and as a teacher. He is a pioneer who introduced professional television production to Sri Lanka (in 1979), commencing with Sri Lanka's and South Asia's first color teledrama, "Dimuthu Muthu". He was the founding Chief Executive Officer and General Manager of Sri Lanka's National Film Corporation and a; D. B. Nihalsinghe // Failure in Sri Lanka", by Trafford Publishing, British Columbia, Canada. D. B. Nihalsinghe Dr. Diongu Badaturuge Nihalsingha (known as "D. B. Nihalsinghe", 27 May 1939 – 21 April 2016) was an accomplished Sri Lankan film director, cinematographer, editor, producer. He was noted for his versatility : as a film cameraman, as a film director, as a (pioneering) television director, as an administrator, and as a teacher. He is a pioneer who introduced professional television production to Sri Lanka (in 1979), commencing with Sri Lanka's and South Asia's first color teledrama, "Dimuthu Muthu". He was the founding Chief Executive Officer and; D. B. Nihalsinghe // the "NEWS of the DAY" weekly global newsreel. Returning to Sri Lanka, he began a career in film encompassing documentary and feature films beginning as cameraman and editor of "Sath Samudura", (Nuwan Nayanajith in Nihalsingha:The Pioneering Third Eye) as a milestone in Sri Lankan cinema. His fluid camera work in this film, originating from his newsreel experience, was widely recognised as fresh in an industry where massive Mitchell Indian-style immobile camera work was the norm. At the age of 29, Nihalsingha became the youngest person to hold the post of Director of the Ceylon Government Film Unit, succeeding George Wicremasinghe; D. B. Nihalsinghe // at the 16th New Delhi International Film Festival. Two more of his films, "Ridei Nimanaya" and "Kelimadala" are also noteworthy, with the latter winning the highest number of national awards at that time. Nihalsinghe was an accomplished student leader as Head Prefect and as Sergeant of the cadet platoon at Ananda college and originally hoped to join the army. By the time he left school he had become more interested in film. As a present for completing the SSC examination, Nihalsinghe's father veteran journalist D.B Dhanapala presented him with a 16mm Bolex cine camera. Nihalsingha entered the University of Ceylon; D. B. Nihalsinghe // distinguished alumni of the then University of Ceylon, Peradeniya (presently University of Peradeniya). He is the only Sri Lankan who has been conferred Life Fellowship of the Society of Motion picture and Television Engineers USA, the oldest film organisation in the world, established in 1915. The Society determines film and television standards worldwide. His best known work is "Welikathara", Sri Lanka's first and South Asia's second Cinemascaope film, included as among the ten best Sri Lankan films awarded the Sri Lanka Presidential award, while "Maldeniye Simiyon" is also noted for the award for its actress Anoja Weerasinghe as Best Actress [sep] knowledge2: D. B. Nihalsinghe: Dr. Diongu Badaturuge Nihalsingha (known as D. B. Nihalsinghe, 27 May 1939 – 21 April 2016)[1] was an accomplished Sri Lankan film director, cinematographer, editor, producer. He was noted for his versatility : as a film cameraman, as a film director, as a (pioneering) television director, as an administrator, and as a teacher. He is  a pioneer who introduced professional television production to Sri Lanka (in 1979), commencing with Sri Lanka's and South Asia's first color teledrama, Dimuthu Muthu. He was the founding Chief Executive Officer  and General Manager of Sri Lanka's National Film Corporation and a distinguished alumni of the then University of Ceylon, Peradeniya (presently University of Peradeniya). He is the only Sri Lankan who has been conferred Life Fellowship of the Society of Motion picture and Television Engineers USA, the oldest film organisation in the world, established in 1915. The Society determines film and television standards worldwide.[citation needed] ; D. B. Nihalsinghe: His best known work is Welikathara, Sri Lanka's first  and South Asia's second Cinemascope film, included as among the ten best Sri Lankan films awarded the Sri Lanka Presidential award, while Maldeniye Simiyon is also  noted for the award for its actress Anoja Weerasinghe as Best Actress  at the 16th New Delhi International Film Festival.  Two more of his films, Ridei Nimanaya and Kelimadala are also noteworthy, with the latter winning the highest number of national awards at that time. He is also notable for being the pioneer with first ever degree for TV and cinema degree from the University of Kelaniya.[2] ; D. B. Nihalsinghe: Nihalsinghe was an accomplished student leader as Head Prefect and as Sergeant of the cadet platoon at Ananda college and originally hoped to join the army. By the time he left school he had become more interested in film.  As a present for completing the SSC examination, Nihalsinghe's father veteran journalist D.B Dhanapala presented him with a 16mm Bolex cine camera.[3] ; D. B. Nihalsinghe: Nihalsingha entered the University of Ceylon at Peradeniya and read for a degree in Economics. While at the University he did the camera work for the first documentary to be made by University students, "Niyanada Rata", directed by a student K.K.L de Silva. ; D. B. Nihalsinghe: After leaving the University, Nihalsingha got an opportunity to enter the film field when a friend of his father offered him a job as a cameraman for the Australian Broadcasting Corporation in Colombo which he took. In 1965 he was offered a post with Hearst Metrotone News on the weekly newsreel, Metro News for the Military Assistance Command in Vietnam.[3]
knowledge1: Yehuda Lindell // Yehuda Lindell Yehuda Lindell (born 24 February 1971) is a professor in the Department of Computer Science at Bar-Ilan University where he conducts research on cryptography with a focus on the theory of secure computation and its application in practice. Lindell received a BSc and Msc degree in computer science from Bar-Ilan University. He then obtained a PhD in computer science from the Weizmann Institute of Science in 2002. Lindell received a Raviv Fellowship and spent two years at IBM's cryptography research group at the T.J. Watson Research Center. In 2004, he returned to Israel to take up an academic; Yehuda Lindell // mining algorithms; in particular the ID3 algorithm. More recent work has focused on the first proof of security for the basic Yao protocol, on the design of two-party protocols which are secure against active adversaries, and the introduction of the concept of covert adversarial models. Lindell is also the author of a textbook with Jonathan Katz on modern cryptography. This textbook is utilized in many universities around the world as a standard reference work. Yehuda Lindell Yehuda Lindell (born 24 February 1971) is a professor in the Department of Computer Science at Bar-Ilan University where he conducts research on cryptography [sep] knowledge2: Yehuda Lindell: Yehuda Lindell (born 24 February 1971) is a professor in the Department of Computer Science at Bar-Ilan University where he conducts research on cryptography with a focus on the theory of secure computation and its application in practice. Lindell currently leads the cryptography team at Coinbase. ; Yehuda Lindell: Lindell received a BSc and Msc degree in computer science from Bar-Ilan University. He then obtained a PhD in computer science from the Weizmann Institute of Science in 2002. Lindell received a Raviv Fellowship[1] and spent two years at IBM's cryptography research group at the T.J. Watson Research Center. In 2004, he returned to Israel to take up an academic position at Bar-Ilan University.[2] Lindell's work on secure computation was recognized by the award of an ERC starting grant in 2009 and an ERC consolidators grant in 2014.[3] Lindell was appointed as an IACR Fellow in 2021.[4] ; Yehuda Lindell: Lindell worked from 2004 to 2014 as a permanent cryptographic consultant to Safenet, formally Aladdin. He co-founded the company Unbound Security, and served as its Chief Scientist from 2014 to 2018. In early 2019, he took over the role of CEO of Unbound Security, taking leave from Bar-Ilan University. In January 2022, Unbound Security was acquired by Coinbase, and Lindell now leads their cryptography team. ; Yehuda Lindell: Lindell's  main contributions are in the field of secure multiparty computation. Lindell's research initially focused on theoretical feasibility, and in particular in the area of protocol composition. Lindell has carried out extensive research on efficient two-party secure computation via the Yao garbled circuit construction, and on efficient multiparty computation for the multiparty honest-majority setting based on Secret sharing. His most cited work is a joint paper with Benny Pinkas on privacy preserving data mining[5] in which the use of secure computation was proposed for performing data mining algorithms; in particular the ID3 algorithm. Lindell provided the first proof of security for the basic Yao protocol,[6] and the first proof of security for the BGW protocol.[7] Lindell has also worked on the design of two-party protocols which are secure against active adversaries,[8][9][10][11] the introduction of the concept of covert adversarial models,[12] and much more. Lindell won the IBM Pat Goldberg Memorial Best Paper Award in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering and Math in 2006 for his work on the composition of Authenticated Byzantine Agreement,[13] and the best paper award at ACM CCS 2016 for work on high-throughput MPC protocols.[14] In 2021, Lindell published a review article on secure multiparty computation in the Communications of the ACM.[15] ; Yehuda Lindell: Lindell is also the co-inventor of the AES-GCM-SIV mode of operation for symmetric encryption, standardized by the IETF Crypto Forum Research Group in RFC 8452.[16] He received the best paper award at ACM CCS 2017 for the research paper behind AES-GCM-SIV.[17]
knowledge1: Ted Mack (politician) // Ted Mack (politician) Edward Carrington Mack (20 December 1933 – 6 November 2018) was an Australian politician. He is the only person ever to have been elected and re-elected as an independent to local, state, and federal government in Australia, and is often referred to as the "father of the independents". He chose to serve for only two terms in both the New South Wales state seat of North Shore and the federal seat of North Sydney to avoid receiving a parliamentary pension. Mack was born in the Sydney suburb of Paddington and educated at Sydney Boys High School, graduating; Ted Mack (politician) // March 2017 by Elizabeth Farrelly, a "Sydney Morning Herald" columnist and architecture academic at the University of New South Wales. Mack died after a stroke on 6 November 2018. Ted Mack (politician) Edward Carrington Mack (20 December 1933 – 6 November 2018) was an Australian politician. He is the only person ever to have been elected and re-elected as an independent to local, state, and federal government in Australia, and is often referred to as the "father of the independents". He chose to serve for only two terms in both the New South Wales state seat of North Shore and; Ted Mack (politician) // Australia. After his retirement from federal parliament he was an occasional media political commentator, and was chosen to deliver the 2013 Sir Henry Parkes Oration entitled "The State of the Federation" at . Ahead of the 2015 North Sydney by-election held on 5 December, Mack re-entered the federal political arena by announcing he would steer the campaign of independent candidate Stephen Ruff, which had the support of some disgruntled Liberal supporters. A senior orthopaedic surgeon at Royal North Shore Hospital, Ruff was a late entrant into the 2015 New South Wales state election for the North Shore state seat, and; Ted Mack (politician) // in 1950. He completed national service in the RAAF in 1951–1952 at Albury. At the University of New South Wales, he trained as an architect, graduating with a Bachelor of Architecture in 1958. Following graduation, he married Wendy, with whom he has two daughters, one of whom is consumer activist Jenni Mack, and two sons. He and his wife travelled to Europe and worked in London 1958–61. Returning to Australia he worked as an architect mainly on hospitals and public housing until 1974 and in private practice until 1980. He supervised the construction of the Port Kembla district hospital (1961–63); Ted Mack (politician) // foregone conclusion that it would revert to the Liberals once Mack retired. As expected, Hockey easily won the seat, and later went on to serve in various ministerial roles including Treasurer. Mack was elected as an independent Republican delegate to the Australian Constitutional Convention. He opposed the model favoured by the Australian Republican Movement. Along with Clem Jones, he was a director of Real Republic and was appointed to the official ten person "no" committee for the 1999 referendum. In 1997, Ted Mack was elected as one of the one hundred "National Living Treasures", organised by the National Trust of [sep] knowledge2: Ted Mack (politician): Edward Carrington Mack (20 December 1933 – 6 November 2018) was an architect and Australian politician. He is the only person ever to have been elected and re-elected as an independent to local, state, and federal government in Australia, and is often referred to as the "father of the independents". He chose to serve for only two terms in both the New South Wales state seat of North Shore and the federal seat of North Sydney to avoid receiving a parliamentary pension.[1] ; Ted Mack (politician): Mack was born in the Sydney suburb of Paddington and educated at Sydney Boys High School, finishing in 1950. He completed national service in the RAAF in 1951–1952 at Albury.[2] At the University of New South Wales, he trained as an architect, graduating with a Bachelor of Architecture in 1958. Following graduation, he married Wendy, with whom he has two daughters, one of whom is consumer activist Jenni Mack,[3] and two sons. He and his wife travelled to Europe and worked in London 1958–61. Returning to Australia he worked as an architect mainly on hospitals and public housing until 1974 and in private practice until 1980.[4] He supervised the construction of the Port Kembla district hospital (1961–63) and was later appointed as Architect-in-charge of Hospital design and construction at the NSW Public Works Department in 1966. In 1972 he was appointed as Assistant Chief Architect at the NSW Housing Commission. In 1975, he was appointed to a committee chaired by H.C. Coombs (former Governor of both the Commonwealth and Reserve Banks) to monitor and advise on Aboriginal housing in remote areas of Australia. Between 1974 and 1980, Mack was also employed as a part-time tutor at UNSW in architecture. ; Ted Mack (politician): Mack began to take an interest in politics in 1970 after the North Sydney Municipal Council approved construction of a 17-storey office block near his residence. He subsequently ran for election to the council in 1974 and was successful. He was re-elected as an Alderman in 1977 and 1980. He was elected by the council as mayor in 1980, 1981, and 1982. He was re-elected by popular vote in 1983 and 1987.[4] He began his term as mayor by selling the mayoral Mercedes-Benz car to help buy community buses. For the next eight years he used his 1951 Citroen as the mayoral car at no cost to the ratepayers. He relinquished his private architectural practice on becoming mayor. ; Ted Mack (politician): In 1981, he decided to run as an independent for the newly created New South Wales Legislative Assembly seat of North Shore, based in North Sydney.[4] On paper, it was a comfortably safe Liberal seat; the North Shore has been the power base for the Liberals (and their predecessors) in Sydney for over a century. Mack nominated for North Shore after noticing that on its boundaries, the newly created North Shore was virtually coextensive with the Municipality of North Sydney.  Mack considered that being both mayor and state member for electorates that covered nearly identical boundaries would make both positions more effective. His opponent was state opposition leader Bruce McDonald. After the first count on election night he pushed the Labor candidate into third place, and ultimately defeated McDonald on Labor preferences—one of the few times a major-party leader has been defeated at any level in Australia. Mack did not accept a mayoral allowance for the next seven years. He was returned by comfortable margins in 1984 and 1988, the latter election coming as the Coalition won government in a landslide. Shortly after his 1988 victory, he abruptly retired from all of his offices.[5] He did so just two days short of serving seven years in parliament, which would have made him eligible for parliamentary pension entitlements in excess of $1,000,000. Mack had always taken a dim view of what he perceived as the excesses of public political office, and decided to retire in protest. His retirement from both local and state government resulted in three by-elections for North Sydney ward alderman, North Sydney mayor and state member for North Shore. All three people he recommended for these positions were elected. ; Ted Mack (politician): Despite living nearby, for a time, he refused to travel across the Sydney Harbour Bridge or through the Sydney Harbour Tunnel in protest at the secret contract and awarding of all tolls to Kumagai Transfield for 30 years.
knowledge1: Phillip Gillespie // he replaced Damien Mealey on the 2015–16 National Umpire Panel. Gillespie was born 23 October 1975 in Frankston, an outer-suburb of Melbourne in Victoria, Australia. A supporter of the Richmond Tigers in the Australian Football League, his day job is a police officer in the Victorian Police Force. Phillip Gillespie Phillip J. Gillespie (born 23 October 1975) is an Australian cricket umpire. A member of the Australian National Umpire Panel, Gillespie has umpired 6 Women's One Day International cricket matches, 10 first-class matches, 9 List A matches, 10 Twenty20 matches and 9 Women's Twenty20 matches . He began his career; Phillip Gillespie // Phillip Gillespie Phillip J. Gillespie (born 23 October 1975) is an Australian cricket umpire. A member of the Australian National Umpire Panel, Gillespie has umpired 6 Women's One Day International cricket matches, 10 first-class matches, 9 List A matches, 10 Twenty20 matches and 9 Women's Twenty20 matches . He began his career in umpiring after suffering injuries to his Achilles tendon, jaw and knee whilst playing for Rowville Cricket Club in Melbourne. Wanting to stay in the game, he began umpiring in the Victorian Premier Cricket competition in 2009. Making his List A debut in the fixture between the England [sep] knowledge2: Phillip Gillespie: Phillip J. Gillespie (born 23 October 1975) is an Australian cricket umpire and former cricketer. A member of the Australian National Umpire Panel, Gillespie has umpired 6 Women's One Day International cricket matches,[1] 10 first-class matches,[2] 9 List A matches,[3] 10 Twenty20 matches[4] and 9 Women's Twenty20 matches[5] as of March 2017[update]. ; Phillip Gillespie: He began his career in umpiring after suffering injuries to his Achilles tendon, jaw and knee whilst playing for Rowville Cricket Club in Melbourne. Wanting to stay in the game, he began umpiring in the Victorian Premier Cricket competition in 2009.[6] ; Phillip Gillespie: Making his List A debut in the fixture between the England Lions and Victoria during the February 2013 tour, he has officiated in eight Matador BBQs One-Day Cup matches.[3] Gillespie has also umpired two Women's National Cricket League matches including the semi-final between New South Wales and Victoria in 2015.[7] ; Phillip Gillespie: Gillespie umpired six matches during the 2015–16 Big Bash League season and a further four the following season.[4] In women's Twenty20, he umpired his first match during the 2012–13 Australian Women's Twenty20 Cup. He has also stood in Women's Big Bash League matches including the second semi final of the 2016–17 season where the Sydney Sixers defeated the Hobart Hurricanes at the Gabba.[5][8] ; Phillip Gillespie: He made his first-class debut on 15 February 2015 in the Sheffield Shield in the round 7 match between New South Wales and Victoria at Robertson Oval in Wagga Wagga where Doug Bollinger took a hat-trick from his end.[9] He has since umpired a further nine matches with the latest the clash between Tasmania and Queensland at Bellerive Oval in March 2017.[2]
knowledge1: Shigeru Fukudome // Shigeru Fukudome Born in Yonago, Tottori prefecture, Fukudome graduated from the 40th class of the Imperial Japanese Naval Academy in 1913, ranked 8 out of 144 cadets. As a midshipman, he served on the cruisers "Soya" and "Izumo" and battleship "Satsuma". After his promotion to ensign, he was assigned to the battleship "Hizen" and cruiser "Kashima". After attending torpedo school and naval artillery school, he served on the patrol boat "Manshu", followed by the cruiser "Chitose" and was promoted to lieutenant in 1918. After attending navigational training, he was assigned as chief navigator to the destroyer "Sakura", and cruiser "Niitaka".; Shigeru Fukudome // was interrogated in Tokyo between December 9–12, 1945 by Rear Admiral Ralph A. Ofstie of the United States Navy. In addition to the cooperative interrogation with the Americans, Fukudome was also entrusted by the British to take charge of repatriating Japanese nationals from the Singapore area. However, despite the high regard and trust extended by American and British officers due to Fukudome’s cooperative behavior and attitude, once the task of repatriation was accomplished, Fukudome was arrested by the British government at the instigation of American prosecutors, and accused of war crimes; he was tried by a military tribunal in Singapore; Shigeru Fukudome // November 1939 Vice Admiral - 1 November 1942 Fukudome was one of the characters that appeared in the 1970 American/Japanese war film "Tora! Tora! Tora!", where he was portrayed by the Japanese actor Koji Kawamura. Shigeru Fukudome Born in Yonago, Tottori prefecture, Fukudome graduated from the 40th class of the Imperial Japanese Naval Academy in 1913, ranked 8 out of 144 cadets. As a midshipman, he served on the cruisers "Soya" and "Izumo" and battleship "Satsuma". After his promotion to ensign, he was assigned to the battleship "Hizen" and cruiser "Kashima". After attending torpedo school and naval artillery school, he; Shigeru Fukudome // battleship "Nagato" from 1938-1939. He was promoted to rear admiral on November 15, 1939. Fukudome was first assigned to the Combined Fleet in 1940 to April 1941 (where he conducted aerial torpedo exercises with Admiral Isoroku Yamamoto in early 1940 in contemplation of the proposed attack on Pearl Harbor), which was then under discussion. After his promotion to vice admiral in 1942, he again served as Chief of Staff under Admiral Yamamoto and his successor Admiral Mineichi Koga from May 1943 to March 1944, On March 31, 1944, while traveling from Palau to deliver plans for the Japanese counterattack against; Shigeru Fukudome // transferred to Singapore to command the IJN 10th Area Fleet, which at the time consisted mainly of the 13th Air Fleet with 450 aircraft (mostly trainers) and the IJN 1st Southern Expeditionary Fleet (2 operational cruisers and other smaller ships). He arrived in Singapore and took over command on January 16, 1945, and remained in this role until the end of the war. Because of the American control of air and sea after the Philippines campaign, he was effectively stranded in Singapore without the ability to affect the outcome of the war in a significant way. After the war, Fukudome [sep] knowledge2: Shigeru Fukudome: Shigeru Fukudome (福留 繁, Fukudome Shigeru, 1 February 1891 – 6 February 1971) was an admiral and Chief of Staff of the Imperial Japanese Navy during World War II.[2] ; Shigeru Fukudome: Born in Yonago, Tottori prefecture, Fukudome graduated from the 40th class of the Imperial Japanese Naval Academy in 1913, ranked 8 out of 144 cadets. As a midshipman, he served on the cruisers Soya and Izumo and battleship Satsuma. After his promotion to ensign, he was assigned to the battleship Hizen and cruiser Kashima. ; Shigeru Fukudome: After attending torpedo school and naval artillery school, he served on the patrol boat Manshu, followed by the cruiser Chitose and was promoted to lieutenant in 1918. After attending navigational training, he was assigned as chief navigator to the destroyer Sakura, and cruiser Niitaka. He was then appointed executive officer on the oiler Kamoi, on its voyage to the United States from 1921–1922. After his return to Japan, he was assigned a number of staff positions. He then graduated from the Naval War College with honors in 1924, and was promoted to lieutenant commander. After a tour as chief navigator on the cruiser Iwate, he joined the Imperial Japanese Navy General Staff and was promoted to commander in 1929. He continued to hold a number of staff positions through the 1930s. He was promoted to captain in 1933, and was captain of the battleship Nagato from 1938–1939. He was promoted to rear admiral on 15 November 1939. ; Shigeru Fukudome: Fukudome was first assigned to the Combined Fleet in 1940 to April 1941 (where he conducted aerial torpedo exercises with Admiral Isoroku Yamamoto in early 1940 in contemplation of the proposed attack on Pearl Harbor), which was then under discussion. After his promotion to vice admiral in 1942, he again served as Chief of Staff under Admiral Yamamoto's successor Admiral Mineichi Koga from May 1943 to March 1944, ; Shigeru Fukudome: On 31 March 1944, while traveling by air from Palau to deliver plans for the Japanese counterattack in defense of the Marianas Islands (code named "Z plan") to Japanese headquarters at Davao near British North Borneo, Fukudome became the first flag officer in Japanese history to be captured by the enemy (Filipino guerrillas commanded by Lieutenant Colonel James M. Cushing) after his plane crash landed in a typhoon near Cebu. (Admiral Mineichi Koga, who had been traveling in a separate plane, was killed the same night). He was released to stop civilian reprisals that were killing Filipinos and burning dozens of villages as the Japanese searched for the Admiral and the documents, but the battle plans fell into the American hands. [3]
knowledge1: Akbar Hossain // Akbar Hossain Akbar Hossain (18 January 1941 – 25 June 2006) was a veteran of the Bangladesh Liberation War, a politician of Bangladesh National Party and a Minister in three Bangladesh governments. Hossain was born in Kashari Patty on January 18, 1941, in Comilla District. He joined the army at Kakul Military Academy in Pakistan in May 1966, after his commission he was posted to the 31 Baluch Regiment. While serving he studied for his BA at the University of Dhaka, receiving it in 1969. Hossain joined the War of Independence in 1971 first under Khaled Musharraf and then with; Akbar Hossain // He was first made Special Secretary and then held the position of Joint Secretary General and was one of the Vice-Presidents of the BNP up until his death. In 1978 he was made Minister for Petroleum and Mineral Resources under the government of President Ziaur Rahman. Hossain was first elected a Member of the Bangladesh Parliament in 1979, he represented the Comilla 8th constituency in the 2nd Jatiyo Sangshad elections, a seat he was re-elected to four times. During the military dictatorship of General Hossain Mohammad Ershad, Akbar Hossain was jailed on five separate occasions for coming into conflict with; Akbar Hossain // the regime. After the ending of the military dictatorship and the election of Khaleda Zia, the country's first female Prime Minister. Hossain returned to government as Minister for the Environment and Forests in October 1993. In October 2001 he was appointed Minister for Shipping after the BNP led four-party alliance won the 8th Jatiyo Sangshad elections, with a two-thirds majority and Khaleda Zia became the Prime Minister of Bangladesh for the third time. He died in Dhaka in 2006 following a massive heart attack. Akbar Hossain Akbar Hossain (18 January 1941 – 25 June 2006) was a veteran of the; Akbar Hossain // the Z force headed by Ziaur Rahman. He was decorated for gallantry, receiving the 'Bir Protik' for his role in the War. After independence was won, he took voluntary retirement from the Bangladesh Army at the end of December 1973, after attaining the rank of lieutenant colonel. He then became actively involved in politics and helped form the United People's Party (UPP) in January 1974. He went on to become the Vice-President of the UPP. In 1977, the UPP merged with the Jatiyatabadi Front, Hossain left and joined Bangladesh National Party (BNP) and played a crucial role in its founding. [sep] knowledge2: Akbar Hossain: Bir Protik Akbar Hossain  (18 January 1941 – 25 June 2006)[1] was a Bangladeshi politician of Bangladesh National Party. He served as the minister of Minister for Shipping, Minister for the Environment and Forests and Minister for Petroleum and Mineral Resources.[2] ; Akbar Hossain: Hossain was born in Kashari Patty on 18 January 1941, in Comilla District.[1] ; Akbar Hossain: Hossain joined the army at Kakul Military Academy in Pakistan in May 1966, after his commission, he was posted to the 31 Baluch Regiment. While serving, he studied for his bachelor's at the University of Dhaka, receiving the degree in 1969. ; Akbar Hossain: Hossain joined the War of Independence in 1971 first under Khaled Musharraf and then with the Z force headed by Ziaur Rahman. He was decorated for gallantry, receiving the 'Bir Protik' for his role in the War.[3] After independence was won, he took voluntary retirement from the Bangladesh Army at the end of December 1973, after attaining the rank of lieutenant colonel. ; Akbar Hossain: Hossain then became actively involved in politics and helped form the United People's Party (UPP) in January 1974. He went on to become the Vice-President of the UPP. In 1977, the UPP merged with the Jatiyatabadi Front, Hossain left and joined Bangladesh National Party (BNP) and played a crucial role in its founding.[3] He was first made Special Secretary and then held the position of Joint Secretary General and was one of the Vice-Presidents of the BNP up until his death.
knowledge1: Zhang Yaokun // Zhang Yaokun Zhang Yaokun (; born 17 April 1981) is a Chinese footballer. Zhang Yaokun started his football career in 1998 with Dalian Shide; however, due to an ankle fracture, he struggled to establish himself within the team and it was only once he overcame his long term injury did he start to become a regular. He later became an integral member of the defense and helped Dalian in their dominance within Chinese football by winning league titles in the 2001 season and the 2002 season as well as the Chinese FA Cup in 2001. After Dalian had a disappointing [sep] knowledge2: Zhang Yaokun: Zhang Yaokun (simplified Chinese: 张耀坤; traditional Chinese: 張耀坤; pinyin: Zhāng Yàokūn; born 17 April 1981) is a retired Chinese footballer. ; Zhang Yaokun: Zhang Yaokun started his football career in 1998 with Dalian Shide; however, due to an ankle fracture, he struggled to establish himself within the team and it was only once he overcame his long term injury did he start to become a regular. He later became an integral member of the defense and helped Dalian in their dominance within Chinese football by winning league titles in the 2001 season and the 2002 season as well as the Chinese FA Cup in 2001.[1] After Dalian had a disappointing 2004 season, Vladimir Petrović came in as the new manager and would loan out Zhang to Sichuan Guancheng during the 2005 season where he quickly established himself as a key member of the club.[2] He returned to Dalian the following season where he continued to be a key member of the squad and would go on to become their captain. ; Zhang Yaokun: On 18 December 2012, Zhang transferred to fellow Chinese Super League side Guangzhou R&F.[3] He made his debut for the club on 9 March 2013 in a 4-2 loss against Liaoning Whowin. On 26 February 2017, Zhang transferred to League One side Wuhan Zall.[4] ; Zhang Yaokun: On 12 November 2018, Zhang Yaokun publicly announced his retirement from professional football right after Wuhan Zall successfully promoted to Chinese Super League. ; Zhang Yaokun: Zhang was called-up to the Chinese national team for the 2004 AFC Asian Cup where he made several appearances coming on as a substitute and playing in numerous positions in defence.[5] He continued to be a regular for the squad that qualified for the 2007 AFC Asian Cup and he and Li Weifeng were the first-choice centre back pairing during the tournament.[6]
knowledge1: Steve Cummins // Steve Cummins Steven Cummins (born 29 March 1992) is an Australian professional rugby union player, currently signed with Welsh team Scarlets. He was previously a member of Melbourne-based Super Rugby side, the . His regular position is lock and he also plays at blind-side flanker. Cummins was born in Sydney and attended The Hills Sports High, captaining their first XV in 2010. He was also named captain of the New South Wales All Schools team in the same year, as well as the Australian Schoolboy team. In 2011, he captained the Australia Under-19 side and he was a member of [sep] knowledge2: Steve Cummins: Steven Cummins (born 29 March 1992) is an Australian professional rugby union player, currently signed with Melbourne-based Super Rugby side, the Rebels.[1] He was previously a member of Welsh Pro 14 team Scarlets.[2] His regular position is lock and he also plays at blind-side flanker. ; Steve Cummins: Cummins was born in Sydney and attended The Hills Sports High, captaining their first XV in 2010.[3] He was also named captain of the New South Wales All Schools team in the same year, as well as the Australian Schoolboy team. ; Steve Cummins: Cummins played in the Shute Shield competition with Eastwood, impressing coach John Manenti, who said:[5] ; Steve Cummins: Steve Cummins has established himself as a real hard worker with huge involvements at the tackle and breakdown areas.; Steve Cummins: In 2013, Cummins played for the Sydney-based Super Rugby franchise side the Waratahs' emerging side, Gen Blue in the Pacific Rugby Cup.[6]
knowledge1: Kubota Beisen // Kubota Beisen Although his style remained recognisably Japanese, his knowledge of Western principles and methods is also reflected in his work. Beisen trained under Suzuki Hyakunen (1825–1891). The way in which he integrated Western perspective and techniques in his work was a self-taught skill. Kubota was a teacher at the Kyoto Prefectural School of Painting, which was founded in 1878 by Kubota and others. Among his colleagues in establishing the school was the artist Kōno Bairei (1844–95). As war artist for "Kokumin Shimbun", he accompanied the Japanese army at the time of the war with China in 1894 through 1895.; Kubota Beisen // published a visual account of Japan's advance into Manchuria. The peace treaty signed between Japan and China was also illustrated as part of this series of drawings. Amongst the honours he received are the Paris Exposition, Gold Medal, 1889. and at the Columbian Exposition, First Class Medal, 1893. Kubota's published work in Japanese is encompassed in 24 works in 25 publications in 53 library holdings. His one work in English was published in six editions and is found in 84 libraries worldwide. Kubota Beisen Although his style remained recognisably Japanese, his knowledge of Western principles and methods is also reflected; Kubota Beisen // His vivid illustrations of battlefield scenes of the First Sino-Japanese War were widely distributed in the Japanese population. When Kubota returned from the front, he was summoned to General Headquarters where he was ordered to create drawings in the presence of the Emperor. Kubota's artwork was published in "Nisshin Sentou Gahou" ("A Pictorial Record of the Sino-Japanese War"). The eleven volumes were published at irregular intervals between October 1894 and June 1895. The volumes are a visual chronicle of the war, beginning with the outbreak of hostilities in the summer of 1894. Kubota created images of Japan's sea-victories. He also [sep] knowledge2: Kubota Beisen: Kubota Beisen (久保田 米僊, 1852 – May 19, 1906) was a Japanese artist and art instructor in the Meiji period. ; Kubota Beisen: Although his style remained recognisably Japanese, his knowledge of Western principles and methods is also reflected in his work.[1]  Beisen trained under Suzuki Hyakunen (1825–1891).[2] The way in which he integrated Western perspective and techniques in his work was a self-taught skill. ; Kubota Beisen: Kubota was a teacher at the Kyoto Prefectural School of Painting, which was founded in 1878 by Kubota and others.[1] Among his colleagues in establishing the school was the artist Kōno Bairei (1844–95).[2] ; Kubota Beisen: As war artist for Kokumin Shimbun, he accompanied the Japanese army at the time of the war with China in 1894 through 1895.[1]  His vivid illustrations of battlefield scenes of the First Sino-Japanese War were widely distributed in the Japanese population. ; Kubota Beisen: When Kubota returned from the front, he was summoned to General Headquarters where he was ordered to create drawings in the presence of the Emperor.[1]
knowledge1: Marty Mayberry // Marty Mayberry Marty Mayberry (born 9 February 1986) is a double leg amputee LW3 classified Paralympic alpine skier from Australia. Mayberry lost both legs after contracting meningococcal disease when he was sixteen years old. This experiences led him to study medicine, and he attended Griffith University and the University of Sydney where Mayberry pursued health science courses. Beyond the classroom, he has written a paper on Meningococcal disease, worked part-time on research about the disease, and talked about his experiences at a conference. While at a music festival, he met his future wife whom he married in June 2010. Having; Marty Mayberry // elite skiing, one of several 2010 Winter Paralympic skiers to retire following the games. Others who retired at the same time he did included Shannon Dallas and Bart Bunting. Marty Mayberry Marty Mayberry (born 9 February 1986) is a double leg amputee LW3 classified Paralympic alpine skier from Australia. Mayberry lost both legs after contracting meningococcal disease when he was sixteen years old. This experiences led him to study medicine, and he attended Griffith University and the University of Sydney where Mayberry pursued health science courses. Beyond the classroom, he has written a paper on Meningococcal disease, worked part-time on; Marty Mayberry // started out as an able-bodied skier, Mayberry took up the disability sport. He made his national team debut in 2005, and went on to represent Australia at the 2006 Winter Paralympics the following year, when he did not medal. With the aid of a prosthesis, adjustments were made to his skiing legs, and he competed in several skiing competitions during 2007, 2008 and 2009. He was selected for the Australian 2010 Winter Paralympics team at a ceremony in Canberra in November 2009. Between then and the start of the Games, he participated in a few more competitions, including one where; Marty Mayberry // feel right during the speed events in Italy." Following those Games, he worked with prosthetist Peter Farrand to develop new legs that would address the problems in Italy. Continuing to ski following the 2006 Games, he earned a gold medal at a World Cup event in 2007 in Slalom, and earned a bronze medal in slalom event at a 2008 World Cup competition. During Australia's 2009—2010 summer, Mayberry was based in Europe and North America for training. At the 2009 World Championships, he had a pair of sixth places finished in the Super G and downhill events. That year, at; Marty Mayberry // a Spanish hosted IPC World Cup, he crashed in the giant slalom event and did not score a time. He was officially named to the Australian 2010 Winter Paralympics team in November 2009. A ceremony was held in Canberra with Australian Paralympic Committee president Greg Hartung and Minister for Sport Kate Ellis making the announcement. Mayberry was selected to the largest Winter Paralympics team that Australia had ever sent to the Games. In 2010, he was the only elite skier with his type of disability in his classification. At the second to last World Cup event before the 2010 Games, [sep] knowledge2: Marty Mayberry: Marty Mayberry (born 9 February 1986) is a double leg amputee LW3 classified Paralympic alpine skier from Australia. Mayberry lost both legs after contracting meningococcal disease when he was sixteen years old. This experiences led him to study medicine, and he attended Griffith University and the University of Sydney where Mayberry pursued health science courses. Beyond the classroom, he has written a paper on meningococcal disease, worked part-time on research about the disease, and talked about his experiences at a conference. ; Marty Mayberry: Having started out as an able-bodied skier, Mayberry took up the disability sport. He made his national team debut in 2005, and went on to represent Australia at the 2006 Winter Paralympics the following year, when he did not medal.  With the aid of a prosthesis, adjustments were made to his skiing legs, and he competed in several skiing competitions during 2007, 2008 and 2009. He was selected for the Australian 2010 Winter Paralympics team at a ceremony in Canberra in November 2009. Between then and the start of the Games, he participated in a few more competitions, including one where he picked up a gold medal, and participated in a national team training camp.  He was selected as Australia's flag bearer for the opening ceremony.  In competition, he earned a silver medal in the men's downhill standing event, finished 24th in the Super-G, was disqualified from the slalom, and failed to finish in the giant slalom.  Following the games, he retired from skiing. ; Marty Mayberry: Mayberry was born on 9 February 1986,[1] and grew up in Byron Bay, New South Wales,[2][3]   where he attended Byron Bay High School.[4] By 2009, he resided in Queensland,[5] and was living in Yeerongpilly, Queensland by 2010.[6] In June 2010, he married a woman he met at a music festival.[4] ; Marty Mayberry: Following a high school ski trip when he was in year 11,[4] Mayberry contracted meningococcal disease at the age of 16, and this resulted in double below the knee amputations.[2][7] He was in a coma for two weeks as a result of the disease,[7] and, when he woke up at Byron Bay Hospital, learned his legs had been amputated.[4] One of the things that motivated him to keep going during rehabilitation was the opportunity for sports.[8] ; Marty Mayberry: Mayberry studied health sciences at Griffith University,[9][10] and medicine at the University of Sydney.[10] He went into medicine partly because of his illness during high school.[4][11][12] He relocated to Sydney with his fiancé to do so not long before the start of the 2009—2010 ski season.[9] In August 2010, he was the opening speaker at the Amanda Young Foundation Meningococcal Conference,[13] and in 2010 and 2011, worked part-time at the Kids Research Institute at the Children's Hospital at Westmead, where he was in contact with "Robert Booy in his research on the psycho-social impact of meningococcal B on families."[14] He wrote up his experiences in dealing with meningococcal infection in the Journal of Paediatrics and Child Health.[15]
knowledge1: Thirayuth Boonmee // Thirayuth Boonmee Thirayuth Boonmee (, ; born 10 January 1950) is a Thai public intellectual and a former student activist. While a student at Chulalongkorn University in 1973, Thirayuth led the National Student Center of Thailand (NSCT) in coordinating political activism against the military dictatorship of Thanom Kittikachorn and Praphas Charusathien. The NSCT led tens of thousands in public protests against the regime. One of the earlier activities of the NSCT had been a 10-day boycott against Japanese products, in protest against Japanese investments in Thailand. On 6 October 1973, Thirayuth and 12 other student activists were arrested by the; Thirayuth Boonmee // PhD in political science in the US, then returned to Thailand. For many years he has taught in the Faculty of Sociology of Thammasat University. In 1997, he was named one of Thailand's ten most influential public intellectuals. Thirayuth Boonmee Thirayuth Boonmee (, ; born 10 January 1950) is a Thai public intellectual and a former student activist. While a student at Chulalongkorn University in 1973, Thirayuth led the National Student Center of Thailand (NSCT) in coordinating political activism against the military dictatorship of Thanom Kittikachorn and Praphas Charusathien. The NSCT led tens of thousands in public protests against the; Thirayuth Boonmee // Praphas government for sedition after they distributed leaflets demanding a new constitution. Rumors spread that they had been killed, which sparked massive anti-government protests. The demonstrations reached their peak on 13 October, when about 400,000 protesters gathered in front of the Democracy Monument and the parliament building. That afternoon, Thirayuth and the other students were released, and the king approved plans to draft a new constitution within 12 months. Thirayuth also played a role in exposing the Internal Security Operations Command's role in a massacre of villagers at Ban Na Sai village in the northeast. After the student massacre at [sep] knowledge2: Thirayuth Boonmee: Thirayuth Boonmee (Thai: ธีรยุทธ บุญมี, RTGS: Thirayut Bunmi; born 10 January 1950) is a Thai social scientist, public intellectual and a former student activist. ; Thirayuth Boonmee: On 6 October 1973, Thirayuth and 12 other student activists were arrested by the Praphas government for sedition after they distributed leaflets demanding a new constitution. Rumors spread that they had been killed, which sparked massive anti-government protests. The demonstrations reached their peak on 13 October, when about 400,000 protesters gathered in front of the Democracy Monument and the parliament building. That afternoon, Thirayuth and the other students were released, and the king approved plans to draft a new constitution within 12 months.[3] ; Thirayuth Boonmee: Thirayuth also played a role in exposing the Internal Security Operations Command's role in a massacre of villagers at Ban Na Sai village in the northeast. ; Thirayuth Boonmee: After the student massacre at Thammasat University on 6 October 1976, Thirayuth, as well as many other students and intellectuals fled from the cities to take refuge with the Communist Party of Thailand (CPT) in its jungle strongholds. Thirayuth increasingly became critical of the king, noting in a broadcast on 1 April 1977 that the monarchy was "obsolete and deteriorating", and that "I think that if our people were to destroy it, there would be no adverse effects". After the CPT dissolved itself in the early-1980s, Thirayuth returned to the mainstream of Thai intellectual life, renouncing socialism and rejecting his anti-monarchical statements.[4] ; Thirayuth Boonmee: Thirayuth went to the Netherlands to study Philosophy, Sociology and Anthropology at the International Institute of Social Studies in The Hague and University of Nijmegen, earning a doctorandus degree (M.A. equivalent).[5] In 1985 returned to Thailand. For many years he has taught in the Faculty of Sociology and Anthropology of Thammasat University. In 1997, he was named one of Thailand's ten most influential public intellectuals.[6] In 2008, Thirayuth became director of the Sanya Dharmasakti Institute for Democracy at Thammasat University. In 2012 he was appointed Professor of Anthropology.[7] In 2015, he moved to Thammasat University's College of Interdisciplinary Studies.
knowledge1: Bir Hambir // Bir Hambir Hambir Malla Dev, also known as Bir Hambir(Beera Hambeera) & Veer Hambir, was the forty-ninth king of the Mallabhum.He ruled from 1565 to 1620 CE. Hambir was the 49th ruler of the Malla dynasty who flourished around 1586 AD and ruled in 16th-17th century, and was a contemporary of the Mughal emperor Akbar. He fought on the side of Akbar against the Afghans and paid an annual tribute to the Muslim viceroys of Bengal and thus acknowledged their suzerainty. Bir Hambir was a pious man who started following Vaishnavism. A story in two Vaishnava works (Prem-vilasa of Nityananda; Bir Hambir // It was commissioned by Malla king Bir Hambir in 1600 CE. During the Vaishnava Ras festival, all the Radha Krishna idols of Bishnupur town used to be brought here to be worshipped by the citizens. During the reign of Bir Hambir the Dal Madal, one of the largest-bored cannons even made, was founded, demonstrating the skill of artisans of that time. Dal Madal was made by Jagannath Karmakar. "Dal Madal" means "destruction of enemy". Bir Hambir Hambir Malla Dev, also known as Bir Hambir(Beera Hambeera) & Veer Hambir, was the forty-ninth king of the Mallabhum.He ruled from 1565 to 1620; History of Bankura district // paid an annual tribute to the Muslim viceroys of Bengal and thus acknowledged their suzerainty. Bir Hambir was both powerful and pious. He was converted to Vaishnavism by Srinivasa. There is mention in two Vaishnava works, "Prem-vilasa" of Nityananda Das (alias Balaram Das) and "Bhakti Ratnakara" of Narahari Chakrabarti, about Srinivasa and other bhaktas (devotees) being robbed by Bir Hambir, when they were travelling from Vrindavan to Gaur with a number of Vaishanava manuscripts. However, Bir Hambir was so moved by Srinivasa’s reading of "Bhagavata" that he converted to Vaishnavism and gave Srinivasa a rich endowment of land and money.; Bir Hambir // Das (alias Balaram Das) and Bhakti Ratnakara of Narahari Chakrabarti) recounts the manner in which Srinivasa and other devotees were robbed by Bir Hambir while travelling from Vrindavan to Gaur with a number of Vaishanava manuscripts. However, Bir Hambir was so moved by Srinivasa’s reading of Bhagavata that he converted to Vaishnavism and gave Srinivasa a rich endowment of land and money. He introduced the worship of Madan Mohan to Bishnupur. During his regime (1565 to 1620), Dev title was suffixed after title Malla and Mallabhum was very safe and secured. The Rashmancha is a historical building located at Bishnupur.; Bankura district // Bir Hambir, was the first Bishnupur Raja to use the Kshatriya title Singh. With exquisite palaces and temples built during the period that followed Bishnupur was reputed to be the most renowned city in the world, more beautiful than the house of Indra in heaven. However, it has also been recorded that while these royal patrons of Hindu art and religion were busy building temples they had lost much of their independence and sunk to the position of tributary princes. Bir Singh walled up alive all his sons, eighteen in number. The youngest, Durjan, alone escaped, having been kept in [sep] knowledge2: Bir Hambir: Hambir Malla Dev (also known as Bir Hambir, Beera Hambeera, and Veer Hambir) was the forty-ninth king of Mallabhum. He ruled from 1565 to 1620 AD.[1][2][3] ; Bir Hambir: Hambir was the 49th ruler of the Malla dynasty who flourished around 1586 AD and ruled in 16th-17th century, and was a contemporary of the Mughal emperor Akbar. He fought on the side of Akbar against the Afghans and paid an annual tribute to the Mughal governors of Bengal and thus acknowledged their suzerainty.[4] ; Bir Hambir: Bir Hambir was a pious man who started following Vaishnavism. A story in two Vaishnava works (Prem-vilasa of Nityananda Das (alias Balaram Das) and Bhakti Ratnakara of Narahari Chakrabarti) recounts the manner in which Srinivasa and other devotees were robbed by Bir Hambir while travelling from Vrindavan to Gaur with a number of Vaishanava manuscripts. However, Bir Hambir was so moved by Srinivasa’s reading of Bhagavata that he converted to Vaishnavism and gave Srinivasa a rich endowment of land and money. He introduced the worship of Madan Mohan to Bishnupur.[4] ; Bir Hambir: During his regime (1565 to 1620), Dev title was suffixed after title Malla and Mallabhum was very safe and secured.[5] ; Bir Hambir: During the Pathan rule of Soleiman Karrani in Gaur, the kingdom of Bishnupur stood in a unique[citation needed] glory in the Rarh region of Bengal. His reckless son Daud Khan Karrani dreamed of seizing the whole of Bengal. In this situation, in 1575 AD, Daud Khan attacked Bishnupur with a large number of Pathan troops. Revered Fakir Narayan Karmakar Mahasaya writes - "Dawood Khan suddenly came and encamped at a village called Ranisagar near Bishnupur with more than one lakh soldiers and similar ammunition."[6]
knowledge1: Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad // Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad (15 September 1955 – 25 January 2016) was an Indian politician. He was a member of the 14th Lok Sabha of India where he represented the Junagadh constituency of Gujarat. He was a former Cabinet Minister of water resources and irrigation of Gujarat state. He played a vital role in the development of Narmada and Ukai Dam Projects. He served his fourth term as member of legislative assembly representing Talala Gir Constituency of Gujarat until 2016. He hailed from Ahir community. His family was a native of Badalpara village near Veraval. Jashubhai also known; Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad // as lion of saurastra and lion of sorath. He was elected to Lok Sabha in Indian general election, 2004 and represented Junagadh. He was twice elected to Gujarat legislative assembly in 1990 and 1995 from Somnath constituency and became Cabinet Minister for water resources and irrigation. He was also twice elected to Gujarat legislative assembly in 1998 and in 2012 from Talala Gir constituency. He died on 25 January 2016 at Ahmedabad following brain tumour. after his death his brother bhagvanjibhai barad elected with 31000 margin against bjp candidate govindbhai parmar Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad (15 September 1955 [sep] knowledge2: Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad: Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad (15 September 1955 – 25 January 2016) was an Indian politician. He was a member of the 14th Lok Sabha of India where he represented the Junagadh constituency of Gujarat. He was a former Cabinet Minister of water resources and irrigation of Gujarat state. He played a vital role in the development of Narmada and Ukai Dam Projects. He served his fourth term as member of legislative assembly representing Talala Gir Constituency of Gujarat until 2016. ; Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad: He hailed from Yadav/Ahir community. His family was a native of Badalpara village near Veraval.[1] Jashubhai was also known as lion of saurastra and lion of sorath(Sorath no savaj) રાજનીતિ માં આવ્યા બાદ પોતે તાલાલા તાલુકાનાં ઘુસીંયા ગામે તેમની સ્કૂલ આવેલી છે ત્યાં રહેવાનું વધારે પસંદ કરતા હતા. ; Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad: He was elected to Lok Sabha in 2004 Indian general election and represented Junagadh.[1] ; Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad: He was twice elected to Gujarat legislative assembly in 1990 and 1995 from Somnath constituency and became Cabinet Minister for water resources and irrigation. He was also twice elected to Gujarat legislative assembly in 1998 and in 2012 from Talala Gir constituency.[1] ; Jashubhai Dhanabhai Barad: He died on 25 January 2016 at Ahmedabad following brain tumour.[1] After his death, his brother Bhagvanjibhai Barad was elected with 31,000 margin against BJP candidate Govindbhai Parmar.
knowledge1: Namita Gokhale // 2018 is collection of poetry, prose and translation that enter the historical as well as the artistic dimensions of the eternal romance of Radha and Krishna. Gokhale has contributed an introduction to the forthcoming biography of Ra'na Liaqat Ali Khan--"The Begum," a well-researched portrayal of an intrepid and passionate stateswoman and wife of Liaquat Ali Khan, the first Prime Minister of Pakistan. She was born in Lucknow, Uttar Pradesh in 1956 and spent her childhood between New Delhi and Nainital, in the foothills of the Himalayas. A Kumaoni by birth, she married to Rajiv Gokhale when she was eighteen. Gokhale; Namita Gokhale // Namita Gokhale Namita Gokhale is an Indian writer, publisher and festival director. She is the author of sixteen books including nine works of fiction."Things to Leave Behind" has been published in November 2016. It is a rich, panoramic historical novel that shows Kumaon and the Raj as you have never seen them. Illuminated with painstaking detail, taking on the complications of caste, race and culture, this is a compelling historical novel of epic sweep and is described as Namita Gokhale's most ambitious novel yet. "Things to Leave Behind" has received the Best Fiction(English) Jury Award at the Valley of Words; Namita Gokhale // and 2018, JLF has added Adelaide, Houston and New York City as three additional stop overs in its yearly literary pilgrimage across the world. Namita Gokhale is also festival adviser to 'Mountain Echoes' a literary festival in Bhutan, an initiative of the India Bhutan Foundation, in association with Siyahi. It brings together writers, biographers, historians, environmentalists, scholars, photographers, poets, musicians, artists, film-makers to engage in cultural dialogue, share stories, create memories and spend three blissful days in the mountains. She has also founded 'The Crime Writers Festival', along with Kishwar Desai, a literary festival held annually bringing together crime fiction; Namita Gokhale // "Mountain Echoes – Reminiscences of Kumaoni Women", 1994 "The Book of Shiva", 2000 "The Puffin Mahabharata", 2009 "In Search of Sita"(co-edited with Malashri Lal), 2009 "Travelling In, Travelling Out" (edited), 2014 "Himalaya: Adventures, Meditations, Life"(co-edited with Ruskin Bond), 2016 "The Himalayan Arc: Journeys East of South-east"(edited), 2018 "Finding Radha: The Quest for Love", 2018 Namita Gokhale Namita Gokhale is an Indian writer, publisher and festival director. She is the author of sixteen books including nine works of fiction."Things to Leave Behind" has been published in November 2016. It is a rich, panoramic historical novel that shows Kumaon and the Raj; Namita Gokhale // dropped out of college after a conflict over the bias against Indian literatures in the curriculum. She then published the film magazine "Super" from Bombay in the late seventies. Namita Gokhale is the author of eighteen books, including nine previous works of fiction and several works of non-fiction.Her debut novel "Paro: Dreams of Passion", first published in 1984, was a satire on the elite of Bombay and Delhi created a furore due to its frank sexual humour. "Gods Graves and Grandmother" an ironic fable about street life in Delhi was adapted into a musical play. Gokhale was diagnosed with cancer [sep] knowledge2: Namita Gokhale: Namita Gokhale (born 1956) is an Indian writer, editor, festival director, and publisher. Her debut novel, Paro: Dreams of Passion was released in 1984, and she has since written fiction and nonfiction, and edited nonfiction collections. She conceptualized and hosted the Doordarshan show Kitaabnama: Books and Beyond and is a founder and co-director of the Jaipur Literature Festival. She won the 2021 Sahitya Akademi Award.[1] ; Namita Gokhale: Gokhale was born in Lucknow, Uttar Pradesh in 1956.[2] She was raised in Nainital[3][4] by her aunts and her grandmother Shakuntala Pande.[2] She studied English literature Jesus and Mary College at Delhi University, and at age 18[5] married Rajiv Gokhale and had two daughters while she was a student.[6][2] She refused to attend a course about the writings of Geoffrey Chaucer, and was dismissed from university by age 26.[2][6] By age forty, she had survived cancer and her husband had died.[2] ; Namita Gokhale: While a student, at age 17,[7] Gokhale began editing and managing the 1970s-era film magazine Super, and continued publishing the magazine for seven years, until it closed in the early 1980s.[8][6][2] After Super closed, she began writing the story that became her debut novel.[6] ; Namita Gokhale: In addition to her writing career, Gokhale hosted a hundred episodes of Kitaabnama: Books and Beyond, a multilingual book-show she conceptualized for Doordarshan.[9][2][10] According to Raksha Kumar, writing for The Hindu in 2013, "Kitaabnama tries to showcase the multilingual diversity of Indian literature by inviting laureates from different languages to talk about their work. It reminds one of the times when book stores were not overwhelmed by technical writing and self-help books; when literature and quality writing were not considered a waste of time; when the pleasure of reading was experienced by many."[11] ; Namita Gokhale: Gokhale is also a founder and co-director of the Jaipur Literature Festival, along with William Dalrymple[8][12] and Sanjoy K Roy.[13][2] She was also an advisor to the 'Mountain Echoes' literary festival in Bhutan.[7] She conceptualised the 'International Festival of Indian Literature-Neemrana' 2002, and 'The Africa Asia Literary Conference', 2006. Gokhale also advises The Himalayan Echo Kumaon Festival for Arts and Literature or the Abbotsford Literary Weekend.
knowledge1: Nonzee Nimibutr // not like, in a house that has some problems, namely, the toyol. He's also produced "", a live-action adaptation of the popular Thai comic book (or manga) by Padung Kraisri, about a plucky Isan woman who works as a maid in a middle class urban Thai home. In 2008, Nonzee became the fifth filmmaker to be honored with the Thailand Culture Ministry's Silpathorn Award, an honor previously bestowed on Pen-ek Ratanaruang, Apichatpong Weerasethakul, Wisit Sasanatieng and Thunska Pansittivorakul. Nonzee Nimibutr Nonzee Nimibutr (, ; born in 1962 in Nonthaburi Province, Thailand) is a Thai film director, film producer and screenwriter.; Nonzee Nimibutr // Nonzee Nimibutr Nonzee Nimibutr (, ; born in 1962 in Nonthaburi Province, Thailand) is a Thai film director, film producer and screenwriter. Best known for his ghost thriller, "Nang Nak", he is generally credited as the leader among a "New Wave" of Thai filmmakers that also includes Pen-Ek Ratanaruang, Wisit Sasanatieng and Apichatpong Weerasethakul. Nonzee is a relative of Lieutenant General Phachoen Nimitbutr (เผชิญ นิมิบุตร), Director of the Signal Department of the Royal Thai Army and the founder of Thailand's first television station, Army TV Channel 5. Nonzee graduated with a Bachelor of Arts in visual communication design from the; Nonzee Nimibutr // must protect their realm, Langkasuka. The film was originally to be called "Queens of Pattani", but the name was changed to avoid possible political overtones stemming from the South Thailand insurgency and Pattani separatism. Shooting began in August 2006. The film stars Jarunee Suksawat, Ananda Everingham from "Shutter", Dan Chupong from "Kerd ma lui", Jesdaporn Pholdee, Winai Kraibutr and Sorapong Chatree. Another film mentioned as being in development by Nonzee is a ghost thriller, "Toyol", a Singaporean co-production about a pair of Hong Kong children who move with their father to Bangkok and are introduced to a stepmother they do; Nonzee Nimibutr // producer, putting his name on such films as "Bangkok Dangerous" by the Pang Brothers; "Tears of the Black Tiger" by Wisit Sasanatieng; the historical battle epic, "Bangrajan" by Thanit Jitnukul and Pen-Ek Ratanaruang's "Monrak Transistor". He co-founded his own production company, Cinemasia, with his production partner, Duangkamol Limcharoen. She died in 2003. Continuing on his path of pan-Asian production, Nonzee initiated the horror trilogy, "Three", in which he and two other directors, Hong Kong's Peter Chan and Korean director Kim Ji-Woon, each directed a segment. While keeping busy as a producer, he directed 2003's "OK Baytong", a topical, contemporary drama [sep] knowledge2: Nonzee Nimibutr: Nonzee Nimibutr (Thai: นนทรีย์ นิมิบุตร, RTGS: Nonsi Nimibut; born in 1962 in Nonthaburi Province, Thailand) is a Thai film director, film producer and screenwriter. Best known for his ghost thriller, Nang Nak, he is generally credited as the leader among a "New Wave" of Thai filmmakers that also includes Pen-Ek Ratanaruang, Wisit Sasanatieng and Apichatpong Weerasethakul. ; Nonzee Nimibutr: Nonzee is a relative of Lieutenant General Phachoen Nimitbutr (เผชิญ นิมิบุตร), Director of the Signal Department of the Royal Thai Army and the founder of Thailand's first television station, Army TV Channel 5.  Nonzee graduated with a Bachelor of Arts in visual communication design from the Faculty of Decorative Arts at Silpakorn University in 1987. Classmates included Wisit Sasanatieng and production designer Ek Iemchuen. He started his career as a director of television commercials and music videos. ; Nonzee Nimibutr: He made his feature-film debut with 1997's Dang Bireley's and Young Gangsters, with a screenplay by Wisit Sasanatieng. The story was set in 1956 in Bangkok and follows the adventures of a gang of young criminals, with the action showing the influence of John Woo films. It was named best picture at the Thailand National Film Awards and was nominated for a Dragons and Tigers Award at the Vancouver International Film Festival. ; Nonzee Nimibutr: His next film was Nang Nak, a thriller based on a popular Thai ghost story, also scripted by Wisit. A famous ghost story that has been depicted in many Thai films and television series, the story is about a husband comes home from war and takes up living with his wife and newborn son who, unbeknownst to him, have died while he was away. The moodily framed horror film won numerous awards, including best picture at the Thailand National Film Awards. ; Nonzee Nimibutr: Both Young Gangsters and Nang Nak were hits at the box office and were credited with reinvigorating the Thai film industry.
knowledge1: Mamunul Islam // Mamunul Islam Mamunul Islam Mamun (born 12 December 1988) is a Bangladeshi international footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Dhaka Abahani Limited. He has won four league titles with two clubs. Mamunul started his career at Brothers Union as a central midfielder. After spending a season, he moved to Dhaka Abahani Limited and played two seasons there, 2008–09 and 2009–10. Both seasons Dhaka Abahani Limited became the league champion. He joined Atletico de Kolkata on loan from Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club to play the inaugural season of the Indian Super League. After returning to Sheikh Jamal DC, later; Mamunul Islam // Asian player outside India who played in the first season of the league. He impressed Indian football fans in 2014 IFA Shield by taking Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club(one of three foreign clubs participating in the tournament) to the finals. Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club received multiple offers for his transfer from Indian clubs. But Mamunul didn't get any chance to play in "ISL". Abahani Limited Mohammedan Sporting Club Sheikh Russel KC Chittagong Abahani Limited Atlético de Kolkata Bangladesh U-23 Mamunul Islam Mamunul Islam Mamun (born 12 December 1988) is a Bangladeshi international footballer who currently plays as a midfielder for Dhaka; Mamunul Islam // he joined his hometown club Chittagong Abahani Limited for a record fee. After spending two seasons there, the midfielder returned to Dhaka Abahani Limited this year. Mamunul started his career in Dhaka Abahani as a central midfielder. He was brought from Abahani's youth academy. He played two seasons for Abahani, 2008–09 and 2009–10. Abahani became the league champion in both seasons. Mamunul went to Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club from Dhaka Abahani at 2010–11 season. At first season Sheikh Jamal DC became the league champion. Mamunul played another season for the club. Mamunul went to Sheikh Russel KC from Sheikh Jamal [sep] knowledge2: Mamunul Islam: Mamunul Islam Mamun (Bengali: মামুনুল ইসলাম; born 12 December 1988) is a Bangladeshi professional footballer who last played as a midfielder for Bangladesh Premier League club Fortis and also played for the Bangladesh national football team during 2009–2020 and was captain from 2013–2016. ; Mamunul Islam: He has won five league titles with three clubs. Mamunul started his career at Brothers Union as a central midfielder. After spending three seasons, he moved to Abahani Limited Dhaka in 2008–09 season and became league champion with Sky Blue Brigade. He joined Mohammedan SC Dhaka the following season. For 2010–11 season, Mamunul moved to Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club and won his second league title. Leaving Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club after 2011–12 season, he played the next season for Muktijoddha Sangsad KC. Then he joined Sheikh Russel KC and won his third league title. Again in 2013–14 season he returned to Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club and won two more league titles in 2013-14 and 2014–15 season. In the middle of this quest, Atletico de Kolkata signed Mamunul on loan from Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club to play the inaugural season of Indian Super League. After returning to Sheikh Jamal Dhanmondi Club, later he joined his hometown club Chittagong Abahani Limited for a record transfer fee in 2016. After spending two seasons there, the midfielder returned to Abahani Limited Dhaka in 2018. On 6 September 2020, he announced his retirement from international football.[3][4] ; Mamunul Islam: Mamunul started his career in Brothers Union as a central midfielder in the 2005 season. ; Mamunul Islam: Mamunul moved to Abahani Limited Dhaka in 2008–09 season and became the league champion in that season. ; Mamunul Islam: After winning league title with Abahani he moved to their arch-rival Mohammedan SC in 2009–10 season and won Federation Cup and Super Cup with them.
knowledge1: Khalid Mahmood Mithu // Khalid Mahmood Mithu Khalid Mahmood Mithu (1960 – March 7, 2016) was a Bangladeshi film director and painter. He won Bangladesh National Film Award for Best Director for his direction of the film "Gohine Shobdo" (2010). Mithu was born in Dhaka in 1960. His mother Begum Momtaz Hossain Mithu was a scriptwiter. He was the nephew of the film director Alamgir Kabir. Mithu completed his Master of Fine Arts (MFA) degree from Faculty of Fine Arts, University of Dhaka in 1986. He directed his play "Dhusor Album" in 1993. In 2010, he directed the film "Gohine Shobdo" which earned him; Khalid Mahmood Mithu // the national film award. His second film "Jonakir Alo" was selected as the Bangladeshi entry for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film in 2014, but was not nominated. Mithu was also a painter. By 2004, his work had been featured in 11 solo exhibitions. Mithu was married to painter Kanak Chanpa Chakma. Together they had one son, Arjo Srestha and one daughter, Shiropa Purna. Mithu was killed by a falling tree on March 7, 2016 in Dhanmondi Thana, Dhaka. Khalid Mahmood Mithu Khalid Mahmood Mithu (1960 – March 7, 2016) was a Bangladeshi film director and painter. He [sep] knowledge2: Khalid Mahmood Mithu: Khalid Mahmood Mithu (1960 – March 7, 2016)[2] was a Bangladeshi film director and painter.[3] He won Bangladesh National Film Award for Best Director for his direction of the film Gohine Shobdo (2010).[4][5] ; Khalid Mahmood Mithu: Mithu was born in Dhaka in 1960.[6] His mother, Begum Momtaz Hossain Mithu, was a scriptwriter. He was the nephew of the film director Alamgir Kabir.[4] ; Khalid Mahmood Mithu: Mithu completed his Master of Fine Arts (MFA) degree from Faculty of Fine Arts, University of Dhaka in 1986.[7][4] He directed his play, Dhusor Album, in 1993.[4] In 2010, he directed the film, Gohine Shobdo, which earned him the national film award. His second film, Jonakir Alo, was selected as the Bangladeshi entry for the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film in 2014, but was not nominated.[8] ; Khalid Mahmood Mithu: Mithu was also a painter and by 2004, his work had been featured in 11 solo exhibitions.[9] ; Khalid Mahmood Mithu: Mithu was married to painter Kanak Chanpa Chakma[10] and together they had one son, Arjo Srestha and one daughter, Shiropa Purna.[7]
knowledge1: Ahsee Tuala // Ahsee Tuala Ahsee Tuala (born 23 August 1989) is a Samoan rugby union player who plays as a fullback for Aviva Premiership side Northampton Saints. Tuala was born in Samoa, but moved to New Zealand with his family aged 2 years old and grew up in South Auckland. Tuala began his senior rugby career in New Zealand with the Counties Manukau Steelers, debuting during the 2009 Air New Zealand Cup season while only 20 years old. His ability to play in several positions across the backline saw him become an integral part of the Steelers squad and earn over 50; Ahsee Tuala // alongside fellow Saint Ken Pisi, to the Samoan squad for the 2017 internationals. Ahsee Tuala Ahsee Tuala (born 23 August 1989) is a Samoan rugby union player who plays as a fullback for Aviva Premiership side Northampton Saints. Tuala was born in Samoa, but moved to New Zealand with his family aged 2 years old and grew up in South Auckland. Tuala began his senior rugby career in New Zealand with the Counties Manukau Steelers, debuting during the 2009 Air New Zealand Cup season while only 20 years old. His ability to play in several positions across the backline saw; Ahsee Tuala // experience came with New Zealand. He was a member of the New Zealand Under-20 wider squad in 2009 and the New Zealand sevens wider training group in 2012. However, in January 2012 it was announced that Tuala had withdrawn from the New Zealand sevens squad to focus on gaining international recognition with his native Samoa. His ambitions were realized 2 years later when he was named in the Samoan squad for the 2014 end-of-year rugby union tests and made his international debut on 14 November 2014 in a 23-13 victory over in Vannes, France. Most recently Tuala was called up,; Ahsee Tuala // retained that on the wing's return, crossing the whitewash five times that season for Saints. Teaming up with the rest of Saints' backline to form a formidable force when firing, Tuala was awarded Saints' Supporter' Breakthrough Player of the Year award at the 2016/17 End of Season Awards, pipping newcomers Nic Groom and Juan Pablo Estelles to the post. Most recently Tuala helped Saints secure a place in European Rugby Champions Cup, scoring the match winning try as Saints beat Stade Francais by one point to clinch the final top-tier European spot. Despite being born in Samoa, Tuala's early international; Ahsee Tuala // ITM Cup caps. He was also involved in the Chiefs Development squads in both 2010 and 2011. On 3 February 2015, Tuala signed for English club Northampton Saints in the Aviva Premiership until the end of the 2014-15 season. However, he signed a new deal with Northampton, making his move permanent at Franklin's Gardens. It could be said that while Tuala has been at Saints for two season now, his breakthrough year was this past season (2016/17). The full back secured his place within the starting lineup on a weekly basis while George North was away on international duty and [sep] knowledge2: Ahsee Tuala: Ahsee Tuala (born 23 August 1989) is a Samoan rugby union player who plays as a fullback for Aviva Premiership side Northampton Saints.[1][2][3][4] ; Ahsee Tuala: Tuala was born in Samoa, but moved to New Zealand with his family aged 2 years old and grew up in South Auckland.[5] ; Ahsee Tuala: Tuala began his senior rugby career in New Zealand with the Counties Manukau Steelers, debuting during the 2009 Air New Zealand Cup season while only 20 years old. His ability to play in several positions across the backline saw him become an integral part of the Steelers squad and earn over 50 ITM Cup caps.[3] He was also involved in the Chiefs Development squads in both 2010 and 2011.[2] ; Ahsee Tuala: On 3 February 2015, Tuala signed for English club Northampton Saints in the Aviva Premiership until the end of the 2014-15 season.[6] However, he signed a new deal with Northampton, making his move permanent at Franklin's Gardens.[7] ; Ahsee Tuala: It could be said that while Tuala has been at Saints for two season now, his breakthrough year was this past season (2016/17). The full back secured his place within the starting lineup on a weekly basis while George North was away on international duty and retained that on the wing's return, crossing the whitewash five times that season for Saints.[1]
knowledge1: Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay // Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay (born 8 March 1956) is a Bengali writer from India. He has written novels and short stories for both adults and children. Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay was born in Calcutta His father was Ramangamohan Mukhopadhyay and mother Kanaklata Mukhopadhyay. He graduated from Ramakrishna Mission Vidyamandira (a residential college) at Belur before taking a Masters in English from The University of Calcutta.He did his Ph.D from Jadavpur University. Mukhopadhyay started his career as Regional Secretary,East India, of Sahitya Akademi. Formerly he was Convener of the Bengali Advisory Board of the Sahitya Akademi. He was also President of the Bharatiya; Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay // Bhasha Parishad. He has retired as the Director of the Publishing Department, Visva-Bharati. He is associated with a number of Bengali Little Magazines. His first collection of 14 short stories entitled "Madale Natun Bol"(The New Beats on the Drum) published from Calcutta in 1984. His first novel "Charane Prantare" (At the Grazing Ground, at the Horizon) was published from Calcutta in 1993. Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay (born 8 March 1956) is a Bengali writer from India. He has written novels and short stories for both adults and children. Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay was born in Calcutta His father was Ramangamohan Mukhopadhyay and; Asim Mukhopadhyay // Buddhist literature and culture. Mukhopadhyay was born in Kolkata, India, the second son of Malin Kumar Mukhopadhyay, a famous advocate who appeared for Kazi Nazrul Islam in Banksal Court, Kolkata. He is the third of a family of four sisters and six brothers. He passed Matriculation in 1946 from Collins Institute, Lenin Sarani, Kolkata. He completed his Intermediate in 1948 and Bachelor of Arts with Honours in Pali from Vidyasagar College, Kolkata. He passed Master of Arts in Pali from University of Calcutta in 1952. He got great scholars like Suniti Kumar Chatterji, Nalinaksha Dutta, Sukumar Sen and Sukumar Sengupta [sep] knowledge2: Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay: Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay (born 8 March 1956) is a Bengali writer from India. He has written novels and short stories for both adults and children.[1] ; Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay: Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay was born in Calcutta[2] His father was Ramangamohan Mukhopadhyay and mother Kanaklata Mukhopadhyay. He graduated from Ramakrishna Mission Vidyamandir (a residential college) at Belur before taking a Masters in English from The University of Calcutta. He did his Ph.D from Jadavpur University. Mukhopadhyay started his career as Regional Secretary, East India, of Sahitya Akademi. Formerly he was Convener of the Bengali Advisory Board of the Sahitya Akademi. He was also President of the Bharatiya Bhasha Parishad. He has retired as the Director of the Publishing Department, Visva-Bharati.[3]  He is associated with a number of Bengali Little Magazines. ; Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay: His first collection of 14 short stories entitled "Madale Natun Bol" (The New Beats on the Drum)  published from Calcutta in 1984. His first novel "Charane Prantare" (At the Grazing Ground, at the Horizon) was published from Calcutta in 1993. ; File:Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay.jpg: Original file ‎(787 × 1,181 pixels, file size: 630 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Ramkumar Mukhopadhyay.jpg: Click on a date/time to view the file as it appeared at that time.
knowledge1: Alf Garland // Alf Garland Brigadier Alfred Barrett Garland, AM (19 March 1932 – 9 March 2002) was an Australian Army officer, and National President of the Returned and Services League of Australia (RSL) from 1988 to 1993. Garland had a distinguished military career, and attracted media attention by being outspoken on many controversial social issues, often antagonising the Keating government at the time. Garland's army career spanned 35 years. In 1965, he commanded the 1st Special Air Service squadron against Indonesian forces in Borneo. During the Vietnam War, he was second-in-command of the 7th Battalion, Royal Australian Regiment, and was appointed Australia's; Alf Garland // Australian Monarchist League NSW and ACT branches. Garland also opposed the construction of the Japanese funded technology city known as the Multifunction Polis (MFP). Garland died at age 69, after a long battle with motor neurone disease. Alf Garland Brigadier Alfred Barrett Garland, AM (19 March 1932 – 9 March 2002) was an Australian Army officer, and National President of the Returned and Services League of Australia (RSL) from 1988 to 1993. Garland had a distinguished military career, and attracted media attention by being outspoken on many controversial social issues, often antagonising the Keating government at the time. Garland's army [sep] knowledge2: Alf Garland: Brigadier Alfred Barrett Garland, AM (19 March 1932 – 9 March 2002) was an Australian Army officer, and National President of the Returned and Services League of Australia (RSL) from 1988 to 1993.[1] Garland had a distinguished military career, and attracted media attention by being outspoken on many controversial social issues, often antagonising the Keating government at the time. ; Alf Garland: Garland's army career spanned 35 years. In 1965, he commanded the 1st Special Air Service squadron against Indonesian forces in Borneo. During the Vietnam War, he was second-in-command of the 7th Battalion, Royal Australian Regiment, and was appointed Australia's chief liaison officer to US forces.[1] ; Alf Garland: Garland was President of the Australian Capital Territory branch of the RSL, before becoming the RSL National President in 1988.[1] ; Alf Garland: Garland was elected as the Australian Monarchist League delegate from New South Wales at the 1998 Australian Constitutional Convention. He joined Bruce Ruxton in campaigning against the notion of Australia becoming a republic. The two sat next to each other, angering republican delegates by opposing them on almost every point.[1] In  one attempt to filibuster debate, Garland recounted his family's loyalty to the Crown beginning in medieval times. ; Alf Garland: Garland was chairman of both the Australian Monarchist League NSW and ACT branches.
knowledge1: Don Beard // Don Beard Donald Derek Beard (14 January 1920, Palmerston North, Manawatu – 15 July 1982, Lancaster, England) was a New Zealand cricketer who played in four Tests from 1952 to 1956. Don Beard grew up in the country near Palmerston North, cycling 15 miles a day to attend Palmerston North Boys' High School. After teacher training in Auckland, he attended Victoria University in Wellington. An accurate fast-medium bowler and useful lower-order batsman, Beard was selected to make his first-class debut for Wellington in the first round of Plunket Shield matches after the Second World War in December 1945, but he; Don Beard // union for Wellington, Wanganui (as captain) and North Island. He died in 1982 while on holiday in England after retiring as principal of Te Aroha College. Don Beard Donald Derek Beard (14 January 1920, Palmerston North, Manawatu – 15 July 1982, Lancaster, England) was a New Zealand cricketer who played in four Tests from 1952 to 1956. Don Beard grew up in the country near Palmerston North, cycling 15 miles a day to attend Palmerston North Boys' High School. After teacher training in Auckland, he attended Victoria University in Wellington. An accurate fast-medium bowler and useful lower-order batsman, Beard was [sep] knowledge2: Don Beard: Donald Derek Beard (14 January 1920 – 15 July 1982) was a New Zealand cricketer who played in four Tests from 1952 to 1956. He was a schoolteacher and school principal. ; Don Beard: Don Beard grew up in the country near Palmerston North, cycling 15 miles a day to attend Palmerston North Boys' High School.[1] After teacher training in Auckland, he attended Victoria University in Wellington, from where he completed a Diploma in Education in 1946 and a Master of Arts in 1948.[2] His thesis was on the history of physical education in New Zealand primary schools.[3] ; Don Beard: In the 1951–52 Plunket Shield season, Beard took 16 wickets at 27.25[6] and was selected for the two Tests against the touring West Indies side, taking four wickets. ; Don Beard: Beard topped the bowling averages in the Plunket Shield in 1955–56 with 28 wickets at 10.64, "and 110 of his 217 overs were maidens".[10] After the visiting West Indies side won the first two Tests by an innings, they played Central Districts at Wanganui, where Beard top-scored in each innings, making 25 and 67, and took 3 for 52 and 2 for 59 (match figures of 50.1–20–111–5).[11] He returned to the Test team for the last two Tests, and played an important role in New Zealand's first-ever Test victory in the Fourth Test, making 31 and 6 not out and taking 1 for 20 and 3 for 22.[12] But that was his last Test. ; Don Beard: Beard's best innings and match figures came in 1956–57 against Otago in Dunedin, when he took 7 for 56 and 4 for 43 (match figures of 61.4–26–99–11) in a match that Otago nevertheless won.[13]
knowledge1: Edgar Bennett // Edgar Bennett Edgar Bennett III (born February 15, 1969) is an American football coach and former running back who is the wide receivers coach for the Oakland Raiders of the National Football League (NFL). He previously was the offensive coordinator for the Green Bay Packers. Bennett played college football at Florida State and was drafted by the Green Bay Packers in the 4th round of the 1992 NFL Draft. He also played for the Chicago Bears. Bennett attended Robert E. Lee High School in Jacksonville, Florida and won varsity letters in football, basketball, and track. Influenced by football coach Corky; Edgar Bennett // seasons. In February 2011, Bennett was named wide receivers coach. In February 2015, Packers head coach Mike McCarthy promoted Bennett to offensive coordinator. On January 13, 2018, Bennett was hired by the Oakland Raiders as their wide receivers coach under head coach Jon Gruden. NFL head coaches under whom Edgar Bennett has served: Edgar Bennett Edgar Bennett III (born February 15, 1969) is an American football coach and former running back who is the wide receivers coach for the Oakland Raiders of the National Football League (NFL). He previously was the offensive coordinator for the Green Bay Packers. Bennett played [sep] knowledge2: Edgar Bennett: Edgar Bennett III (born February 15, 1969) is an American football coach and former running back who is the wide receivers coach for the Las Vegas Raiders of the National Football League (NFL). Bennett played college football for the Florida State Seminoles and was selected by the Green Bay Packers in the fourth round of the 1992 NFL Draft. He also played for the Chicago Bears. ; Edgar Bennett: Bennett attended Robert E. Lee High School  in Jacksonville, Florida and won varsity letters in football, basketball, and track. Influenced by football coach Corky Rogers, he was a Class 4A All-State running back, and was a SuperPrep All-Dixie selection. ; Edgar Bennett: Bennett attended Florida State University. He lined up primarily at fullback in a backfield that included future NFL running backs Amp Lee, Marquette Smith, William Floyd, Zach Crockett and Sean Jackson. When Lee was suspended for the Cotton Bowl, Bennett started at halfback. Bennett is considered one of the most versatile fullbacks in FSU history. His career all-purpose yardage totaled more than 2,300 on 389 touches, good for 20 touchdowns. He was an all-around player who ran a 4.5 40 and caught 93 passes for over 1,000 yards.[1] ; Edgar Bennett: Bennett was drafted in the fourth round (103rd overall) by the Packers in the 1992 NFL Draft.[2] Bennett started his Packer career as a fullback, but he became the starting running back in 1995 and gained 1,067 yards rushing. As both a fullback and a running back, Bennett excelled as a receiver leading the Packers in receptions. He continued as the starting running back throughout the 1996 season, but in the latter half, Dorsey Levens was receiving significant playing time at running back. Bennett's career as a Packer culminated in their Super Bowl XXXI victory. He ruptured his Achilles tendon in the 1997 preseason and did not play that year. ; Edgar Bennett: Bennett played with the Chicago Bears in 1998 and 1999 before retiring after the 1999 season.
knowledge1: Matt Hunter (singer) // Matt Hunter (singer) Matthew Alexander Hunter Correa (born February 20, 1998), better known as Matt Hunter, is a Colombian-Italian-American singer, songwriter and voice actor. Hunter was born in New York, New York, and raised in New Jersey. His mother is Colombian, and his father is Italian. Hunter worked in voice acting from ages 9 to 12, at which point he began posting YouTube videos of himself playing the guitar and singing various covers, occasionally in Spanish. His videos went viral and he traveled around Latin America building his fan base in a grass roots fashion. Around this time, he was; Matt Hunter (singer) // Pop Artist at the 2013 Premios Juventud, presented by Univision. Matt Hunter (singer) Matthew Alexander Hunter Correa (born February 20, 1998), better known as Matt Hunter, is a Colombian-Italian-American singer, songwriter and voice actor. Hunter was born in New York, New York, and raised in New Jersey. His mother is Colombian, and his father is Italian. Hunter worked in voice acting from ages 9 to 12, at which point he began posting YouTube videos of himself playing the guitar and singing various covers, occasionally in Spanish. His videos went viral and he traveled around Latin America building his fan base [sep] knowledge2: Matt Hunter (singer): Matthew Alexander Hunter Correa (born February 20, 1998), better known as Matt Hunter, is an American singer, songwriter and voice actor of Colombian-Italian descent.[1] ; Matt Hunter (singer): Hunter was born in New York City,[2] and raised in Paramus, New Jersey.[3][4] His mother is Colombian,[5] and his father is Italian.[2] ; Matt Hunter (singer): Hunter worked in voice acting from ages 9 to 12, at which point he began posting YouTube videos of himself playing the guitar and singing various covers, occasionally in Spanish.[6][7] His videos went viral and he traveled around Latin America building his fan base in a grass roots fashion.[3] Around this time, he was dubbed the "Latino Justin Bieber".[8] Marc Anthony later called Hunter "the future" of music.[6] ; Matt Hunter (singer): At 13, Hunter released his first single, "Mi Amor".[8] He released follow-up singles in English and Spanish, "Right Here, Right Now" and "Mi Senorita", in 2012,[7] and then his EP Right Here, Right Now.[5][7] For the 2014 FIFA World Cup, he released the songs "Minha Mina Ta Loca" and "Mi Chica Esta Loca" with Pitbull, in both Portuguese and Spanish versions.[9][10] By 2016 he had amassed 200,000 subscribers on his YouTube channel and over 500,000 Twitter followers.[6] ; Matt Hunter (singer): Hunter splits his time between New York, Los Angeles, Miami, and Latin America.
knowledge1: Naz Mitrou-Long // Naz Mitrou-Long Nazareth Jersey "Naz" Mitrou-Long (born August 3, 1993) is a Canadian-Greek professional basketball player for Utah Jazz of the National Basketball Association (NBA), on a two-way contract with the Salt Lake City Stars of the NBA G League. He played college basketball for the Iowa State Cyclones. Born in Mississauga, Ontario, he played high school basketball at St. Martin in his hometown. In 2012, he started playing college basketball for Iowa State. He played in the 2017 NBA Summer League for the Sacramento Kings. One of the top prospects out of Canada, Long was ranked as the 7th-best; Naz Mitrou-Long // had only his father's name on it. Naz Mitrou-Long Nazareth Jersey "Naz" Mitrou-Long (born August 3, 1993) is a Canadian-Greek professional basketball player for Utah Jazz of the National Basketball Association (NBA), on a two-way contract with the Salt Lake City Stars of the NBA G League. He played college basketball for the Iowa State Cyclones. Born in Mississauga, Ontario, he played high school basketball at St. Martin in his hometown. In 2012, he started playing college basketball for Iowa State. He played in the 2017 NBA Summer League for the Sacramento Kings. One of the top prospects out of; Naz Mitrou-Long // range and is tied for fifth all-time at Iowa State with 146 three-pointers made. Long suffered a labral tears in both of his hips during the season. In the offseason he had separate surgeries to repair each tear. Naz played in the first eight games this season for the fifth-ranked Cyclones, averaging 12.0 points in 31.6 minutes. He got a rest against Arkansas–Pine Bluff, with coach Steve Prohm commenting that his situation would be re-evaluated every week. On 15 December 2015, he decided to sit out the rest of the season due to persistent pain from his hip surgeries. Mitrou-Long; Naz Mitrou-Long // player in Canada according to North Pole Hoops. He participated in the 2011 All-Canada Classic, a showcase of the best Canadian basketball players and played for the CIA Bounce AAU program, the top AAU summer circuit in Canada. He played with NBA players Tristan Thompson and Cory Joseph, and future Cyclone teammate Melvin Ejim while competing for REDA Red in the National Prep School Athletic Association in 2011–12. Naz played for Findlay Prep in Las Vegas, Nev., during the 2010–11 season, helping the Prep Pilots to a 28–4 record and their third-straight ESPN Rise National High School Invitational appearance where; Naz Mitrou-Long // his work ethic, maturity and leadership. Former teammate Jameel McKay commented before the season that Mitrou-Long looked in the best shape of his life, also stating that he could end up Big 12's leading scorer for the season. He started the season strong, posting his first career double-double against the Savannah State Tigers with 18 points and a career best 10 rebounds. Versus Mount St. Mary's Mountaineers, Mitrou-Long played against his younger brother Elijah Long, a sophomore for the Mountaineers; Mitrou-Long said after the game: ""Part of me wanted to cheer for him. Part of me was keeping it competitive. [sep] knowledge2: Naz Mitrou-Long: Nazareth Jersey Mitrou-Long (born August 3, 1993) is a Canadian-Greek professional basketball player for Olympiacos of the Greek Basket League and the EuroLeague. He played college basketball for the Iowa State Cyclones. Born in Mississauga, Ontario, he played high school basketball at Father Michael Goetz in his hometown. In 2012, he started playing college basketball for Iowa State. He played in the 2017 NBA Summer League for the Sacramento Kings. He later played a total of 20 regular-season games with the Utah Jazz and the Indiana Pacers. ; Naz Mitrou-Long: One of the top prospects out of Canada, Long was ranked as the 7th-best player in Canada according to North Pole Hoops.  He participated in the 2011 All-Canada Classic, a showcase of the best Canadian basketball players and played for the CIA Bounce AAU program, the top AAU summer circuit in Canada. He played with NBA players Tristan Thompson and Cory Joseph, and future Cyclone teammate Melvin Ejim while competing for REDA Red in the National Prep School Athletic Association in 2011–12.  Naz played for Findlay Prep in Las Vegas, Nev., during the 2010–11 season, helping the Prep Pilots to a 28–4 record and their third-straight ESPN Rise National High School Invitational appearance where he was teammates with Texas' Myck Kabongo. He prepped at Montrose Christian (Rockville, Md) in 2009–10, teaming with Duke's Josh Hairston During his recruitment he received offers from Rice, Dayton, Creighton, and Miami, eventually committing to the Iowa State Cyclones. ; Naz Mitrou-Long: Naz saw action in 18 games as a freshman, averaging 1.4 points and 1.0 assists.  He tallied seven points vs. Southern and handed out seven assists vs. Alabama A&M. ; Naz Mitrou-Long: Long played in all 36 games, making seven starts and establishing himself as a clutch 3-point threat. He averaged 7.1 points per game and shot 40 percent from behind the arc, finishing fourth in the Big 12 in 3-point field goal percentage (40.0) and seventh in 3-pointers made (1.8).  His 64 3-pointers ranks as the 17th-most by a Cyclone in a single season.  He made at least four 3-pointers in seven games.  He hit a 30-foot three at the buzzer to send the Cyclones to overtime against Oklahoma State[1] and in ISU's game at Oklahoma State earlier in the season, Long drilled a three to send the game to triple-OT.[2]  He earned Phillips 66 Big 12 Player of the Week honors after hitting 8-of-11 3-pointers in the Cyclones' season-opening win against UNC Wilmington and finishing with a career-high 26 points in the game.[3]  He went 4-of-6 from long range to score 16 points in the Cyclones' win against No. 7 Michigan. Long played a key role in ISU's Big 12 Tournament run, making 7-of-10 threes and averaging 10 points and going 4-of-6 from behind the arc in the championship game against Baylor.  In the third round of the NCAA Tournament, Long hit three 3-pointers in the final 5:10, including one that tied the game at 81, as ISU rallied to defeat North Carolina.[4]  He averaged 7.1 points per game and shot 40 percent from behind the arc, finishing fourth in the Big 12 in 3-point field goal percentage (40.0) and seventh in 3-pointers made (1.8).  His 64 3-pointers ranks as the 17th-most by a Cyclone in a single season. ; Naz Mitrou-Long: Long saw action in all 34 games, making 33 starts and hit four or more threes in a game six times.  He scored a team-high 20 points in Iowa State's regular season win against Kansas and connected on 5-of-9 threes to lead Iowa State with 21 points in win at Iowa.[5]  He drilled 7-of-10 threes and scored a season-high 24 points against Mississippi Valley State.[6] Naz grabbed a career-high seven boards in win against Texas.  He averaged 10.1 points, 2.9 rebounds, and 2.0 assists.  He hit a team-high 77 three-pointers, the eighth most in a single season by a Cyclone.  He was second in the Big 12 averaging 2.3 three-pointers made per game and finished the season tied for fifth in the league shooting 39.1 percent behind the arc.  Naz had ISU's third-longest streak of games with a three-pointer come to an end at 21 games.  He shot 44.9 percent from the field despite 77.5 percent of his shots coming from three-point range and is tied for fifth all-time at Iowa State with 146 three-pointers made.  Long suffered a labral tears in both of his hips during the season.  In the offseason he had separate surgeries to repair each tear.[7]
knowledge1: Jeff Long (athletic director) // Jeff Long (athletic director) Jeffrey P. Long (born c. 1960) is the Director of Athletics at the University of Kansas. He is the former Vice Chancellor and Director of Athletics at the University of Arkansas and joined the University in 2008 after holding the same position at the University of Pittsburgh. Long's career in administration includes positions at the University of Oklahoma, University of Michigan, Virginia Tech and Eastern Kentucky University. Long replaced Frank Broyles, who retired at Arkansas at the beginning of 2008. Prior to his term at Arkansas, Long was hired as Pittsburgh's athletic director after Steve Pederson; Jeff Long (athletic director) // university leadership." Long is married to the former Fanny Gellrich of Ann Arbor, Michigan and the couple have two daughters, Stephanie and Christina. Jeff Long (athletic director) Jeffrey P. Long (born c. 1960) is the Director of Athletics at the University of Kansas. He is the former Vice Chancellor and Director of Athletics at the University of Arkansas and joined the University in 2008 after holding the same position at the University of Pittsburgh. Long's career in administration includes positions at the University of Oklahoma, University of Michigan, Virginia Tech and Eastern Kentucky University. Long replaced Frank Broyles, who retired; Jeff Long (athletic director) // of Bobby Petrino led to the subsequent tumultuous hiring of John L. Smith as interim head coach in 2012 and then the hiring of Bret Bielema the following year. In October 2013, Long parlayed the Petrino scandal into another job and was subsequently announced as the first chairman of the College Football Playoff selection committee, along with twelve other members. On November 15, 2017, the University of Arkansas announced that it had parted ways with Long effective immediately, with the school's chancellor saying Long had "lost the support of many of our fans, alumni, key supporters, and members of the; Jeff Long (athletic director) // left the University of Pittsburgh to take the same position at the University of Nebraska. Long hired controversial football coach Bobby Petrino in 2008 and later fired Petrino in 2012. The firing followed revelations that Petrino may have been involved in an extramarital affair with a former Arkansas volleyball player, whom Long and Petrino had agreed to hire to a staff position within the football program. It was rumored that Petrino had also attempted to cover up the fact that he had been riding with his mistress when he was involved in a motorcycle accident in April 2012. The firing [sep] knowledge2: Jeff Long (athletic director): Jeffrey Paul Long (born September 21, 1959) is an American athletics director, most recently at the University of Kansas.[1] He is the former Vice Chancellor and director of athletics at the University of Arkansas and joined the University in 2008 after holding the same position at the University of Pittsburgh.[2] Long's career in administration includes positions at the University of Oklahoma, University of Michigan, Virginia Tech, and Eastern Kentucky University. ; Jeff Long (athletic director): In 1982, Long earned his bachelor's degree in economics from Ohio Wesleyan University and his master's degree in education from Miami University in 1983.[3] ; Jeff Long (athletic director): Long came to Arkansas as the successor of longtime athletic director Frank Broyles, who retired at the beginning of 2008. Prior to his term at Arkansas, Long was hired as Pittsburgh's athletic director after Steve Pederson left the University of Pittsburgh to take the same position at the University of Nebraska.[4] ; Jeff Long (athletic director): Long hired controversial football coach Bobby Petrino in 2008, but fired him in April 2012 after it emerged he was carrying on an extramarital affair with former Arkansas volleyball player Jessica Dorrell, whom Long and Petrino had agreed to hire to a staff position within the football program. The affair came to light after Petrino attempted to cover up the fact that he had been riding with his mistress when he was involved in a motorcycle accident in April 2012.[5] Long concluded that he could not allow Petrino to remain at Arkansas because Petrino had deceived both him and the public about the accident and his relationship with Dorrell.[6] He was also angered that Petrino had secretly given Dorrell $20,000 as a Christmas present, which could have potentially exposed Arkansas to a sexual harassment suit had Petrino been retained.[7]  In his formal termination letter to Petrino, Long told him that he would have never greenlighted the hiring of Dorrell had Petrino disclosed their relationship.[8] The firing of Bobby Petrino led to the subsequent tumultuous hiring of John L. Smith as interim head coach in 2012 and then the hiring of Bret Bielema the following year. ; Jeff Long (athletic director): In October 2013, Long was announced as the first chairman of the College Football Playoff selection committee, along with twelve other members.[9]
knowledge1: Lennie Hayton // Lennie Hayton Leonard George Hayton (February 14, 1908 – April 24, 1971) was an American musician, composer, conductor and arranger. Hayton's trademark was the wearing of a captain's hat, which he always wore at a rakish angle. Hayton was born in New York City, New York, to a Jewish family. The son of a Manhattan restaurateur, he developed a penchant for the piano when six years old, showing unusual interest in the early classics from the rolls of the family player piano. Although neither of his parents was a tutored musician, both were keen followers of the concert hall. Hayton; Lennie Hayton // admitted in a 1980 "Ebony" interview she had married Hayton primarily to advance her career, and cross the "color-line" in show business, but had learned to love him very much. Horne and Hayton were separated for most of the 1960s. Always a heavy drinker and smoker, Hayton died of heart disease while separated from Horne, in Palm Springs, California in 1971. He was buried in the Hollywood Forever Cemetery in Hollywood, California. Lennie Hayton Leonard George Hayton (February 14, 1908 – April 24, 1971) was an American musician, composer, conductor and arranger. Hayton's trademark was the wearing of a captain's; Lennie Hayton // attended many concerts with them. His parents disliked "Jazz" and it was not until Hayton was 16 that he really discovered it. He left high school to become pianist with the Broadway Hotel Orchestra of Cass Hagen, a boyhood friend. While playing at the Park Central, Hayton was heard by Paul Whiteman and immediately engaged by him in April 1928 as second pianist, playing piano and celeste as well as acting as a part-time arranger. Whilst with the Paul Whiteman orchestra, he played with musicians such as Frankie Trumbauer, Bix Beiderbecke, Red Nichols and Joe Venuti. He also became friendly; Lennie Hayton // He continued to work with Crosby on radio (Bing Crosby Entertains) and record for a while but in 1940 he became a musical director for Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer and guided it through its prime years as forerunner of the movie musical. Up until his retirement from the post in 1953, he racked up four Academy Award nominations: for the Judy Garland musicals "The Harvey Girls" (1946) and "The Pirate" (1948). Hayton won the Academy Award for music for "On the Town" with Roger Edens in 1950. Lennie Hayton also arranged the music for "Singin' in the Rain" in 1952. Hayton notched up; Lennie Hayton // piano. In New York on October 25, 1932, Hayton led the orchestra for one of Bing Crosby's most famous recordings, Brother, Can You Spare a Dime? which went to the top of the charts of the day. In January 1933, Hayton became the musical director for the Chesterfield radio series "Music That Satisfies" which again featured Crosby and ran for 13 weeks. Hayton's involvement with Bing Crosby continued and he was made musical director for the singer's film Going Hollywood (1933) which was a Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer production. This was to be the start of a major career for Hayton in Hollywood. [sep] knowledge2: Lennie Hayton: Leonard George Hayton (February 14, 1908 – April 24, 1971) was an American musician, composer, conductor and arranger. Hayton's trademark was a captain's hat, which he always wore at a rakish angle. ; Lennie Hayton: Hayton was born in New York City to a Jewish family. The son of a Manhattan restaurateur, he developed a penchant for the piano when six years old, showing unusual interest in the early classics from the rolls of the family player piano. Although neither of his parents was a tutored musician, both were keen followers of the concert hall. Hayton attended many concerts with them. His parents disliked "Jazz", and it was not until Hayton was 16 that he really discovered it. He left high school to become pianist with the Broadway Hotel Orchestra of Cass Hagen, a boyhood friend.[3] ; Lennie Hayton: While playing at the Park Central, Hayton was heard by Paul Whiteman and immediately engaged by him in April 1928 as second pianist, playing piano and celeste as well as acting as a part-time arranger. Whilst with the Paul Whiteman orchestra, he played with musicians such as Frankie Trumbauer, Bix Beiderbecke, Red Nichols and Joe Venuti. He also became friendly with Bing Crosby, then a member of The Rhythm Boys. In May 1930, Whiteman had to thin down his orchestra as theatre audiences fell due to the economic problems of the day and because of the impact of radio. Hayton and Eddie Lang were amongst the ten members of the band released.[4] Hayton then joined the Charles Previn Orchestra which had a weekly assignment on radio in the Camel Pleasure Hour.[5] ; Lennie Hayton: The chance came to re-join Bing Crosby who by late 1931 had enjoyed tremendous success on record, radio and the stage. Starting in April 1932, Crosby embarked on a tour of Paramount-Publix theaters, working across the country to Hollywood where he was to make the film The Big Broadcast. At each location, he continued to broadcast his radio show until he reached the West Coast. Lennie Hayton and Eddie Lang provided the musical support to Crosby on his theatre appearances and on his radio shows.[6] In Chicago in May 1932, Hayton led an orchestra for his first recordings with the singer.[7] "Cabin in the Cotton", "Love Me Tonight" and "Some of These Days" were all hits.[8] In September 1932, Crosby again went on tour with Hayton accompanying him on piano. In New York on October 25, 1932, Hayton led the orchestra for one of Bing Crosby's most famous recordings, "Brother, Can You Spare a Dime?" which went to the top of the charts of the day. In January 1933, Hayton became the musical director for the Chesterfield radio series "Music That Satisfies" which again featured Crosby and ran for 13 weeks. ; Lennie Hayton: Hayton's involvement with Bing Crosby continued, and he was made musical director for the singer's film Going Hollywood (1933), which was a Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer production. This was to be the start of a major career for Hayton in Hollywood. He continued to work with Crosby on radio (Bing Crosby Entertains) and record for a while but in 1940 he became a musical director for Metro-Goldwyn-Mayer and guided it through its prime years as foremost producer of movie musicals. Up until his retirement from the post in 1953, he racked up four Oscar nominations: for the Judy Garland musicals The Harvey Girls (1946) and The Pirate (1948). Hayton won the Academy Award for music for On the Town with Roger Edens in 1950. Lennie Hayton also arranged the music for Singin' in the Rain in 1952. Hayton notched up two more nominations—one in 1968 for the unsuccessful Julie Andrews musical Star! and his last the following year for the Barbra Streisand vehicle Hello, Dolly! co-composed with Lionel Newman, which brought him his second and final Oscar. In 1970, Hayton arranged Frank Sinatra's first attempt at the George Harrison composition "Something".[9] However, Sinatra later began using a Nelson Riddle arrangement of the song in concert performances and, in 1979, he put the Riddle version on record.[citation needed] Hayton composed "Apple Blossoms" with Joe Venuti, Frankie Trumbauer, and Eddie Lang. His other compositions included "Flying Fingers", "The Stage is Set", "Mood Hollywood" with Jimmy Dorsey, and "Midnight Mood". Hayton also co-arranged the Hoagy Carmichael composition "Stardust" with Artie Shaw, for Shaw's recording of it in 1940, for Bluebird Records.[10]
knowledge1: Marli Renfro // and is known as Marli Renfro Peterson. She has lived in the Mojave Desert since 1970. Marli Renfro Marli Renfro (born April 3, 1938, in Los Angeles, California) is an American former showgirl, model, Playboy cover girl and actress. She was the body double for Janet Leigh in the shower scene of the 1960 film "Psycho". Renfro, described as a free spirit with a lifelong commitment to nudism, appeared in many men's magazines including "Ace", "Adam", "Beau", "Dude", "Escapade", "Follies", "Gala" and "Modern Man". She also appeared on the cover of the September 1960 edition of "Playboy". Renfro spent some; Marli Renfro // Marli Renfro Marli Renfro (born April 3, 1938, in Los Angeles, California) is an American former showgirl, model, Playboy cover girl and actress. She was the body double for Janet Leigh in the shower scene of the 1960 film "Psycho". Renfro, described as a free spirit with a lifelong commitment to nudism, appeared in many men's magazines including "Ace", "Adam", "Beau", "Dude", "Escapade", "Follies", "Gala" and "Modern Man". She also appeared on the cover of the September 1960 edition of "Playboy". Renfro spent some time working as a showgirl in Las Vegas, and also worked as a Playboy Bunny. Unperturbed; Marli Renfro // character had been voiced by Virginia Gregg and Jeanette Nolan. In his 2002 book "Body Double", author Don Lasseter compounded the confusion and wrote that Davis and Renfro were the same person, meaning that Renfro was dead. Author Robert Graysmith, who had a lifelong fascination with Renfro, noted a comment by Davis's granddaughter that Davis would never have done nude work. He set out to find Renfro and discovered that she was living in California. He subsequently wrote a book, "The Girl in Alfred Hitchcock's Shower" (2010), about Renfro's role in "Psycho" and the confusion over Davis's death. Renfro married [sep] knowledge2: Marli Renfro: Marli Renfro (born April 3, 1938 in Los Angeles, California) is an American former showgirl, model, Playboy cover girl and actress. ; Marli Renfro: She was the body double for Janet Leigh in the shower scene of the 1960 film Psycho.[1] ; Marli Renfro: Renfro, described as a free spirit with a lifelong commitment to nudism,[2] appeared in many men's magazines including Ace, Adam, Beau, Dude, Escapade, Follies, Gala and  Modern Man.[3] She also appeared on the cover of the September 1960 edition of Playboy.[4] ; Marli Renfro: Renfro spent some time working as a showgirl in Las Vegas, and also worked as a Playboy Bunny.[5] ; Marli Renfro: Unperturbed by working nude, Renfro was hired as the body double for the actress Janet Leigh in Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 film Psycho. She was paid $500.[6] The shower scene in Psycho is considered one of the most famous scenes in cinema history.[7] It features more than 50 camera cuts in three minutes and took six days to film. Although nudity is implied in the rapid cuts, none is seen. Hitchcock and Leigh initially maintained that only Leigh appeared in the shower.[6] Only later did Hitchcock acknowledge that when Leigh's face is seen it is her, otherwise it is Renfro.[8] Although Leigh's account of the shower scene says all the actual shower footage in the film was of her and the only time Renfro was used was in an overhead shot that was eventually cut due to censors' concerns  [9]
knowledge1: Charmion King // Charmion King Charmion King (July 25, 1925 – January 6, 2007) was a Canadian actress. Born in Toronto, Ontario, she was part of the country's burgeoning theatre and television industry in the decade of the 1950s. Fresh out of the University of Toronto's Hart House, she quickly became known for her fresh beauty and roles at the new Crest Theatre and their Straw Hat Players summer circuit in the Muskoka Lake district. She went on to the Stratford Festival appearing in productions of "The Winter's Tale", "Three Sisters" and "Uncle Vanya", and appeared on Broadway in Tyrone Guthrie's production of; Charmion King // "Love and Libel". She also acted in notable television films, including "Anne of Green Gables" (as Josephine Barry) and "Jackie, Ethel, Joan: The Women of Camelot" (as Rose Fitzgerald Kennedy). She also starred in the Canadian television series "Wind at My Back" and "House of Pride". In 1988 she appeared in the film "Shadow Dancing". She was married to actor Gordon Pinsent for 44 years. Their daughter, Leah Pinsent, is also a noted Canadian television actress. King died, aged 81, in Toronto, reportedly from complications of emphysema. Charmion King Charmion King (July 25, 1925 – January 6, 2007) was a [sep] knowledge2: Charmion King: Charmion King (July 25, 1925 – January 6, 2007) was a Canadian actress. ; Charmion King: Born in Toronto, Ontario, she was part of the country's burgeoning theatre and television industry in the decade of the 1950s. Fresh out of the University of Toronto's Hart House, she quickly became known for her fresh beauty and roles at the new Crest Theatre and their Straw Hat Players summer circuit in the Muskoka Lake district. ; Charmion King: She went on to the Stratford Festival appearing in productions of The Winter's Tale, Three Sisters and Uncle Vanya, and appeared on Broadway in Tyrone Guthrie's production of Love and Libel. ; Charmion King: She also acted in notable television films, including Anne of Green Gables (as Josephine Barry) and Jackie, Ethel, Joan: The Women of Camelot (as Rose Fitzgerald Kennedy). She also starred in the Canadian television series Wind at My Back and House of Pride. In 1988 she appeared in the film Shadow Dancing. ; Charmion King: She was married to actor Gordon Pinsent for 44 years. Their daughter, Leah Pinsent, is also a noted Canadian television actress.
knowledge1: Literature of Cameroon // Effa, Werewere Liking, Ba'bila Mutia, John Nkemngong Nkengasong, Bole Butake, Leonora Miano, Francis B Nyamnjoh and Linus T. Asong. In 2014, Imbolo Mbue signed a million dollar deal with Random House for her debut manuscript. The novel titled "Behold the Dreamers" follows the travails of a Cameroonian immigrant and a Lehman Brothers executive during the 2008 financial crisis. International and bilingual English-and-French literary prizes, Grand Prix of Literary Associations (GPLA), were launched in Cameroon in 2013, and are to date the main literary awards in Cameroon. They have already contributed to unveil or confirm many gifted authors, such as Eric [sep] knowledge2: Imbolo Mbue: Imbolo Mbue (born 1981) is a Cameroonian-American novelist and short-story writer based in New York City.[1] She is known for her debut novel Behold the Dreamers (2016), which has garnered her the PEN/Faulkner Award for Fiction and the Blue Metropolis Words to Change Award.[2] Her works draw from her own experiences as an immigrant, as well as the experiences of other immigrants. ; Imbolo Mbue: Mbue was born in 1981 in Limbe, Cameroon, in the English-speaking region of the country, where she was raised until the family sponsored her higher education studies in the United States.[3] ; Imbolo Mbue: Mbue became an American citizen in 2014,[7] and currently lives in New York City with her husband and children.[5] ; Imbolo Mbue: Mbue came to the United States in 1998 to study business management as an undergraduate student at Rutgers University. After graduating in 2002, she went on to complete her M.A. from Columbia University, in 2006.[8] She began to work in the corporate sector in New York City, but lost her job as did millions of Americans during the Great Recession.[9] ; Imbolo Mbue: In 2014, she signed a million-dollar deal with Random House for her debut book Behold the Dreamers,[10] which was published in 2016. The novel garnered critical acclaim for, according to NPR, the way it "depicts a country both blessed and doomed, on top of the world, but always at risk of losing its balance. It is, in other words, quintessentially American."[11]
knowledge1: Virginia Christine // Virginia Christine Virginia Christine (March 5, 1920 – July 24, 1996) was an American stage, radio, film, television, and voice actress. Christine had a long career as a character actress in film and television. She is particularly remembered as "Mrs. Olson" (or the "Folgers Coffee Woman") in a number of television commercials for Folgers. Christine was born Virginia Christine Ricketts in Stanton in Montgomery County in southwestern Iowa. She was of Swedish descent. Upon her mother's remarriage, she changed her last name to "Kraft". The family later moved to Des Moines in Polk County, where Virginia attended Elmwood Elementary School.; Virginia Christine // the honorary mayor of Brentwood, Los Angeles where she and her husband resided for many years. In November 1940, Christine married actor Fritz Feld. The couple had two sons, Steven and Danny. Christine and Feld remained married until Feld's death in 1993. On July 24, 1996, Christine died at her Brentwood home of cardiovascular disease. Her interment was at the Jewish Mount Sinai Memorial Park Cemetery in the Hollywood Hills section of Los Angeles. Virginia Christine Virginia Christine (March 5, 1920 – July 24, 1996) was an American stage, radio, film, television, and voice actress. Christine had a long career; Virginia Christine // a verbally abusive hypochondriac in the first-season episode of "The Twilight Zone" entitled "Escape Clause". In 1960 and 1961, Christine guest starred on episodes of "Coronado 9", "Rawhide", and "The Untouchables". From 1961 to 1962, Christine had a recurring role as widow Ovie Swenson in the Western series "Tales of Wells Fargo". She made four guest appearances on "Perry Mason", including the role of defendant Beth Sandover in the season 6, 1962 episode, "The Case of the Double-Entry Mind," and murderer Edith Summers in the season 7, 1963 episode, "The Case of the Devious Delinquent." For the remainder of the; Virginia Christine // decade, she continued with guest starring roles in show such as "77 Sunset Strip", "Ben Casey", "Bonanza", "The Fugitive", "Hazel", "Wagon Train", "The Virginian", "Going My Way", "The F.B.I.", and "Daniel Boone". In 1969, Christine co-starred in the ABC television movie "Daughter of the Mind". Her greatest fame came in 1965 when she started her 21-year stint as the matronly Mrs. Olson, who had comforting words for young married couples while pouring Folgers Coffee in the television commercials. The commercials became a popular staple on television and Christine's character, Mrs. Olsen, was often parodied by comedians and entertainers including Carol [sep] knowledge2: Virginia Christine: Virginia Christine (born Virginia Christine Ricketts; March 5, 1920 – July 24, 1996) was an American stage, radio, film, television, and voice actress.[1] Though Christine had a long career as a character actress in film and television, she may be best remembered as "Mrs. Olson" (or the "Folgers Coffee Woman") in a string of television commercials for Folgers Coffee during the 1960s and 1970s. ; Virginia Christine: Christine was born in Stanton in Montgomery County in southwestern Iowa. She was of Swedish descent. Upon her mother's remarriage, she changed her last name to "Kraft". The family later moved to Des Moines, the state capital, in central Iowa, where Virginia attended Elmwood Elementary School. The family relocated again to Des Moines County in the southeastern part of the state. There Christine attended Mediapolis High School, where she aspired to be a concert pianist. Her family later moved to California, where she enrolled at UCLA.[2] ; Virginia Christine: Christine began working in radio during college. Later, she appeared several times in the radio version of Gunsmoke, including the December 4, 1954 episode "Cholera", the February 19, 1955 episode "Poor Pearl", the September 3, 1955 episode "Change of Heart", the October 8, 1955 episode "Good Girl, Bad Company", the December 4, 1955 episode "Sunny Afternoon", the May 13, 1956 episode "Cows and Cribs", the September 9, 1956 episode "Belle's Back", the October 28, 1956 episode "Dirty Bill's Girl", the November 23, 1957 episode "Fingered", the October 5, 1958 episode "Tag You're It", the September 6, 1959 episode "Matt's Decision", the December 6, 1959 episode "Big Chugg Wilson", the January 24, 1960 episode "Bless Me 'Till I Die", the February 7, 1960 episode "Delia's Father", the February 28, 1960 episode "Prescribed Killing", the April 17, 1960 episode "Solomon River", the July 17, 1960 episode "Busted Up Guns", the August 28, 1960 episode "Tumbleweed", the September 18, 1960 episode "Two Mothers", the November 6, 1960 episode "Jedro's Woman", the December 4, 1960 episode "Kitty's Good Neighboring", the February 5, 1961 episode "Love of Money", and the May 7, 1961 episode "Ma's Justice".   ; Virginia Christine: She began training for a theatrical career with actor/director Fritz Feld, whom she married in 1940. In 1942, she made her stage debut in the Los Angeles production of Hedda Gabler. While performing in the play, she was spotted by an agent from Warner Bros., who signed her to a film contract with the studio.[3] Her first film for Warner was Edge of Darkness (1943), in which she played a Norwegian peasant girl.[4] She was dropped by Warner Bros. in 1943 and signed with Universal Pictures in 1944. That year, Christine had a supporting role in The Mummy's Curse and The Wife of Monte Cristo, with her husband Fritz Feld (the two went go on to appear together in the Western 4 for Texas in 1963). In 1946, she appeared in The Scarlet Horseman, a 13-chapter film serial playing Carla Marquette, or Matosca, followed by a supporting role in the mystery film The Inner Circle. Christine's next film for Universal was the film noir classic The Killers. She initially tested for the lead role of femme fatale Kitty Collins, but lost out to Ava Gardner. The film's producer, Mark Hellinger, was impressed with her test and cast her as Lilly Harmon Lubinsky, the wife of Lt. Sam Lubinsky (Sam Levene). Christine also portrayed Miss Watston in the 1964 remake of the film, starring Lee Marvin and Angie Dickinson.[3] ; Virginia Christine: In 1950, she played an uncredited supporting role in The Men. Although the part was small and the film was not a commercial success, her performance impressed the film's producer, Stanley Kramer.  She became a favorite of his, and went on to appear in a number of his films, including Cyrano de Bergerac (1950) and High Noon (1952). Kramer later cast her in the 1955 drama Not as a Stranger, where she played a countrywoman. She also coached the film's star Olivia de Havilland on her Swedish accent. The following year, she co-starred in the horror film Invasion of the Body Snatchers. In 1961, Kramer cast her again as a German housekeeper in Judgment at Nuremberg.[3] One of her most notable roles was as Hilary St. George, the bigoted co-worker of Katharine Hepburn's character in the 1967 film Guess Who's Coming to Dinner.[4][5]
knowledge1: Sada Thompson // she is survived by her husband (a former executive for Pan American Airways) and a brother, David. Sada Thompson Sada Carolyn Thompson (September 27, 1927 – May 4, 2011) was an American stage, film, and television actress. Born in Des Moines, Iowa, in 1927 to Hugh Woodruff Thompson and his wife Corlyss (née Gibson), and raised in Fanwood, New Jersey, where she attended Scotch Plains-Fanwood High School, graduating in the class of 1945. Thompson earned a Bachelor of Fine Arts in Theatre at the Carnegie Institute of Technology, after which she worked steadily in regional theatre in such plays as; Sada Thompson // Sada Thompson Sada Carolyn Thompson (September 27, 1927 – May 4, 2011) was an American stage, film, and television actress. Born in Des Moines, Iowa, in 1927 to Hugh Woodruff Thompson and his wife Corlyss (née Gibson), and raised in Fanwood, New Jersey, where she attended Scotch Plains-Fanwood High School, graduating in the class of 1945. Thompson earned a Bachelor of Fine Arts in Theatre at the Carnegie Institute of Technology, after which she worked steadily in regional theatre in such plays as "The Seagull", "Pygmalion", "Our Town", "Arms and the Man", and "Blithe Spirit". She received training at Pittsburgh [sep] knowledge2: Sada Thompson: Sada Carolyn Thompson (September 27, 1927 – May 4, 2011) was an American stage, film, and television actress. She was known to television audiences as Kate Lawrence in Family (1976-1980), for which she won the Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Drama Series in 1978. ; Sada Thompson: She was born Sada Carolyn Thompson in Des Moines, Iowa, in 1927 to Hugh Woodruff Thompson and his wife Corlyss (née Gibson). The family moved to Fanwood, New Jersey a few years later.[1][2] where she attended Scotch Plains-Fanwood High School, graduating in the class of 1945.[3] Thompson earned a Bachelor of Fine Arts in Theatre at the Carnegie Institute of Technology (now known as Carnegie Mellon University),[2] after which she worked steadily in regional theatre in such plays as The Seagull, Pygmalion, Our Town, Arms and the Man, and Blithe Spirit. She received training at Pittsburgh Playhouse, where she appeared in numerous productions.[4] ; Sada Thompson: She made her Off-Broadway debut in a 1955 production of Under Milk Wood,[2] and the following year she appeared on television in a Goodyear Television Playhouse production. She made her Broadway debut in the 1959 musical Juno. Her additional New York City stage-credits include The Effect of Gamma Rays on Man-in-the-Moon Marigolds, Tartuffe, and Twigs. Her stage performances won her an Obie Award, a Tony Award for Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Play (for "Twigs"), three Drama Desk Awards and two Sarah Siddons Awards (the last presented for outstanding performances in Chicago theatre). She was elected to the American Theater Hall of Fame in 2005.[5] ; Sada Thompson: On the strength of her success in Twigs, Thompson was signed to play neighbor Irene Lorenzo on All in the Family.  After taping her first episode, however, she was replaced by Betty Garrett, when it became obvious that she and producer Norman Lear had different opinions about how the character should be played.[2] ; Sada Thompson: She was subsequently cast as matriarch Kate Lawrence on Family. Thompson's portrayal of Kate was lauded for its realism.[1] She won the 1978 Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Drama Series for the role, which also garnered three nominations for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actress in a Television Series Drama.
knowledge1: Jean Muir (actress) // Jean Muir (actress) Jean Muir (February 13, 1911 – July 23, 1996) was an American stage and film actress and educator. She was the first performer to be blacklisted after her name appeared in the infamous anti-Communist 1950 pamphlet "Red Channels". An only child, Muir was born in Suffern, New York, as Jean Muir Fullarton; her father was a certified public accountant, and her mother was a substitute teacher. Her education came at the Dwight School in Englewood, New Jersey. Muir's Broadway debut came in "The Truth Game" (1930). She was signed by Warner Bros. in 1933 and made 14; Jean Muir (actress) // at the University of Missouri–Kansas City. On December 20, 1940, Muir married attorney Henry Jaffe in New York. They had three children. In the mid-1950s she reportedly suffered from alcoholism and cirrhosis of the liver. Muir died in a nursing home in Mesa, Arizona on July 23, 1996. Muir has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame at 6280 Hollywood Blvd. Jean Muir (actress) Jean Muir (February 13, 1911 – July 23, 1996) was an American stage and film actress and educator. She was the first performer to be blacklisted after her name appeared in the infamous anti-Communist 1950; Jean Muir (actress) // films in her first three years there. She played opposite several famous actors including Warren William, Paul Muni, Richard Barthelmess and Franchot Tone, but she returned to Broadway in 1937 because she was unsatisfied with the roles. She appeared occasionally in films through 1943. She was also one of the candidates for the role of Melanie in "Gone with the Wind". Muir incurred the disfavor of studio executives because of her involvement in formation of the Screen Actors Guild, her tendency to question the way the film business operated, and her resistance to posing for publicity photographs. In 1950 Muir; Jean Muir (actress) // of the accusation was her six-month membership in the Congress of American Women, which federal authorities considered a subversive group. Muir resumed acting in 1958, appearing in an episode of "Matinee Theater" on NBC-TV. After teaching drama and directing plays at two community centers in New York, Muir moved to Missouri in 1968 and became the Master Acting Teacher at Stephens College, in addition to directing several productions there. She also completed her college degree at Stephens in 1977. Reaching Stephens' mandatory retirement age forced her to stop teaching there, and in 1981 she had a one-year appointment to teach; Jean Muir // the author and historian Lady Antonia Fraser and the publisher Carmen Callil. Other fans of vintage Muir include Kate Moss and Stella McCartney. Jean Muir had a discreet but complicated private life. In 1955, she married a German actor, Harry Leuckert, with whom she co-founded Jean Muir Ltd. and lived in London and Lorbottle Hall near Alnwick in Northumberland. Their marriage was unconventional, described by Leuckert as "wonderful and loving, but never singular". In 1976, Leuckert fathered a daughter, Friederike, with another woman. His wife was aware of this, and Leuckert continued to live with her whilst paying regular visits [sep] knowledge2: Jean Muir: Jean Elizabeth Muir CBE FCSD (/mjʊər/ MURE; 17 July 1928 – 28 May 1995) was a British fashion designer. ; Jean Muir: Jean Muir was born in London, the daughter of Cyril Muir, a draper's floor superintendent, and his wife, Phyllis Coy. Her father was an Aberdonian, and Muir would attribute her creative pragmatism and self-discipline to this Scottish ancestry.[1] Her parents separated while she was still a child, and she and her brother Christopher were brought up in Bedford by their mother. ; Jean Muir: She was educated at the Bedford Girls' Modern School (subsequently renamed Dame Alice Harpur School, and as of 2010, merged into the Bedford Girls' School). She showed a precocious talent for needlework, claiming to have been able to knit, embroider, and sew by the age of six.[1] ; Jean Muir: At the age of seventeen, she left school and went to work at an electoral registration office at Bedford Town Hall. She then moved to London, where she worked briefly in a solicitor's office before taking a stockroom job at Liberty & Co in 1950. She worked her way upwards to selling over the counter, and then despite her lack of formal art college training, was given the opportunity to sketch in Liberty's ready to wear department. This would serve as her apprenticeship, and led to her gaining a job as designer for Jaeger in 1956.[2] While there, she helped develop the Young Jaeger fashion label.[3] ; Jean Muir: Upon leaving Jaeger, Muir was approached by David Barnes, a mass-market jersey dress manufacturer, who was keen to have her talents on board as a designer for his brand. Muir declined, as she did not wish to design for the mass market.[1] Undeterred, Barnes offered to fund her own design label, and so Jane & Jane launched in 1962.[4]
knowledge1: Cierre Wood // Cierre Wood Cierre Marcelle Wood (born February 21, 1991) is a Canadian football running back who is currently a free agent. He played college football at Notre Dame. He has also been a member of the Houston Texans, the New England Patriots, and the Buffalo Bills. Wood attended Santa Clara High School in Oxnard, California. He rushed for 1,632 yards and 20 touchdowns and caught eight passes for 182 yards and four touchdowns as a senior. During his junior year, he had 2,612 yards rushing with 34 touchdowns. Wood was a "USA Today" All-American in 2008. He was also selected; Cierre Wood // their roster on August 19, 2015. On September 4, 2015, he was released by the Bills. On September 6, 2015, the Bills signed Wood to their practice squad. Wood was promoted to the Bills active roster on Friday October 2. However, in Week 5, Wood tore his ACL, ending his season. Wood signed with the Hamilton Tiger-Cats on March 9, 2017. On May 1, 2017 Wood was traded to the Montreal Alouettes along with defensive end Denzell Perine, in exchange for defensive back Khalid Wooten. He was released on May 1, 2018. Cierre Wood Cierre Marcelle Wood (born February 21,; Cierre Wood // 170 yards and 2 touchdowns. In his junior year, he took over the starting role. He recorded 1,102 yards on 217 carries (5.1 AVG) and 9 touchdowns, and 27 receptions for 187 yards. In 2012, Wood had been suspended for the opening two games, against Navy and Purdue, for violating team rules. In the final 11 games, he rushed for 742 yards on 114 carries (6.5 avg) and four touchdowns after splitting carries with classmate Theo Riddick. In January 2013, Wood decided to forgo his final year of eligibility, entering the 2013 NFL Draft. He went undrafted and was signed; Cierre Wood // as a free agent with the Houston Texans hours after the draft. The Texans released Wood, along with two others players, on October 21 for unspecified violations of team rules prior to a game in Kansas City. The New England Patriots signed Wood to their practice squad on November 5, 2013. He was released on December 26, 2013. He was signed by the Ravens to a reserve-future deal on January 15, 2014. The Ravens released Wood on August 25, 2014. He was signed by the Seahawks to the practice squad on November 12, 2014. The Buffalo Bills signed Wood to [sep] knowledge2: Cierre Wood: Cierre Marcelle Wood (born February 21, 1991) is a former American football running back. He played college football at Notre Dame. He was signed as an undrafted free agent by the Houston Texans in 2013. ; Cierre Wood: Wood attended Santa Clara High School in Oxnard, California. He rushed for 1,632 yards and 20 touchdowns and caught eight passes for 182 yards and four touchdowns as a senior. During his junior year, he had 2,612 yards rushing with 34 touchdowns. Wood was a USA Today All-American in 2008. He was also selected to play in the 2009 U.S. Army All-American Bowl in San Antonio, Texas. ; Cierre Wood: After redshirting in the 2009 season, Wood emerged on the depth chart as the No. 2 running back in 2010. He was used sparingly over the first few games, but after an injury to starter Armando Allen, he started the final six games where he recorded 603 yards on 119 carries and three touchdowns, and 20 receptions for 170 yards and 2 touchdowns. In his junior year, he took over the starting role. He recorded 1,102 yards on 217 carries (5.1 AVG) and 9 touchdowns, and 27 receptions for 187 yards. In 2012, Wood had been suspended for the opening two games, against Navy and Purdue, for violating team rules.[2] In the final 11 games, he rushed for 742 yards on 114 carries (6.5 avg) and four touchdowns after splitting carries with classmate Theo Riddick. ; Cierre Wood: In January 2013, Wood decided to forgo his final year of eligibility, entering the 2013 NFL Draft.[3] He went undrafted and was signed as a free agent with the Houston Texans hours after the draft.[4] ; Cierre Wood: The Texans released Wood, along with two others players, on October 21, 2013, for unspecified violations of team rules prior to a game in Kansas City.[5]
knowledge1: Jan-Michael Gambill // Jan-Michael Gambill Jan-Michael Charles Gambill (born June 3, 1977) is an American tennis player who made his professional debut in 1996. His career-high singles ranking is World No. 14, which he achieved on June 18, 2001. Best known for his unusual double-handed forehand, Gambill reached the quarterfinals of the 2000 Wimbledon Championships, the final of the 2001 Miami Masters, and won three singles titles. Gambill spent the early years of his life in the countryside of Spokane, Washington. He currently resides in both Los Angeles, California and Kailua-Kona, Hawaii. While Jan-Michael has been sponsored by car manufacturer Jaguar, he also; Jan-Michael Gambill // 2017 He is currently coaching top 50 player Jared Donaldson on the ATP Tour. "To prevent confusion and double counting, information in this table is updated only after a tournament or the player's participation in the tournament has concluded. This table is current through the 2010 Paris Masters." Jan-Michael Gambill Jan-Michael Charles Gambill (born June 3, 1977) is an American tennis player who made his professional debut in 1996. His career-high singles ranking is World No. 14, which he achieved on June 18, 2001. Best known for his unusual double-handed forehand, Gambill reached the quarterfinals of the 2000 Wimbledon Championships,; Jan-Michael Gambill // supports real life Jaguars and tigers through Cat Tales Zoological Park, an organization dedicated to saving the lives of big cats. Gambill also raised money for his long-time friend Elton John through his charity EJAF. Gambill's high-profile career as a professional athlete has evolved into coaching world-class tennis players as well as being an international analyst for BeIn sports. Gambill was also sponsored by Prince for both his racquets and apparel. Gambill began playing tennis at the age of five, looking up to multiple Grand Slam singles titlists Jimmy Connors and John McEnroe. He has defeated, amongst other top players,; Jan-Michael Gambill // Gaudio, and Thomas Enqvist. He was coached by his father Chuck Gambill, who also coaches Jan-Michael's younger brother Torrey. Throughout his career, Gambill was hampered by numerous injuries. Most prominently, whilst still in the world's top 40, he suffered a recurring shin condition, which severely limited him on the ATP Tour after 2004. He also started serving harder to try and compensate for lack of movement, which resulted in a shoulder injury. Gambill played for the Boston Lobsters in the World Team Tennis league from 2008 on, alongside other successful American players such as Andre Agassi, John Isner, and Robby; Jan-Michael Gambill // Ginepri. In September 2009, Gambill reached the semifinals of the USA F23 Futures tournament (losing to second seed Michael McClune) in his first pro match of the year. He competed in three Challenger events in 2010, and reached the quarterfinals of the USA F25 Futures in Irvine, California. Since October 2010, Gambill has not competed on the pro tour. Gambill was a guest teaching at the Coto de Caza Golf & Tennis club in Southern California in 2010. Since July 2011, he has coached top 10 player Coco Vandeweghe, his former Boston Lobsters teammate, on the WTA Tour. As of [sep] knowledge2: Jan-Michael Gambill: Jan-Michael Charles Gambill (born June 3, 1977) is an American former professional tennis player who made his professional debut in 1996. His career-high singles ranking is world No. 14, which he achieved on June 18, 2001. Best known for his unusual double-handed forehand,[1] Gambill reached the quarterfinals of the 2000 Wimbledon Championships, the final of the 2001 Miami Masters, and won three singles titles. ; Jan-Michael Gambill: Gambill spent the early years of his life in the countryside of Spokane, Washington. He currently resides in both Los Angeles and Kailua-Kona, Hawaii with his partner, architect and developer Malek Alqadi. While Jan-Michael has been sponsored by car manufacturer Jaguar, he also supports real-life Jaguars and tigers through Cat Tales Zoological Park, an organization dedicated to saving the lives of big cats. Gambill has also raised money for his long-time friend Sir Elton John's charity, the Elton John AIDS Foundation. ; Jan-Michael Gambill: Gambill's high-profile career as a professional athlete has evolved into coaching world-class tennis players as well as being an international analyst for BeIn sports. Gambill was also sponsored by Prince for both his racquets and apparel. ; Jan-Michael Gambill: Gambill began playing tennis at the age of five, looking up to multiple Grand Slam singles titlists Jimmy Connors and John McEnroe. He has defeated, amongst other top players, former World No. 1s, Roger Federer, Carlos Moyá, Lleyton Hewitt, Gustavo Kuerten, Marcelo Ríos, Jim Courier, Pete Sampras, and Andre Agassi, as well as Grand Slam champions Michael Chang, Thomas Johansson, Sergi Bruguera, and Gastón Gaudio. His best performances at Grand Slams have been reaching the quarterfinals of Wimbledon in 2000 and the fourth round of the US Open in 2002. His run at Wimbledon in 2000 saw him beat Lleyton Hewitt, Fabrice Santoro, Paul Goldstein and Thomas Enqvist before losing to eventual champion Pete Sampras. His run to the final of the 2001 Miami Masters included wins over Hewitt, Gaudio, and Thomas Enqvist. He was coached by his father Chuck Gambill (1947–2020), who coached Jan-Michael's younger brother Torrey, who was also pro tennis player.[2] ; Jan-Michael Gambill: Throughout his career, Gambill was hampered by numerous injuries. Most prominently, while still in the world's top 40, he suffered a recurring shin condition, which severely limited him on the ATP Tour after 2004.[3] He also started serving harder to try and compensate for lack of movement, which resulted in a shoulder injury.[4][5]
knowledge1: Ryan Brasier // Ryan Brasier Ryan David Brasier (born August 26, 1987) is an American professional baseball pitcher for the Boston Red Sox of Major League Baseball (MLB). Listed at and , he both throws and bats right-handed. Brasier previously played for the Los Angeles Angels and for the Hiroshima Toyo Carp of Nippon Professional Baseball. Brasier attended Rider High School in Wichita Falls, Texas, and Weatherford College in Weatherford, Texas. The Angels selected him in the sixth round of the 2007 Major League Baseball Draft. From 2007 through 2013, Brasier pitched for various Angels farm teams, starting with the Rookie League Orem; Ryan Brasier // his first MLB win, pitching an inning of scoreless relief in a come-from-behind victory over the Chicago White Sox. Brasier proved to be a consistent reliever down the stretch, finishing with a 1.60 ERA in 34 appearances. , or Retrosheet Ryan Brasier Ryan David Brasier (born August 26, 1987) is an American professional baseball pitcher for the Boston Red Sox of Major League Baseball (MLB). Listed at and , he both throws and bats right-handed. Brasier previously played for the Los Angeles Angels and for the Hiroshima Toyo Carp of Nippon Professional Baseball. Brasier attended Rider High School in Wichita; Ryan Brasier // Owlz and reaching the Triple-A Salt Lake Bees. He made a career-high 55 appearances (all in relief) with the Bees in 2012, recording 13 saves along with a 7–3 record, 54 strikeouts, and 24 walks in innings pitched. The Angels promoted Brasier to the major leagues for the first time on May 1, 2013. He made his MLB debut the next day, pitching an inning of relief against the Baltimore Orioles, allowing two runs on two hits. After making one additional appearance in May, he returned to the minors and was recalled in September when the major league rosters expanded;; Ryan Brasier // he made five appearances during the month. Overall, with the 2013 Angels, Brasier made seven appearances, striking out seven and walking four in nine innings pitched with a 2.00 ERA. Brasier was outrighted off of the Angels 40-man roster on October 28, 2014. On July 7, 2015, Brasier signed a minor league deal with the Oakland Athletics. He spent 2015 and 2016 in Oakland's farm system, including 46 relief appearances with the Triple-A Nashville Sounds in 2016, recording a 3.56 ERA in innings. The Athletics sold his contract to the Hiroshima Toyo Carp of Nippon Professional Baseball on December 14, [sep] knowledge2: Ryan Brasier: Ryan David Brasier (born August 26, 1987) is an American professional baseball pitcher who is  a free agent. He has played in Major League Baseball (MLB) for the Los Angeles Angels, Boston Red Sox and Los Angeles Dodgers, and in Nippon Professional Baseball (NPB) for the Hiroshima Toyo Carp. Listed at 6 feet 0 inches (1.83 m) and 225 pounds (102 kg), he both throws and bats right-handed. ; Ryan Brasier: Brasier attended Rider High School in Wichita Falls, Texas, and Weatherford College in Weatherford, Texas. ; Ryan Brasier: The Angels promoted Brasier to the major leagues for the first time on May 1, 2013.[2] He made his MLB debut the next day, pitching an inning of relief against the Baltimore Orioles, allowing two runs on two hits.[3] After making one additional appearance in May, he returned to the minors and was recalled in September when the major league rosters expanded; he made five appearances during the month. Overall, with the 2013 Angels, Brasier made seven appearances, striking out seven and walking four in nine innings pitched with a 2.00 ERA.[4] Brasier was outrighted off of the Angels 40-man roster on October 28, 2014.[5] ; Ryan Brasier: The Athletics sold his contract to the Hiroshima Toyo Carp of Nippon Professional Baseball on December 14, 2016.[7] With the Carp in 2017, Brasier made 26 relief appearances; in 30 innings of work he struck out 19, walked eight, and had a 3.00 ERA. ; Ryan Brasier: On March 4, 2018, Brasier signed a minor-league contract with the Boston Red Sox.[8] Pitching for the Pawtucket Red Sox of the Triple-A International League, he was selected to appear in the Triple-A All-Star Game.[9] The Red Sox promoted Brasier to the major leagues on July 8;[10] he made his Boston debut the next day, pitching one inning against the Texas Rangers and retiring the side in order.[11] On August 30, Brasier recorded his first MLB win, pitching an inning of scoreless relief in a come-from-behind victory over the Chicago White Sox.[12] Brasier proved to be a consistent reliever down the stretch, finishing with a 1.60 ERA in 34 appearances, and was the recipient of the Red Sox' Lou Gorman Award.[13] Brasier was included on Boston's postseason roster, making a total of nine appearances and allowing one earned run in 8+2⁄3 innings, as Boston went on to win the World Series.[14]
knowledge1: Mark Murphy (singer) // Mark Murphy (singer) Mark Howe Murphy (March 14, 1932 – October 22, 2015) was an American jazz singer based at various times in New York City, Los Angeles, London, and San Francisco. He recorded 47 albums under his own name during his lifetime and was principally known for his innovative vocal improvisations. He was the recipient of the 1996, 1997, 2000, and 2001 "Down Beat" magazine readers' jazz poll for Best Male Vocalist and was also nominated five times for the Grammy Award for Best Vocal Jazz Performance. He wrote lyrics to the jazz tunes "Stolen Moments" and "Red Clay".; Mark Murphy (singer) // for television of "Casey at the Bat". He also twice took second place at Apollo Theatre amateur singing contests. Murphy was eventually introduced to record producer Milt Gabler, who was an artist and repertoire director (A&R) for Decca. His resulting debut recording was "Meet Mark Murphy" (1956), followed closely by "Let Yourself Go" (1957). After disappointing album sales, in 1958 Murphy moved to Los Angeles, where he recorded three albums for Capitol Records, and had a minor hit single with "This Could Be the Start of Something". But this was not enough for him to be retained by Capitol, so; Mark Murphy (singer) // generations and styles. In August 1997, BMG/RCA Victor released "Song For The Geese", for which he received his fifth and final Grammy nomination. In that same month, the 32 Records label released a double CD anthology "Stolen and Other Moments", which features some of his recordings for the now defunct Muse label. The CD features material from the two "Kerouac" albums and a selection of "the best of Mark Murphy". It was followed by three further anthologies. After Muse boss Joe Fields sold the label and set up HighNote Records in its place, Murphy recorded five more albums for the; Mark Murphy (singer) // band, appearing on their albums "Chasin' the Jazz Gone By" (2005) and "Hot Corner" (2008). In 2010 he released the independently produced CD, "Never Let Me Go", accompanied by pianist Misha Piatigorsky, bassist Danton Boller and drummer Chris Wabich. The CD contains all songs he selected, mostly ballads, and was the first time he recorded Bill Evans' "Turn Out The Stars". Murphy also participated as a guest on "The Royal Bopsters Project" by Amy London, Darmon Meader, Dylan Pramuk, and Holli Ross, recorded in 2012 and released in 2015 by Motema Music. His final recording was a limited edition EP/MP3, [sep] knowledge2: Mark Murphy: Murphy died on October 22, 2015 in Englewood, New Jersey, aged 83.[1]
knowledge1: Jennifer Paz // Jennifer Paz Jennifer Paz-Fedorov (born April 24, 1974) is a Filipina-born American actress. She is mostly known for her recurring role as Lapis Lazuli in "Steven Universe". The youngest of four children, Paz moved with her family at the age of 5 from the Philippines to Seattle, where her mother's brother was living at the time. After completing her freshman year at the University of Washington in Seattle, Paz - then at the age of 21 - played the alternate of the lead role of Kim in the 1st National "Miss Saigon" US Tour. Since this professional debut, Paz has; Jennifer Paz // received multi-award nominations and wins including a 2008 LA Stage Alliance Ovation Award for Best Lead Actress. In 2013, Paz returned to playing the lead role of Kim in Miss Saigon at the Casa Mañana theatre. Paz is known for providing the voice of Lapis Lazuli and part of the voice of Malachite on the Cartoon Network television series, "Steven Universe". Paz became engaged to boyfriend Anthony Fedorov on December 25, 2012. Their son, Julian Paz Fedorov, was born on April 1, 2013. Jennifer Paz Jennifer Paz-Fedorov (born April 24, 1974) is a Filipina-born American actress. She is mostly known [sep] knowledge2: Jennifer Paz: Jennifer Paz-Fedorov (born April 23, 1973) is an American actress, writer and producer.[1] She is mostly known for her recurring role as Lapis Lazuli in Steven Universe and Steven Universe Future. ; Jennifer Paz: The youngest of four children, Paz moved with her family at the age of 5 from the Philippines to Seattle, where her mother's brother was living at the time. ; Jennifer Paz: After completing her freshman year at the University of Washington in Seattle, Paz - then at the age of 21 - played the alternate of the lead role of Kim in the 1st National Miss Saigon US Tour.[2] Since this professional debut, Paz has received multi-award nominations and wins including a 2008 LA Stage Alliance Ovation Award for Best Lead Actress, and has since reprised her role in Miss Saigon in various regional productions. She appeared on Broadway in Les Miserables and in the pre-Broadway run of David Henry Hwang's revised Flower Drum Song at the Los Angeles Mark Taper Forum in the role of Mei-Li during the production's celebrated 5-week extension. ; Jennifer Paz: In 2013, Paz returned to playing the lead role of Kim in Miss Saigon at the Casa Mañana theatre.[3] ; Jennifer Paz: Paz is known for providing the voice of Lapis Lazuli and part of the voice of Malachite on the Cartoon Network  television series, Steven Universe. Paz is a recipient of the 2022/23 NAMT (National Alliance of Musical Theatre) Writers Residency Grant and winner of the Outstanding Screenplays TV Pilot Competition 2021 for her original comedy "Proud Marys."
knowledge1: Bobby Thomson // Bobby Thomson Robert Brown Thomson (October 25, 1923 – August 16, 2010) was a Scottish-born American professional baseball player nicknamed "The Staten Island Scot". He was an outfielder and right-handed batter for the New York Giants (1946–53, 1957), Milwaukee Braves (1954–57), Chicago Cubs (1958–59), Boston Red Sox (1960), and Baltimore Orioles (1960). His pennant-winning three-run home run for the Giants in 1951 is popularly known as the "Shot Heard 'Round the World" and is one of the most famous moments in baseball history. It overshadowed his other accomplishments, including eight 20-home run seasons and three All Star selections. "It was [sep] knowledge2: Bobby Thomson: Robert Brown Thomson (October 25, 1923 – August 16, 2010) was a Scottish-born American professional baseball player, nicknamed "the Staten Island Scot".[1] He was an outfielder and right-handed batter for the New York Giants (1946–53, 1957), Milwaukee Braves (1954–57), Chicago Cubs (1958–59), Boston Red Sox (1960), and Baltimore Orioles (1960). His pennant-winning three-run home run for the Giants in 1951 is popularly known as the "Shot Heard 'Round the World", and is one of the most famous moments in baseball history. It overshadowed his other accomplishments, including eight 20-home-run seasons and three All-Star selections.  "It was the best thing that ever happened to me", he said.  "It may have been the best thing that ever happened to anybody."[2] ; Bobby Thomson: Thomson was born in the Townhead area of Glasgow, Scotland, United Kingdom. He was the youngest of six children born to parents James and Elizabeth.[3] He arrived in the United States two years later. James, a cabinet maker, had moved to New York City shortly before Bobby's birth and sent for his family in 1925. ; Bobby Thomson: Thomson grew up on Staten Island in New York City and signed with the New York Giants for a $100 bonus right out of Curtis High School in 1942.[4] On December 5, 1942, he joined the United States Army Air Forces and trained as a bombardier. His entire service was within the continental United States. He played semiprofessional baseball in the summer of 1945 while awaiting his discharge.[1] ; Bobby Thomson: The bat from the "Shot Heard 'Round the World" is in the collection of the National Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum in Cooperstown, New York. The uniform worn by Thomson on that day is apparently a part of a large private collection owned by Dan Scheinman, a member of the San Francisco Giants ownership group.[7] ; Bobby Thomson: In the 1990s, over 40 years after his famous home run, Thomson received a letter from a Marine who had been stationed in Korea in 1951:
knowledge1: Sally Hemings // of whom survived to adulthood. The Thomas Jefferson Foundation (TJF), which runs Monticello, conducted an independent historic review in 2000, as did the National Genealogical Society in 2001; scholars concluded Jefferson was probably the father of all Hemings' children. In an article that appeared in "Science," eight weeks after the DNA study, Eugene Foster, the lead co-author of the DNA study, is reported to have "made it clear that Thomas was only one of eight or more Jeffersons who may have fathered Eston Hemings". In an interview in 2000, the historian Annette Gordon-Reed said of the change in historical scholarship [sep] knowledge2: Thomas Jefferson: Jefferson was interred at Monticello, under an epitaph that he wrote: ; Jefferson Thomas: Jefferson Allison Thomas (September 19, 1942 – September 5, 2010) was one of the Little Rock Nine, a group of African-American students who, in 1957, were the first black students ever to attend classes at Little Rock Central High School in Little Rock, Arkansas. In 1999, Thomas and the other students of the Little Rock Nine were awarded the Congressional Gold Medal by President Bill Clinton. ; Jefferson Thomas: On September 4, 1957, the Little Rock Nine made an unsuccessful attempt to enter Central High School, which had been segregated. The Arkansas National Guard, under orders from the governor, and an angry mob of about 400 surrounded the school and prevented them from going in. On September 23, 1957, a mob of about 1000 people surrounded the school again as the students attempted to enter. The following day, President Dwight D. Eisenhower took control of the Arkansas National Guard from the governor and sent federal troops to accompany the students to school for protection. Both federal troops and federalized National Guard soldiers were deployed at the school for the entirety of the school year. ; Jefferson Thomas: Thomas narrated the United States Information Agency's 1964 film Nine from Little Rock. In the film Thomas said, "If Little Rock taught us nothing more, it taught us that problems can make us better. Much better." The goal of this government film, in the context of the Cold War, was to show, to countries concerned about American racism, the progress the United States had made with respect to civil rights. It achieved this goal at least in part as the film received wide acclaim (including an Academy Award) and was distributed to 97 countries.[2] ; Jefferson Thomas: Thomas resided in Columbus, Ohio with his wife, Mary. He served as a volunteer mentor in the Village to Child Program co-sponsored by Ohio Dominican University, where he received his Honorary Degree, "Doctor of Humane Letters", on May 13, 2001, for his lifelong efforts in human rights and equality advancement.
knowledge1: Mike Melvill // Mike Melvill Michael Winston "Mike" Melvill (born November 30, 1940 Johannesburg ) is a world-record-breaking pilot and one of the test pilots for SpaceShipOne, the experimental spaceplane developed by Scaled Composites. Melvill piloted SpaceShipOne on its first flight past the edge of space, flight 15P on June 21, 2004, thus becoming the first commercial astronaut and the 434th person to go into space. He was also the pilot on SpaceShipOne's flight 16P, the first competitive flight in the Ansari X Prize competition. In 1978, Melvill met aerospace designer and Scaled Composites founder Burt Rutan when he flew to California to; Mike Melvill // He was awarded the Iven C. Kincheloe Award in 1999 for high altitude, developmental flight-testing of the model 281 Proteus aircraft. Through SpaceShipOne flight 15P in 2004, he is known as the first privately funded human spaceflight mission pilot to reach space. Mike Melvill Michael Winston "Mike" Melvill (born November 30, 1940 Johannesburg ) is a world-record-breaking pilot and one of the test pilots for SpaceShipOne, the experimental spaceplane developed by Scaled Composites. Melvill piloted SpaceShipOne on its first flight past the edge of space, flight 15P on June 21, 2004, thus becoming the first commercial astronaut and the 434th [sep] knowledge2: Mike Melvill: Michael Winston Melvill (born November 30, 1940, in Johannesburg, South Africa)[1] is a world-record-breaking pilot[2]  and one of the test pilots for SpaceShipOne, the experimental spaceplane developed by Scaled Composites. Melvill piloted SpaceShipOne on its first flight past the edge of space, flight 15P on June 21, 2004,[3] thus becoming the first commercial astronaut, and the 435th person to go into space.[4] He was also the pilot on SpaceShipOne's flight 16P, the first competitive flight in the Ansari X Prize competition.[5] ; Mike Melvill: In 1978, Melvill met aerospace designer and Scaled Composites founder Burt Rutan when he flew to California to show Rutan the VariViggen he had built at his home. Rutan then hired him on the spot. In 1982, he was named Rutan's lead test pilot.[6] ; Mike Melvill: In 1997, Melvill and Dick Rutan, Burt's brother, flew two Long-Eze aircraft that they built side-by-side around the world. This "around the world in 80 nights" flight was called The Spirit of EAA Friendship World Tour, and some legs of it lasted for over 14 hours.[7] ; Mike Melvill: Mike Melvill holds FAA Commercial certificate, ASEL, AMEL, instrument airplane, rotorcraft-helicopter, glider and now astronaut.[8] ; Mike Melvill: As of January, 2020, Melvill is the sole or joint holder of ten FAI aviation world records in various categories.[9]
knowledge1: George Eacker // George Eacker George I. Eacker ( 1774 – January 4, 1804) was a New York lawyer. He fatally shot Philip Hamilton, the oldest son of Alexander Hamilton and Elizabeth Schuyler Hamilton, in a duel on November 23, 1801, in Weehawken, New Jersey. Eacker was born in Palatine, New York. He was the son of Jacob Eacker, who fought in the American Revolution and served as a county judge and New York State Assemblyman, and Anna Margaret Finck, daughter of Andreas Finck. He had one younger brother, Jacob I., and four sisters. He attended a preparatory school in Schenectady, New York,; George Eacker // and graduated from Columbia College in 1793. He then studied law under Henry Brockholst Livingston, a future Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. Eacker was admitted to the New York bar at age 21. He soon built his practice in Manhattan into a lucrative business, allowing him to take a house on Wall Street and employ a married couple as his valet and housekeeper. He gained popularity in New York City's well-to-do social circles as a lawyer, Freemason, cavalry captain, and fire brigade inspector. For an unknown offense in 1798, which historian Eric Monkkonen interprets as; George Eacker // tuberculosis. According to Eacker's brother, the prolonged illness began in January 1802 on a bitterly cold night when Eacker fought a raging fire with his brigade, and contracted a severe cold that "settled upon his lungs" until his death. His remains were interred at St. Paul's Chapel with military honors, and his funeral procession included members of the military, fire brigade, and the Howard Lodge of Freemasons. Eacker and his fiancée never married. In January 1808, Harriet Livingston married the steamboat inventor Robert Fulton, with whom she had four children. Eacker appeared as a minor character in the 2015 Broadway; George Eacker // an earlier duel or conflict, Eacker appeared in court and paid a recognizance, likely as a bond for good behavior. In 1801, Eacker was appointed as a master in the New York Court of Chancery, then the highest court in the state. Eacker was selected in 1801 to deliver the Fourth of July oration at an Independence Day celebration held in New York City by a brigade of the New York State Militia, the Tammany Society, and two of the city's labor organizations, the Mechanics' Society and Coopers' Society. The Tammany Society, better known as Tammany Hall, was a Democratic-Republican; George Eacker // musical "Hamilton", in which the musical number "Blow Us All Away" dramatized his duel with Philip Hamilton. The role of Eacker was originated on Broadway by a member of the show's ensemble, Ephraim M. Sykes, who also appears as Eacker on the original cast recording. George Eacker George I. Eacker ( 1774 – January 4, 1804) was a New York lawyer. He fatally shot Philip Hamilton, the oldest son of Alexander Hamilton and Elizabeth Schuyler Hamilton, in a duel on November 23, 1801, in Weehawken, New Jersey. Eacker was born in Palatine, New York. He was the son of Jacob [sep] knowledge2: George Eacker: George I. Eacker (c. 1774 – January 4, 1804) was a New York lawyer. He is best known for having fatally shot Philip Hamilton, the eldest son of Alexander Hamilton and Elizabeth Schuyler Hamilton, in a duel on November 23, 1801, in  Weehawken, New Jersey.[1][2] ; George Eacker: Eacker was born in Palatine in what was then the colonial-era Province of New York.[3] He was the son of Jacob Eacker, who fought in the American Revolution and served as a county judge and a member of the New York State Assembly, and Anna Margaret Finck, daughter of Andreas Finck.[4][5] He had one younger brother, Jacob I., and four sisters.[5] ; George Eacker: He attended a preparatory school in Schenectady, New York,[5] and graduated from Columbia College in 1793.[6] He then studied law under Henry Brockholst Livingston, a future Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. ; George Eacker: Eacker was admitted to the New York bar at 21. He soon built his practice in Manhattan into a lucrative business, which allowed him to take a house on Wall Street and to employ a married couple as his valet and housekeeper.[4] He gained popularity in New York City's well-to-do social circles as a lawyer, Freemason, cavalry captain, and fire brigade inspector.[4] ; George Eacker: For an unknown offense in 1798, which the historian Eric Henry Monkkonen interprets as an earlier duel or conflict, Eacker appeared in court and paid a recognizance, likely as a bond for good behavior.[7]
knowledge1: Jeff Beukeboom // Jeff Beukeboom Jeffrey Scott Beukeboom (born March 28, 1965) is a Canadian professional ice hockey coach and former player in the National Hockey League (NHL). He played as a defenceman for the Edmonton Oilers and New York Rangers. Beukeboom played junior hockey for the Sault Ste. Marie Greyhounds (1982–1985). After being selected in the first round (19th overall) of the 1983 NHL Entry Draft by the Edmonton Oilers, he played in juniors for two more years before joining the Oilers. While playing for the Oilers, he won three Stanley Cups, and was known as a hard-hitting defenceman. Beukeboom was traded; Jeff Beukeboom // played, and is currently second all-time on the Rangers' penalty minutes list. Even after retiring, he continued to suffer post-concussion symptoms for almost two years before recovering. Beukeboom returned to hockey as an assistant coach for the Toronto Roadrunners American Hockey League (AHL) for the 2003–04 season. In 2005, he became the president and part owner of the Lindsay Muskies of the Ontario Provincial Junior "A" Hockey League, and in 2008, Beukeboom became an assistant coach for the Barrie Colts of the Ontario Hockey League (OHL) and worked in both teams. In June 2009, Beukeboom was named the assistant coach; Jeff Beukeboom // the team in penalty minutes three times (1992–93, 1993–94, 1995–96) and won his last with the Rangers in 1994. He was also known for his philanthropy, including Ice Hockey in Harlem. Beukeboom won the Rangers' Crumb Bum Award, given for service to local youngsters, in 1996. While with the Rangers, Beukeboom also appeared in a memorable "This is Sportscenter" spot in which he assaults ESPN's Steve Levy after being told Levy had referred to Beukeboom as "Puke-a-boom." Due to his physical play, Beukeboom suffered multiple concussions, the most devastating of which came as a result of a sucker punch by; Jeff Beukeboom // second cousin of Adam Beukeboom. He is the uncle of Johnny and Scott McGuire. Johnny played in the Ontario Hockey League (OHL), American Hockey League (AHL), and ECHL, while Scott spent two seasons in the Central Ontario Junior C Hockey League. Jeff Beukeboom Jeffrey Scott Beukeboom (born March 28, 1965) is a Canadian professional ice hockey coach and former player in the National Hockey League (NHL). He played as a defenceman for the Edmonton Oilers and New York Rangers. Beukeboom played junior hockey for the Sault Ste. Marie Greyhounds (1982–1985). After being selected in the first round (19th overall) of; Jeff Beukeboom // from the Edmonton Oilers to the New York Rangers on November 12, 1991. At the time, neither the Rangers nor Oilers made any announcement to indicate that Beukeboom was part of the Mark Messier trade. At and , Beukeboom quickly established himself as a fan favourite and an anchor of the defence with his bodychecks and willingness to protect his teammates, through fighting if necessary. He played on the top defensive pairing with Brian Leetch, and was an alternate captain. Beukeboom's stay-at-home play allowed Leetch to lead the rush and kept opposing players out of the goal crease. He led [sep] knowledge2: Jeff Beukeboom: Jeffrey Scott Beukeboom (/buːkəbuːm/ BOO-kə-boom; born March 28, 1965) is a Canadian professional ice hockey coach and former player in the National Hockey League (NHL). He played as a defenceman for the Edmonton Oilers and New York Rangers between 1986 and 1999. ; Jeff Beukeboom: Beukeboom played junior hockey for the Sault Ste. Marie Greyhounds (1982–1985). After being selected in the first round (19th overall) of the 1983 NHL Entry Draft by the Edmonton Oilers, he played in juniors for two more years before joining the Oilers. While playing for the Oilers, he won three Stanley Cups, and was known as a hard-hitting defenceman. ; Jeff Beukeboom: Beukeboom was traded from the Edmonton Oilers to the New York Rangers on November 12, 1991.[1] At the time, neither the Rangers nor Oilers made any announcement to indicate that Beukeboom was part of the Mark Messier trade.[2] He played on the top defensive pairing with Brian Leetch, and was an alternate captain. Beukeboom's stay-at-home play allowed Leetch to lead the rush and kept opposing players out of the goal crease. He led the team in penalty minutes three times (1992–93, 1993–94, 1995–96) and won his last Stanley Cup with the Rangers in 1994. He was also known for his philanthropy, including Ice Hockey in Harlem. Beukeboom won the Rangers' Crumb Bum Award, given for service to local youngsters, in 1996.[3] ; Jeff Beukeboom: While with the Rangers, Beukeboom also appeared in a memorable This is Sportscenter spot in which he assaults ESPN's Steve Levy after being told Levy had referred to Beukeboom as "Puke-a-boom."[4] ; Jeff Beukeboom: Due to his physical play, Beukeboom suffered multiple concussions, the most devastating of which came as a result of a sucker punch by Matt Johnson of the Los Angeles Kings in November 1998.[5] Johnson received a 12-game suspension for intent to injure.[6] While Beukeboom returned after a few games off, he bumped his head again in a minor collision with Martin Gelinas in February 1999 and he was forced to miss the rest of the season.[7] Afterward, Beukeboom was left with recurrent headaches, memory loss, nausea, and mental fogginess that lasted for months. He was diagnosed with post-concussion syndrome, and ordered to never play hockey again. Beukeboom officially retired in July 1999 with a total of 1,890 NHL penalty minutes in 804 games played, and is currently second all-time on the Rangers' penalty minutes list.[8][9] After retiring, he continued to suffer post-concussion symptoms for almost two years before recovering.
knowledge1: Mindy Smith // Mindy Smith Mindy Smith (born June 1, 1972, Long Island, New York) is an American singer-songwriter. Her first record deal came after she sang a cover version of the song "Jolene" by Dolly Parton. Smith was adopted at birth by a non-denominational Protestant minister and his wife, who was choir director at the church. She grew up on Long Island, New York. After her mother died of cancer in 1991, Smith attended Cincinnati Bible College for two years. Smith and her father moved to Knoxville, Tennessee, where she began listening to folk and bluegrass music, Alison Krauss, and the Cox; Mindy Smith // raise money and awareness for the Captain Planet Foundation, a non-profit organization. Anthropologie donated fifteen percent of sales made in the first hour after Smith's performance to CPF. Mindy Smith Mindy Smith (born June 1, 1972, Long Island, New York) is an American singer-songwriter. Her first record deal came after she sang a cover version of the song "Jolene" by Dolly Parton. Smith was adopted at birth by a non-denominational Protestant minister and his wife, who was choir director at the church. She grew up on Long Island, New York. After her mother died of cancer in 1991, Smith attended; Mindy Smith // Family. In 1998, she moved to Nashville to pursue a career in music. Two years later, she reached the finals of a contest at the Kerrville Folk Festival. This led to a contract with Big Yellow Dog Music. Smith attracted attention in 2003 when she sang a cover version of "Jolene" by Dolly Parton for the tribute album "". Soon after, she signed a contract with Vanguard Records, who released her debut album, "One Moment More" in 2004. In addition to Dolly Parton, she has expressed admiration for John Prine, Alison Krauss, Patty Griffin, Shania Twain, Kris Kristofferson, Buddy Miller,; Mindy Smith // with Jay Leno". In October 2007, Smith released a Christmas album, "My Holiday". She wrote six original songs, including "I Know the Reason" with Thad Cockrell. In August 2009, Smith released her fourth studio album, "Stupid Love". She appeared on "The Early Show" on August 15, 2009 to perform the first single, "Highs and Lows". On September 29, 2009, while promoting the album on the syndicated radio show "World Cafe", she disclosed that she had obsessive–compulsive disorder. In June 2012, Smith released an independent studio album, "Mindy Smith". In March 2013, Smith worked with Anthropologie during an in-store performance to [sep] knowledge2: Mindy Smith: Melinda Leigh Smith (born June 1, 1972, Long Island, New York) is an American singer-songwriter. Her first record deal came after she sang a cover version of the song "Jolene" by Dolly Parton. ; Mindy Smith: Smith was adopted at birth by a non-denominational Protestant minister and his wife, who was choir director at the church. She grew up on Long Island, New York. After her mother died of cancer in 1991, Smith attended Cincinnati Bible College for two years.[1] ; Mindy Smith: Smith and her father moved to Knoxville, Tennessee, where she began listening to folk and bluegrass music, Alison Krauss, and the Cox Family. In 1998, she moved to Nashville to pursue a career in music. Two years later, she reached the finals of a contest at the Kerrville Folk Festival. This led to a contract with Big Yellow Dog Music.[2] ; Mindy Smith: Smith attracted attention in 2003 when she sang a cover version of "Jolene" by Dolly Parton for the tribute album Just Because I'm a Woman. Soon after, she signed a contract with Vanguard Records, who released her debut album, One Moment More in 2004.[2] In addition to Dolly Parton, she has expressed admiration for John Prine, Alison Krauss, Patty Griffin, Shania Twain, Kris Kristofferson, Buddy Miller, and Bill Gaither.[1] ; Mindy Smith: "Come to Jesus" was her biggest hit, receiving airplay on country, Christian, adult album alternative (AAA), and adult contemporary radio. The song charted at No. 32 on the Adult Top 40 chart of Billboard magazine.[citation needed] In 2004 Smith appeared at the Cambridge Folk Festival in the U.K., which was broadcast nationally on BBC Radio.
knowledge1: Deitrick Haddon // Deitrick Haddon Deitrick Vaughn Haddon (born May 17, 1973) is an American gospel singer, songwriter, music producer, pastor, and actor. He is best known for progressive gospel, and contemporary styles of music. He is also one of the cast members in Oxygen's reality television show "Preachers of L.A." Haddon launched his solo career as a Christian R&B vocalist with the "Lost & Found" on Tyscot/Verity in 2002. The set peaked at No. 1 on Billboard's Top Gospel Charts and received wide critical acclaim and spawned the hit "Sinner's Prayer" which was played extensively on gospel and mainstream R&B radio stations.; Deitrick Haddon // II. His first wife was called Damita Deitrick Haddon Deitrick Vaughn Haddon (born May 17, 1973) is an American gospel singer, songwriter, music producer, pastor, and actor. He is best known for progressive gospel, and contemporary styles of music. He is also one of the cast members in Oxygen's reality television show "Preachers of L.A." Haddon launched his solo career as a Christian R&B vocalist with the "Lost & Found" on Tyscot/Verity in 2002. The set peaked at No. 1 on Billboard's Top Gospel Charts and received wide critical acclaim and spawned the hit "Sinner's Prayer" which was played extensively; Deitrick Haddon // and his brother Gerald also produced the comeback album "Brand New Day" for veteran gospel vocalist Vanessa Bell Armstrong. Deitrick Haddon & Voices of Unity's "Live the Life" won Gospel Music Workshop of America Excellence Awards for "New Artist of the Year—Urban Contemporary" and "Album of the Year—Urban Contemporary". On September 2, 2008, Haddon released an album called "Revealed". This album includes the popular single, "Love Him Like I Do" (featuring Mary Mary and Ruben Studdard). On July 27, 2010 Haddon made his film debut in a movie released directly to DVD called "Blessed and Cursed". On January 25, 2012, [sep] knowledge2: Deitrick Haddon: Deitrick Vaughn Haddon (born May 17, 1973) is an American gospel singer, songwriter, pianist, arranger, record producer, and pastor. He is best known for progressive gospel, and contemporary styles of music. He was also one of the cast members in Oxygen's reality television show Preachers of L.A. ; Deitrick Haddon: Haddon launched his solo career as a Christian R&B vocalist with the Lost & Found on Tyscot/Verity in 2002. The set peaked at No. 1 on Billboard's Top Gospel Charts[1] and received wide critical acclaim and spawned the hit "Sinner's Prayer" which was played extensively on gospel and mainstream R&B radio stations.[2] ; Deitrick Haddon: The 1970s-leaning Crossroads followed in 2004, led off by the upbeat single "God is Good". In an uncharacteristic move for marketing a gospel album, Haddon made an appearance on the long-running syndicated series Soul Train performing the single and the title track from the album.[3] ; Deitrick Haddon: Haddon appeared to be pushing his Gospel artistry further into the ranks of mainstream venues with 7 Days, released October 10, 2006. 7 Days was produced almost entirely by R&B producers Tim & Bob[4] Balancing out the contemporary bulk of the album is the traditional gospel-flavored lead single "Heaven Knows" which Haddon produced himself. ; Deitrick Haddon: Haddon and his brother Gerald also produced the comeback album Brand New Day for veteran gospel vocalist Vanessa Bell Armstrong. Deitrick Haddon & Voices of Unity's Live the Life won Gospel Music Workshop of America Excellence Awards for "New Artist of the Year—Urban Contemporary" and "Album of the Year—Urban Contemporary".
knowledge1: Joe McGinniss // Joe McGinniss Joseph Ralph McGinniss, Sr. (December 9, 1942 – March 10, 2014) was an American non-fiction writer and novelist. The author of twelve books, he first came to prominence with the best-selling "The Selling of the President 1968" which described the marketing of then-presidential candidate Richard Nixon. He is popularly known for his trilogy of bestselling true crime books — "Fatal Vision", "Blind Faith" and "Cruel Doubt" — which were adapted into TV miniseries in the 1980s and 90s. His last book was "The Rogue: Searching for the Real Sarah Palin", an account of Sarah Palin, the former governor; Joe McGinniss // such as "The New York Times", Associated Press, "The Washington Post", The Dish, and others. "The New York Times" Public Editor Margaret Sullivan wrote: Joe McGinniss Joseph Ralph McGinniss, Sr. (December 9, 1942 – March 10, 2014) was an American non-fiction writer and novelist. The author of twelve books, he first came to prominence with the best-selling "The Selling of the President 1968" which described the marketing of then-presidential candidate Richard Nixon. He is popularly known for his trilogy of bestselling true crime books — "Fatal Vision", "Blind Faith" and "Cruel Doubt" — which were adapted into TV miniseries in; Joe McGinniss // something he later pointed to with pride, he became a general assignment reporter at the "Worcester Telegram". He left within a year to become a sportswriter for the "Philadelphia Bulletin" before joining "The Philadelphia Inquirer" as a general interest columnist. In 1979, he became a writer-in-residence at the "Los Angeles Herald Examiner". From 1982 to 1985, he taught creative writing at Bennington College in Vermont. While at Bennington, his students included Donna Tartt and Bret Easton Ellis. At the time of his death, "The New York Times" described him as a "gregarious man who was generous with other writers." McGinniss's; Joe McGinniss // of Alaska who was the 2008 Republican vice-presidential nominee. McGinniss was born in Manhattan, the only child of travel agent Joseph A. McGinniss and Mary (nee Leonard), a secretary at CBS. He was raised in Forest Hills, Queens, and Rye, New York. In his youth he was given a chance to pick a middle name and chose Ralph, after the baseball player Ralph Kiner. McGinniss attended Archbishop Stepinac High School in White Plains and graduated in 1964 from the College of the Holy Cross in Worcester, Massachusetts. After his application to the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism was rejected, [sep] knowledge2: Joe McGinniss: Joseph Ralph McGinniss Sr. (December 9, 1942 – March 10, 2014) was an American non-fiction writer and novelist. ; Joe McGinniss: The author of twelve books, he first came to prominence with the best-selling The Selling of the President 1968 which described the marketing of then-presidential candidate Richard Nixon. He is popularly known for his trilogy of bestselling true crime books—Fatal Vision, Blind Faith and Cruel Doubt—which were adapted into TV miniseries in the 1980s and 90s. His last book was The Rogue: Searching for the Real Sarah Palin, an account of Sarah Palin, the former governor of Alaska who was the 2008 Republican vice-presidential nominee. ; Joe McGinniss: McGinniss was born in Manhattan, the only child of travel agent Joseph A. McGinniss and Mary (nee Leonard), a secretary at CBS. He was raised in Forest Hills, Queens, and Rye, New York. In his youth he was given a chance to pick a middle name and chose Ralph, after the baseball player Ralph Kiner.[1] ; Joe McGinniss: McGinniss attended Archbishop Stepinac High School in White Plains and graduated in 1964 from the College of the Holy Cross in Worcester, Massachusetts. After his application to the Columbia University Graduate School of Journalism was rejected, something he later pointed to with pride,[1] he became a general assignment reporter at the Worcester Telegram. He left within a year to become a sportswriter for the Philadelphia Bulletin before joining The Philadelphia Inquirer as a general interest columnist. In 1979, he became a writer-in-residence at the Los Angeles Herald Examiner. ; Joe McGinniss: McGinniss's first book, The Selling of the President 1968, landed on The New York Times Best Seller list when he was 26 years old, making him the youngest living writer with that achievement. The book was on The New York Times non-fiction bestseller list for 31 weeks from October 1969 to May 1970.[3] The book described the marketing of Richard Nixon during the 1968 presidential campaign. The idea for the book came to McGinniss almost serendipitously:
knowledge1: Ted Thompson // Ted Thompson Ted Thompson (born January 17, 1953) is an American football executive for the Green Bay Packers and former player. He was the general manager of the Green Bay Packers of the National Football League (NFL) from 2005 to 2017. He was named to the post on January 14, 2005, by former Packers president and CEO Bob Harlan. Thompson took over the general manager duties from Mike Sherman, who had been serving as both head coach and general manager. Prior to becoming the Packers' general manager, Thompson served with the Seattle Seahawks as their vice president of operations from; Ted Thompson // a physical before the Draft. The replacement safety Charlie Peprah was also cut at the beginning of training camp. On January 1, 2018, it was reported that Thompson would no longer be the general manager of the Packers but would remain with the team in an advisory role. On January 2, it was announced that Thompson's new position would be the senior advisor to football operations. Ted Thompson Ted Thompson (born January 17, 1953) is an American football executive for the Green Bay Packers and former player. He was the general manager of the Green Bay Packers of the National [sep] knowledge2: Ted Thompson: Ted Thompson (January 17, 1953 – January 20, 2021)  was an American professional football player and executive in the National Football League (NFL). He was the general manager of the Green Bay Packers from 2005 to 2017. Thompson had a 10-year playing career in the NFL as a linebacker and special teams player with the Houston Oilers from 1975 to 1984. ; Ted Thompson: In 1992, Thompson was hired by Ron Wolf as a scout for the Green Bay Packers.  Thompson worked for the Packers through the 1999 season when former Packers' head coach Mike Holmgren recruited Thompson to join the Seattle Seahawks.  During Thompson's time with the Packers as a scout, the Packers advanced to the playoffs six times, participating in two Super Bowls and winning Super Bowl XXXI.[4] ; Ted Thompson: Thompson worked for the Seattle Seahawks as vice president of football operations, also heading Seattle's scouting department and running the draft boards.  He worked alongside former Packers and Seahawks coach Mike Holmgren, who was Seattle's GM at the time. ; Ted Thompson: During Thompson's tenure in Seattle, the Seahawks advanced to the playoffs twice.  In 2005, following Thompson's departure to the Packers, the Seahawks had one of their best success in team history, reaching the Super Bowl.  Many of the players on Seattle's Super Bowl team were acquired under Thompson's direction, including HB Shaun Alexander, WR Darrell Jackson, OG Steve Hutchinson, CB Marcus Trufant, K Josh Brown and OT Sean Locklear. ; Ted Thompson: In an interview with Mike Holmgren in 2009, Holmgren noted that "Once Ted Thompson came on board and we settled down a little bit, we started making good decisions."[5]
knowledge1: Roman Šebrle // in training for some time, especially in the pole vault. Later he stated that he was only 20 cm away from being killed and 1 cm from an injury that would have ended his career. Roman Šebrle Roman Šebrle (; born 26 November 1974) is an athlete from the Czech Republic. He is considered to be one of the best decathlon athletes of all time. Originally a high jumper, he competes in decathlon and heptathlon for team Dukla Prague and is a former world record holder in the decathlon. In 2001 in Götzis he became the first decathlete ever to [sep] knowledge2: Roman Šebrle: Šebrle was born in Lanškroun, Czechoslovakia. He studied at Gymnázium Františka Martina Pelcla (English: František Martin Pelcl Gymnasium) in Rychnov nad Kněžnou and at Gymnázium Pardubice. Then he studied an extension course of Information Science and Computer Technology.[4]
knowledge1: Giorgi Papunashvili // Giorgi Papunashvili Giorgi Papunashvili (, ; born 2 September 1995) is Georgian footballer who plays for Spanish club Real Zaragoza and the Georgian national team as a winger. Papunashvili started his career in his hometown club Dinamo Tbilisi. In 2013, after having spent a single season with the reserve side of the Georgian club, Papunashvili was promoted to the first team and in November he made his debut in Erovnuli Liga against Tskhinvali. During the 2014–15 season, Papunashvili became the key figure at Dinamo, scoring 16 goals in all tournaments with the club, including his first career hat-trick against Tskhinvali; Giorgi Papunashvili // August, 2017, replacing Oliver Buff. Papunashvili made his debut for the national team in a 1–0 friendly loss against the United Arab Emirates on 3 June 2014. He also represented Georgia national under-17 football team in the 2012 UEFA European Under-17 Championship in Slovenia. Giorgi Papunashvili Giorgi Papunashvili (, ; born 2 September 1995) is Georgian footballer who plays for Spanish club Real Zaragoza and the Georgian national team as a winger. Papunashvili started his career in his hometown club Dinamo Tbilisi. In 2013, after having spent a single season with the reserve side of the Georgian club, Papunashvili was; Giorgi Papunashvili // in October 2014. Dinamo won Georgian Cup at the end of the season as well, with Papunashvili scoring two goals in the final against Samtredia. In summer 2015, Papunashvili signed a season-long loan deal with Werder Bremen. He joined the reserve side of the club and played in 3. Liga. The loan spell was unsuccessful, as Papunashvili missed 12 games due to injury and was only able to make 20 appearances for the club, scoring 2 goals. In June 2017, Papunashvili signed four-year deal with Real Zaragoza. Papunashvili made his debut for the Spanish club against Granada CF in 28 [sep] knowledge2: Giorgi Papunashvili: Giorgi Papunashvili (Georgian: გიორგი პაპუნაშვილი, romanized: giorgi p'ap'unashvili, pronounced [ɡioɾɡi pʼapʼunaʃʷili]; born 2 September 1995), commonly known as Papu, is a Georgian professional footballer who plays for Azerbaijani club Kapaz as a winger. ; Giorgi Papunashvili: Papunashvili started his career in his hometown club Dinamo Tbilisi. In 2013, after having spent a single season with the reserve side of the Georgian club, Papunashvili was promoted to the first team and in November he made his debut in Erovnuli Liga against Tskhinvali.[2] ; Giorgi Papunashvili: During the 2014–15 season, Papunashvili became the key figure at Dinamo, scoring 16 goals in all tournaments with the club, including his first career hat-trick against Tskhinvali in October 2014.[3] Dinamo won Georgian Cup at the end of the season as well, with Papunashvili scoring two goals in the final against Samtredia.[4] ; Giorgi Papunashvili: In summer 2015, Papunashvili signed a season-long loan deal with Werder Bremen.[5] He joined the reserve side of the club and played in 3. Liga.[6] The loan spell was unsuccessful, as Papunashvili missed 12 games due to injury and was only able to make 20 appearances for the club, scoring two goals.[7] ; Giorgi Papunashvili: In June 2017, Papunashvili signed four-year deal with Real Zaragoza.[8][9][10] He made his debut for the Spanish club against Granada CF on 28 August, replacing Oliver Buff.[11]
knowledge1: André Billy // André Billy André Billy (13 December 1882 – 11 April 1971) was a French writer. He was born in Saint-Quentin, Aisne. After completing secondary studies at the Collège de la Providence in Amiens, he studied under the Jesuits at Saint-Dizier. He began writing in 1907, occasionally using the pseudonym "Jean de l'Escritoire". Billy used ecclesiastical settings for the novels "Bénoni", "L'Approbaniste", "Introïbo", and "Le Narthex". He was inspired by the story-tellers of the 18th century for "La Femme maquillée", "L'Amie des hommes", "Quel homme es-tu?" and the essay "Pudeur". For many years he was the literary critic for "L'Œuvre". He [sep] knowledge2: André Le Nôtre: Sur les autres projets Wikimedia :
knowledge1: Roman Pavlyuchenko // Roman Pavlyuchenko Roman Anatolyevich Pavlyuchenko (; born 15 December 1981) is a Russian footballer who plays as a striker for FC Znamya Noginsk. He started his career at Dynamo Stavropol, and Rotor Volgograd, before transferring to Spartak Moscow in 2003. His performances there earned him a £13.7 million transfer to Tottenham Hotspur of the English Premier League in 2008, where he spent three full seasons before returning to Russia to play for Lokomotiv Moscow. After another full 3 seasons he moved in July 2015, to Kuban Krasnodar. A full international for a decade following his debut in 2003, Pavlyuchenko earned; Roman Pavlyuchenko // Larisa and has a young daughter named Kristina. In Russia, Pavlyuchenko is a local "Duma" (city council) deputy in Stavropol, representing the ruling Vladimir Putin-led United Russia party, although "because of my profession it won't be easy for me to take part directly in the workings of the city council – but I am ready to help with advice and with a concrete contribution to the development possibilities for exercise and sport". !Goal !Date !Venue !Opponent !Score !Result !Competition Spartak Moscow Lokomotiv Moscow Russia Roman Pavlyuchenko Roman Anatolyevich Pavlyuchenko (; born 15 December 1981) is a Russian footballer who plays; Roman Pavlyuchenko // 51 caps for Russia, and scored 21 international goals. He was named in the Team of the Tournament at Euro 2008, with Russia reaching the semi-finals, and was also in their squad for Euro 2012. Pavlyuchenko was born in the village of Mostovskoy, Krasnodar Krai. Pavlyuchenko was raised by his father Anatoly A. V. Pavlyuchenko and his mother Lyubov Vladimirovna. Pavlyuchenko has a sister. A few days after Pavlyuchenko was born, the family moved to Karachay-Cherkessia, the city of Ust-Dzheguta. Pavlyuchenko began his football career when he joined Victory Sports School and stayed there for seven years before joining another; Roman Pavlyuchenko // first goal in over four years in Russia in a 2-0 win over CSKA Moscow and provided an assist for Felipe Caicedo. After starting first 6 games of the 2012-13 season under the new manager Slaven Bilić, he lost his spot in the starting lineup and was intermittently used a substitute for the rest of the season. In the 2013–14 season, there was again a change of manager in Lokomotiv, but Pavlyuchenko was still used as a substitute by Leonid Kuchuk. On 16 July 2015, Kuban Krasnodar announced the signing of Pavlyuchenko. He reunited with former Russia teammate Andrei Arshavin.; Roman Pavlyuchenko // game on 22 March 2003, Pavlyuchenko scored his first goal for the club in a 2-1 loss against Alania Vladikavkaz. In his first season, Pavlyuchenko scored 10, making him the best scorer in the team. Also the club placed in 10th place and achieved winning the Russian Cup in a 1-0 win with Pavlyuchenko played for 87 minutes before being substituted. Also, Pavlyuchenko scored in the second leg on 15 October 2003 in a 1-1 draw against Esbjerg of the UEFA Cup which he made his debut in the competition on 24 September 2003. In his second season, Pavlyuchenko made [sep] knowledge2: Roman Pavlyuchenko: Roman Anatolyevich Pavlyuchenko (Russian: Роман Анатольевич Павлюченко; born 15 December 1981) is a Russian former footballer who played as a striker. ; Roman Pavlyuchenko: He started his career at Dynamo Stavropol, and Rotor Volgograd, before transferring to Spartak Moscow in 2003. His performances there earned him a £13.7 million transfer to Tottenham Hotspur of the English Premier League in 2008, where he spent three full seasons before returning to Russia to play for Lokomotiv Moscow. After another full 3 seasons he moved in July 2015, to Kuban Krasnodar. ; Roman Pavlyuchenko: A full international for a decade following his debut in 2003, Pavlyuchenko earned 51 caps for Russia, and scored 21 international goals. He was named in the Team of the Tournament at Euro 2008, with Russia reaching the semi-finals, and was also in their squad for Euro 2012. ; Roman Pavlyuchenko: Pavlyuchenko was born in the village of Mostovskoy, Krasnodar Krai. Pavlyuchenko was raised by his father Anatoly A. V. Pavlyuchenko and his mother Lyubov Vladimirovna. Pavlyuchenko has a sister. A few days after Pavlyuchenko was born, the family moved to Karachay-Cherkessia, the city of Ust-Dzheguta. Pavlyuchenko began his football career when he joined Victory Sports School and stayed there for seven years before joining another youth club, Dynamo Stavropol. ; Roman Pavlyuchenko: Pavlyuchenko started his football career at Dynamo Stavropol. Under the guidance of coach Vladimir Tokarev and Vladimir Kitin, Pavlyuchenko did not stand out among the rest of the Dynamo players. But under Fyodor Gagloyev, he was first invited to join pre-season tour with the club. Pavlyuchenko made his debut for the club, coming on as a substitute, in a 1–0 loss against Moscow on 5 April 1999. On 15 May 1999, Pavlyuchenko provided a double assist in a 2–1 win over Chita. In his first season, Pavlyuchenko made 31 appearances and scoring 11 goals. However, the club played was still relegated to the Second Division after the club was last place. Despite this, Pavlyuchenko was named  'Team of the top' junior division for the first version of the newspaper Sport Express.[4]
knowledge1: Alice Torriani // Alice Torriani Alice Torriani (born 25 March 1984) is an Italian film actor, author and screenwriter. She is notable for her portrayal of Andreina in "Il Paradiso delle Signore" ("Ladies' Paradise") directed by Monica Vullo and as the author of the novel "L'altra Sete" ("A Different Thirst"). Alice graduated from The Paolo Grassi Drama School in Milan in 2007 and started theatrical tours in Italy and Europe with Romeo Castellucci, Alvis Hermanis, Massimo Castri, Gabriele Lavia and Franca Valeri among others. Alice graduated from Paolo Grassi Drama School in Milan in 2007, after three years of intense studies. Upon receiving; Alice Torriani // by Fandango Libri. In 2015, with Giampiero Judica, she wrote her first screenplay for the TV series "Cleaning your Shit", which was filmed in 2017. Alice played the main role. Alice Torriani Alice Torriani (born 25 March 1984) is an Italian film actor, author and screenwriter. She is notable for her portrayal of Andreina in "Il Paradiso delle Signore" ("Ladies' Paradise") directed by Monica Vullo and as the author of the novel "L'altra Sete" ("A Different Thirst"). Alice graduated from The Paolo Grassi Drama School in Milan in 2007 and started theatrical tours in Italy and Europe with Romeo Castellucci,; Alice Torriani // her appearance in "Ten Winters" by Valerio Mieli (2010 David di Donatello prize for Best Debut), the commercially successful "E'nata una star" directed by Lucio Pellegrini and based on the novel "Not a Star" by Nick Hornby, "D.A.D." by Marco Maccaferri and "Them Who?" by Francesco Miccichè and Fabio Bonifaci. In an effort to ever improve her acting skills she has visited the Margie Haber Studio in Los Angeles and Jordan Bayne's in New York numerous time and she is always working on her skills. She has participated in many 'acting for the stage' workshops with Luca Ronconi, Antonio Latella, [sep] knowledge2: Alice Torriani: Alice Torriani (born 25 March 1984) is an Italian film actor, author and screenwriter. She is notable for her portrayal of Andreina in Il Paradiso delle Signore (Ladies' Paradise) directed by Monica Vullo and as the author of the novel L'altra Sete (A Different Thirst). ; Alice Torriani: Alice graduated from The Paolo Grassi Drama School in Milan in 2007 and started theatrical tours in Italy and Europe with Romeo Castellucci, Alvis Hermanis, Massimo Castri, Gabriele Lavia and Franca Valeri among others. ; Alice Torriani: Alice graduated from Paolo Grassi Drama School in Milan in 2007, after three years of intense studies. Upon receiving the sought after diploma, Massimo Castri, the critically acclaimed Italian director, cast her as the female lead in Chekhov's Three Sisters. This life-changing part took Alice on a one-year tour, as she performed in some of the most celebrated theatres across Italy. ; Alice Torriani: When the Italian tour came to an end, it was now renowned director Gabriele Lavia who took a bow, as he too cast Alice for the female lead part in Dostoyevsky's Memoirs from the House of The Dead. ; Alice Torriani: During that same year Alice started working on the European Project "Prospero", under the guiding hand of Latvian director Alvis Hermanis. Together, they brought The Young Ladies of Wilko, Hermanis's first work with Italian actors, to the stages of Milan, Paris, Venice, Berlin, Lisbon, Moscow, Rennes, Liege, Lotz, and Tampere,[1] in a production spanning two fulfilling years.
knowledge1: Michael Goleniewski // Michael Goleniewski Michael Goleniewski a.k.a. 'SNIPER', 'LAVINIA', (16 August 1922 – 12 July 1993), was a Polish officer in the People's Republic of Poland's Ministry of Public Security, the deputy head of military counterintelligence GZI WP, later head of the technical and scientific section of the Polish intelligence, and a spy for the Soviet government during the 1950s. In 1959, he became a triple-agent, giving Polish and Soviet secrets to the Central Intelligence Agency, which directly caused the exposure of George Blake and Harry Houghton. Goleniewski defected to the United States in 1961. He later claimed to be Tsarevich Alexei; Michael Goleniewski // Nikolaevich of Russia. Goleniewski was born in 1922 in Nieśwież, then in Poland, now Belarus. He enlisted in the Polish Army in 1945 and was commissioned a lieutenant colonel in the Polish Army in 1955. He studied law at the University of Poznan and received a master's degree in political science from the University of Warsaw in 1956. He said he was head of the Technical and Scientific Department of the Polish Secret Service from 1957 to 1960. At the same time, he was spying on Polish intelligence operations for the Soviet Union. In early 1959, Goleniewski became a triple-agent,; Michael Goleniewski // on 30 September 1964, using the name Alexei Romanov. Their daughter, Tatiana, was born a few hours later. The marriage later broke up. Goleniewski lived the remainder of his life in Queens, New York, still claiming that he was Tsarevich Alexei. He leveled accusations against the government and the Russian Orthodox Church for mistreating him. Few believed his claim. Michael Goleniewski Michael Goleniewski a.k.a. 'SNIPER', 'LAVINIA', (16 August 1922 – 12 July 1993), was a Polish officer in the People's Republic of Poland's Ministry of Public Security, the deputy head of military counterintelligence GZI WP, later head of the technical; Michael Goleniewski // in absentia. A private bill, H.R. 5507, was introduced in the U.S. Congress in July 1963 to make Goleniewski a US citizen. The legislation was passed by both the United States House of Representatives and the United States Senate. Goleniewski later made the claim that he was Tsarevich Alexei Nikolaevich, who is now known to have been killed with his family by Bolsheviks at Ekaterinburg, Russia on 17 July 1918. Goleniewski claimed that Yakov Yurovsky, one of the assassins, saved the family and helped them to escape. The whole family supposedly traveled to Poland via Turkey, Greece, and Austria. According; Michael Goleniewski // informant in Poland, and sent word back to the KGB, who passed it to the UB. Goleniewski heard the news from the KGB, and immediately escaped. He also provided information that led to the arrests of American diplomat Irvin C. Scarbeck, Swedish Air Force officer Stig Wennerström, and KGB penetrations of the BND, Heinz Felfe and Hans Clemens. He defected to the United States in January 1961, which led to the imprisonment of Soviet agents in Britain including the Portland Spy Ring and George Blake. Goleniewski went to work for the CIA, and a Polish court sentenced him to death [sep] knowledge2: Michael Goleniewski: Michał Franciszek Goleniewski a.k.a. 'SNIPER', 'LAVINIA', (16 August 1922 – 12 July 1993), was a Polish officer in the People's Republic of Poland's Ministry of Public Security, the deputy head of military counterintelligence GZI WP, later head of the technical and scientific section of the Polish intelligence, and a spy for the Soviet government during the 1950s. In 1959, he became a "triple agent" by giving Polish and Soviet secrets to the Central Intelligence Agency that directly caused the exposure of George Blake and Harry Houghton. Goleniewski defected to the United States in 1961. He later made unsubstantiated claims to be Tsarevich Alexei Nikolaevich of Russia.[1] ; Michael Goleniewski: Goleniewski was born in 1922 in Nieśwież, then in Poland, now Belarus. He enlisted in the Polish Army in 1945 and was commissioned a lieutenant colonel in the Polish Army in 1955. He studied law at the University of Poznan and received a master's degree in political science from the University of Warsaw in 1956. He said he was head of the Technical and Scientific Department of the Polish Secret Service from 1957 to 1960. At the same time, he was spying on Polish intelligence operations for the Soviet Union.[1] ; Michael Goleniewski: In early 1959, Goleniewski became a triple-agent, anonymously sending Polish and Soviet secrets addressed to the US Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) by letter.[2] He insisted on communicating with the FBI, knowing that all other agencies had been penetrated by Soviet bloc intelligence. His letters were actually intercepted by the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), who did not inform the FBI. According to Tim Tate, author of the 2021 book The Spy Who Was Left Out in the Cold, Goleniewski's motive, unlike most defectors who sought a better life outside the Soviet Union, was that he "realised that the communist system was wrong. And that he needed, ... to counter it, and to start working for the west and democracy".[3] ; Michael Goleniewski: He defected to the United States in January 1961, which led to the imprisonment of Soviet agents in Britain including the Portland Spy Ring and George Blake.[8] Goleniewski went to work for the CIA, and a Polish court sentenced him to death in absentia. A private bill, H.R. 5507, was introduced in the U.S. Congress in July 1963 to make Goleniewski a US citizen. The legislation was passed by both the United States House of Representatives and the United States Senate.[1] ; Michael Goleniewski: According to Tate, who used freedom of information requests to obtain CIA files on Goleniewski which had never been made public before, Goleniewski as of 2021[update] had identified more spies than any other defector or agent. Tate has also written a background article on him [9] However, when Anatoliy Golitsyn defected to the US, he convinced the CIA's head of counter-intelligence that only he, Golitsyn, was a true defector, all others being bogus. From 1964 the CIA started to renege on its contract with Goleniewski and brief other government departments that he had lost his mind. This caused Goleniewski much financial and emotional distress, and he lost his grip on reality, becoming paranoid, and ultimately completely insane, according to Tate. Although CIA records were obtained, Britain's MI5 file on Goleniewski was not released, with MI5 claiming "continuing sensitivity".[3]
knowledge1: James Tyrrell // James Tyrrell Sir James Tyrrell (c. 1455 – 6 May 1502) was an English knight, a trusted servant of King Richard III of England. He is known for allegedly confessing to the murders of the Princes in the Tower under Richard's orders. William Shakespeare portrays Tyrrell as the man who organises the princes' murder in "Richard III". James Tyrrell was the eldest son of William Tyrrell of Gipping, and Margaret Darcy, the daughter of Robert Darcy of Maldon, and the grandson of Sir John Tyrrell. Tyrrell's father was beheaded on Tower Hill on 23 February 1462, together with Sir Thomas; James Tyrrell // Starkey's assumptions and speculations. James Tyrrell Sir James Tyrrell (c. 1455 – 6 May 1502) was an English knight, a trusted servant of King Richard III of England. He is known for allegedly confessing to the murders of the Princes in the Tower under Richard's orders. William Shakespeare portrays Tyrrell as the man who organises the princes' murder in "Richard III". James Tyrrell was the eldest son of William Tyrrell of Gipping, and Margaret Darcy, the daughter of Robert Darcy of Maldon, and the grandson of Sir John Tyrrell. Tyrrell's father was beheaded on Tower Hill on 23 February 1462, [sep] knowledge2: James Tyrrell: Sir James Tyrrell (c. 1455 – 6 May 1502)[1] was an English knight, a trusted servant of king Richard III of England.  He is known for confessing to the murders of the Princes in the Tower under Richard's orders.  William Shakespeare portrays Tyrrell as the man who organises the princes' murder in his 1593 play Richard III.[2] ; James Tyrrell: James Tyrrell was the eldest son of William Tyrrell of Gipping in Suffolk, and Margaret Darcy, the daughter of Robert Darcy of Maldon, and the grandson of Sir John Tyrrell.[1][3] ; James Tyrrell: Tyrrell's father was beheaded on Tower Hill on 23 February 1462, together with Sir Thomas Tuddenham and John Montgomery. John de Vere, 12th Earl of Oxford, and his eldest son and heir, Aubrey, were beheaded on 26 February and 20 February, respectively, after the discovery of an alleged plot to murder Edward IV. No records of the trials of the alleged conspirators have survived to shed light on what part, if any, Tyrrell's father played in the alleged conspiracy.[4] He was not attainted, and his eldest son and heir's wardship and the custody of his lands were granted to Cecily Neville, Duchess of York, who sold them to William Tyrrell's widow in March 1463 for £50.[1] ; James Tyrrell: James Tyrrell fought on the Yorkist side at the Battle of Tewkesbury on 4 May 1471, and was knighted there by Edward IV. A few months later he entered the service of the future Richard III, then Duke of Gloucester.[1] After Richard III assumed power, he was appointed High Sheriff of Cornwall in 1484.[5] He was in France in 1485, and played no part in the Battle of Bosworth Field which signalled the end of the Yorkists and the start of the Tudor dynasty. ; James Tyrrell: He returned to England in 1486 and was pardoned by King Henry VII on 16 June, and was pardoned again on 16 July. Sir Clements Markham considers that it was between these dates that the murder of the princes took place.[6] Henry VII reappointed him governor of Guînes (in the English possession of Calais) in 1486. However, in 1501, Tyrrell lent his support to Edmund de la Pole, 3rd Duke of Suffolk, now the leading Yorkist claimant to the English throne, who was in voluntary exile. In the spring of 1501 Henry VII sent Thomas Lovell to Guînes to arrest Tyrrell and others, including Tyrrell's son, Thomas.[1]
knowledge1: John Atkinson Grimshaw // John Atkinson Grimshaw John Atkinson Grimshaw (6 September 1836 – 13 October 1893) was an English Victorian-era artist who has been called a "remarkable and imaginative painter" best known for his nocturnal scenes of urban landscapes Today, he is considered one of the most renowned painters of the Victorian era, as well as one of the best and most accomplished nightscape, and townscape, artists of all time. Grimshaw's accuracy and drive for realism was criticised by some contemporaries, with one critic claiming that his paintings appeared to ‘showed no marks of handling or brushwork’, adding that ‘not a few artists; John Atkinson Grimshaw // Moonlight" ran from 16 April 2011 to 4 September 2011 at Mercer Art Gallery in Harrogate and subsequently in the Guildhall Art Gallery, London. John Atkinson Grimshaw John Atkinson Grimshaw (6 September 1836 – 13 October 1893) was an English Victorian-era artist who has been called a "remarkable and imaginative painter" best known for his nocturnal scenes of urban landscapes Today, he is considered one of the most renowned painters of the Victorian era, as well as one of the best and most accomplished nightscape, and townscape, artists of all time. Grimshaw's accuracy and drive for realism was criticised by; John Atkinson Grimshaw // 1861, at the age of 24, to the dismay of his parents, he left his job as a clerk for the Great Northern Railway to become a painter. He first exhibited in 1862, mostly paintings of birds, fruit and blossom, under the patronage of the Leeds Philosophical and Literary Society. He and his wife moved in 1866 to a semi-detached villa which is now numbered 56 Cliff Road in Headingley and has a Leeds Civic Trust blue plaque, and in 1870 to Knostrop Hall. He became successful in the 1870s and rented a second home in Scarborough, which became a; John Atkinson Grimshaw // were doubtful whether they could be accepted as paintings at all’. However, other contemporaries recognised his mastery of lighting and technique, and James McNeill Whistler, whom Grimshaw would go on to work with in his Chelsea studios, stated, “I considered myself the inventor of nocturnes until I saw Grimmy’s moonlit pictures”. His early paintings were signed "JAG", "J. A. Grimshaw", or "John Atkinson Grimshaw", though he finally settled on "Atkinson Grimshaw". He was born 6 September 1836 in a back-to-back tenement in Park Street, Leeds to Mary and David Grimshaw. In 1856 he married his cousin Frances Hubbard (1835–1917). In; John Atkinson Grimshaw // depiction of Glasgow's Victorian docks, is a lyrically beautiful evocation of the industrial era. Grimshaw transcribed the fog and mist so accurately as to capture the chill in the damp air, and the moisture penetrating the heavy clothes of the few figures awake in the misty early morning. Grimshaw left behind no letters, journals, or papers. His reputation rested on, and his legacy is based on, his townscapes. There was a revival of interest in Grimshaw's work in the second half of the 20th century, with several important exhibitions devoted to it. A retrospective exhibition "Atkinson Grimshaw – Painter of [sep] knowledge2: John Atkinson Grimshaw: John Atkinson Grimshaw (6 September 1836 – 13 October 1893) was an English Victorian-era artist best known for his nocturnal scenes of urban landscapes.[1][2] He was called a "remarkable and imaginative painter" by the critic and historian Christopher Wood in Victorian Painting (1999).[3] ; John Atkinson Grimshaw: Grimshaw's love for realism stemmed from a passion for photography, which would eventually lend itself to the creative process. Though entirely self-taught, he is known to have used a camera obscura or lenses to project scenes onto canvas, which made up for his shortcomings as a draughtsman and his imperfect knowledge of perspective. This technique, which Caravaggio and Vermeer may also have used, was condemned by a number of his contemporaries who believed it demonstrated less skill than painting by eye,[4] with some claiming that his paintings appeared to "show no marks of handling or brushwork", while others "were doubtful whether they could be accepted as paintings at all".[5] However, many recognised his mastery of colour, lighting and shadow, as well as his unique ability to provoke strong emotional responses in the viewer. James McNeill Whistler, whom Grimshaw worked with in his Chelsea studios, stated, "I considered myself the inventor of nocturnes until I saw Grimmy's moonlit pictures."[6] ; John Atkinson Grimshaw: His early paintings were signed "JAG", "J. A. Grimshaw", or "John Atkinson Grimshaw", though he finally settled on "Atkinson Grimshaw". ; John Atkinson Grimshaw: He was born on 6 September 1836 in a back-to-back house in Park Street, Leeds to Mary and David Grimshaw.[7] In 1856 he married his cousin Frances Hubbard (1835–1917). In 1861, at the age of 24, to the dismay of his parents, he left his job as a clerk for the Great Northern Railway to become a painter. He first exhibited in 1862, mostly paintings of birds, fruit, and blossom, under the patronage of the Leeds Philosophical and Literary Society.[8] He and his wife moved in 1866 to a semi-detached villa, which is now numbered 56 Cliff Road in Headingley and has a Leeds Civic Trust blue plaque, and in 1870 to Knostrop Old Hall.[7] Grid Reference: SE 32125 32100. He became successful in the 1870s and rented a second home, Castle-by-the-Sea in Scarborough. Scarborough became a favourite subject. ; John Atkinson Grimshaw: He died on 13 October 1893 of tuberculosis and is buried in Woodhouse Cemetery, now called St George's Fields, in Leeds.
knowledge1: Celâl Bayar // the Muslims in India to support the Turkish War of Independence. He was the Managing Director of what was the largest Turkish commercial bank until 1932. On 25 October 1937 Mustafa Kemal Atatürk appointed Bayar as Prime Minister of the 9th Government of Turkey after İsmet İnönü left the government. He continued to serve as prime minister when Atatürk died and İnönü became president in 1938 (10th government of Turkey). Differences of opinion with Inönü led him to resign from the position on 25 January 1939. Until 1945, he was a member of Cumhuriyet Halk Partisi (the Republican People's Party),; Celâl Bayar // of the İzmir branch of the party. In 1919, Bayar was elected to the Ottoman Parliament in Istanbul as deputy of Saruhan (today Manisa). As he disagreed with the new constitution determined by the sultan, in 1920 he went to Ankara to join Mustafa Kemal and the Turkish Independence Movement. He became an active member of the "Müdafaa-i Hukuk Cemiyeti" (Association for Defence of Rights of Anatolia and Rumelia), another political organization formed after World War I. He became the deputy of Bursa in the newly established Grand National Assembly of Turkey. The same year, he served as Deputy Minister; Celâl Bayar // of the Economy and on 27 February 1921 he was appointed as the Minister of the Economy. He led the negotiation commission during Çerkes Ethem's uprising. In 1922, Bayar was a member of the Turkish delegation during the Lausanne Peace Conference as an advisor to İsmet İnönü. After the elections in 1923, he served as the deputy of İzmir in the Parliament. On 6 March 1924 Celâl Bayar was appointed Minister of Exchange construction and Settlemen (until 7 July 1924). On 26 August 1924, he founded Türkiye İş Bankası in Ankara by using as capital the gold bullion sent by; Celâl Bayar // Bursa deputy for the Justice Party between 1965 and 1969 and İstanbul deputy for the Democratic Party between 1973 and 1975 and then for the Justice Party between 1975 and 1980. In 1954, Bayar was awarded the Grand Cross Special Class of the Order of Merit of the Federal Republic of Germany ("Sonderstufe des Großkreuzes des Verdienstordens der Bundesrepublik Deutschland"). January 27, 1954 Bayar received the Legion of Merit Award from the USA. In 1954, Bayar was awarded an honorary doctorate by the University of Belgrade. In 1958, the Freie Universität Berlin (Free University Berlin) awarded him an honorary doctorate. [sep] knowledge2: Celâl Bayar: Mahmut Celâlettin "Celâl" Bayar  (16 May 1883 – 22 August 1986)[1][2][3] was a Turkish economist and politician who was the third president of Turkey from 1950 to 1960; previously he was the prime minister of Turkey from 1937 to 1939.  ; Celâl Bayar: Mahmut Celâlettin (Bayar after 1934) was born on 16 May 1883 at Umurbey, a village of Gemlik, Bursa,[6] the third son of Abdullah Fehmi Efendi, religious leader and teacher who migrated from Lom, Ottoman Bulgaria as a muhacir, after the Bulgarians ethnically cleansed the Muslim population there during the 1877–1878 Russo-Turkish war. His older brothers were Behzat and Asım. Bayar worked as a clerk after school, first in a court in Gemlik and then in Ziraat Bank. In 1906, he was employed in the Deutsche Orientbank in Bursa.[7] ; Celâl Bayar: In 1907, Bayar joined an unofficial branch of the Committee of Union and Progress (CUP) in Bursa.[8] After the Second Constitutional Era was proclaimed following the Young Turk Revolution, he served as the secretary-general of a newly founded local branch of the organization, with instructions to organize Unionist infrastructure in Anatolia.[citation needed] Bayar formed a Unionist militia in Bursa with the intention to join up with Mahmud Shevket Pasha's Action Army during the 31 March Incident. He got as far as Mudanya but by then the revolt was crushed. He then founded the İzmir branch of Union and Progress in 1911. Bayar established an organization and CUP mouthpiece known as Halkın Doğru (True to the People), where he wrote pro-CUP articles under the pseudonym Turgut Alp. He was a participant of the 1913 Ottoman coup d'état, and witnessed the murder of the Minister of War Nazım Pasha.[9] ; Celâl Bayar: Following the Armistice of Mudros, which ended World War I for the Ottomans, he was tried and acquitted as a war criminal at the İzmir Martial Law Court. However when the allied powers continued advancing into Ottoman territory despite the armistice, various nationalist organizations known as Defence of National Rights Associations started to be founded. Bayar created the Association for the Cancellation of İzmir's Annexation (İzmir Redd-i İlhak Cemiyeti) and the Association for the Defence of Ottoman İzmir (İzmir Müdâfaa-i Hukuku Osmaniye Cemiyeti). Bayar fled into the mountains after hearing rumors of an impending allied occupation of İzmir and finding out his name was on an arrest list from the Freedom and Accord government in Constantinople. Once İzmir was occupied, he cooperated with the national resistance fighters in the Söke region. On the side of the resistance, he participated in the Battle of Aydın against the Greeks. With the decision of the Balıkesir Congress, he was appointed to the command of the Akhisar front regiment. ; Celâl Bayar: Bayar was elected as a member of the Association for the Defence of National Rights of Anatolia and Rumelia (ADNRAR) in the 1923 election, serving as a deputy of İzmir in the Parliament. ADNRAR soon renamed itself Republican People's Party (CHP) and continued a one party state started by the CUP in 1913. On 6 March 1924 Celâl Bayar was appointed Minister of Exchange Construction and Settlement (until 7 July 1924).[15] Bayar was influential in determining the economic policy of the regime as a result of being in Mustafa Kemal's close circle during this period. A policy of a modern and state supported capitalism was pursued. On 26 August 1924, Atatürk commissioned Bayar to found a national bank, which resulted in the foundation of İşbank[16] in Ankara by using as capital the gold bullion sent by the Muslims in India to support the Turkish War of Independence. The Aşar tax was abolished, land was distributed, the Teşvik-i Sanayi Kanunu (Industry Incentive Law) was enacted, railway construction was accelerated, and the Central Bank was established. The effects of the Great Depression caused this more "liberal" policy to be replaced by statism.
knowledge1: Jan Zamoyski // Jan Zamoyski Jan Zamoyski or Zamojski (; 19 March 1542 – 3 June 1605) was a Polish nobleman, magnate, and the 1st "ordynat" of Zamość. Royal Secretary from 1566, Deputy Kanclerz (Chancellor) of the Crown from 1576, Lord Grand-Chancellor of the Crown from 1578, and Grand Hetman of the Crown from 1581. General Starost of Kraków from 1580 to 1585, Starost of Bełz, Międzyrzecz, Krzeszów, Knyszyn and Tartu. Important advisor to Kings Sigismund II Augustus and Stephen Báthory, he was one of the major supporters of Bathory's successor, Sigismund III Vasa, and one of the most skilled diplomats, politicians and; Jan Zamoyski // statesmen of his time, standing as a major figure in the politics of the Polish-Lithuanian Commonwealth throughout his life. Jan Zamoyski was born on 19 March 1542 to Stanisław Zamoyski and Anna Herburt in Skokówka. He started his education in a school in Krasnystaw but when he was thirteen years old he was sent to study abroad; from 1555 to 1559 he was a page at the royal court in Paris. Already at this young age he attended lectures at the Sorbonne University and Collège de France. In 1559 he briefly visited Poland, then attended the University of Strasbourg; after; Jan Zamoyski // instead, avoiding a war that could devastate the country, and thus curbing his own ambitions. Jan Zamoyski Jan Zamoyski or Zamojski (; 19 March 1542 – 3 June 1605) was a Polish nobleman, magnate, and the 1st "ordynat" of Zamość. Royal Secretary from 1566, Deputy Kanclerz (Chancellor) of the Crown from 1576, Lord Grand-Chancellor of the Crown from 1578, and Grand Hetman of the Crown from 1581. General Starost of Kraków from 1580 to 1585, Starost of Bełz, Międzyrzecz, Krzeszów, Knyszyn and Tartu. Important advisor to Kings Sigismund II Augustus and Stephen Báthory, he was one of the major supporters [sep] knowledge2: Jan Zamoyski: Jan Sariusz Zamoyski (Latin: Ioannes Zamoyski de Zamoscie;[1] 19 March 1542 – 3 June 1605) was a Polish nobleman, magnate, statesman and the 1st ordynat of Zamość. He served as the Royal Secretary from 1565, Deputy Chancellor from 1576, Grand Chancellor of the Crown from 1578, and Great Hetman of the Crown from 1581. ; Jan Zamoyski: Zamoyski was the General Starost of the city of Kraków from 1580 to 1585, Starost of Bełz, Międzyrzecz, Krzeszów, Knyszyn and Tartu. An important advisor to Kings Sigismund II Augustus and Stephen Báthory, he was one of the major opponents of Bathory's successor, Sigismund III Vasa, and one of the most skilled diplomats, politicians and statesmen of his time, standing as a major figure in the politics of the Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth throughout his life. ; Jan Zamoyski: Jan Zamoyski was born on 19 March 1542 to Stanisław Zamoyski and Anna Herburt in Skokówka.[2] He started his education in a school in Krasnystaw but when he was thirteen years old he was sent to study abroad; from 1555 to 1559 he was a page at the royal court in Paris.[3] Already at this young age he attended lectures at the Sorbonne University and Collège de France.[3] In 1559 he briefly visited Poland, then attended the University of Strasbourg; after a few months there he moved to University of Padua, where from 1561 he studied law and received a doctorate in 1564.[2][4] During his years abroad he converted from Calvinism to Roman Catholicism.[4] ; Jan Zamoyski: During his education, he became active in university politics, and in 1563 he was elected the rector of the law department.[4] Around that time he also wrote De senatu Romano, a brochure about Ancient Rome government.[4] He returned to the Commonwealth in 1565, and was the first person to receive a commendation letter from the senate of the Republic of Venice.[4][5] ; Jan Zamoyski: After returning to Poland, he was appointed to the Royal Chancellery, and soon became a favorite secretary to King Sigismund II.[5][6] In 1567 he commanded a royal task force, sent to remove the noble family of Starzechowscy from the royal lands they were decreed to hold illegally.[5] Another major task he completed at that time was the reorganization of the Chancellery archive.[7]
knowledge1: Ki Fitzgerald // Ki Fitzgerald Ki McPhail (born 25 September 1987), commonly known as Ki Fitzgerald or KiFi, is an English musician, singer, songwriter, and music producer based in London and Los Angeles he has written and produced several top 10 singles and was a member of the English pop rock band Busted from 2000 to 2001. Ki was born in Rotterdam, Netherlands to British parents on 25 September 1987, but moved at 6 years old and grew up in Kent, England. His father is the singer Scott Fitzgerald, who had and international hit with "If I Had Words" which was also the; Ki Fitzgerald // Ki Fitzgerald Ki McPhail (born 25 September 1987), commonly known as Ki Fitzgerald or KiFi, is an English musician, singer, songwriter, and music producer based in London and Los Angeles he has written and produced several top 10 singles and was a member of the English pop rock band Busted from 2000 to 2001. Ki was born in Rotterdam, Netherlands to British parents on 25 September 1987, but moved at 6 years old and grew up in Kent, England. His father is the singer Scott Fitzgerald, who had and international hit with "If I Had Words" which was also the; Ki Fitzgerald // for other artists. Since then, Fitzgerald has fast become a successful songwriter and producer for a diverse group of artists such as Galantis, Lawson, The Wanted, Jonas Brothers, B.o.B, Alex Hepburn, and Pitbull. He is credited with having written several songs on the debut album from the UK band Lawson, including the singles "When She Was Mine" (UK No.4) "Standing in the Dark" (UK No.6) and their recent Collaboration with USA Rapper B.o.B on "Broken Hearted" (Uk No.6). Fitzgerald also contributed to the album tracks "Stolen" and "Everywhere You Go", "Die for You", "Getting Nowhere", "Hurts Like You", "Are You; Ki Fitzgerald // theme to the Hollywood Movie Babe. He also performed the song "Go" that represented the United Kingdom at the 1988 Eurovision Song Contest where he lost to Celine Dion by one point. In the year 2000, Ki Fitzgerald assembled and was a member of UK group Busted. Fitzgerald later formed the band Eyes Wide Open and signed a publishing deal with Music Copyright Solutions. The band toured the UK after making their debut at the GWR Fiesta to an audience of 40,000 people. They later played multiple shows including Supporting Blondie at London’s famous Venue Koko. The band members consisted [sep] knowledge2: Ki Fitzgerald: Ki Fitzgerald (born Kiley McPhail), also known as Azteck, is an English DJ, musician, singer, songwriter and record producer. He has written/produced and vocalist on several top 10 singles and albums and was a founding member of the English pop rock band Busted from 2000 to 2001.[3] KiFi is also the feature vocalist on Don Diablo's single "The Same Way", Hardwell/Wildstylez's single "Shine a Light" and Armin van Buuren's "Turn It Up". ; Ki Fitzgerald: Fitzgerald was born in Rotterdam, Netherlands to British parents but moved at six years old and grew up in Kent, England. His father is the singer Scott Fitzgerald, who had an international hit with "If I Had Words" and also represented the United Kingdom at the 1988 Eurovision Song Contest. In 2000, Ki Fitzgerald was an original member of pop punk band Busted.[4] In 2008, Fitzgerald made an unsuccessful claim for copyright on certain Busted songs. [5][6] ; Ki Fitzgerald: In 2007, Fitzgerald formed the band Eyes Wide Open and signed a publishing deal with Music Copyright Solutions.[7] The band toured the UK after making their debut at the GWR Fiesta to an audience of 40,000 people.[8] The band members consisted of: Fitzgerald (vocals and guitar), Tom Warner (lead guitar), TK (bass guitar) and Pat Garvery (drums) and Will Farquarson (Guitar) who went on to become a member of Band Bastille. The band made appearances at festivals.[9] The band broke up whilst in the process of recording their debut album with producer Steve Lironi (Bon Jovi) and mixer Simon Gogerly.[8] ; Ki Fitzgerald: In 2015 Fitzgerald signed an artist deal with producer RedOne and his label 2101/capital records to develop his own album and to Join RedOne's writing group Team Red. The first release with Dutch DJ duo Sunnery James & Ryan Marciano was the song Come Follow with vocals from KiFi. It was released through Spinnin' Records in February 2015.[10] Fitzgerald has been featured Vocalist on many EDM songs, including the single "Shine a Light" by Hardwell and Wildstylez, "Steal the moon" by DubVision, "Best part of me" by Firebeatz and DubVision, the Headhunterz single "Into the Sunset" which was featured on Ellen DeGeneres, Dancing with the Stars and upcoming releases with Armin van Buuren, Dash Berlin and many more.[citation needed] ; Ki Fitzgerald: In October 2011, Fitzgerald signed with Global Talent Publishing to focus on songwriting for other artists.[citation needed] Since then Fitzgerald has fast become a successful songwriter and producer for a diverse group of artists such as Galantis, Lawson, The Wanted, Jonas Brothers, B.o.B, Alex Hepburn, and Pitbull.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Witold Gombrowicz // was accused of participating in the January Uprising of 1863. He later described his family origins and social status as early instances of a lifelong sense of being between ("entre"). In 1911 his family moved to Warsaw. After completing his education at Saint Stanislaus Kostka's Gymnasium in 1922, he studied law at Warsaw University, earning a master's degree in law in 1927. He spent a year in Paris, where he studied at the Institut des Hautes Etudes Internationales. He was less than diligent in his studies, but his time in France brought him in constant contact with other young intellectuals.; Witold Gombrowicz // Witold Gombrowicz Witold Marian Gombrowicz (August 4, 1904 – July 24, 1969) was a Polish writer and playwright. His works are characterised by deep psychological analysis, a certain sense of paradox and absurd, anti-nationalist flavor. As a leftist, bisexual, and anticlerical who defied all party lines, his books were banned in communist Poland. In 1937 he published his first novel, "Ferdydurke", which presented many of his usual themes: problems of immaturity and youth, creation of identity in interactions with others, and an ironic, critical examination of class roles in Polish society and culture. He gained fame only during the last; Witold Gombrowicz // years of his life, but is now considered one of the foremost figures of Polish literature. His diaries were published in 1969 and are, according to the "Paris Review", "widely considered his masterpiece". Gombrowicz was born in Małoszyce near Opatów, then in Radom Governorate, Congress Poland, Russian Empire, to a wealthy gentry family. He was the youngest of four children of Jan and Antonina (née Kotkowska). In an autobiographical piece, "A Kind of Testament", he wrote that his family had lived for four hundred years in Lithuania on an estate between Vilnius and Kaunas but were displaced after his grandfather; Witold Gombrowicz // health deteriorated during this stay, and he was not able to go back to Argentina. He went back to France in 1964. He spent three months in Royaumont abbey, near Paris, where he met Rita Labrosse, a Canadian from Montreal who studied contemporary literature. In 1964 he moved to the Côte d'Azur in the south of France with Labrosse, whom he employed as his secretary. He spent the rest of his life in Vence, near Nice. Gombrowicz's health prevented him from thoroughly benefiting from this late renown. It worsened notably in spring 1964; he became bedridden and was unable to; Witold Gombrowicz // explored in his further writings: the problems of immaturity and youth, the masks taken on by men in front of others, and an ironic, critical examination of class roles in Polish society and culture, specifically among the nobility, representatives of the Catholic Church and provincial Poles. Ferdydurke provoked sharp critical reactions and immediately divided Gombrowicz's audience into rival camps of worshipers and sworn enemies. In his work, Gombrowicz struggled with Polish traditions and the country's difficult history. This battle was the starting point for his stories, which were deeply rooted in this tradition and history. Gombrowicz is remembered by scholars [sep] knowledge2: Witold Gombrowicz: Witold Marian Gombrowicz (August 4, 1904 – July 24, 1969) was a Polish writer and playwright. His works are characterised by deep psychological analysis, a certain sense of paradox and absurd, anti-nationalist flavor. In 1937, he published his first novel, Ferdydurke, which presented many of his usual themes: problems of immaturity and youth, creation of identity in interactions with others, and an ironic, critical examination of class roles in Polish society and culture.  ; Witold Gombrowicz: He gained fame only during the last years of his life, but is now considered one of the foremost figures of Polish literature. His diaries were published in 1969 and are, according to the Paris Review, "widely considered his masterpiece",[1] while Cosmos is considered, according to The New Yorker, "his most accomplished novel".[2] He was nominated for the Nobel Prize in Literature four times, from 1966 to 1969.[3] ; Witold Gombrowicz: Gombrowicz was born in Małoszyce near Opatów, then in Radom Governorate, Congress Poland, Russian Empire, to a wealthy gentry family.  He was the youngest of four children of Jan and Antonina (née Ścibor-Kotkowska of the Clan of Ostoja). In an autobiographical piece, A Kind of Testament, he wrote that his family had lived for 400 years in Lithuania on an estate between Vilnius and Kaunas but were displaced after his grandfather was accused of participating in the January Uprising of 1863.[4] He later described his family origins and social status as early instances of a lifelong sense of being "between" (entre).[5] In 1911 his family moved to Warsaw. After completing his education at Saint Stanislaus Kostka's Gymnasium in 1922, Gombrowicz studied law at Warsaw University, earning a MJur in 1927.[6] He spent a year in Paris, where he studied at the Institute of Higher International Studies (French: Institut des Hautes Etudes Internationales). He was less than diligent in his studies, but his time in France brought him in constant contact with other young intellectuals. He also visited the Mediterranean. ; Witold Gombrowicz: When Gombrowicz returned to Poland, he began applying for legal positions with little success. In the 1920s he started writing. He soon rejected the legendary novel, whose form and subject matter were supposed to manifest his "worse" and darker side of nature. Similarly, his attempt to write a popular novel in collaboration with Tadeusz Kępiński was a failure. At the turn of the 1920s and 1930s, Gombrowicz began to write short stories, later printed under the title Memoirs of a Time of Immaturity, edited by Gombrowicz and published under the name Bacacay, the street where he lived during his exile in Argentina. From the moment of this literary debut, his reviews and columns began appearing in the press, mainly the Kurier Poranny (Morning Courier). Gombrowicz met with other young writers and intellectuals, forming an artistic café society in Zodiak and Ziemiańska, both in Warsaw. The publication of Ferdydurke, his first novel, brought him acclaim in literary circles.[7] ; Witold Gombrowicz: Just before the outbreak of the Second World War, Gombrowicz took part in the maiden voyage of the Polish transatlantic liner MS Chrobry to South America.[8] When he learned of the outbreak of war in Europe, he decided to wait in Buenos Aires until it was over; he reported to the Polish legation in 1941 but was considered unfit for military duties. He stayed in Argentina until 1963—often, especially during the war, in poverty.
knowledge1: Andreea Marin // Andreea Marin Andreea Violeta Marin (born 22 December 1974, in Roman, Neamţ County) is a Romanian television presenter and TV personality. She majored in Journalism, Public Relations & Advertisement, Computer Programming and Mathematics & Physics during her college years. She debuted in 1994 at TVR Iași as emcee. Her involvement within the Romanian media seems to have directly contributed to her selection as the most successful female media person in the country. On 2 December 2006, Marin hosted the 2006 Junior Eurovision Song Contest. She also presented the Romanian votes at the 2000, 2004, 2006, and 2007 Eurovision Song Contest; Andreea Marin // end of their marriage. Their marriage was officially ended on 13 February 2017. Andreea Marin is the only Romanian UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador. Andreea Marin Andreea Violeta Marin (born 22 December 1974, in Roman, Neamţ County) is a Romanian television presenter and TV personality. She majored in Journalism, Public Relations & Advertisement, Computer Programming and Mathematics & Physics during her college years. She debuted in 1994 at TVR Iași as emcee. Her involvement within the Romanian media seems to have directly contributed to her selection as the most successful female media person in the country. On 2 December 2006, Marin hosted; Andreea Marin // finals. Since 1999, she has hosted and directed "Surprize, Surprize" ("Surprises, Surprises"), a long-running show about life stories involving disabled people, people without money, and people with relatives gone away, broadcast on TVR1. Marin is the communications director of Madrid-based Prime Time World Broadcast, and the editorial director of the Romanian version of "Business Woman Magazine". Married to Ștefan Bănică, Jr. in 2006, she was subsequently known as Andreea Marin Bănică. They have a daughter, Ana Violeta Bănică (b. 15 December 2007). The couple divorced in 2013. She married physician Tuncay Öztürk in 2014. In October 2016 they announced the [sep] knowledge2: Andreea Marin: Andreea Violeta Marin (born 22 December 1974, in Roman, Neamț County) is a Romanian television presenter and TV personality. ; Andreea Marin: She majored in Journalism, Public Relations & Advertisement, Computer Programming and Mathematics & Physics during her college years.[1] She debuted in 1994 at TVR Iași as emcee. [2] ; Andreea Marin: Her involvement within the Romanian media seems to have directly contributed to her selection as the most successful female media person in the country.[3] On 2 December 2006, Marin hosted the 2006 Junior Eurovision Song Contest. She also presented the Romanian votes at the 2000, 2004, 2006, and 2007 Eurovision Song Contest finals. ; Andreea Marin: Since 1999, she has hosted and directed Surprize, Surprize ("Surprises, Surprises"), a long-running show about life stories involving disabled people, people without money, and people with relatives gone away, broadcast on TVR1. [4] ; Andreea Marin: Marin is the communications director of Madrid-based Prime Time World Broadcast, and the editorial director of the Romanian version of Business Woman Magazine. [5]
knowledge1: Phil Vickery (rugby union) // Phil Vickery (rugby union) Philip John Vickery MBE DL (born 14 March 1976) is a former English rugby union tighthead prop and member of the England squad. He was a member of England's World Cup winning squad in 2003, playing in all seven matches in the tournament, and is a former England captain. Vickery ended his club rugby career at London Wasps, joining the London side in 2006 after eleven years with Gloucester Rugby. Given the nickname "Raging Bull", he played in three Rugby World Cups, including as England captain in the 2007 tournament, and toured Australia and South Africa; Phil Vickery (rugby union) // Robinson and Ben Kay. Also, on 8 January 2008 he was selected in the squad for the 2008 Six Nations Championship by Brian Ashton. He played every game except for the 23–19 win over Italy which he missed through injury. Vickery is married to Kate and they have two children. He was a co-commentator for ITV's coverage of the 2011 Rugby World Cup. Vickery won the 2011 series of Celebrity Masterchef beating Kirsty Wark and Nick Pickard in the final. He was appointed a Deputy Lieutenant of Gloucestershire in 2015. Phil Vickery (rugby union) Philip John Vickery MBE DL (born; Phil Vickery (rugby union) // the 2003 World Cup. He played in all seven games in the tournament and captained the side against Uruguay. He scored his first international try when he came off the bench against Samoa in England’s third game of the tournament. A rib injury prevented him from captaining the non capped match against the New Zealand Barbarians in December 2003. Although he took a full part in the 2004 Six Nations, another back operation in May ruled him out of the summer tour to New Zealand and Australia. He returned to rugby only in late October 2004. Making his international comeback,; Phil Vickery (rugby union) // he came on as a replacement against South Africa for the first Autumn Test between the two sides on 18 November 2006. After playing well, he drove over to score the winning try, which was converted by Andy Goode, and England won their first game since February that year. He was selected on 2 January by new England Head Coach Brian Ashton to captain the side during the 2007 Six Nations and 2007 Rugby World Cup. He was one of only four players to have started both the 2003 and 2007 RWC Finals, the other three being Jonny Wilkinson, Jason; Phil Vickery (rugby union) // Powergen Cup Final triumph through injury. His representative career went from strength to strength, with appearances for England U21s and Colts in the 1996–97 season. In April 2006 he announced he was quitting Gloucester Rugby after 11 years and signed for Wasps in a 3-year deal. Vickery made his Wasps debut in their 23 – 13 win over London Irish on 8 October 2006. On 28 October 2010, Vickery was forced to retire from rugby after suffering from several neck injuries. He played his last game at Kingsholm against Gloucester on 25 September, which is where he started his career. [sep] knowledge2: Phil Vickery (rugby union): Philip John Vickery MBE DL (born 14 March 1976)[1] is a former English rugby union tighthead prop and member of the England squad.  He was a member of England's World Cup winning squad in 2003, playing in all seven matches in the tournament, and is a former England captain.  Vickery ended his club rugby career at London Wasps, joining the London side in 2006 after eleven years with Gloucester Rugby.[2] Given the nickname "Raging Bull", he played in three Rugby World Cups, including as England captain in the 2007 tournament, and toured Australia and South Africa with the British & Irish Lions. Made his debut for Bolingey Barbarians Sunday 25th Sept 2022 vs Bude vets. ; Phil Vickery (rugby union): The son of a dairy farmer, Vickery was born to Cornish parents in Barnstaple, Devon, England and says he is proud to be a Cornishman and an Englishman.[3] Educated at Budehaven School, his interest in sport developed as a youngster, and by age 12 he started playing rugby.  By the age of 16 he gained his first National Representative honour, being picked for the England Schools U16s group. ; Phil Vickery (rugby union): Vickery left school age 16 and worked as a herdsman on his parents' farm.  He remains a qualified cattle inseminator.[4] ; Phil Vickery (rugby union): Vickery has an Oriental tattoo on his left shoulder which roughly translates to "I'll fight you to the death", and a bulldog tattoo on his right. ; Phil Vickery (rugby union): He started with the Cornish club Bude, then moved to Redruth, during which time he first appeared in an England Colts side.[5] In 1995, England 'A' coach Richard Hill persuaded the 19-year-old Vickery to join Gloucester Rugby, where he became known as "The Raging Bull". Whilst at Gloucester he started in the 2002 Zurich Championship Final (the year before winning the play-offs constituted winning the English title) in which Gloucester defeated Bristol Rugby.[6] The following year he missed their 2003 Powergen Cup Final triumph through injury.[7][8]
knowledge1: Frank Middlemass // Frank Middlemass Francis George “Frank” Middlemass (28 May 1919 8 September 2006) was an English actor, who even in his early career played older roles. He is best remembered for his television roles as Rocky Hardcastle in "As Time Goes By", Algy Herries in "To Serve Them All My Days" and Dr. Alex Ferrenby in "Heartbeat". Middlemass was also active in the Royal Shakespeare Company and was the fourth and final actor to play Dan Archer in "The Archers". Born to Thomas Middlemass and Mary Elizabeth Hoggett, Frank Middlemass was the youngest of four children after sisters Dorothy Mary (born; Frank Middlemass // then went on to join the Old Vic Company. While with them he toured North and South America, Australia, New Zealand, Israel, Lebanon, Russia, Poland and the Far East., and performed in "Twelfth Night" opposite Vivien Leigh. During the 1960s, he toured with Ian McKellen's Actors' Company and performed at the Nottingham Playhouse. He performed opposite Peter O'Toole in "Waiting for Godot". His first television role was in 1958, in "Dixon of Dock Green". His other early television appearances included "Z-Cars", "Softly, Softly", "The Avengers" and "Jackanory". During the 1970s and 1980s he appeared in "Doctor at Large", "War and; Frank Middlemass // 2005, "As Time Goes By" returned for two reunion specials, aired in Christmas that year, and this was his final television appearance. Middlemass never married, and for forty years he had a room in the house of his close friend, actor Geoffrey Toone, who died in 2005. Middlemass died, aged 87, in Northwood, London. Frank Middlemass Francis George “Frank” Middlemass (28 May 1919 8 September 2006) was an English actor, who even in his early career played older roles. He is best remembered for his television roles as Rocky Hardcastle in "As Time Goes By", Algy Herries in "To Serve; Frank Middlemass // and "Mrs Caldicot's Cabbage War" (2002). He joined the Royal Shakespeare Company in 1984 and his Shakespearean roles included Friar Lawrence in "Romeo and Juliet", Quince in "A Midsummer Night's Dream" and Holofernes in "Love's Labour's Lost". Middlemass also appeared widely in classic plays such as "Rosmersholm", "Heartbreak House" and "You Never Can Tell". Even in his eighties, Frank Middlemass was still performing on stage, notably in "The Importance of Being Earnest" and toured with a one-man show called "Frankly Speaking". In his final years, he made appearances in "Kavanagh QC", "Casualty", "The 10th Kingdom", "Doctors" and "Midsomer Murders". In [sep] knowledge2: Frank Middlemass: Francis George Middlemass (28 May 1919 – 8 September 2006) was an English actor, who even in his early career played older roles. He is best remembered for his television roles as Rocky Hardcastle in As Time Goes By, Algy Herries in To Serve Them All My Days and Dr. Alex Ferrenby in 20 episodes of Heartbeat. Middlemass was also active in the Royal Shakespeare Company and was the fourth and final actor to play Dan Archer in The Archers. ; Frank Middlemass: Middlemass was born in Eaglescliffe, County Durham, the son of a shipping company director.[1] He was brought up in Newcastle upon Tyne, and educated in Stockton-on-Tees.[2] He entered the army at the age of nineteen and was wounded in the Dunkirk retreat.[3] He left the army when he was thirty and was by then a lieutenant colonel.[3] ; Frank Middlemass: Middlemass started his acting career in rep in Penzance, Cornwall and then went on to join the Old Vic Company.[3] While with them he toured North and South America, Australia, New Zealand, Israel, Lebanon, Russia, Poland and the Far East,[1] and performed in Twelfth Night opposite Vivien Leigh.[4] During the 1960s, he toured with Ian McKellen's Actors' Company and performed at the Nottingham Playhouse. He performed opposite Peter O'Toole in Waiting for Godot.[1] ; Frank Middlemass: His first television role was in 1958, in Dixon of Dock Green. His other early television appearances included Z-Cars, Softly, Softly, The Avengers and Jackanory.[3] During the 1970s and 1980s he appeared in Doctor at Large, War and Peace (a memorable performance as Mikhail Kutuzov), Crown Court, Last of the Summer Wine, Ripping Yarns (Murder at Moorstone's Manor), Upstairs, Downstairs, Poldark (1975), Fall of Eagles (as Russian Prime Minister Pyotr Stolypin), The Sweeney and Emmerdale Farm.[5] He played Sir Charles Lyndon in Stanley Kubrick's Barry Lyndon (1975).[6] ; Frank Middlemass: Middlemass played the philandering butcher Mr. Lyon in the final episode of the third series of Upstairs, Downstairs in 1973, but it was not until 1980, when he appeared in the post-World War I drama To Serve Them All My Days, that he first took a leading role in a British series.[1]
knowledge1: Andreas Ivanschitz // Andreas Ivanschitz Andreas Ivanschitz (; born 15 October 1983) is an Austrian footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder. A full international since 2003, he represented Austria at Euro 2008. Born in Eisenstadt, Ivanschitz began his football career as a youth in his town's local team called ASK Baumgarten, where he spent nine years. Soon, Rapid Wien scouts found out about his talent and in 1998, he signed his first professional contract with the Austrian champions. He was only 16 years old when he wore his team's shirt during an Austrian Cup match against Ranshofen on 26 October 1999. His; Andreas Ivanschitz // 12 goals. As of 26 June 2016 Ivanschitz comes from a musical family and plays various musical instruments in his spare time. He is a part of the Burgenland Croat community. Andreas Ivanschitz Andreas Ivanschitz (; born 15 October 1983) is an Austrian footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder. A full international since 2003, he represented Austria at Euro 2008. Born in Eisenstadt, Ivanschitz began his football career as a youth in his town's local team called ASK Baumgarten, where he spent nine years. Soon, Rapid Wien scouts found out about his talent and in 1998, he signed his; Andreas Ivanschitz // first official League match was in 2000 against Wüstenrot Salzburg. In 177 games for Rapid Wien, Ivanschitz scored 27 times, winning the Austrian Championship title in 2004–05. In 2003, he was elected "Austrian Footballer of the Year." In January 2006, Ivanschitz transferred to Red Bull Salzburg and then to Greek Super League club Panathinaikos in August 2006 on a two-year loan. On 20 June 2008, Ivanschitz agreed on a permanent deal with Panathinaikos. After three years in Greece with Panathinaikos he agreed on 18 July 2009 on a two-year loan with 1. FSV Mainz 05 with the view to a; Andreas Ivanschitz // two-year permanent contract in the summer of 2011. Mainz took advantage of this contract option prematurely, and signed Ivanschitz permanently in January 2011. On 10 June 2013, Ivanschitz left Mainz for Levante UD. He scored his first goal in La Liga on 31 August, the winner with the last kick of a 2–1 home win over Rayo Vallecano. He finished his first season in Spain with three goals from 29 games, the last being in a 2–0 win over city rivals Valencia CF on 10 May. On 4 August 2015, he signed with Seattle Sounders FC in Major League Soccer.; Andreas Ivanschitz // After suffering from an injury his debut was postponed to 13 September where he assisted a late Obafemi Martins goal to tie up the game against San Jose Earthquakes. Ivanschitz converted Seattle's second kick from the spot in the 2016 MLS Cup penalty shootout, which the Sounders eventually won after six rounds, securing their first MLS Cup Title. Ivanschitz made his debut for Austria in a February 2003 friendly match against Greece, coming on as a substitute for Markus Weissenberger. He was also a participant at the UEFA Euro 2008. He has earned 69 caps for Austria and has scored [sep] knowledge2: Andreas Ivanschitz: Andreas Ivanschitz (Croatian: Ivančić; born 15 October 1983) is an Austrian retired footballer who played as an attacking midfielder.[1] ; Andreas Ivanschitz: During the career, Ivanschitz played for Rapid Wien, Red Bull Salzburg, Panathinaikos, 1.FSV Mainz 05, Levante, Seattle Sounders FC and Viktoria Plzen. ; Andreas Ivanschitz: A full international since 2003, he represented Austria at Euro 2008. ; Andreas Ivanschitz: Born in Eisenstadt, Ivanschitz began his football career as a youth in his town's local team called ASK Baumgarten, where he spent nine years. Soon, Rapid Wien scouts found out about his talent and in 1998, he signed his first professional contract with the Austrian champions. He was only 16 years old when he wore his team's shirt during an Austrian Cup match against Ranshofen on 26 October 1999. His first official League match was in 2000 against Wüstenrot Salzburg. In 177 games for Rapid Wien, Ivanschitz scored 27 times, winning the Austrian Championship title in 2004–05. In 2003, he was elected "Austrian Footballer of the Year." ; Andreas Ivanschitz: In January 2006, Ivanschitz transferred to Red Bull Salzburg and then to Greek Super League club Panathinaikos in August 2006 on a two-year loan. On 20 June 2008, Ivanschitz agreed on a permanent deal with Panathinaikos.[2]
knowledge1: Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort // Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort Tracy Louise Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort (born 22 December 1958) is a British Duchess, environmental activist and former actress. She is widely known as Tracy Worcester, her name before 2017. Born in Kensington, Tracy Louise Ward is a daughter of The Hon. Peter Alistair Ward, a younger son of William Ward, 3rd Earl of Dudley, who became chairman of the family business, Baggeridge Brick, and his first wife, Clare Leonora Baring, the only child of the gentleman cricketer Giles Baring. She is the sister of the actress Rachel Ward and also has one brother and; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort // 2010: she lost the money in June 2012 when a judge ordered it to be forfeited, as Assange had sought to escape the jurisdiction of the English courts by entering the embassy of Ecuador. In 2013, she was signatory to a campaign for women to be able to inherit all peerages and entailed estates. During the campaign for the 2015 general election, she was one of several public figures who endorsed the parliamentary candidacy of the Green Party's Caroline Lucas. Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort Tracy Louise Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort (born 22 December 1958) is a British Duchess, environmental; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort // is best remembered for her role as Tessa Robinson in the television detective series "C.A.T.S. Eyes" (1986–1987). She also played the first Miss Scarlett in the television drama game show "Cluedo" (1990); and appeared in the "Doctor Who" serial "Timelash" (1985). Her theatre credits include: "Our Day Out" (Nottingham Playhouse) and "Intimacy" (Cafe Theatre). On 13 June 1987, she married Henry, Marquess of Worcester, known to his friends as Bunter Worcester, son and heir of David Somerset, 11th Duke of Beaufort. They were divorced in 2018. He was a farmer and chartered surveyor who later succeeded his father as 12th; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort // two half-brothers. Her great-grandfather, the 2nd Earl of Dudley, was Lord Lieutenant of Ireland in the early 20th century, and then Governor-General of Australia. He was the son of Georgina, Countess of Dudley. Tracy Ward grew up on her father's estate at Cornwell, Oxfordshire. After gaining three 'A'-levels, she went to Paris as a model, and then to work at Christie's in London, before working in art galleries in New York City. In her early twenties, she trained for an acting career at the Academy of Live and Recorded Arts, London, and the London Drama School. As an actress, she; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort // Duke of Beaufort. Charles, Prince of Wales, and Diana, Princess of Wales, both attended the wedding. They have three children: In 1989, Tracy Worcester began working with Friends of the Earth. Since then, she has been active in green politics as Associate Director of the International Society for Ecology and Culture, a trustee of The Gaia Foundation, the Trustee of The Schumacher Society and the Bath Environment Centre, on the Council of the UK's Soil Association, and a member of the International Forum on Globalisation. She was a member of the Referendum Party, opposed Britain's involvement in the European Union. [sep] knowledge2: Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort: Tracy Louise Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort (née Ward; born 22 December 1958) is a British duchess, environmental activist, and former actress. She is usually known as Tracy Worcester, the married style that she often used before 2017, and as an actress was credited as Tracy-Louise Ward. She was previously married to Henry Somerset, 12th Duke of Beaufort. ; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort: Born in Kensington,[1] Tracy Louise Ward is a daughter of the Hon. Peter Alistair Ward, a younger son of William Ward, 3rd Earl of Dudley. Her father became chairman of the family business, Baggeridge Brick. His first wife, Clare Leonora Baring, was the only child of the gentleman cricketer Giles Baring. Tracy Beaufort is the sister of the actress Rachel Ward. She also has one brother and two half-brothers. Her great-grandfather William Ward, 2nd Earl of Dudley, was Lord Lieutenant of Ireland in the early 20th century, and then Governor-General of Australia. The son of William Ward, 1st Earl of Dudley, and Georgina, Countess of Dudley, he owned nearly 30,000 acres in Staffordshire and Worcestershire, two hundred coal and iron mines, and several iron works, including the Round Oak Steelworks.[2] ; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort: Tracy Ward grew up on her father's estate at Cornwell, Oxfordshire. After gaining three A-levels, she went to Paris as a model, and then to work at Christie's in London, before working in art galleries in New York City. In her early twenties, she trained for an acting career at the Academy of Live and Recorded Arts, London, and the London Drama School.[citation needed] ; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort: As an actress, she is best remembered for her role as Tessa Robinson in the television detective series C.A.T.S. Eyes (1986–1987). She also appeared in the film Dance with a Stranger and the Doctor Who serial Timelash, both in 1985, and played the first Miss Scarlett in the television drama game show Cluedo (1990). Her theatre credits include: Our Day Out (Nottingham Playhouse) and Intimacy (Cafe Theatre).[citation needed] ; Tracy Somerset, Duchess of Beaufort: On 13 June 1987, she married Henry, Marquess of Worcester, known to his friends as Bunter Worcester, a farmer and chartered surveyor who was son and heir of David Somerset, 11th Duke of Beaufort. Charles, Prince of Wales, and Diana, Princess of Wales, both attended the wedding. They were divorced in 2018, after he had succeeded his father as Duke of Beaufort.[3] They have three children:
knowledge1: Elizabeth Inglis // Elizabeth Inglis Elizabeth Inglis (born Desiree Mary Lucy Hawkins, 10 July 1913 – 25 August 2007), also known as Elizabeth Earl, was an English actress, known for her role in "The Letter". Inglis was born Desiree Mary Lucy Hawkins in Colchester, Essex, the daughter of Margaret Inglis (née Hunt) and Alan George Hawkins. Her screen debut was in the 1934 film, "Borrowed Clothes". She then had a small part in "The 39 Steps" (1935) as Hilary Jordan. She played the role of the young maid Nancy in the original British production of Patrick Hamilton's Victorian stage thriller "Gas Light", which; Elizabeth Inglis // television overtook radio as America's dominant form of home entertainment. After marrying Weaver, Inglis retired from acting altogether. The couple had two children, one of whom, Susan, became actress Sigourney Weaver. A photograph of Inglis was seen in a deleted scene in "Aliens" as Weaver's character's elderly grown daughter, Amanda Ripley. Inglis died on August 25, 2007, in Santa Barbara, California, aged 94. Elizabeth Inglis Elizabeth Inglis (born Desiree Mary Lucy Hawkins, 10 July 1913 – 25 August 2007), also known as Elizabeth Earl, was an English actress, known for her role in "The Letter". Inglis was born Desiree Mary; Ruth Langdon Inglis // Generation", which was published in "The New Leader". In the mid-1960s, Inglis took a position as an interviewer for "Nova" magazine. She later began to write opinion, travel features and personality profiles for "Nova", "The Observer", and other magazines. In 1962, Inglis provided public relations for the prize-winning documentary "The Black Fox". She later researched and wrote about social issues in "The Facts Are These" (1969). Inglis separated from Brian Inglis in 1972, and was divorced in 1974. She met the Canadian writer Eric Burdick, long a resident of Ireland and the UK; they lived together for the next two [sep] knowledge2: Elizabeth Inglis: Elizabeth Inglis (born Desiree Mary Lucy Hawkins, July 10, 1913 – August 25, 2007), also known as Elizabeth Earl, was an English actress, known for her role in The Letter. ; Elizabeth Inglis: Inglis was born Desiree Mary Lucy Hawkins in Colchester, Essex, the daughter of Margaret Inglis (née Hunt) and Alan George Hawkins. ; Elizabeth Inglis: Inglis' screen debut was in the 1934 film, Borrowed Clothes. She then had a small part in Alfred Hitchcock's The 39 Steps (1935) as Hilary Jordan. ; Elizabeth Inglis: She played the role of the young maid Nancy in the original British production of Patrick Hamilton's Victorian stage thriller Gas Light, which premiered December 5, 1938, and closed June 10, 1939, after a total of 141 performances.[3] Inglis and the rest of the cast recreated their stage roles for a 1939 television presentation performed live on BBC Television.[4] ; Elizabeth Inglis: In Hollywood, Inglis played the role of Adele Ainsworth in William Wyler's 1940 film The Letter. By this time she was credited as Elizabeth Earl.[5][6]
knowledge1: Mihai Eminescu // Mihai Eminescu Mihai Eminescu (; born Mihail Eminovici; 15 January 1850 – 15 June 1889) was a Romantic poet, novelist and journalist, generally regarded as the most famous and influential Romanian poet. Eminescu was an active member of the Junimea literary society and worked as an editor for the newspaper "Timpul" ("The Time"), the official newspaper of the Conservative Party (1880–1918). His poetry was first published when he was 16 and he went to Vienna to study when he was 19. The poet's manuscripts, containing 46 volumes and approximately 14,000 pages, were offered by Titu Maiorescu as a gift to; Mihai Eminescu // among other things, that "the Jew does not deserve any rights anywhere in Europe because he is not working." This was not, however, an unusual or false stance to take in the cultural and literary milieu of his age. Mihai Eminescu Mihai Eminescu (; born Mihail Eminovici; 15 January 1850 – 15 June 1889) was a Romantic poet, novelist and journalist, generally regarded as the most famous and influential Romanian poet. Eminescu was an active member of the Junimea literary society and worked as an editor for the newspaper "Timpul" ("The Time"), the official newspaper of the Conservative Party (1880–1918).; Mihai Eminescu // by his good friend, writer Ioan Slavici. In 1886, Eminescu suffered a nervous breakdown and was treated by Romanian doctors, in particular Julian Bogdan and Panait Zosin. Immediately diagnosed with syphilis, after being hospitalized in a nervous diseases hospice within the Neamț Monastery, the poet was treated with mercury. Firstly, massages in Botoșani, applied by Dr. Itszak, and then in Bucharest at Dr. Alexandru A. Suțu's sanatorium, where between February–June 1889 he was injected with mercuric chloride. Professor Doctor Irinel Popescu, corresponding member of the Romanian Academy and president of the Academy of Medical Sciences of Romania, states that Eminescu; Mihai Eminescu // published in the newspaper "Timpul". He used to have a unique manner of describing his own crisis of jealousy. He was soon proclaimed Romania's national poet, not because he wrote in an age of national revival, but rather because he was received as an author of paramount significance by Romanians in all provinces. Even today, he is considered the national poet of Romania, Moldova, and of the Romanians who live in the Ukrainian occupied part of Bucovina. Eminescu is omnipresent in today's Romania. His statues are everywhere; his face was on the 1000-lei banknote issued in 1998 and is on [sep] knowledge2: Mihai Eminescu: Mihai Eminescu (Romanian pronunciation: [miˈhaj emiˈnesku] ⓘ; born Mihail Eminovici; 15 January 1850 – 15 June 1889) was a Romanian Romantic poet from Moldavia, novelist, and journalist, generally regarded as the most famous and influential Romanian poet. Eminescu was an active member of the Junimea literary society and worked as an editor for the newspaper Timpul ("The Time"), the official newspaper of the Conservative Party (1880–1918).[2] His poetry was first published when he was 16 and he went to Vienna, Austria to study when he was 19. The poet's manuscripts, containing 46 volumes and approximately 14,000 pages, were offered by Titu Maiorescu as a gift to the Romanian Academy during the meeting that was held on 25 January 1902.[3] Notable works include Luceafărul (The Vesper/The Evening Star/The Lucifer/The Daystar), Odă în metru antic (Ode in Ancient Meter), and the five Letters (Epistles/Satires). In his poems, he frequently used metaphysical, mythological and historical subjects. ; Mihai Eminescu: His father was Gheorghe Eminovici, an aristocrat from Bukovina, which was then part of the Austrian Empire (while his grandfather came from Banat). He crossed the border into Moldavia, settling in Ipotești, near the town of Botoșani. He married Raluca Iurașcu, an heiress of an old noble family. In a Junimea register, Eminescu wrote down his birthday date as 22 December 1849, while in the documents of Cernăuți Gymnasium, where Eminescu studied, his birth date is 15 January 1850. Nevertheless, Titu Maiorescu, in his work Eminescu and His Poems (1889) quoted N. D. Giurescu's research and adopted his conclusion regarding the date and place of Mihai Eminescu's birth, as being 15 January 1850, in Botoșani. This date resulted from several sources, among which there was a file of notes on christenings from the archives of the Uspenia (Princely) Church of Botoșani; inside this file, the date of birth was "15 January 1850" and the date of christening was the 21st of the same month. The date of his birth was confirmed by the poet's elder sister, Aglae Drogli, who affirmed that the place of birth was the village of Ipotești, Botoșani County.[4] ; Mihai Eminescu: Mihail (as he appears in baptismal records) or Mihai (the more common form of the name that he used) was born in Botoșani, Moldavia. He spent his early childhood in Botoșani and Ipotești, in his parents family home. From 1858 to 1866 he attended school in Cernăuți. He finished 4th grade as the 5th of 82 students, after which he attended two years of gymnasium. ; Mihai Eminescu: The first evidence of Eminescu as a writer is in 1866. In January of that year Romanian teacher Aron Pumnul died and his students in Cernăuţi published a pamphlet, Lăcrămioarele învățăceilor gimnaziaști (The Tears of the Gymnasium Students) in which a poem entitled La mormântul lui Aron Pumnul (At the Grave of Aron Pumnul) appears, signed "M. Eminovici". On 25 February his poem De-aș avea (If I Had) was published in Iosif Vulcan's literary magazine Familia in Pest. This began a steady series of published poems (and the occasional translation from German). Also, it was Iosif Vulcan, who disliked the Slavic source suffix "-ici" of the young poet's last name, that chose for him the more apparent Romanian "nom de plume" Mihai Eminescu. ; Mihai Eminescu: In 1867, he joined Iorgu Caragiale's troupe as a clerk and prompter; the next year he transferred to Mihai Pascaly's troupe. Both of these were among the leading Romanian theatrical troupes of their day, the latter including Matei Millo and Fanny Tardini-Vlădicescu [ro]. He soon settled in Bucharest, where at the end of November he became a clerk and copyist for the National Theater. Throughout this period, he continued to write and publish poems. He also paid his rent by translating hundreds of pages of a book by Heinrich Theodor Rötscher, although this never resulted in a completed work. Also at this time he began his novel Geniu pustiu (Wasted Genius), published posthumously in 1904 in an unfinished form.
knowledge1: Vujadin Savić // signed for English Championship club, Watford until the end of the season. However, he was one of three released by Watford following their promotion to the Barclays Premier League in 2015, and left without making an appearance for the club. In 2015, Savić joined Sheriff Tiraspol, where he made a total of 40 appearances and 4 goals in all competitions over two seasons. He scored a bicycle kick in a league match against FC Zaria Bălți on September 19, 2015. In June 2017, Savić returned to his home club, Red Star Belgrade on a two-year contract. In his first season [sep] knowledge2: Vujadin Savić: On 14 July 2019, Cypriot club APOEL officially announced Savić's signing.[10] Savić joined APOEL from Red Star on a free transfer, with a provision that Red Star be paid half of the sum of his next transfer.[11] He signed a three-year contract.[10] In late August 2019, he underwent surgery for a groin injury.[12]
knowledge1: Gubby Allen // Gubby Allen Sir George Oswald Browning "Gubby" Allen CBE (31 July 1902 – 29 November 1989) was a cricketer who captained England in eleven Test matches. In first-class matches, he played for Middlesex and Cambridge University. A fast bowler and hard-hitting lower-order batsman, Allen later became an influential cricket administrator who held key positions in the Marylebone Cricket Club (MCC), which effectively ruled English cricket at the time; he also served as chairman of the England selectors. Allen was born in Australia and grew up in England from the age of six. After playing cricket for Eton College, he went; Gubby Allen // to Cambridge University where he established a reputation as a fast bowler, albeit one who was often injured. After leaving university, Allen played mainly for Middlesex. He improved as a batsman in the following seasons until work commitments forced him to play less regularly. A change of career allowed him to play more cricket, and by the late 1920s he was on the verge of the England Test team. He made his debut in 1930, and remained in contention for a place, when he was available to play, for the rest of the decade. During the controversial Bodyline tour of; Gubby Allen // little time for cricket, although he appeared twice for Middlesex in 1946. The following season, he played once for Middlesex, and captained their second team. He also played twice for the Free Foresters, a club of wandering amateurs, in first-class games. Late in the 1947 season, Allen was asked to captain and manage an MCC team which was to tour the West Indies that winter. The young and experimental team suffered badly with injuries; Allen missed several matches himself through strains. In first-class games on the tour he scored 262 runs and took six wickets, but writing in "Wisden", Norman [sep] knowledge2: Gubby Allen: Sir George Oswald Browning "Gubby" Allen[notes 1] CBE (31 July 1902 – 29 November 1989) was a cricketer who captained England in eleven Test matches. In first-class matches, he played for Middlesex and Cambridge University. A fast bowler and hard-hitting lower-order batsman, Allen later became an influential cricket administrator who held key positions in the Marylebone Cricket Club (MCC), which effectively ruled English cricket at the time; he also served as chairman of the England selectors. ; Gubby Allen: Allen was born in Australia and grew up in England from the age of six. After playing cricket for Eton College, he went to Cambridge University where he established a reputation as a fast bowler, albeit one who was often injured. After leaving university, Allen played mainly for Middlesex. He improved as a batsman in the following seasons until work commitments forced him to play less regularly. A change of career allowed him to play more cricket, and by the late 1920s he was on the verge of the England Test team. He made his debut in 1930, and remained in contention for a place, when he was available to play, for the rest of the decade. During the controversial Bodyline tour of 1932–33, Allen was very successful for England but refused to use the intimidatory tactics employed by his teammates. ; Gubby Allen: As Allen's first-class career came to a close, he moved into administration and held considerable influence in English and world cricket. He was instrumental in the creation of a MCC coaching manual, and worked hard to eliminate illegal bowling actions. As chairman of selectors from 1955 to 1961, he presided over a period of great success for English cricket, during which he worked closely with the Test captain Peter May. In 1963, he became MCC president, and was made the club's treasurer the following year. In this role, he was deeply involved in the D'Oliveira affair, a controversy over the potential selection of Basil D'Oliveira to tour South Africa. After Allen's gradual retirement from his administrative roles, he was knighted in 1986 and spent his later years in a flat close to Lord's, where he died, aged 87, in 1989. ; Gubby Allen: Allen was born on 31 July 1902 in Bellevue Hill, Sydney, Australia,[notes 2][5] the second of three children to Walter Allen, a lawyer, and his wife Marguerite (Pearl), née Lamb, the daughter of Edward Lamb, a Queensland government minister. Later rumours suggested that Allen's real father may have been the Middlesex cricketer Pelham Warner, who supported Allen in his cricket career.[notes 3][3][6] Both of Allen's parents had roots in England as well as Australia. In 1909, when Allen was six years old, his family moved to London—hoping that the children would benefit from an English education[5]—where they initially lived in a flat before moving to various country villages.[7] Finding that they enjoyed England, the family abandoned plans to return to Australia.[8] ; Gubby Allen: After being educated by a governess, Allen joined Summer Fields School in Oxford in 1912. He began to play cricket seriously at school; by his second year, he reached the school second team, from where he progressed to the first team then the captaincy.[9] His ability attracted the attention of Eton College, where a friend of Allen's father, C. M. Wells, was a housemaster. The family had planned to send Allen to Haileybury, but Wells persuaded Allen senior to send his son to Eton instead, although it was a considerable financial burden on the family. Allen, although not initially keen on the prospect, started there in the winter of 1915–16.[10]
knowledge1: Bobo Baldé // Celtic to their first away clean sheet in almost 15 months and he was awarded Man Of The Match. Baldé dropped out of the first team again after that, then got injured in early when playing for Guinea at the Africa Cup of Nations. Baldé was on the bench against Rangers on 29 March 2008, the first time since Christmas he had been selected after recovering from the injury he sustained at the Africa Cup of Nations. He then started a few days later replacing the suspended Gary Caldwell to make his first appearance since December 2007, with a man [sep] knowledge2: Bobo Baldé: Baldé started his career in 1995 at centre back for Marseille, where he stayed until 1997 but could not make the first-team breakthrough, so he had to leave his hometown club to join second division outfit FC Mulhouse for the 1997–98 season, staying only that year. When Mulhouse were relegated he joined AS Cannes on loan in 1998 where he had little success, in the league making 29 appearances and scoring 4 goals.[2] He left Marseille, moving to Toulouse, whom he helped to promotion during the 1999–00 season. In total he made 52 league appearances for Toulouse, scoring one goal.[3]
knowledge1: Julian Jarrold // Festival, while in 2017, he became a patron of the festival. He is a member of the family which founded Jarrolds of Norwich in 1823 and was educated in Norfolk at Gresham's School, Holt. He is an alumnus of Trinity & All Saints College. Julian Jarrold Julian Edward Peter Jarrold (born 15 May 1960 in Norwich, Norfolk) is a BAFTA Award-nominated English film and television director. Jarrold directed "Great Expectations", starring Ioan Gruffudd, in 1999. "The Boston Globe" felt that Jarrold helped distinguish it from the many other adaptations by "keeping the reins in on his characters, emotionally and morally.; Julian Jarrold // Julian Jarrold Julian Edward Peter Jarrold (born 15 May 1960 in Norwich, Norfolk) is a BAFTA Award-nominated English film and television director. Jarrold directed "Great Expectations", starring Ioan Gruffudd, in 1999. "The Boston Globe" felt that Jarrold helped distinguish it from the many other adaptations by "keeping the reins in on his characters, emotionally and morally. They are unromanticized and low-key performances that only rarely spill over into the maudlin and righteous." In 2006, Jarrold directed "Kinky Boots". The "Chicago Tribune" called the film "quite enjoyable, effortlessly well-done on every level, even moving at times, but relatively lightweight." In 2007,; Julian Jarrold // Jarrold directed the HBO film "The Girl" in 2013. The director received his first Emmy nomination for his work in the film. Mandalay Vision has hired Jarrold to direct the serial killer film "Exit 147", with a script written by Travis Milloy. Producer Cathy Schulman and Matthew Rhodes are producing the film for Mandalay. In February 2013, Taylor Kitsch joined the film to play lead as a sadistic sheriff. Most recently Jarrold directed "A Royal Night Out" for Ecosse Films currently in post-production and due for release in May 2015. In 2016, Jarrold became a judge at the Norwich Film [sep] knowledge2: Julian Jarrold: Julian Edward Peter Jarrold (born in Norfolk) is a BAFTA-nominated British film and television director.[1] ; Julian Jarrold: A scion of the Huguenot family originally from near Lyon in France, which founded Jarrolds of Norwich in 1823, he is the only son of Peter Jarrold DL[2] and Juliet née Pollard.  ; Julian Jarrold: He attended Gresham's School, Holt,[3] before studying at Trinity & All Saints College, Leeds.[4] ; Julian Jarrold: Jarrold directed Great Expectations, starring Ioan Gruffudd, in 1999. The Boston Globe felt that Jarrold helped distinguish it from the many other adaptations by "keeping the reins in on his characters, emotionally and morally. They are unromanticized and low-key performances that only rarely spill over into the maudlin and righteous."[5] In 2006, Jarrold directed Kinky Boots which has proven hugely popular with audiences in its numerous showing on TV.  The Chicago Tribune called the film "quite enjoyable, effortlessly well-done on every level, even moving at times, but relatively lightweight."[6] In 2007, Becoming Jane was released. The Washington Times stated that Jarrold's direction "has made a witty, beautiful film. His technical achievement is no small matter, with nice, long tracking shots and clever focus tricks."[7] ; Julian Jarrold: The following year, Jarrold directed the first film adaptation of Evelyn Waugh's iconic story Brideshead Revisited, "one of the great English novels which has never been filmed," according to producer Kevin Loader.[8] It starred Hayley Atwell, Matthew Goode, Emma Thompson, and Michael Gambon. About the novel's status as an unchangeable classic, Jarrold stated that "there are people who are obsessive and obviously that's going to be daunting when they come and judge us. I've had a few people who have said, 'Why are you doing it?' But I think there is a generation who know nothing about Brideshead Revisited, who haven't read the book or who are only dimly aware of the TV series because it's been repeated on ITV4 or something."[9] The Daily Telegraph felt that Jarrold's "scenes are filled with grand period detail – huge Rolls-Royces, ice sculptures, vast fireplaces of sculptured marble – but he stops it from becoming an overblown, glossy spectacle by making the world around the characters feel like a dream."[8]
knowledge1: Vasily Chuikov // Vasily Chuikov Vasily Ivanovich Chuikov (12 February 1900 – 18 March 1982) was a Soviet military officer. He was the commander of the 62nd Army during the Battle of Stalingrad. Following World War II, Chuikov was Chief of the Group of Soviet Forces in Germany (1949–53), commander of the Kiev Military District (1953–60), Chief of the Soviet Armed Forces and Deputy Minister of Defense (1960–64), and head of the Soviet Civil Defense Forces (1961–72). Chuikov was twice awarded the titles Hero of the Soviet Union (1944 and 1945) and was awarded the Distinguished Service Cross by the United States for; Vasily Chuikov // to 1964, he was the Commander-in-Chief of the Soviet Ground Forces. He also served as the Chief of the Civil Defense from 1961 until his retirement in 1972. From 1961 until his death, he was a member of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union. He was a major consultant for the design of the Stalingrad battle memorial on Mamayev Kurgan, and was buried there after his death at the age of 82. Vasily Chuikov Vasily Ivanovich Chuikov (12 February 1900 – 18 March 1982) was a Soviet military officer. He was the commander of the; Vasily Chuikov // spurs for cavalry officers. Chuikov and all his brothers became soldiers and fought in the Russian Civil War. During the turmoil of the Russian Revolution of 1917, Chuikov became unemployed. Later the same year, an older brother arranged for Chuikov to be recruited into the Red Guards. The year after, in 1918, he joined the Red Army. In October 1918, Chuikov saw active service when he was sent to the Southern Front as a deputy company commander to fight against the White Army. In the spring of 1919, he became commander of the 40th Regiment (later renamed the 43rd), part; Vasily Chuikov // breaking out in 1981, causing a nine-month illness and finally his death. He left his regiment in 1921 to continue his studies at the Frunze Military Academy, from which he graduated in 1925. Chuikov commanded the 4th Army in the Soviet invasion of Poland in 1939. He commanded the 9th Army in the Russo-Finnish War of 1940. He was then sent to China as an adviser to Chiang Kai-shek. In May 1942, the USSR recalled him. According to Chuikov's memoirs, his recall was due to Nationalist China claiming that the USSR was providing military aid as part of an attempt; Vasily Chuikov // his actions during the Battle of Stalingrad. In 1955, he was named a Marshal of the Soviet Union. Following his death in 1982, he was interred at the Stalingrad Memorial at the base of the Mamayev Hill, which had been the site of heavy fighting. Born into a peasant family in the village of Serebryanye Prudy in the Tula region south of Moscow, Chuikov was the eighth of 12 children and the fifth of eight sons. At the age of 12, he left school and his family home to earn his living in a factory in Saint Petersburg, turning out [sep] knowledge2: Vasily Chuikov: Vasily Ivanovich Chuikov (Russian: Васи́лий Ива́нович Чуйко́в, Russian: [vɐˈsʲilʲɪj t͡ɕʉjkof] ⓘ; 12 February [O.S. 31 January] 1900 – 18 March 1982) was a Soviet military commander and Marshal of the Soviet Union. He is best known for commanding the 62nd Army which saw heavy combat during the Battle of Stalingrad in the Second World War. ; Vasily Chuikov: Born to a peasant family near Tula, Chuikov earned his living as a factory worker from the age of 12. After the Russian Revolution of 1917, he joined the Red Army and distinguished himself during the Russian Civil War. After graduating from the Frunze Military Academy, Chuikov worked as a military attaché and intelligence officer in China and the Russian Far East. At the outbreak of the Second World War, Chuikov commanded the 4th Army during the Soviet invasion of Poland, and the 9th Army during the Winter War against Finland. In December 1940, he was again appointed military attaché to China in support of Chiang Kai-shek and the Nationalists in the war against Japan. ; Vasily Chuikov: In March 1942, Chuikov was recalled from China to defend against the German invasion of the Soviet Union. By September, he was assigned command of the 62nd Army in defense of Stalingrad. Tasked with holding the city at all costs, Chuikov adopted keeping the Soviet front-line positions as close to the Germans as physically possible. This served as an effective countermeasure against the Wehrmacht's combined-arms tactics, but by mid-November 1942 the Germans had captured most of the city after months of slow advance. In late November Chuikov's 62nd Army joined the rest of the Soviet forces in a counter-offensive, which led to the surrender of the German 6th Army in early 1943. After Stalingrad, Chuikov led his forces into Poland during Operation Bagration and the Vistula–Oder Offensive before advancing on Berlin. He personally accepted the unconditional surrender of German forces in Berlin on 2 May 1945. ; Vasily Chuikov: After the war, Chuikov served as Chief of the Group of Soviet Forces in Germany (1949–53), commander of the Kiev Military District (1953–60), Chief of the Soviet Armed Forces and Deputy Minister of Defense (1960–64), and head of the Soviet Civil Defense Forces (1961–72). Chuikov was twice awarded the titles Hero of the Soviet Union (1944 and 1945) and was awarded the Distinguished Service Cross by the United States for his actions during the Battle of Stalingrad. In 1955, he was named a Marshal of the Soviet Union. Following his death in 1982, Chuikov was interred at the Stalingrad memorial at Mamayev Kurgan, which had been the site of heavy fighting. ; Vasily Chuikov: Born into a peasant family in the village of Serebryanye Prudy in the Tula region south of Moscow, Chuikov was the eighth of 12 children and the fifth of eight sons. At the age of 12, he left school and his family home to earn his living in a factory in Saint Petersburg, turning out spurs for cavalry officers.[1] Chuikov and all his brothers became soldiers and fought in the Russian Civil War.[2]
knowledge1: Henryk Wieniawski // Henryk Wieniawski Henryk Wieniawski (; 10 July 1835 – 31 March 1880) was a Polish violinist and composer. Henryk Wieniawski was born in Lublin, Congress Poland. His father, Tobiasz Pietruszka (Wolf Helman), was the son of a Jewish barber named Herschel Meyer Helman, from the Jewish Lublin neighbourhood of Wieniawa, when barbers were also practising dentists, healers, and bloodletters. Wolf Helman, also known as Tobiasz Pietruszka, changed his name to Tadeusz Wieniawski, taking on the name of his neighbourhood to blend into his Polish environment better. Prior to obtaining his medical degree, he had converted to Catholicism. He married Regina; Henryk Wieniawski // She published her early works as "Irène Wieniawska," but after marrying Sir Aubrey Dean Paul and becoming a British subject, she used the pseudonym "Poldowski." Another daughter, Henriette, would go on to marry Joseph Holland Loring in 1904, who was among the victims of the Titanic disaster. Wieniawski was a player in the Beethoven Quartet Society in London, where he also performed on viola. Henryk Wieniawski was considered a violinist of great ability and wrote some very important works in the violin repertoire, including two technically demanding violin concertos, the second of which (in D minor, 1862) is more often [sep] knowledge2: Henryk Wieniawski: Henryk Wieniawski (pronounced [vʲɛˈɲafskʲi] ⓘ; 10 July 1835 – 31 March 1880) was a Polish virtuoso violinist, composer and pedagogue, who is regarded amongst the most distinguished violinists in history.[1] His younger brother Józef Wieniawski and nephew Adam Tadeusz Wieniawski were also accomplished musicians, as was his daughter Régine, who became a naturalised British subject upon marrying into the peerage and wrote music under the name Poldowski. ; Henryk Wieniawski: Henryk Wieniawski was born in Lublin, in present-day Poland. His father, Tobiasz Pietruszka né Wolf Helman, was the son of a Jewish barber named Herschel Meyer Helman, from Lublin's Jewish neighborhood of Wieniawa. Wolf Helman later changed his name to Tadeusz Wieniawski, taking on the name of his neighborhood to blend into the Polish environment. Prior to obtaining his medical degree, he had converted to Catholicism. He married Regina Wolff, the daughter of a noted Jewish physician from Warsaw, and out of this marriage, Henryk was born. ; Henryk Wieniawski: Henryk's talent for playing the violin was recognized early, and in 1843 he was accepted by the Paris Conservatoire taught by Lambert Massart, where special exceptions were made to admit him, as he wasn't French and was only eight years old. He attended the Conservatoire from 1843 to 1846 and returned for another year in 1849. After graduation, he toured extensively and gave many recitals, where he was often accompanied by his brother Józef on piano.[2] In 1847, he published his first opus, a Grand Caprice Fantastique, the start of a catalogue of 24 opus numbers. ; Henryk Wieniawski: When his engagement to Isabella Hampton was opposed by her parents, Wieniawski wrote Légende, Op. 17; this work helped her parents change their mind, and the couple married in 1860. ; Henryk Wieniawski: At the invitation of Anton Rubinstein, Wieniawski moved to St. Petersburg, where he lived from 1860 to 1872, taught many violin students and led the Russian Musical Society's orchestra and string quartet. From 1872 to 1874, Wieniawski toured the United States with Rubinstein. Wieniawski replaced Henri Vieuxtemps as violin professor at the Conservatoire Royal de Bruxelles in 1875.
knowledge1: Rory Byrne // Rory Byrne Rory Byrne (born 10 January 1944) is a South African semi-retired engineer and car designer, most famous for being the chief designer at the Benetton and Scuderia Ferrari Formula One teams. Byrne-designed cars have won ninety-nine Grands Prix, seven constructors' titles and seven drivers' titles. This makes Byrne the third most successful Formula One designer, behind rivals Adrian Newey and Colin Chapman. Byrne became interested in motor racing at Witwatersrand University in Johannesburg, South Africa, firstly as a competitor and later the technical aspects of the sport. After graduating in 1964 Byrne began working as a chemist but; Rory Fleck Byrne // Rory Fleck Byrne Rory Fleck Byrne (born 1988 or 1989 in England) is an actor and composer, known for Vampire Academy, Harlots and The Foreigner. Rory Fleck Byrne was born in England but moved to Ireland when he was nine years old. There he lived in Kilkenny until he moved to London in 2007 to train at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art, graduating in 2010. He lives in London. Fleck Bryne first acting job was in Liverpool in the play "Antony and Cleopatra" opposite Kim Cattrall. In 2014 Bryne could be seen as Harry Abrams, an assistent of the; Rory Byrne // German Auto Motor und Sport Rory Byrne said that he is "working full steam" on Ferrari's 2014 F1 car, in an advisory role. Maurizio Arrivabene revealed that Byrne is working as mentor in Ferrari helping the chief designer Simone Resta. Byrne is a Special Engineering Advisor to Discovery Insure in South Africa in which he assists the company in improving the driving behaviour of South Africans and making the roads safer for all to use. Constructors' Championships: Rory Byrne Rory Byrne (born 10 January 1944) is a South African semi-retired engineer and car designer, most famous for being the chief [sep] knowledge2: Rory Byrne: Rory Byrne (born 10 January 1944) is a South African semi-retired engineer and car designer, most famous for being the chief designer at the Benetton and Scuderia Ferrari teams of Formula One. ; Rory Byrne: Byrne-designed cars have won ninety-nine Grands Prix, seven constructors' titles and seven drivers' titles. This makes Byrne the third most successful Formula One designer, behind rival Adrian Newey and Colin Chapman. ; Rory Byrne: Byrne became interested in motor racing at Witwatersrand University in Johannesburg, South Africa, firstly as a competitor and later the technical aspects of the sport. After graduating in 1964 Byrne began working as a chemist but retained his fascination for racing until by the late 1960s he, with three friends Dave Collier, Ronny and Dougie Bennett, set up a company importing performance car parts called Auto Drag and Speed Den situated in Jules Street, Malvern, Johannesburg and later Voortrekker Road in Alberton. It was in this period that he first began to design racing cars, putting to use his mathematical knowledge even though he lacked formal engineering training. His first car, a Formula Ford racer, was competitive and finished well in the 1972 championship. ; Rory Byrne: The first Byrne-designed car to appear at a grand prix was the Hart-powered TG181. Lacking the finances to reach the first three long-haul races Toleman entered Formula One at the San Marino Grand Prix. Two seasons passed before the fledgling team began to score points, but by the conclusion of the 1983 season Derek Warwick and Bruno Giacomelli had collected a very respectable 10 points – enough for the team to finish ninth in the constructors' championship, and enough to earn Byrne credibility in the pit-lane. It was in the off-season of 1983/84 that Toleman signed Ayrton Senna – a move that almost made Byrne, Senna and the team first time winners at that year's Monaco Grand Prix. ; Rory Byrne: Over the following five seasons Rory Byrne–designed cars took four more race wins but the Benetton team was never in a position to truly challenge the likes of Ferrari, Williams and McLaren, with most victories being taken on days when the competition faltered.
knowledge1: Patoranking // Patoranking Patrick Nnaemeka Okorie (born 27 May 1990), better known by his stage name Patoranking, is a Nigerian reggae-dancehall singer and songwriter. He hails from Onicha in Ebonyi State and was born and raised in Ijegun-Egba. Patoranking started his musical career doing underground collaborations with artists such as XProject, Konga, Slam and Reggie Rockstone. He signed a record deal with K-Solo's Igberaga Records in 2010, releasing "Up in D Club" under the outfit. Patoranking became a protégé of Dem Mama Records after collaborating with Timaya on his song "Alubarika". In February 2014, he signed a record deal with Foston Musik; Patoranking // musicians. In February 2014, Patoranking signed a record deal with Foston Musik and ended his affiliations with Dem Mama Records. During an interview with Toolz on NdaniTv's "The Juice", Timaya said that Patoranking left his label and was never officially signed. On 4 February 2014, Patoranking released "Girlie O", a song produced by WizzyPro. The music video for the song was shot and directed in London by Moe Musa. It was released on 5 February 2014, a day after the audio release. In the music video, Patoranking liberates his next door neighbour from domestic violence by expressing his innate feelings; Patoranking // at No. 4 in May and went on top the chart at No. 1 in June. "My Woman, My Everything" also made the chart when it was released, peaking at No. 2. In January 2016, Patoranking was announced as one of the judges for the maiden edition of the singing competition "The Voice Nigeria". Patoranking released his debut studio album, "God Over Everything", on 1 August 2016. The album features guest appearances from Phyno, Wizkid, Sarkodie, Olamide, Elephant Man, and Wasiu Ayinde Marshall. It debuted at No. 4 on Billboard's Reggae Albums chart. Patoranking Patrick Nnaemeka Okorie (born 27 May; Patoranking // him by a Jamaican artist whom he met at Alpha Beach in Lagos. Patoranking has cited Buju Banton, Bob Marley, Fela Kuti, Lucky Dube, Chaka Demus, Majek Fashek, Blackky, Blackface, Tuface and Marvelous Benjy as his key musical influences. In the aforementioned interview with "Entertainment Express", he said he references socio-political issues in his music. He has described his music as a morally inclined variation of dancehall. In May 2012, Patoranking released a single titled "Iya Bisi" featuring Qdot and Kbaj. The song, which is a fusion of dancehall and Fuji, was produced by Drumphase. Patoranking told "Entertainment Express" that; Patoranking // and released "Girlie O", a single that put him in the limelight. On 9 February 2015, Patoranking announced via Instagram that he signed a distribution deal with VP Records. Patoranking was born on 27 May 1990, to Mr. and Mrs. Okorie. He grew up in Ijegun-Egba Satellite Town and later relocated to Ebute Metta. He attended Citizen Comprehensive College Epe,_Lagos, and later enrolled at Jibril Martin Memorial Grammar School in Iponri. Patoranking started his performing arts career as a street jam and carnival dancer. In a 2012 interview with "Entertainment Express", he said that his stage name was given to [sep] knowledge2: Patoranking: Patrick Nnaemeka Okorie (born 27 May 1990),[2] better known by his stage name Patoranking, is a Nigerian reggae-dancehall singer and songwriter. Born and raised in Ebute Metta community of Lagos, he grew up sharing one room with his parents and five siblings. His modest upbringing and close relationship with his family instilled a drive and determination to create a better future, and led him to music[3][4] He started his music career doing underground collaborations, with artists such as XProject, Konga, Slam and Reggie Rockstone.[5] He signed a record deal with K-Solo's Igberaga Records in 2010, releasing "Up in D Club" under the outfit. Patoranking became a protégé of Dem Mama Records after collaborating with Timaya on his song "Alubarika". In February 2014, he signed a record deal with Foston Musik and released "Girlie O", a single that put him in the limelight.[5] On 9 February 2015, Patoranking announced on Instagram that he signed a distribution deal with VP Records.[6] on September 28 Patoranking released a song titled Abule which he released ahead of his album scheduled to be released later in 2020. He once said, in 2020 that he once got inspiration for song on a football pitch while playing football.[7] ; Patoranking: Patoranking was born and raised in Ijegun-Egba Satellite Town but has family roots in Onicha, Ebonyi State. He attended Citizen Comprehensive College in Epe, Lagos and later enrolled at Jibril Martin Memorial Grammar School in Iponri.[2] ; Patoranking: Patoranking moved to Ghana in 2007 to pursue his education after gaining admission to the "University of Cape Coast".[8] but dropped out due to financial reasons.[9] ; Patoranking: After dropping out of the University, he moved to Osu, a suburb of Accra, Ghana where he met Lanky, an entrepreneur who signed Patoranking to his label, Black Rhythmz Entertainment. Whilst signed to Black Rhythmz Entertainment, he was working at a restaurant opposite Frankies Osu and had another job at Accra Mall.[10] After recording a few songs on Lanky's label, the relationship came to an end and he returned to Nigeria. ; Patoranking: Upon his return to Nigeria, Okorie joined K-Solo's Igberaga Records in 2012, where he recorded "Iya Bisi",  featuring Qdot and Kbaj. The Drumphase-produced song is a fusion of dancehall and "fuji". Patoranking told Entertainment Express that Qdot and Kbaj helped compose the song by sharing ideas with him.[11] Other singles recorded with K-Solo's label included Tonight, Park Well, and So Nice.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Cobhams Asuquo // Cobhams Asuquo Cobhams Asuquo ( ) (born January 6, 1981) is a Nigerian musician, producer, and songwriter. In 2005, Asuquo was signed on with Sony ATV London as a songwriter. After working as Head of Audio Productions at a local label, Questionmark Entertainment, he set up his own recording facility in 2006. He is the former CEO/ Head of Productions of CAMP (Cobhams Asuquo Music Productions) represented himself, Bez Idakula and Stan Iyke. He was responsible for Aşa's highly acclaimed international album "ASA" and has been mentioned on many artists' sleeve credits as producer and writer. He is now the; Cobhams Asuquo // started a digital radio countdown show Cobhams Top 12. The digital radio show counts down the hottest African/Nigerian songs that Asuquo thinks the Nigerian audience should be listening to. The show was originally called The Top 12 Countdown With Cobhams Asuquo. Asuquo is visually impaired. On 2 December 2010, Cobhams Emmanuel Asuquo married Ojuolape Veronica Olukanni. They have a son together. Cobhams Asuquo Cobhams Asuquo ( ) (born January 6, 1981) is a Nigerian musician, producer, and songwriter. In 2005, Asuquo was signed on with Sony ATV London as a songwriter. After working as Head of Audio Productions at a; Cobhams Asuquo // first official single "Ordinary People" on January 1, 2014, and released the video the following January. Star of Wonder released in December 2014 is his second officially released single. His third single Stronger Than Before was released in 2015 and was sung by Morayo. He released his fourth single Boosit featuring Falz in April 2016 Asuquo also wrote and co-wrote several songs on the album including the singles, "Fire on the Mountain", and "Jailer". Asuquo has likewise produced songs for Nigerian recording artistes such as Banky W and Omawumi. He has arranged music, and performed with bands at international music; Cobhams Asuquo // stage performances such as “A Voice for Ella” by Uche Macaulay, Sunshine (Alpha Vision), "Bent Arrows" by Isang Awah and Communication for Change’s “Bayelsan Sillhouttes.” Cobhams performed with other renowned Nigerian artists at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2014. CNN Africa Voices featured Cobhams in a full-length interview in December 2011. Cobhams, alongside African musicians such as Dbanj, Omawumi, Femi Kuti and Somi, visited the white house to raise awareness on agriculture in Nigeria, through Bono’s global humanitarian group, ‘ONE Campaign’. He was also invited to participate in the three-day US-Africa summit. Cobhams was invited by [sep] knowledge2: Cobhams Asuquo: Cobhams Asuquo (Efik pronunciation: [ˈko̞bʱäms äsˈuːku:wo̞]) (born January 6, 1981) is a Nigerian musician, producer, and songwriter. In 2005, Asuquo was signed on with Sony ATV London as a songwriter.[1] After working as Head of Audio Productions at a local label, Questionmark Entertainment, he set up his own recording facility in 2006. He is the former CEO/Head of Productions of CAMP (Cobhams Asuquo Music Productions), which he co-managed with Bez Idakula and Stan Iyke. He was responsible for Aşa's highly acclaimed international album ASA and has been mentioned on many artists' sleeve credits as producer and writer. He is now the Founder/CEO of Vintage Grey Media. ; Cobhams Asuquo: "Cobhams Emmanuel Asuquo is a Nigerian-born songwriter/music producer/singer who started his academic training as a lawyer. Previously signed to Sony/ATV UK publishing as a songwriter, Cobhams formed his first music production and label company Cobhams Asuquo Music Production (CAMP) in 2008. In 2016 he started Vintage Gray Media Ltd.  Vintage Gray Media Ltd. produced 74 episodes of "The Top 12 Countdown with Cobhams Asuquo" – a music countdown show aimed at showcasing new music. ; Cobhams Asuquo: Cobhams’ international acclaim came with the music production of Nigeria's soul performer – ASA’s debut album. He also wrote and co-wrote several songs on the album including the singles, "Fire on the Mountain" and "Jailer". He has worked with numerous musicians both local (Nigeria) and International. From the early 2000s he produced hits, including ‘Maintain in India,’ and ‘Catch cold’ by Maintain; ‘Ego’- Djinne; ‘In the music’, ‘If you ask me’ by Omawumi to recently released 2017 butterflies also by Omawumi. His stable of artistes include : Asa, Banky W, Omawumi, Eldee, Sasha, Dare Art-Alade, Waje, Timi Dakolo, Djinne, Faze, Seyi Shay, Korede Bello, Tiwa Savage, Ego, Yemi Alade, Bez, Omolara, Chidinma Ekile, Shola Allyson, Lara George, Ego, Silver Saddih, Flavour, Mo'Chedda, Praiz, Simi, Rooftop MC's and so many others. Cobhams became an MTN Nigeria ambassador for its corporate elite customers in 2015. ; Cobhams Asuquo: He has arranged music, and performed with bands at international music events such as The Harare International Festival of Arts, the AFA Sponsored French Cultural Center Concert with Asa and Angelique Kidjo; AFA Sponsored French Cultural Center Concert in Johannesburg, South Africa; Nigeria Week in Paris and the launch of MTV's one hundredth channel (MTV Base Africa) at Abuja, Nigeria. In the TV and film media, he has composed and arranged film scores to be interpreted for conservatoires as well as for film and stage performances such as "A Voice for Ella" by Uche Macaulay, Sunshine (Alpha Vision), "Bent Arrows" by Isang Awah and Communication for Change's "Bayelsan Sillhouttes.” ; Cobhams Asuquo: Cobhams performed with other renowned Nigerian artists at the World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland in January 2014.[2] CNN Africa Voices featured Cobhams in a full-length interview in December 2011.
knowledge1: Diafra Sakho // Diafra Sakho Diafra Sakho (born 24 December 1989) is a Senegalese professional footballer who plays as a striker for Bursaspor, on loan from Stade Rennais, and the Senegal national team. Sakho began his career in the lower divisions of French football, with Metz and on loan at Boulogne, before joining West Ham United in August 2014. Since May 2014, he has been a full international for the Senegal national team. He joined Renne in January 2018 and was loaned to Bursaspor in August 2018. Sakho was born in Guédiawaye. He started is career in Dakar with Génération Foot, a football; Diafra Sakho // academy and feeder club for FC Metz, at age 16. After six months with the club he moved to France in 2007 to start training with Metz. After 17 goals in 22 games for FC Metz's reserve team in the 2009–10 season he was awarded a first-team place. He made his first-team debut in a goalless draw at home to Brest, on 19 January 2010. His debut goal came on 10 September, in a 1–1 home draw with Nantes. He was mainly used as a substitute in his first three seasons and was loaned to Boulogne in January 2012. In; Diafra Sakho // by coach, Alain Giresse, for the 2015 Africa Cup of Nations qualification games against Egypt and Botswana. Sakho missed the final tournament due to a back injury. In November 2017 Sakho scored the first goal in a 2–0 win against South Africa in Polokwane. The win resulted in Senegal qualifying for the 2018 World Cup in Russia, their first global finals since 2002. In May 2018, he was named in Senegal's 23-man squad for the 2018 FIFA World Cup in Russia. Sakho was arrested on 6 August 2015 on suspicion of common assault, criminal damage and malicious communication towards his; Diafra Sakho // all competitions scoring 24 goals. On 29 January 2018, Sakho joined Rennes for an undisclosed fee. He scored on his debut, in a 3-2 Coupe de la Ligue defeat against PSG on 30 January 2018. On 31 August 2018, the last day of the 2018 summer transfer window, Sakho joined Süper Lig side Bursaspor on loan for the season. Sakho made his international debut for Senegal in a friendly match against Burkina Faso, on 21 May 2014. His debut goal came four days later, in a 3–1 win over Kosovo. In November 2014 he was recalled to the Senegal squad; Diafra Sakho // the 2016–17 season having suffered a back injury which required surgery and rehabilitation. He returned briefly in April for games against Arsenal and Everton before again being ruled out, in May, for the rest of the season. Sakho made 14 league appearances for West Ham in the 2017–18 season, all of them after coming on as a substitute. He scored two goals, against Swansea City and Stoke City. He also made three appearances in the EFL Cup scoring twice, against Cheltenham Town and Bolton Wanderers. He left West Ham at the end of January 2018 having played 71 games in [sep] knowledge2: Diafra Sakho: Diafra Sakho (born 24 December 1989) is a Senegalese former professional footballer who played as a striker. ; Diafra Sakho: Sakho began his career in the lower divisions of French football, with Metz and on loan at Boulogne, before joining West Ham United in August 2014. Since May 2014, he has been a full international for the Senegal national team. He joined Rennes in January 2018 and was loaned to Bursaspor in August 2018. ; Diafra Sakho: Sakho was born in Guédiawaye.[4] He started his career in Dakar with Génération Foot, a football academy and feeder club for FC Metz, at age 16.[5] After six months with the club he moved to France in 2007 to start training with Metz. After 17 goals in 22 games for FC Metz's reserve team in the 2009–10 season he was awarded a first-team place. He made his first-team debut in a goalless draw at home to Brest, on 19 January 2010. His debut goal came on 10 September, in a 1–1 home draw with Nantes. He was mainly used as a substitute in his first three seasons and was loaned to Boulogne in January 2012. In May 2012, with Metz in Championnat National, the third tier of French football, new manager Albert Cartier gave Sakho a starting place in the team. The following season Sakho scored 19 goals in 33 league appearances as Metz finished in second place and won promotion back to Ligue 2 at their first attempt. In season 2013–14 he scored 20 goals in 36 appearances as Metz won the Ligue 2 title.[6] For his performances, Sakho was voted Ligue 2 Player of the Year for the 2013–14 season.[6][7] ; Diafra Sakho: On 14 August 2014, Sakho signed a four-year contract for an undisclosed fee with West Ham United, becoming their seventh signing before the start of the 2014–15 season.[6] Upon his joining, he said: "This is a proud day to have signed for West Ham, I really love English football and I've dreamed of coming to play for one of the big English clubs. Today, West Ham have given me that opportunity and I didn't hesitate to grab it".[6] ; Diafra Sakho: Sakho made his West Ham debut on 23 August 2014, in a 3–1 away win against Crystal Palace, coming on as a 63rd-minute substitute for Carlton Cole.[8] On 26 August, he scored his first competitive goal for the club against Sheffield United in the second round of the League Cup.[9] Sakho's first League goal came on 15 September in a 2–2 away draw against Hull City. Initially credited as an own goal by Hull defender Curtis Davies, the goal was later awarded to Sakho.[10] He made his home debut against Liverpool on 20 September, and scored his second goal with a chip over goalkeeper Simon Mignolet as the Hammers won 3–1.[11] On 29 September Sakho scored in a 2–1 away defeat by Manchester United. This was his fourth goal in his first four starts for the club, breaking a 26-year-old record previously held by Leroy Rosenior.[12] On 25 October 2014 Sakho scored West Ham's second goal in a 2–1 home win against reigning champions, Manchester City. In doing so he became the first West Ham player to score in six straight Premier League games and matched Micky Quinn's Premier League record, set in 1992, of scoring in his first six starts.[13][14] For his performances, Sakho was awarded the Premier League Player of the Month for October 2014, with his manager Sam Allardyce named Manager of the Month.[15]
knowledge1: Joseline Hernandez // by Grammy Award-winning record producer Stevie J while performing as a stripper at the Onyx Club in Atlanta. In 2012, she became part of the original cast of "", appearing as Stevie J's new artist, an aspiring rapper, singer and actress. It is later revealed that the two are romantically and sexually involved, much to the anger of his girlfriend, Mimi Faust. The trio's love triangle became "Love & Hip Hop: Atlanta"'s leading storyline and Hernandez continued as a main cast member for six seasons. It became the highest rated show of the "Love & Hip Hop" franchise and is [sep] knowledge2: Rosaline Elbay: Rosaline Elbay (Arabic: روزالين البيه; /roʊzəliːn/)[1] is an Egyptian stage and screen actress, producer and writer.[2] She is known for her roles as Judy Goodwin on the Netflix series Kaleidoscope, Amani on the Hulu/A24 Films series Ramy, and Sara on the MBC Masr series Qabeel.[3][4][5][6] ; Rosaline Elbay: Elbay was born and raised in Cairo to Egyptian parents.[7] She grew up speaking English, Arabic and French, jokingly describing her English accent, which has led to an assumption that she is British-born, as a 'product of colonialism'.[8][9] ; Rosaline Elbay: She performed in a production of The Sound Of Music at the age of 11.[10] As a child, she watched The Mummy and 'wanted to be Evie', and was later inspired to pursue archaeology.[11] ; Rosaline Elbay: She read Classics and Archaeology at Oxford University and completed a master's in Colonial History.[12][13] ; Rosaline Elbay: Elbay then studied at the Actors Studio New York City with Elizabeth Kemp before the two-year MFA in Acting at LAMDA.[14] Her early career was in UK theater.[8][15]
knowledge1: Sofiane Feghouli // Sofiane Feghouli Sofiane Feghouli (; born 26 December 1989) is an Algerian professional footballer who plays for Turkish Süper Lig club Galatasaray S.K. and the Algeria national team. He mainly operates as a right midfielder, but can also play as a winger and as an attacking midfielder. Feghouli made his senior international debut for Algeria in February 2012. He represented Algeria at the 2013 and 2015 Africa Cup of Nations, and the 2014 FIFA World Cup, where he scored Algeria's first goal in the competition. Feghouli was born in Levallois-Perret to Algerian parents. His father is from Tiaret, while his; Sofiane Feghouli // mother is from Ghazaouet. He has 4 brothers. Feghouli began his career with Grenoble, after French team Paris Saint-Germain decided not to sign him after a trial. For the latter portion of the 2006–2007 season, he was promoted to the first-team squad and given the number 33 shirt. He made his highly anticipated debut, at the age of 17, for the club on 27 April 2007 in a Ligue 2 match against Reims, appearing as a substitute. Grenoble won the match 1–0. He made two more appearances that season, including his first start on the final match day of the; Sofiane Feghouli // 29 February 2012, Feghouli made his debut for the Algerian national team in a 2–1 Africa Cup of Nations qualifying win against Gambia, scoring the winning goal. During qualification for the 2014 FIFA World Cup, he scored three goals in seven appearances for "Les Fennecs". In the team's opening match of the 2014 World Cup, a 2–1 defeat to Belgium in Belo Horizonte, Feghouli scored with a penalty kick – Algeria's first World Cup goal in 28 years. He was surprisingly omitted from the 2017 African Cup Of Nations squad. Sofiane Feghouli Sofiane Feghouli (; born 26 December 1989) is; Sofiane Feghouli // appeared in several France youth squads. On 12 November 2008, national team manager Raymond Domenech shortlisted the player for his pre-selection squad ahead of a friendly against Uruguay. Despite this, Algeria national team manager Rabah Saadane contacted Feghouli by telephone in an attempt to get the player to play for Algeria in the team's 19 November friendly against Mali. Team captain Yazid Mansouri also contacted the player. On 25 May 2011, it was reported that, whilst on loan at Almeria, Feghouli met with the President of the Algerian Football Federation Mohamed Raouraoua. Feghouli agreed to play for Algeria and was; Sofiane Feghouli // season against Montpellier on 25 May 2007. Montpellier won the match 1–0 with Feghouli playing 56 minutes before being subbed out. On 31 May 2007, he signed his first professional contract with Grenoble, keeping him with the side until 2010. The following season, he was handed the number 8 shirt and, despite being 17 years of age, was given a more important role in the first-team squad. Despite having the pressure of being labelled the "new Zidane", his contribution to the squad was successful, appearing in 27 matches and scoring three goals, helping Grenoble achieve promotion to Ligue 1. His [sep] knowledge2: Sofiane Feghouli: Sofiane Feghouli (Arabic: سفيان فيغولي; born 26 December 1989) is a professional footballer who plays for Turkish Süper Lig club Fatih Karagümrük and the Algeria national team. He mainly operates as a right midfielder, but can also play as a winger and as an attacking midfielder. ; Sofiane Feghouli: Feghouli made his senior international debut for Algeria in February 2012. He represented Algeria at the 2013, 2015, 2019 and 2021 Africa Cup of Nations (winning the 2019 tournament), as well as the 2014 FIFA World Cup, where he scored Algeria's first goal in the competition since 1986. ; Sofiane Feghouli: Feghouli was born in Levallois-Perret to Algerian parents. His father is from Tiaret, while his mother is from Ghazaouet. He has 4 brothers.[3] ; Sofiane Feghouli: Feghouli began his career with Grenoble, after French team Paris Saint-Germain decided not to sign him after a trial.[4] For the latter portion of the 2006–2007 season, he was promoted to the first-team squad and given the number 33 shirt. He made his highly anticipated debut, at the age of 17, for the club on 27 April 2007 in a Ligue 2 match against Reims, appearing as a substitute. Grenoble won the match 1–0.[5] He made two more appearances that season, including his first start on the final match day of the season against Montpellier on 25 May 2007. Montpellier won the match 1–0 with Feghouli playing 56 minutes before being subbed out.[6] On 31 May 2007, he signed his first professional contract with Grenoble, keeping him with the side until 2010.[7] ; Sofiane Feghouli: The following season, he was handed the number 8 shirt and, despite being 17 years of age, was given a more important role in the first-team squad. Despite having the pressure of being labelled the "new Zidane",[8] his contribution to the squad was successful, appearing in 27 matches and scoring three goals, helping Grenoble achieve promotion to Ligue 1. His first career goal came on 18 January 2008 in a 4–3 away victory against Reims, the club he faced on his debut.[9]
knowledge1: Danny Faure // Danny Faure Danny Faure (born 8 May 1962) is a Seychellois politician who has been President of Seychelles since 16 October 2016. Previously, he served as Vice President of Seychelles from 2010 to 2016. Faure is a member of the People's Party (PP). Faure was born to Seychellois parents in the western Ugandan town of Kilembe. He completed his primary and secondary education in Seychelles. He studied at a university in Cuba, graduating with a degree in political science. In 1985, at the age of 23, Faure started working as an assistant curriculum officer at the Seychelles education ministry. He; Danny Faure // Faure was accordingly sworn in on 16 October 2016. Danny Faure is divorced. He is the father of three daughters and one son. Danny Faure Danny Faure (born 8 May 1962) is a Seychellois politician who has been President of Seychelles since 16 October 2016. Previously, he served as Vice President of Seychelles from 2010 to 2016. Faure is a member of the People's Party (PP). Faure was born to Seychellois parents in the western Ugandan town of Kilembe. He completed his primary and secondary education in Seychelles. He studied at a university in Cuba, graduating with a degree in; Danny Faure // also worked as a lecturer at both the National Youth Service and the Seychelles Polytechnic. In 1993, following the return of multiparty democracy to the island nation, Faure became the leader of government business in the National Assembly, serving in that capacity until 1998. That year, he was appointed as Minister of Education. Over the years, he has served in various ministerial capacities including youth, finance, trade and industries, public administration and information and communication technology. In 2006, he was appointed as Minister of Finance by President James Michel. During his tenure at finance, Seychelles embarked on a series of; Danny Faure // economic reforms, recommended by the International Monetary Fund. Faure oversaw the first generation reforms, which ran from October 2008 to October 2013. Faure served as designated minister between 2004 and 2010. He became Vice President on 1 July 2010, while retaining the finance portfolio. President James Michel announced on 27 September 2016 that he would resign, effective on 16 October, and transfer power to Vice President Faure. The announcement coincided with the election of an opposition majority in the National Assembly. As there were four years of Michel's term remaining, it was to count as a full term for Faure. [sep] knowledge2: Danny Faure: Danny Faure (born 8 May 1962) is a Seychellois politician who served as the fourth President of Seychelles from 16 October 2016 until 26 October 2020. Previously, he served as Vice President of Seychelles from 2010 to 2016. Faure is a member of the United Seychelles Party (PP).[2][3] ; Danny Faure: Faure was born to Seychellois parents in the western Ugandan town of Kilembe.[4] He completed his primary and secondary education in the Seychelles. He studied at the University of Havana in Cuba,[5] graduating with a degree in political science.[2][3][4][6] ; Danny Faure: In 1985, at the age of 23, Faure started working as an assistant curriculum officer at the Seychelles education ministry. He also worked as a lecturer at both the National Youth Service and the Seychelles Polytechnic.[3] ; Danny Faure: In 1993, following the return of multiparty democracy to the island nation, Faure became the leader of government business in the National Assembly, serving in that capacity until 1998.[6] That year, he was appointed Minister of Education. Over the years, he has served in various ministerial capacities including youth, finance, trade and industries, public administration and information and communication technology.[3] ; Danny Faure: On 13 June 2019, Faure was awarded the National Geographic Society’s prestigious ‘Planetary and Leadership Award’ at a National Geographic Awards Ceremony, at George Washington University, in Washington DC.[10][11]
knowledge1: Jorge Molina Enríquez // Antonio de los Banos with his wife and their two daughters. Jorge Molina Enríquez Jorge Molina Enríquez (born 1966 in Palma Soriano in the province of Santiago) is a Cuban actor and film director. After studying cinema in the USSR, he graduated from the Escuela Internacional de Cine y Television (International Film and TV School of San Antonio de los Baños, Cuba), known as EICTV. His thesis film, "Molina's Culpa" was a controversial tale with anti-Catholic content. As an actor, Molina has appeared in close to 80 films (including student films and shorts), most notably in Cuban filmmaker Fernando Perez's [sep] knowledge2: Jorge Enríquez: Enriquez was born in Mexicali, Baja California, and debuted with Chivas on 5 February 2010 in a match against Pachuca CF, corresponding to week 6 of the Bicentenario tournament. He came on in the 86th minute, replacing Adolfo Bautista. Enríquez scored his first goal in the quarter finals outside the penalty area against Monarcas Morelia.[2]
knowledge1: Fuerza Guerrera // Fuerza Guerrera Fuerza Guerrera (born December 13, 1953) is a Mexican "Luchador enmascarado" (or masked professional wrestler) who made his debut in 1978. In his career Guerrera has worked for every major wrestling organization in Mexico including Consejo Mundial de Lucha Libre (CMLL), AAA, Universal Wrestling Association (UWA), World Wrestling Association (WWA) and International Wrestling Revolution Group (IWRG). Throughout his career Fuerza Guerrera has held many titles for CMLL, AAA and IWRG. Fuerza Guerrera's real name is not a matter of public record, as is often the case with masked wrestlers in Mexico where their private lives are kept a; Fuerza Guerrera // wrestler, his son Hijo de fuerza Guerrera (45 years) and his daughter Fuerza Guerrera (35 years). He is the uncle of professional wrestler Furia Guerrera, who after a brief stint in AAA in 1998 wrestled in the independent circuit until his murder in August 2009. Fuerza Guerrera Fuerza Guerrera (born December 13, 1953) is a Mexican "Luchador enmascarado" (or masked professional wrestler) who made his debut in 1978. In his career Guerrera has worked for every major wrestling organization in Mexico including Consejo Mundial de Lucha Libre (CMLL), AAA, Universal Wrestling Association (UWA), World Wrestling Association (WWA) and International Wrestling; Fuerza Guerrera // father. Fuerza wrestled his last major match for AAA when he took part in a joint AAA/Pro Wrestling NOAH show, TripleSEM on September 3, 2007. Fuerza teamed with Antifaz and Histeria, losing to the Mexican Powers (Juventud, Joe Lider and Crazy Boy) in a match that also involved El Elegido, KENTA and Taiji Ishimori. In 2007 Fuerza Guerrera worked his final match for AAA and began working on the independent circuit and making regularly appearances for International Wrestling Revolution Group (IWRG). One of Guerrera's early IWRG appearances was at the 2008 "Rey del Ring" (Spanish for "King of the Ring"); Fuerza Guerrera // markings – red representing passion and blue representing peace, a mask that quickly became his trademark. He made his in ring debut as Fuerza Guerrera on December 19, 1979 in "Arena Naucalpan". Since his debut Guerrera has almost always worked as a "Rudo", a "bad guy" or "Heel" character, a choice he took early on as it fit with both his personality and his wrestling style. The combination of Guerrera's in ring skills, natural charisma and unique mask quickly landed him a regular job working for Empresa Mexicana de Lucha Libre (EMLL), Mexico's largest wrestling promotion. On September 25, 1981; Fuerza Guerrera // secret from the wrestling fans. Only his paternal surname is known, as his son Eduardo Aníbal González Hernández' name is a matter of public record making Fuerza Guerrera's paternal surname "González" as well. Eduardo González is better known as "luchador" Juventud Guerrera. Fuerza Guerrera is Spanish for "Warrior Strength", not to be mistaken for the surname Guerrero. The wrestler who would become known as Fuerza Guerra trained for his professional wrestling career under Dick Angelo, he would later receive further training from Gallo Tapado, Raul Reyes, El Solar, El Espectro and Ángel Blanco. He made his professional wrestling debut in [sep] knowledge2: Fuerza Guerrera: Fuerza Guerrera (born December 13, 1953) is a Mexican Luchador enmascarado (or masked professional wrestler) who made his debut in 1978. In his career Guerrera has worked for every major wrestling organization in Mexico including Consejo Mundial de Lucha Libre (CMLL), AAA, Universal Wrestling Association (UWA), World Wrestling Association (WWA) and International Wrestling Revolution Group (IWRG). Throughout his career Fuerza Guerrera has held many titles for CMLL, AAA and IWRG. Fuerza Guerrera's real name is not a matter of public record, as is often the case with masked wrestlers in Mexico where their private lives are kept a secret from the wrestling fans.[3] Only his paternal surname is known, as his son Eduardo Aníbal González Hernández' name is a matter of public record making Fuerza Guerrera's paternal surname "González" as well.[4] Eduardo González is better known as luchador Juventud Guerrera. Fuerza Guerrera is Spanish for "Warrior Strength", not to be mistaken for the surname Guerrero. ; Fuerza Guerrera: The combination of Guerrera's in-ring skills, natural charisma and unique mask quickly landed him a regular job working for Empresa Mexicana de Lucha Libre (EMLL), Mexico's largest wrestling promotion.[1] On September 25, 1981, Fuerza Guerrera made his first appearance at a major EMLL show as he wrestled and defeated Negro Casas on EMLL's 48th Anniversary show.[5] On November 6, 1983, Guerrera defeated Aguila Venezolana in a tournament final to win the vacant Mexican National Lightweight Championship, the first professional wrestling championships of his career.[6] In May, 1984 Guerrera vacated the title when he moved from the lightweight weight class (between 63 kg (139 lb) and 70 kg (150 lb)) and into the Welterweight weight class (between 70 kg (150 lb) and 78 kg (172 lb)).[7] On December 3, 1985, Fuerza Guerrera captured the Mexican National Welterweight Championship when he defeated Javier Cruz.[8] Guerrera held the title for approximately 240 days before vacating the title as he left EMLL to work for other wrestling promotions in Mexico.[8] By late 1988 Guerrera had returned to EMLL and captured the NWA World Welterweight Championship on October 4, 1988, when he defeated Solar II and won the highest ranking title in the Welterweight division at the time.[9] Guerrera would go on to make several successful title defenses until he lost to Águila Solitaria on June 2, 1980. Guerrera regained the title three days later and went on to have an 808-day reign that included successful title defenses against Pantera II, Americo Rocca, his trainer Gallo Tapado, Misterioso and Octagón. In 1989 Guerrera also began working part-time in the Tijuana, Baja California based World Wrestling Association promotion, winning the WWA Welterweight Championship twice in 1989 and 1990.[10] ; Fuerza Guerrera: During his title reign Fuerza Guerrera began a long running storyline feud that quickly drew big crowds as the two talented young wrestlers worked a series of very highly thought off matches.[1] On December 14, 1990, Fuerza Guerrera and Octagón were involved in a three-way Luchas de Apuesta ("bet match"), round robin tournament along with Huracán Ramírez where their masks were on the line. In the end Guerrera managed to defeat both Octagón and Ramírez, forcing the two to face off with their mask on the line. Guerrera sat on the sideline and watched Octagón defeat Ramírez and unmask him after the match per Lucha Libre traditions.[11] On December 15, 1991, Guerrera and Octagón were once again involved in an Apuesta match where each could potentially lose their mask. The two teamed up to take on El Hijo del Santo and Black Shadow, Jr. in a Relevos suicida match, where the losing team is forced to wrestle each other with their mask on the line. Fuerza Guerrera pinned El Hijo del Santo to keep both his and Octagón's mask safe, while Hijo del Santo would go on to unmask Black Shadow, Jr.[12] On February 15, 1992, Fuerza Guerrera became the first ever CMLL World Welterweight Champion when he defeated El Khalifa in the finals of a 4-man tournament.[13] Guerrera only held the title for 22 days before losing it to America.[13] ; Fuerza Guerrera: In the months following Triplemanía I Fuerza's son, working under the name Juventud Guerrera, made his debut in AAA and began teaming with his father on a regular basis. On November 6, 1994, Fuerza Guerrera teamed with Madonna's Boyfriend, and Psicosis to defeat Rey Mysterio, Jr., Heavy Metal, and Latin Lover on the undercard of AAA's first ever Pay-Per-View AAA When Worlds Collide.[16] On December 2, 1994, Fuerza and Juventud Guerrera defeated Heavy Metal and Latin Lover to win the Mexican National Tag Team Championship, a title the team held for 181 days before losing the belts to Latin Lover and Panterita del Ring.[17] The father son team would also win the WWA Tag Team Championship[a][18] Los Guerreras also teamed with Psicosos to win the WWA Trios Championship from El Hijo del Santo, Octagón and Rey Misterio, Jr.[19] Fuerza Guerrera would also briefly hold the IWC World Middleweight Championship.[20] In late 1995 AAA and Promo Azteca who had been co-promoting shows for about a year split up and Juventud Guerrera left AAA for Promo Azteca. Following his departure Los Guerreras were stripped of the National tag Team titles[17] On September 6, 1996, Fuerza, Blue Panther and El Signo won the Mexican National Trios Championship, a title that would soon after become inactive as the three began working for different promotions.[21] ; Fuerza Guerrera: In 1997 Fuerza Guerrera teamed with Jerry Estrada and Heavy Metal, losing to Héctor Garza, Perro Aguayo and El Canek at the World Wrestling Federations (WWF) 1997 Royal Rumble event, a match that came about due to the AAA/WWF working relationship at the time. This was Guerrera's only WWF appearance.[22] On May 15, 1997, Fuerza Guerrera teamed with Mosco de la Merced to win the Mexican National Tag Team title for a third time.[17] A couple of months later the original Mosco de la Merced left AAA and was quietly replaced by Mosco de la Merced II who took both the original wrestlers bookings and his half of the Mexican tag team title. The team held the tag team titles until losing to the father/son team of Perro Aguayo and Perro Aguayo, Jr. on June 7, 1998.[17]
knowledge1: Sila María Calderón // Sila María Calderón Sila María Calderón Serra (born September 23, 1942) is a Puerto Rican politician, businesswoman, and philanthropist who served as the eighth Governor of the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico from 2001 to 2005. She is the first and, to date, only woman elected to that office. Prior to serving as governor, Calderón held various positions in the Government of Puerto Rico, including the 12th Secretary of State of Puerto Rico from 1988 to 1989, and Chief of Staff to Governor Rafael Hernández Colón. She was also Mayor of San Juan, the Capital of Puerto Rico, from 1997 to [sep] knowledge2: Sila María Calderón: Sila Calderón Serra was born in San Juan, Puerto Rico on September 23, 1942, to entrepreneur César Augusto Calderón and Sila Serra Jesús. Her maternal grandfather Miguel Serra Joy emigrated from Mallorca, Balearic Islands to Puerto Rico in the late 19th century which granted Calderón Spanish citizenship in 2012.[1] She attended high school at the Colegio Sagrado Corazón de Las Madres in Santurce, Puerto Rico. In 1964 she graduated with honors from Manhattanville College in Purchase, New York, with a Bachelor of Arts degree in Government. She later attended the Graduate School of Public Administration at the University of Puerto Rico.[2][3][4][5][6]
knowledge1: Abdulqawi Yusuf // Abdulqawi Yusuf Abdulqawi Ahmed Yusuf () is a Somali lawyer and judge who is the incumbent President of the International Court of Justice. Yusuf was born in the northeastern town of Eyl in Somalia . He is a "Juris Doctor" (Somali National University) and holds a Ph.D. in international law from the Graduate Institute of International Studies of Geneva. Prior to his doctorate, Yusuf completed post-graduate studies in international law at the University of Florence in Italy. He is fluent in Somali, Arabic, English, French, and Italian. Yusuf's previous positions include: Legal Adviser and Director of the Office of International; Abdulqawi Yusuf // number of universities and institutes in Switzerland, Italy, Greece and France. Yusuf is the founder and General Editor of the African Yearbook of International Law and is a Member of the Institut de droit international (Geneva). He is also one of the founders of the African Foundation for International Law, as well as the chairperson of its Executive Committee. In addition, Yusuf has authored several books and numerous articles on various aspects of international law as well as articles and op-ed pieces in newspapers on current Northeast African and Somali affairs. He is a member of the editorial advisory board; Abdulqawi Yusuf // Abraham of France as the 25th President of the ICJ and only the third African to hold the title after Nigeria's Taslim Elias (1982-1985) and Algeria's Mohamed Bedjaoui (1994-1997). Abdulqawi Yusuf Abdulqawi Ahmed Yusuf () is a Somali lawyer and judge who is the incumbent President of the International Court of Justice. Yusuf was born in the northeastern town of Eyl in Somalia . He is a "Juris Doctor" (Somali National University) and holds a Ph.D. in international law from the Graduate Institute of International Studies of Geneva. Prior to his doctorate, Yusuf completed post-graduate studies in international law at; Abdulqawi Yusuf // Standards and Legal Affairs for UNESCO from March 2001 to January 2009, Legal Advisor (1994–1998) and Assistant Director General for African Affairs, United Nations Industrial Development Organization (UNIDO), Vienna (1998–2001), Representative and Head of the New York office of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD) (1992–1994) and Chief of the Legal Policies Service of UNCTAD( 1987–1992), Lecturer in law at the Somali National University (1974–1981) and at the University of Geneva(1981–1983), and Somali delegate to the Third United Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea (1975–1980). He has also been guest professor and lecturer at a; Abdulqawi Yusuf // of the Asian Yearbook of International Law, and a member of the Thessaloniki Institute of Public International Law and International Relations curatorium. He also previously served as a judge ad hoc at the International Court of Justice. On February 6, 2009, was appointed as a judge at the International Court of Justice. On February 6, 2015 he was elected vice-president of the court. In 2011, Yusuf would later gain a seat in the advisory council of The Hague Institute for Global Justice. On February 6, 2018, Yusuf was appointed President of the International Court of Justice. Yusuf will succeed Ronny [sep] knowledge2: Abdulqawi Yusuf: Abdulqawi Ahmed Yusuf (Somali: Cabdulqaawi Axmed Yuusuf) is a Somali lawyer and judge serving on the International Court of Justice since 2009. He served as the court's president from 2018 to 2021. ; Abdulqawi Yusuf: Yusuf was born in the northeastern town of Eyl, Somalia.[1] His family hails from the Osman Mahmoud sub-clan of the larger Majeerteen clan in Northeastern Somalia.[2] He holds a Juris Doctor (Somali National University) and holds a PhD in international law from the Graduate Institute of International Studies of Geneva. Prior to his doctorate, Yusuf completed post-graduate studies in international law at the University of Florence in Italy. ; Abdulqawi Yusuf: He is fluent in Somali, Arabic, English, French, and Italian. ; Abdulqawi Yusuf: Yusuf's previous positions include: Legal Adviser and Director of the Office of International Standards and Legal Affairs for UNESCO from March 2001 to January 2009, Legal Advisor (1994–1998) and Assistant Director General for African Affairs, United Nations Industrial Development Organization (UNIDO), Vienna (1998–2001), Representative and Head of the New York office of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD) (1992–1994) and Chief of the Legal Policies Service of UNCTAD (1987–1992), Lecturer in law at the Somali National University (1974–1981) and at the University of Geneva (1981–1983), and Somali delegate to the Third United Nations Conference on the Law of the Sea (1975–1980). He has also been guest professor and lecturer at a number of universities and institutes in Switzerland, Italy, Greece and France. ; Abdulqawi Yusuf: Yusuf was elected to the Institut de droit international in 1999 and is currently a member. He is the founder and General Editor of the African Yearbook of International Law. Yusuf is also one of the founders of the African Foundation for International Law, as well as the chairperson of its executive committee. In addition, Yusuf has authored several books and numerous articles on various aspects of international law as well as articles and op-ed pieces in newspapers on current Northeast African and Somali affairs. He is a member of the editorial advisory board of the Asian Yearbook of International Law, and a member of the Thessaloniki Institute of Public International Law and International Relations curatorium.[3] He also previously served as a judge ad hoc at the International Court of Justice.[4]
knowledge1: Ezechiel N'Douassel // Ezechiel N'Douassel Ezechiel Aliadjim N'Douassel (Arabic: إيزيكييل ندواسل ; born 22 April 1988) also known as King Eze, is a Chadian international footballer who plays a striker for Indonesian club Persib Bandung and the Chad national team. N'Douassel began his career in 2006 at local side Tourbillon FC before moving to Algeria in 2007 to play for MC Oran and he joined USM Blida. In his debut for USM Blida, Ndouassel scored a brace against MC El Eulma, with goals in the 86th and 90th minute to give his team a 2–1 win. He would end the season with five; Ezechiel N'Douassel // 2005 CEMAC Cup, 2007 CEMAC Cup, 2008 Africa Cup of Nations qualification in a matches against South Africa home and away, against Zambia and Congo, and in the 2010 World Cup qualification against the Congo home and away, and Sudan and Mali at home. In the 2012 Africa Cup of Nations qualification he played matches against Togo at home, Botswana home and away, Tunisia at home and away, and Malawi both away and at home. He also played the home match against Tanzania, in a 2014 World Cup qualification. Ezechiel N'Douassel Ezechiel Aliadjim N'Douassel (Arabic: إيزيكييل ندواسل ; born 22; Ezechiel N'Douassel // Club Africain. In July 2014, Ndouassel was reported to have moved to Paris FC on loan, with an option to buy. However this move fell through due to financial constraints on the French club, and with Club African unwilling to include him in their squad, left Ndouassel looking for a new club. On 4 September 2016 he signed a 3-year contract with Ironi Kiryat Shmona. On January 2017 he left the club. On 7 August 2017, he signed a half year contract with Persib Bandung. Ezechiel is a member of the Chad national football team since 2005. He played on [sep] knowledge2: Ezechiel N'Douassel: Ezechiel Aliadjim N'Douassel (Arabic: إيزيكييل ندواسل; born 22 April 1988) is a Chadian professional footballer who plays a striker for Liga 2 club Bekasi City and the Chad national team. He is also nicknamed "King Eze". ; Ezechiel N'Douassel: N'Douassel began his career in 2006 at local side Tourbillon before moving to Algeria in 2007 to play for MC Oran and he joined USM Blida. ; Ezechiel N'Douassel: In his debut for USM Blida, Ndouassel scored a brace against MC El Eulma, with goals in the 86th and 90th minute to give his team a 2–1 win. He would end the season with five goals in fifteen appearances. During his time at USM Blida, N'Douassel was linked with a number of European clubs including Olympique de Marseille, Arsenal, Monaco and Mallorca.[3] On July 20, 2009, it was announced that Ndouassel joined Belgian club FCV Dender on a free transfer and signed a 3-year contract worth €200,000 after impressing on trial in friendlies against Roeselare and Hamme.[4] However, the move was not finalized and Ndouassel was forced to return to USM Blida shortly after because he was still under contract with the club.[5] ; Ezechiel N'Douassel: On January 9, 2011, Ndouassel signed a 4-year contract with Tunisian side Club Africain.[6] For the 2011 CAF Confederation Cup his team made it second place losing to Maghreb de Fès by penalties. During the 2012 CAF Confederation Cup he scored a Hattrick for Africain making them reach the fourth round before they got eliminated in the playoffs.[7] In July 2014, Ndouassel was reported to have moved to Paris FC on loan, with an option to buy.[8] However this move fell through due to financial constraints on the French club, and with Club African unwilling to include him in their squad, left Ndouassel looking for a new club.[9] ; Ezechiel N'Douassel: On 4 September 2016 he signed a 3-year contract with Ironi Kiryat Shmona.[10] In January 2017 he left the club and joined Hapoel Tel Aviv until the end of the 2016–17 Israeli Premier League season.[11] After playing five matches, he was released in March 2017, following behaviour issues.[12]
knowledge1: Tarik Elyounoussi // Tarik Elyounoussi Tarik Elyounoussi ( "", ; born 23 February 1988) is a Moroccan-born Norwegian footballer who plays for Swedish club AIK. Born in Al Hoceima, Morocco, Elyounoussi moved to Norway with his family when he was 11 years old. He started playing football in the club Nylende in Fredrikstad, and then joined Trosvik, in which many of the young players in the Fredrikstad youth team have their roots. He was considered to be the greatest talent Fredrikstad has produced in decades. As such he was awarded the Norwegian Young Player of the Year trophy in 2006 and 2007, after; Tarik Elyounoussi // on 15 January 2012, in the opening match of 2012 King's Cup against Denmark, which was his fifth cap for Norway. Elyounoussi was chosen as captain for the international friendlies against South Africa and Zambia in January 2013, and scored the winning goal in the 1–0 victory against South Africa. Elyounoussi is the cousin of Mohamed Elyounoussi, who is also a Norwegian international footballer. "Statistics accurate as of match played 16 October 2018" Fredrikstad SC Heerenveen Olympiacos AIK Individual Tarik Elyounoussi Tarik Elyounoussi ( "", ; born 23 February 1988) is a Moroccan-born Norwegian footballer who plays for Swedish club; Tarik Elyounoussi // was a member of Qarabağ FK during the first half of 2017-18 season, on loan from the Reds, but made only seven official performances in all competitions and failed to impress. On 30 January 2018, Swedish outfit AIK announced the transfer of Elyounoussi from Olympiacos on a two-year deal; details of the fees involved have not been disclosed. He scored on his debut for the national team against Uruguay on 28 May 2008 after only four minutes on the pitch; this was one of the fastest ever debut goal on the national team. He scored his second national team goal; Tarik Elyounoussi // two great seasons in the league, and a Norwegian football cup trophy. Elyounoussi was sought after by various Premier League clubs in the summer of 2008. However Fredrikstad accepted a bid on around €4 million from French club Le Mans on 8 July. But Elyounoussi had no interest in joining Le Mans. A few weeks later Elyounoussi signed a five-year contract with Heerenveen worth €3.5 million, on 22 July. He joined Heerenveen in August 2008. He scored in his debut match against FC Volendam. He also netted an important equalizer for Heerenveen in their first round UEFA Cup match away; Tarik Elyounoussi // against Vitória F.C., and his second league goal came against NEC Nijmegen. On 19 February 2010, Lillestrøm SK loaned the 21-year-old talented forward until the end of season from SC Heerenveen. On 7 January 2011, Elyounoussi returned to Fredrikstad FK and Tippeligaen. Elyounoussi signed for Rosenborg on 9 August 2012, binding him to the club to the end of the 2015 season. Elyounoussi and Mikkel Diskerud's transfers was announced at half time during the UEFA Europa League qualifier against Servette. Rosenborg announced on 18 June 2013 that they had sold Elyounoussi to Hoffenheim, and bought Alexander Søderlund from Haugesund as [sep] knowledge2: Tarik Elyounoussi: Tarik Elyounoussi (Arabic: طارق اليونسي, ṭāriq al-yūnusī, pronounced [tˤaːˈrɪq ælˈjuːnusiː]; born 23 February 1988) is a professional footballer who plays for Japanese club Shonan Bellmare. His preferred position is a forward, but he can also play as a winger. ; Tarik Elyounoussi: Born in Al Hoceima, Morocco, Elyounoussi moved to Norway with his family when he was 11 years old. He started playing football in the club Nylende in Fredrikstad, and then joined Trosvik,[2] in which many of the young players in the Fredrikstad youth team have their roots. ; Tarik Elyounoussi: Elyounoussi was sought after by various Premier League clubs in the summer of 2008. However Fredrikstad accepted a bid on around €4 million from French club Le Mans on 8 July.[3] But Elyounoussi had no interest in joining Le Mans. A few weeks later Elyounoussi signed a five-year contract with Heerenveen worth €3.5 million, on 22 July. He joined Heerenveen in August 2008.[4] ; Tarik Elyounoussi: He scored in his debut match against FC Volendam. He also netted an important equalizer for Heerenveen in their first round UEFA Cup match away against Vitória F.C., and his second league goal came against NEC Nijmegen. ; Tarik Elyounoussi: On 19 February 2010, Lillestrøm SK loaned the 21-year-old talented forward until the end of season from SC Heerenveen.[5]
knowledge1: Deyverson // Deyverson Deyverson Brum Silva Acosta (born 8 May 1991), simply known as Deyverson, is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as a forward for Palmeiras. Born in Santa Margarida, Rio de Janeiro, Deyverson joined Benfica on a three-year deal, arriving on 5 September 2012, from Grêmio Mangaratibense. He was placed on the reserve side and made his debut on 19 September 2012, against Tondela. His first goal was in the immediate matchday, scoring the winner in a 2-1 away victory at Oliveirense. He scored 8 league goals throughout the season, being on the starting eleven only 12 times. On 6; Deyverson // the Camp Nou. On 11 July 2017 Deyverson returned to his homeland, after agreeing to a five-year contract with Palmeiras. Deyverson Deyverson Brum Silva Acosta (born 8 May 1991), simply known as Deyverson, is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as a forward for Palmeiras. Born in Santa Margarida, Rio de Janeiro, Deyverson joined Benfica on a three-year deal, arriving on 5 September 2012, from Grêmio Mangaratibense. He was placed on the reserve side and made his debut on 19 September 2012, against Tondela. His first goal was in the immediate matchday, scoring the winner in a 2-1 away victory; Deyverson // August 2013, Deyverson joined Belenenses, signing a four-year deal. After settling as the main striker in 2014–15, he scored the only goal in a 1–1 draw at Alvalade. On 2 February 2015, Deyverson signed a six-month loan deal with Bundesliga team, 1. FC Köln. He scored his first goal on 8 March 2015, against Eintracht Frankfurt. On 27 July 2015, Deyverson signed a four-year deal with La Liga side Levante UD, for a rumoured €2 million fee. He made his debut in the category on 23 August, starting in a 1–2 home loss against Celta de Vigo. Deyverson scored his; Deyverson // first goal in the main category of Spanish football on 23 September 2015, scoring a last-minute equalizer in a 2–2 home draw against SD Eibar. On 22 November, he contributed with a brace in a 3–0 away win against Sporting de Gijón, taking his tally up to four goals in ten matches. On 21 July 2016, after Levante's relegation, Deyverson signed a one-year loan deal with Deportivo Alavés also in the top level, with a buyout clause. On 10 September he scored his first goal for the club, netting the first in a 2–1 historical win against FC Barcelona at [sep] knowledge2: Deyverson: Deyverson Brum Silva Acosta (born 8 May 1991), also known as "Deyvinho", or simply known as Deyverson, is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as a forward for Cuiabá. ; Deyverson: Born in Santa Margarida, a neighborhood in Rio de Janeiro, Deyverson began his career with lowly local side Grêmio Mangaratibense in 2011. Known as Acosta at the time, he made his senior debut on 10 March 2011, starting and scoring the opener in a 2–0 Campeonato Carioca Série C home win against Duquecaxiense. ; Deyverson: During his two-year period at Mangaratibense, Deyverson scored 18 goals in 31 appearances, being his side's top goalscorer in the two Carioca Série C editions where he played. ; Deyverson: On 5 September 2012, after a trial period, Deyverson joined Benfica on a three-year deal.[1] He was placed on the reserve side and made his debut on 19 September 2012, against Tondela.[2] His first goal was in the immediate matchday, scoring the winner in a 2–1 away victory at Oliveirense.[3] He scored 8 league goals throughout the season, being on the starting eleven only 12 times. ; Deyverson: On 6 August 2013, Deyverson joined Belenenses, signing a four-year deal.[4] After settling as the main striker in 2014–15, he scored the only goal in a 1–1 draw at Alvalade.[5]
knowledge1: Muhammad Qutb // Muhammad Qutb Muhammad Qutb, (; ;‎ 1919 – April 4, 2014) was an Islamist author, scholar and teacher best known as the younger brother of the Egyptian Islamist thinker Sayyid Qutb. After his brother was executed by the Egyptian government, Muhammad moved to Saudi Arabia where he promoted his older brother's ideas. Muhammad Qutb was the second oldest of five children born in the Upper Egyptian village of Musha near Asyut, several years younger than his elder brother Sayyid. Little is known in English sources about his upbringing and education but it is known that he lived with his famous; Muhammad Qutb // of plotters' homes and environs. Another very popular work, "Islam: the Misunderstood Religion," expands on his brother's ideas, describing the ways in which fundamentalist Islam is superior to the "perverted ... inhuman ... crazy ... savage and backward" Western world. Muhammad Qutb died at a hospital in Mecca on 4 April 2014 at the age of 95. Muhammad Qutb Muhammad Qutb, (; ;‎ 1919 – April 4, 2014) was an Islamist author, scholar and teacher best known as the younger brother of the Egyptian Islamist thinker Sayyid Qutb. After his brother was executed by the Egyptian government, Muhammad moved to [sep] knowledge2: Muhammad Qutb: Muhammad Qutb, (/ˈkʌtəb/; Arabic: محمد قطب;‎ April 26, 1919 – April 4, 2014) was a Muslim author, scholar and teacher who is best known as the younger brother of the Egyptian Muslim thinker Sayyid Qutb. After his brother was executed by the Egyptian government, Muhammad moved to Saudi Arabia, where he promoted his brother's ideas.[1][2] ; Muhammad Qutb: Muhammad Qutb was the second oldest of five children born in the Upper Egyptian village of Musha near Asyut, 13 years younger than his elder brother, Sayyid. When his father died in 1933, his mother moved with her children to live in Helwan near Cairo.[3] ; Muhammad Qutb: He was arrested a few days before Sayyid (on July 29, 1965) for his alleged co-leadership along with his brother in a plot[5] to kill leading political and cultural figures in Egypt and overthrow the government. His brother was hanged in 1966, but Muhammad's life was spared[1] and he, along with other members of the Muslim Brotherhood  took refuge in Saudi Arabia. ; Muhammad Qutb: Qutb died at a hospital in Mecca on 4 April 2014 at the age of 94.[17]
knowledge1: Fifi Cooper // Fifi Cooper Refilwe Boingotlo Moeketsi (born 27 October 1991), professionally and popularly known as Fifi Cooper is a South African recording artist. Fifi Cooper started her music career as an R&B singer before her musical versatility saw her release her breakthrough rap single "Chechella Morao" in 2010. In 2015, she released her award-winning debut studio album "20FIFI". Fifi Cooper was the last of three children in Montshiwa, Mahikeng, South Africa, where she had her early education and also harnessed her ability in singing and dancing. She completed her secondary school education at Batswana High School, Mahikeng and her higher education; Fifi Cooper // Year" categories at the 2nd edition of the South African Music Awards. On February 2017, Fifi Cooper departed from Ambitiouz Entertainment along with A-Reece and the hip hop duo "B3nchMarQ". Regarded by the local media as the "Motswako first lady", Fifi Coopers' musical versatility can see her rap and sing. Credited as the vocalist on Khuli Chana's hit single "Mnatebawen", she does the hip hop and Motswako genres of music. In an interview with "YoMzansi", Fifi Cooper describes her style of rap as "unpredictable, punchy and hearty". Fifi Cooper is a single mother. She has a son named Resego. Fifi; Fifi Cooper // album titled "Asia", Khuli Chana's "Lost in Time" and Lection's "Gentlemen's Club". In 2015, Fifi Cooper signed a recording contract with Ambitiouz Entertainment, a South Africa-based record label. In early 2015, she released an AB Crazy-produced song titled "Kisses". The music video for "Kisses" was directed by Dino Benedetti and was released on Youtube on 24 May 2015. On 13 November 2015, Fifi Cooper released "20FIFI", her debut studio album which won her three categories at the 15th Metro FM Music Awards and further earned her nominations in the "Best Newcomer of The Year" and "Best Female Artist of The; Fifi Cooper // at Boston Media House where she studied Media. Fifi Cooper began singing at the age of 8 while in primary school; participating in various social extra-curricula activities. She professionally started her music career in 2008 when she made a guest appearance on Mo'Molemi's "Motzamai: Rebel With a Pause" album. Her breakthrough however came in 2010 following the release of a single titled "Chechella Morao", a rap song that received massive airplay and did well to gain her new grounds in the South African music industry. Fifi Cooper also made vocal appearances in the remix of AKA's "Baddest Remix" single, Mo'Molemi's; R. Clarke Cooper // president, president of Pi Kappa Phi and rowed for the men's heavy weight crew. Immediately following graduation from FSU in 1994, Cooper joined the Washington, D.C. staff of Florida Republican Congresswoman Ileana Ros-Lehtinen. He then worked with her husband, former U.S. Attorney Dexter W. Lehtinen, as a lobbyist for the Miccosukee Tribe. During these years, Cooper become involved in Republican Party politics and campaigns including serving as a national committeeman for the Young Republicans. After serving in the George W. Bush Administration, Cooper would go back to lobbying for the Miccosukee in 2009. In 1998, Cooper served as a field [sep] knowledge2: Fifi Cooper: Refilwe Boingotlo Moeketsi (born 24 October 1991), known professionally as Fifi Cooper is a South African recording artist.[2] Fifi Cooper started her music career as an R&B singer before her musical versatility saw her release her breakthrough rap single "Chechela Morago" in 2010.[3] In 2015, she released her award-winning debut studio album 20FIFI.[4][5] ; Fifi Cooper: Fifi Cooper is the last of three children. She had her early education in Montshiwa, Mahikeng, South Africa, where she also harnessed her ability in singing and dancing. She completed her secondary school education at Batswana High School, Mahikeng and her higher education at Boston Media House where she studied Media.[6][7] ; Fifi Cooper: Fifi Cooper began singing at the age of 8 while in primary school; participating in various social extra-curricula activities. She professionally started her music career in 2008 when she made a guest appearance on Mo'Molemi's Motzamai: Rebel With a Pause album. Her breakthrough however came in 2010 following the release of her single titled "Chechela Morago", a rap song that received massive airplay and did well to gain her new grounds in the South African music industry.[8][9] Fifi Cooper also made vocal appearances in the remix of AKA's "Baddest Remix" single, Mo'Molemi's album titled Asia, Khuli Chana's Lost in Time and Lection's Gentlemen's Club.[6] ; Fifi Cooper: In 2015, Fifi Cooper signed a recording contract with Ambitiouz Entertainment, a South Africa-based record label. In early 2015, she released an AB Crazy-produced song titled "Kisses". The music video for "Kisses" was directed by Dino Benedetti and was released on YouTube on 24 May 2015. ; Fifi Cooper: On 13 November 2015, Fifi Cooper released 20FIFI, her debut studio album which won three awards at the 15th Metro FM Music Awards[10] and was further nominated in the "Best Newcomer of The Year" and "Best Female Artist of The Year" categories at the 2nd edition of the South African Music Awards.[11] In February 2017, Fifi Cooper departed from Ambitiouz Entertainment along with A-Reece and the hip hop duo B3nchMarQ.[12][13]
knowledge1: Michael A. Cardozo // Michael A. Cardozo Michael A. Cardozo (born June 28, 1941) is an American lawyer. From 2002 through the end of 2013, he was the Corporation Counsel for the Government of New York City, New York (a position appointed by the mayor). Cardozo is a partner at the law firm Proskauer Rose, and a former president of the New York City Bar Association. His great grandfather's first cousin was United States Supreme Court Justice Benjamin Cardozo. Michael A. Cardozo was born on June 28, 1941 in New York City to Lucile and Harmon Cardozo. He received his Bachelor of Arts degree [sep] knowledge2: José Cardozo: Due to his work at Toluca, Cardozo was elected as the Paraguayan Footballer of the Year in the years 2000, 2002 and 2003; and the South American Footballer of the Year in 2002. Despite the fact that he was fiercely opposed to the move, Cardozo was transferred to Argentine team San Lorenzo de Almagro in June 2005, and finished the season with only 4 goals due to injuries that kept him away from playing several games. However, many critics lambasted Cardozo for refusing to play through the pain. While playing for Toluca, Cardozo struggled through the 1997 campaign with hamstring problems and then played through much of the 2001 season despite suffering a broken wrist in the season opener. Cardozo is the all-time leading scorer for Toluca, with 249 goals in 332 appearances.[1]
knowledge1: Lina Marulanda // divorce with Carlos Oñate, her second husband, to whom she had been married for three months. Lina Marulanda Lina Marulanda (15 May 1980 – 22 April 2010) was a Colombian television personality and model. Marulanda was born Lina María Marulanda Cuartas in Medellín, Colombia. She began her modeling career at age 12. She first attended Santa María del Rosario de Medellín High School but moved to Parra Paris High School, from which she graduated, following conflicts with the directors and nuns at Santa María. Her adolescence was extremely busy with fashion shows and photo shoots; in a 2004 interview, Marulanda; Lina Marulanda // Lina Marulanda Lina Marulanda (15 May 1980 – 22 April 2010) was a Colombian television personality and model. Marulanda was born Lina María Marulanda Cuartas in Medellín, Colombia. She began her modeling career at age 12. She first attended Santa María del Rosario de Medellín High School but moved to Parra Paris High School, from which she graduated, following conflicts with the directors and nuns at Santa María. Her adolescence was extremely busy with fashion shows and photo shoots; in a 2004 interview, Marulanda said she regretted having grown up this way. After completing high school, Marulanda enrolled in Jorge; Lina Marulanda // she returned to CM& News, doing special reports on Colombiamoda 2007. She also reported on Colombiamoda 2007 for the station W Radio. On 24 July 2007, Marulanda joined the team of "La hora del Regreso" on W Radio, replacing Marcela Sarmiento. She was a spokesmodel for major brands of clothing, and appeared in magazines including "SoHo", "Don Juan", "Cromos", and "G". On 22 April 2010, Marulanda died upon falling from the balcony of her sixth-floor apartment. It is considered a suicide. Marulanda was with her parents, ex-husband, and a doctor at the time. She was in the midst of a [sep] knowledge2: Lina Marulanda: Lina Marulanda (born Lina María Marulanda Cuartas; 15 May 1980[2] – 22 April 2010[2]) was a Colombian television personality and model. ; Lina Marulanda: Marulanda was born in Medellín, Colombia. She began her modeling career at age 12.[2] She first attended Santa María del Rosario de Medellín High School but moved to Parra Paris High School, from which she graduated, following conflicts with the directors and nuns at Santa María.[2] Her adolescence was extremely busy with fashion shows and photo shoots; in a 2004 interview, Marulanda said she regretted having grown up this way.[2] ; Lina Marulanda: After completing high school, Marulanda enrolled in Jorge Tadeo Lozano University in Bogota, where she studied advertising.[2] ; Lina Marulanda: In December 2005, Marulanda went on to lead the entertainment portion of Caracol News at 12:30, with journalist and presenter Ivan Lalinde.[citation needed] ; Lina Marulanda: In early 2007, she hosted the reality show Challenge 20-07 on Canal Caracol. That July, she returned to CM& News, doing special reports on Colombiamoda 2007. She also reported on Colombiamoda 2007 for the station W Radio. On 24 July 2007, Marulanda joined the team of La hora del Regreso on W Radio, replacing Marcela Sarmiento.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Zeca Pagodinho // Zeca Pagodinho Zeca Pagodinho (, b. February 4, 1959, birth name Jessé Gomes da Silva Filho) is a Brazilian singer/songwriter working in the genres of samba and pagode Born in the neighborhood of Irajá, Rio de Janeiro, Zeca Pagodinho grew up around the most traditional manifestations of samba and started making his own verses while still a kid at GRES Portela samba School. In the '70s, Zeca started frequenting the Carnival Block of Cacique de Ramos, which took place in Rio de Janeiro every Wednesday and became a true pagode's crib (pagode is a type of samba). At one of; Zeca Pagodinho // album "Ser Humano" was nominated for the 16th Latin Grammy Awards in the Best Samba/Pagode Album category. Zeca Pagodinho Zeca Pagodinho (, b. February 4, 1959, birth name Jessé Gomes da Silva Filho) is a Brazilian singer/songwriter working in the genres of samba and pagode Born in the neighborhood of Irajá, Rio de Janeiro, Zeca Pagodinho grew up around the most traditional manifestations of samba and started making his own verses while still a kid at GRES Portela samba School. In the '70s, Zeca started frequenting the Carnival Block of Cacique de Ramos, which took place in Rio de Janeiro [sep] knowledge2: Zeca Pagodinho: Jessé Gomes da Silva Filho, known professionally as Zeca Pagodinho (Portuguese pronunciation: [ˈzɛkɐ pɐɡɔˈdʒĩɲu], born February 4, 1959), is a Brazilian singer-songwriter working in the genres of samba and pagode.[1] ; Zeca Pagodinho: Born in the neighborhood of Irajá, Rio de Janeiro, Zeca Pagodinho grew up around the most traditional manifestations of samba and started making his own verses while still a kid at GRES Portela samba School. In the '70s, Zeca started frequenting the Carnival Block of Cacique de Ramos, which took place in Rio de Janeiro every Wednesday and became a true pagode's crib (pagode is a type of samba). Son of Jessé da Silva and Irinéia da Silva, grandson paternal of Jessé Gomes da Silva and Milena da Silva, maternal of the president Manuel Deodoro da Fonseca and the president Mariana Cecília de Sousa Meirelles da Fonseca, his sister is Ircéia Pagodinho, his wife is Mônica Silva and his children are Eduardo, Elisa, Louis, and Maria Eduarda, his grandson is Noah, his granddaughter is Catarina, his daughter in law is Thalita, At one of these jams, samba singer Beth Carvalho was impressed with Zeca's skills and invited him to record the song Camarão Que Dorme a Onda Leva in 1983. From that point on, Zeca began to record his own albums. There are now 15 of them, and three DVDs. His creative, joyful, malicious songs translate the day-by-day of the typical easy going carioca and are a big success in Brazil. He's one of the biggest-sellers in the country, He lives at neighborhood of Barra da Tijuca with his wife Mônica Silva and his children Eduardo, Elisa, Louis, and Maria Eduarda.[2] A song of his, "Deixa a Vida Me Levar" was featured in the game FIFA 2004. ; Zeca Pagodinho: In 2015, his album Ser Humano was nominated for the 16th Latin Grammy Awards in the Best Samba/Pagode Album category.[3] ; Zeca Pagodinho: Jessé Gomes da Silva Filho, conhecido pelo nome artístico Zeca Pagodinho (Rio de Janeiro, 4 de fevereiro de 1959), é um cantor e compositor brasileiro. Gravou mais de 20 discos e é considerado um grande nome do gênero samba. ; Zeca Pagodinho: Começou sua carreira nas rodas de samba dos bairros de Irajá e Del Castilho, subúrbio do Rio de Janeiro. Tornou-se tão popular que seus shows chegam a ser contratados por cachês generosos, sendo realizados nas mais badaladas casas de espetáculo do país. Sempre fiel a suas características de irreverência e jocosidade, Zeca recebe também reconhecimento da crítica e de artistas e compositores consagrados. Nei Lopes afirma que o sambista "é uma das poucas unanimidades nacionais, elevado ao patamar do mega-estrelato pop pelas gravadoras".[1]
knowledge1: Blanca Errázuriz // in Meadowbrook Colony, near Westbury. She had legal claims over the custody of their son, since she and her husband had been given shared custody over him, but de Saulles refused to acknowledge the court's decision. She arrived at The Box shortly after 8pm, and found her former husband sitting on the porch of the house. They argued, and she pointed a gun at his head demanding him to immediately hand over the child to her. When he tried to disarm her, she shot him five times. He was rushed to the Nassau County Hospital, but died there at 10.20pm [sep] knowledge2: Blanca Errázuriz: Shortly before filing for divorce, Errázuri befriended future actor Rudolph Valentino in New York City. Valentino was then working as an exhibition dancer (taxi dancer) and had gained attention for his rendition of the Argentine tango, which was the craze at the time. Whether the two actually had a romantic relationship is unknown, but Valentino did agree to provide proof in court during the de Saulles' divorce case that Joan Sawyer, his dancing partner, was having an adulterous relationship with John de Saulles; he himself took the stand to support Errázuriz's claim of de Saulle's infidelities. De Saulles was also accused of various financial improprieties involving his misuse of his wife's fortune, claims that received greater validity when it became clear upon his death that de Saulles was deeply in debt.[4][5]
knowledge1: Diosdado Cabello // Diosdado Cabello Diosdado Cabello Rondón (born 15 April 1963) is a Venezuelan politician, member of the National Assembly of Venezuela and a former Speaker of the country's legislature, and active member of the Venezuelan armed forces. He was involved in Hugo Chávez’s return to power after the 2002 "coup d'état". He became a leading member of Chavez’s Movimiento V República (MVR), and remains a leading member of the United Socialist Party of Venezuela, into which MVR was merged in 2007. Governor of Miranda from 2004 to 2008, he lost the 2008 election to Henrique Capriles Radonski and was subsequently appointed; Diosdado Cabello // use public information to track wealth individuals who were potentially drug trafficking and steal their drugs and property in order to get rid of potential competition. As a result of the sanctions, reports estimate that approximately $800 million worth of assets were frozen by the United States government. Cabello denied the reports, stating that it would be foolish to have assets located in a place where they could be seized. Diosdado Cabello Diosdado Cabello Rondón (born 15 April 1963) is a Venezuelan politician, member of the National Assembly of Venezuela and a former Speaker of the country's legislature, and active; Diosdado Cabello // Public Works & Housing Minister. In November 2009, he was additionally appointed head of the National Commission of Telecom, a position traditionally independent from the Ministry of Public Works and Housing. In 2010, he was elected a member of parliament by his home state of Monagas. In 2011, President Hugo Chávez named him Vice-President of Venezuela’s ruling party, the PSUV. In 2012, he was elected and sworn in as President of the National Assembly of Venezuela, the country’s parliament. Diosdado Cabello was born in El Furrial, in the state of Monagas. His background is in engineering. He has an undergraduate; Diosdado Cabello // Cabello was nicknamed "the octopus" for having "tentacles everywhere". He is very influential in the Venezuelan government, using a network of patronage throughout the military, ministries and pro-government militias. Information presented to the United States State Department by Stratfor claimed that Cabello was "head of one of the major centers of corruption in Venezuela." A Wikileaked U.S. Embassy cable from 2009 characterized Cabello as a “major pole” of corruption within the regime, describing him as “amassing great power and control over the regime’s apparatus as well as a private fortune, often through intimidation behind the scenes.” The communiqué likewise created; Diosdado Cabello // in Washington, D.C. observed an increased security presence surrounding United States Senator Marco Rubio. A month later on 13 August 2017, "The Miami Herald" reported that Diosdado Cabello had initiated an assassination plot targeting Rubio, allegedly contacting Mexican nationals to discuss killing Rubio. Rubio, who is a critic of the Venezuelan government, has led an effort in the United States government to take action against corrupt officials of the Latin American government, often singling out Cabello. The Department of Homeland Security could not verify all of the details involved in the threat, though the plan was serious enough that multiple [sep] knowledge2: Diosdado Cabello: Diosdado Cabello Rondón (born 15 April 1963[1]) is a Venezuelan politician and current member of the National Assembly of Venezuela, where he previously served as Speaker. He is also an active member of the Venezuelan armed forces, with the rank of captain. ; Diosdado Cabello: Cabello played a key role in Hugo Chávez's return to power following the 2002 Venezuelan coup d'état attempt. He became a leading member of Chavez’s Movimiento V República (MVR), and remains a leading member of the ruling United Socialist Party of Venezuela, into which MVR was merged in 2007. Governor of Miranda state from 2004 to 2008, he lost the 2008 election to prominent opposition leader Henrique Capriles Radonski and was subsequently appointed Public Works & Housing Minister. In November 2009, he was additionally appointed head of the National Commission of Telecommunications, a position traditionally independent from the Ministry of Public Works and Housing.[2] In 2010, he was elected a member of parliament by his home state of Monagas. In 2011, President Hugo Chávez named him the vice president of Venezuela’s ruling party, the PSUV.[citation needed] In 2012, he was elected and sworn in as President of the National Assembly of Venezuela, the country’s parliament.[3] He was elected president of the National Assembly each year until 2016. He was the second and last president of the 2017 National Constituent Assembly. ; Diosdado Cabello: Allegations of corruption involving Cabello includes being head of an international drug trafficking organization,[4][5] accepting bribes from Derwick Associates for public works projects in Venezuela,[6] using nepotism to reward friends and family members[7] and directing colectivos while paying them with funds from Petróleos de Venezuela.[8] In 2013, there were at least 17 formal corruption allegations lodged against Cabello in Venezuela's prosecutors office.[9] On 26 March 2020, the U.S. Department of State offered $10 million for information to bring him to justice in relation to drug trafficking and narco-terrorism.[10] ; Diosdado Cabello: Often described as the second most,[11][12] if not the most,[citation needed] powerful man in Venezuela, Reuters notes that Cabello possesses significant "sway with the military and lawmakers plus close links to businessmen."[13] ; Diosdado Cabello: Diosdado Cabello was born in El Furrial, in the state of Monagas.[1] In 1987, he graduated second in his class from the Venezuelan Military Academy.[14] His measured intelligence quotient (IQ) was ranked as the fifth-highest among all students in the institution's history.[15][16][17] His background is in engineering. He has an undergraduate degree in systems engineering from the Instituto Universitario Politécnico de las Fuerzas Armadas Nacionales and a graduate degree in engineering project management from the Andrés Bello Catholic University.[1]
knowledge1: Funke Abimbola // Funke Abimbola Funke Abimbola, MBE is a multi-award-winning business leader, lawyer, public speaker, TV contributor, diversity leader, patron and board member. Until recently, she was the general counsel and head of financial compliance for Roche UK. She is of Nigerian descent. She attended Newcastle University to study law. She had a son while working with Campbell Hooper. She works as a volunteer in advancing diversity across UK society with a specific focus on the legal profession. Abimbola comes from a family of medical doctors. She was educated at Burgess Hill Girls. She did not study medicine because of her fear; Funke Abimbola // Empire) by HM Queen Elizabeth II for services to diversity in the legal profession and to young people. Funke Abimbola Funke Abimbola, MBE is a multi-award-winning business leader, lawyer, public speaker, TV contributor, diversity leader, patron and board member. Until recently, she was the general counsel and head of financial compliance for Roche UK. She is of Nigerian descent. She attended Newcastle University to study law. She had a son while working with Campbell Hooper. She works as a volunteer in advancing diversity across UK society with a specific focus on the legal profession. Abimbola comes from a family of [sep] knowledge2: Funke Abimbola: Funke Abimbola MBE is a Nigerian businesswoman and lawyer. She advocates for diversity across UK society with a specific focus on the legal profession. ; Funke Abimbola: Abimbola attended Newcastle University to study law.[1] Funke Abimbola is a mother of a 19 year old who is presently at Newcastle University studying Software Engineering.[2] ; Funke Abimbola: Sources:[10][12][16]
knowledge1: Jennifer Maia // Jennifer Maia Jennifer Maia (born October 6, 1988) is a Brazilian female mixed martial artist who competes in the Flyweight division. Maia trains at the legendary Chute Boxe Academy in Brazil. She is currently signed with Invicta Fighting Championships. As of September 27, 2018, she is #14 in the official UFC flyweight rankings. On March 29, 2008, Maia made her professional Boxing debut at Centri de Boxe in Curitiba, Brazil. She faced Michelle Bonassoli in an eight round bout that went the distance and saw her victorious via unanimous decision. Her second bout was against Juliana de Aguiar, another eight; Jennifer Maia // Fighting Championships debut at on April 5, 2013 against former Bellator women's strawweight champion Zoila Frausto Gurgel. She won the fight via unanimous decision. Maia then faced off against Leslie Smith in a #1 contender's fight for a shot at the flyweight championship held by Barb Honchak at on July 13, 2013. She lost the fight via unanimous decision. Maia made her UFC debut against Liz Carmouche at UFC Fight Night 133 on July 14, 2018. Maia lost the fight by unanimous decision. Jennifer Maia Jennifer Maia (born October 6, 1988) is a Brazilian female mixed martial artist who competes [sep] knowledge2: Jennifer Maia: Jennifer Maia (born October 6, 1988) is a Brazilian professional mixed martial artist who competes in the Women's Flyweight division. Maia trains at  Chute Boxe Academy in Brazil.A professional since 2009, Maia is most notable for her 12 bout stint in the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC) and for being the former Invicta FC Flyweight World Champion.[3] ; Jennifer Maia: Maia was born in Curitiba, Paraná, Brazil, on October 6, 1988. Playing soccer since childhood, Maia transitioned to muay Thai, at the age of 15.[1][2] She won several national titles in the discipline before turning to boxing and then mixed martial arts.[1][2] ; Jennifer Maia: On March 29, 2008, Maia made her professional Boxing debut at Centri de Boxe in Curitiba, Brazil. She faced Michelle Bonassoli in an eight-round bout that went the distance and saw her victorious via unanimous decision. ; Jennifer Maia: Her second bout was against Juliana de Aguiar, another eight-round bout in which she won via points. ; Jennifer Maia: The last boxing match Maia competed in before transitioning into MMA was on August 5, 2009. She defeated Lorena Nancy Lopez via TKO in the fourth round.[4]
knowledge1: María José (singer) // of "Maxim" in the US. She opened for Gwen Stefani's "The Sweet Escape Tour" in Mexico. This part of the tour included concerts in "Arena Monterrey" in Monterrey and in "Palacio de los Deportes" in Mexico City. She also appeared in the "Reventour", a series of concerts in several places in Mexico, both as a singer and as a host. In late July, she was part of an American tour with LU and Motel and announced the release of her first album in August in the United States, which she promoted extensively. She was also invited to participate in "Hoy [sep] knowledge2: María José (singer): She opened for Gwen Stefani's The Sweet Escape Tour in Mexico.[1] This part of the tour included concerts in Arena Monterrey in Monterrey and in Palacio de los Deportes in Mexico City.[2] She also appeared in the Reventour, a series of concerts in several places in Mexico, both as a singer and as a host.[3]
knowledge1: Will Voigt // Will Voigt Will Voigt (born August 18, 1976) is an American basketball coach, who is currently the head coach of the Angola national basketball team. He led the Nigerian team to its first ever AfroBasket title in August 2015, where they defeated Angola in the finals to qualify for the 2016 Summer Olympics in Rio. Voigt grew in Cabot, Vermont, and attended Cabot High School, where he played varsity basketball and soccer. He attended Pomona College in California for college, lettering in soccer, and graduating with a degree in political science. During college, Voigt landed an internship with the NBA's; Will Voigt // title, and automatic qualification to the 2016 Summer Olympics. In November 2017, Voigt signed a three-year deal with the Angolan Basketball Federation as headcoach of the Angola national basketball team. Voigt's mother, Ellen Bryant Voigt is the former Poet Laureate of the state of Vermont. He married his wife in 2009, divorced in 2018. They had two children, a boy and a girl. Will Voigt Will Voigt (born August 18, 1976) is an American basketball coach, who is currently the head coach of the Angola national basketball team. He led the Nigerian team to its first ever AfroBasket title in [sep] knowledge2: Will Voigt: William Voigt (born August 18, 1976) is an American basketball coach who is currently serving as head coach of the Austin Spurs in the NBA G League. ; Will Voigt: Voigt grew up in Cabot, Vermont and attended Cabot High School, where he played varsity basketball and soccer. He attended Pomona College in California, lettering in soccer, and graduating with a degree in political science.[2] ; Will Voigt: During college, Voigt landed an internship with the NBA's Los Angeles Clippers. After graduation, he became a video coordinator with the San Antonio Spurs, and a year later entered the college coaching ranks taking on an assistant role with Texas under Rick Barnes. Voigt moved on to Division II powerhouse Metro State as an assistant for Mike Dunlap. ; Will Voigt: Voigt's first head coaching job came in Norway, taking over Ulriken Elite where he stayed from 2003 to 2006. When Sports Illustrated writer Alexander Wolff decided to purchase an ABA franchise, the Vermont Frost Heaves, he put the naming of the head coach to a vote by the fans. The Vermont native Voigt was selected.[3] In the first two seasons of the franchise's existence, Voigt led the Frost Heaves to back-to-back ABA Championships. ; Will Voigt: In 2009, Voigt, in similar fashion, was selected by the fans to be the head coach of the Bakersfield Jam of the NBA Development League.[4] Voigt led the Jam to three playoff appearances, before leaving the team in 2014.
knowledge1: Josh Mansour // Josh Mansour Josh Mansour (Arabic: جوش منصور; born 17 June 1990) is a rugby league footballer who plays for the Penrith Panthers in the National Rugby League. Primarily playing on the , Mansour has represented Australia and Lebanon internationally, as well as the New South Wales State of Origin, Prime Minister's XIII and NSW City Origin teams. He was born in Sydney, New South Wales, Australia. Mansour is of Lebanese descent through his father Fidel, who was born north of Beirut, Portuguese descent through his mother Angie, who was born in Madeira and Cuban descent. He played his junior rugby; Josh Mansour // on his badly fractured face, Mansour said “The biggest risk was obviously losing my eye, My surgeon has done over 2000 people and he reckons he has only seen a dozen like this, and they are all from motor accidents and soldiers". On 17 April, Mansour signed a three-year contract extension to stay at Penrith until the end of the 2021 season. Mansour is an avid fan of Arsenal F.C.. His wife Daniella gave birth to their first child, Siana, on 2 November 2017. Josh Mansour Josh Mansour (Arabic: جوش منصور; born 17 June 1990) is a rugby league footballer; Josh Mansour // league for the St Johns Eagles and the Kingsgrove Colts, and attended Holy Spirit College in Lakemba during his high schooling. After being cut from the Canterbury-Bankstown Bulldogs' S. G. Ball Cup side, Mansour attended an open trial for the North Sydney Bears and was subsequently signed by the South Sydney Rabbitohs, playing in their NYC team between 2008 and 2010. Mansour was selected in 2010 as Winger of the Year NYC and was chosen as the NYC Player of the Year at the Rabbitohs. He represented Lebanon in the 2009 European Cup, and played for the Junior Kangaroos in; Josh Mansour // scored 2 tries in the 54-12 win at Craven Park in Hull. On 3 November, Mansour suffered a serious knee injury during a freak mishap at training during a game of touch footy when he collided with Dragons star Josh Dugan, ruling Mansour from the tournament and the first half of the 2017 season. On 4 June 2017, Mansour played his first game for the season after returning from a serious knee injury. He scored a try in Penrith's 38-0 demolition of Canterbury at Stadium Australia. On 2 September 2017, Mansour played his 100th NRL game against the Manly Warringah; Josh Mansour // 2010. Mansour graduated to South Sydney's full-time training squad in 2011, playing for their feeder team, the North Sydney Bears, in the New South Wales Cup. After a number of strong performances for Norths, Mansour caught the attention of the Penrith Panthers who offered him a contract for the 2012 season. In round 9, Mansour made his NRL debut for the Penrith Panthers at Penrith Stadium on the wing in the 10-44 loss against the Melbourne Storm. Mansour scored a try on debut. He was named the Panthers rookie of the year after playing in 14 matches and scoring 7 [sep] knowledge2: Josh Mansour: Josh Mansour (Arabic: جوش منصور; born 17 June 1990) is a former professional rugby league footballer who played as a winger. He represented Lebanon and Australia at international level. ; Josh Mansour: He previously played for the Penrith Panthers and the South Sydney Rabbitohs in the National Rugby League, and for Newtown Jets in the NSW Cup. At representative level he played for the Prime Minister's XIII, NSW City Origin and New South Wales in the State of Origin series. ; Josh Mansour: Mansour was born in Sydney, Australia. He is of Lebanese and Cuban descent through his father, Fidel, who was born north of Beirut, Lebanon,[2] and is of Portuguese descent through his mother, Angie, who was born in the Madeira archipelago.[3] ; Josh Mansour: He played junior rugby league for the St Johns Eagles and the Kingsgrove Colts, and attended Holy Spirit College in Lakemba during his high school years.[4] ; Josh Mansour: After being cut from the Canterbury-Bankstown Bulldogs' S. G. Ball Cup side, Mansour attended an open trial for the North Sydney Bears and was subsequently signed by the South Sydney Rabbitohs, playing in their NYC team between 2008 and 2010.[3] Mansour was selected in 2010 as Winger of the Year NYC and was chosen as the NYC Player of the Year at the Rabbitohs.[5]
knowledge1: Bhuma Nagi Reddy // Bhuma Nagi Reddy Bhuma Nagi Reddy (; 8 January 1964 – 12 March 2017) was an Indian politician. He was elected in a by-election to the Andhra Pradesh Legislative Assembly in 1992 after the sudden death of his brother, Bhuma Sekhar Reddy, an MLA from Allagadda constituency in Kurnool district. In 1996, Reddy was the Telugu Desam Party candidate against Prime Minister P. V. Narasimha Rao in the Nandyal Lok Sabha constituency election. He served in the 11th, 12th and 13th Lok Sabhas. Reddy died in office on 12 March 2017 after a massive heart attack at his home in; Bhuma Nagi Reddy // member of the transport and tourism committee, the committee to provide computers to MPs, and a consultative committee for the Ministry of Chemicals and Fertilizers in 1998-1999. Nagi Reddy was a member of the energy committee in 1999 and 2000 and of a consultative committee for the Ministry of Urban Development from 2000 to 2004.. Nagi Reddy died of a massive heart attack at his home on 12 March 2017 at age 53. He was survived by his three children, including Allagada MLA Akhila Priya. Bhuma Nagi Reddy Bhuma Nagi Reddy (; 8 January 1964 – 12 March 2017) was; Bhuma Nagi Reddy // Nagi Reddy to rebuild his political strategy and improve his relationship with the party core. In the 1999 midterm election, he defeated Prathapa Reddy by 72,600 votes. In 2004, Nagi Reddy was defeated by Prathap Reddy in the Allagadda assembly constituency. His wife, a two-term MLA from Allagadda, reluctantly stood as an MP candidate from Nandyal and lost to Congress candidate S. P. Y. Reddy. After the Praja Rajyam Party was founded by Tollywood film actor Chiranjeevi, the couple resigned from the TDP on 4 July 2008 and joined the new party on 20 August. In the 2009 general elections, [sep] knowledge2: Bhuma Nagi Reddy: Bhuma Nagi Reddy (Telugu: భూమా నాగిరెడ్డి; 8 January 1964 – 12 March 2017) was an Indian politician. He was elected in a by-election to the Andhra Pradesh Legislative Assembly in 1992[2] after the sudden death of his brother, Bhuma Sekhar Reddy, an MLA from Allagadda constituency in Kurnool district. In 1996, Reddy was the Telugu Desam Party candidate against Prime Minister P. V. Narasimha Rao in the Nandyal Lok Sabha constituency election. He served in the 11th, 12th and 13th Lok Sabhas. Reddy died in office on 12 March 2017 after a massive heart attack at his home in Allagadda. [3] ; Bhuma Nagi Reddy: Nagi Reddy was born in the remote village of Kothapalle, near Dornipadu, the youngest son of Bhuma Bali Reddy and Eeswaramma. He had three older brothers and one younger sister, Bogolu Sri Devi. As the family had been involved in local politics, Bali Reddy wanted to send his son away for his education. Nagi Reddy completed his intermediate studies in Velankanni at a private school affiliated with the Central Board of Secondary Education. He was later sent to Bangalore to study medicine, but had to return after his father was murdered. His father's death inspired Nagi Reddy to become a politician in the Rayalaseema region. ; Bhuma Nagi Reddy: He married Shobha Nagi Reddy, daughter of former Andhra Pradesh minister S. V. Subbareddy, who also became a renowned politician. She died on 24 April 2014 at 11:05 pm after an automobile accident while she was campaigning for the 2014 legislative elections.[4] They had three children: one son and two daughters, one of whom is Allagada MLA Akhila Priya Reddy.[5] ; Bhuma Nagi Reddy: Nagi Reddy began his political career in 1984, when he was elected president of the Rudravaram Cooperative Society. From 1986 to 1990, he was a mandal president in Allagadda MPP. Nagi Reddy stood as an MLA candidate for the opposition Telugu Desam Party in the 1991 by-election for the Allagadda constituency left vacant by the death of his brother Bhuma Sekhar Reddy, who died of a heart attack on 7 June. In 1996, he challenged Prime Minister P. V. Narasimha Rao for the TDP. Although Nagi Reddy was narrowly defeated, he gained many supporters and considerable publicity. Narasimha Rao resigned the Nandyal seat to retain the Berhampur constituency, leading to a by-election. Nagi Reddy defeated Rangaiah Naidu to join the 11th Lok Sabha. ; Bhuma Nagi Reddy: In 1998, he narrowly defeated Gangula Prathapa Reddy.[6] The result inspired Nagi Reddy to rebuild his political strategy and improve his relationship with the party core. In the 1999 midterm election, he defeated Prathapa Reddy by 72,600 votes.[7]
knowledge1: Billy Snedden // Billy Snedden Sir Billy Mackie Snedden, (31 December 1926 – 27 June 1987) was an Australian politician who served as the leader of the Liberal Party from 1972 to 1975. He was also a cabinet minister from 1964 to 1972, and Speaker of the House of Representatives from 1976 to 1983. Snedden was born in Perth, Western Australia. He served in the Royal Australian Air Force during World War II, and then studied law at the University of Western Australia. From 1951 to 1952, he was the inaugural federal chairman of the Young Liberal Movement. After a period working overseas; Billy Snedden // in 1912 with their three oldest children, initially settling in the remote mining town of Meekatharra. The family moved to Perth in about 1921, after their house in Meekatharra burned down. Snedden's father worked mostly as a stonemason, but also spent periods as a miner and general labourer when better work was not available. He reputedly left Scotland to escape a paternity suit, and had earlier been in trouble with the law for poaching. The family name was originally "Snaddon" (or "Snadon"), but was changed upon arrival in Australia. Snedden grew up in Perth's inner north near the suburb of; Billy Snedden // through to the ninth grade. Snedden left school in April 1942 and began working as a junior law clerk for Thomas Hughes, who was a solicitor and independent state MP. He would not normally have been considered qualified for the job, but there was a shortage of applicants due to the war. Snedden was eventually able to receive his leaving certificate by attending night school at Perth Technical College. He fell out with Hughes late in 1943, and in January 1944 began working as a clerk at the Commonwealth Crown Solicitor's office. He was a talented sportsman as a youth,; Billy Snedden // to Italy for sixteen months, initially living in Taormina, Sicily, and later in Rome. He learnt to speak Italian, and travelled around the country conducting interviews with prospective migrants. In November 1953, Snedden was transferred to England. He stayed there for a year, and was then supposed to be moved on to Germany. However, he decided to return to Australia, and in January 1955 moved to Melbourne to work in a legal advice bureau for ex-servicemen. He and his family settled in Ringwood. Snedden was state president of the Young Liberals, and from 1951 to 1952 served as the inaugural; Billy Snedden // but lost her seat. Snedden was appointed a Knight Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George (KCMG) in January 1978. He was appointed a Privy Councillor in 1972. Billy Snedden Sir Billy Mackie Snedden, (31 December 1926 – 27 June 1987) was an Australian politician who served as the leader of the Liberal Party from 1972 to 1975. He was also a cabinet minister from 1964 to 1972, and Speaker of the House of Representatives from 1976 to 1983. Snedden was born in Perth, Western Australia. He served in the Royal Australian Air Force during World War [sep] knowledge2: Billy Snedden: Sir Billy Mackie Snedden, KCMG, QC (31 December 1926 – 27 June 1987) was an Australian politician who served as the leader of the Liberal Party from 1972 to 1975. He was also a cabinet minister from 1964 to 1972, and Speaker of the House of Representatives from 1976 to 1983. ; Billy Snedden: Snedden was born in Perth, Western Australia. He served in the Royal Australian Air Force during World War II, and then studied law at the University of Western Australia. From 1951 to 1952, he was the inaugural federal chairman of the Young Liberal Movement. After a period working overseas for the Department of Immigration, Snedden returned to Australia in 1954 and settled in Melbourne. He was elected to the House of Representatives the following year, aged 28. ; Billy Snedden: In 1964, Snedden was elevated to cabinet by Robert Menzies. He served as a government minister until the Liberal government's defeat at the 1972 election, under an additional four prime ministers. Snedden spent periods as Attorney-General (1964–1966), Minister for Immigration (1966–1969), Minister for Labour and National Service (1969–1971), and Treasurer (1971–1972). He was elected deputy leader of the Liberal Party in 1971, and replaced William McMahon as leader after the following year's election loss, thus becoming Leader of the Opposition. ; Billy Snedden: Snedden led the Liberal Party to the 1974 federal election, which saw the Labor Party retain government with a narrow majority. Malcolm Fraser mounted two leadership challenges in early 1975, winning on the second attempt; by the end of the year he was prime minister. Snedden was elected to the speakership when the parliament next sat. He held the position for almost seven years, gaining a reputation for impartiality. In retirement, Snedden served as chairman of the Melbourne Football Club and on the board of the Victorian Football League. The unusual circumstances of his death in 1987, which involved the ex-girlfriend of his own son, attracted much public interest. ; Billy Snedden: Snedden was born on 31 December 1926 at a private hospital in Newcastle Street, West Perth, Western Australia. He was the youngest of six children born to Catherine (née Mackie) and Alan Snedden. His mother was 43 years old when he was born, and his siblings – one sister and four brothers – were much older than him.[a][1]
knowledge1: Huang Xing // Huang Xing Huang Xing or Huang Hsing (; 25 October 1874 – 31 October 1916) was a Chinese revolutionary leader and politician, and the first army commander-in-chief of the Republic of China. As one of the founders of the Kuomintang (KMT) and the Republic of China, his position was second only to Sun Yat-sen. Together they were known as Sun-Huang during the Xinhai Revolution. He was also known as the "Eight Fingered General" because of wounds sustained during war. His tomb is on Mount Yuelu, in Changsha, Hunan, China. Huang was born in the village of Gaotang, now part of; Huang Xing // Changsha, Hunan. Like many other Chinese men born before 1949, Huang was known by many different names during his life. His birth name was "Huang Zhen", but this was later changed to "Huang Xing". He was also known as "Huang Keqiang" and "Qing Wu". In the period after 1911 he also used the names "Li Youqing" and "Zhang Shouzheng". Huang was a descendant of Huang Tingjian, a Chinese artist, scholar, government official, and poet of the Song dynasty. Huang Xing began his studies at the prestigious South Changsha Academy in 1893, and received his Jinshi degree when he was only [sep] knowledge2: Huang Xing: Huang Xing or Huang Hsing (Chinese: 黃興; 25 October 1874 – 31 October 1916) was a Chinese revolutionary leader and politician, and the first commander-in-chief of the Republic of China. As one of the founders of the Kuomintang (KMT) and the Republic of China, his position was second only to Sun Yat-sen.  Together they were known as Sun-Huang during the Xinhai Revolution. He was also known as the "Eight Fingered General" because of wounds sustained during war. His tomb is on Mount Yuelu, in Changsha, Hunan, China. ; Huang Xing: Huang was born in the village of Gaotang, now part of Changsha, Hunan. Like many other Chinese men born before 1949, Huang was known by many different names during his life. His birth name was "Huang Zhen", but this was later changed to "Huang Xing". He was also known as "Huang Keqiang" and "Qing Wu". In the period after 1911 he also used the names "Li Youqing" and "Zhang Shouzheng". ; Huang Xing: Huang Xing was a descendant of Huang Tingjian, a Chinese artist, scholar, government official, and poet of the Song dynasty.[1] Huang Xing began his studies at the prestigious South Changsha Academy in 1893, and received his Jinshi degree when he was only 22 years old. In 1898 Huang Xing was selected to complete further study at Wuchang Lianghu College, from which Huang Xing graduated in 1901. In 1902 Huang was selected by Zhang Zhidong to study abroad in Japan, and was enrolled in Tokyo's Kōbun Institute (弘文学院). ; Huang Xing: While in Japan, Huang Xing developed an appreciation for the study of military affairs, and studied modern warfare under a Japanese officer in his leisure time. While living in Japan, Huang Xing practiced horsemanship and shooting every morning. Huang Xing's military training in Japan prepared him for his later role as a Chinese revolutionary. ; Huang Xing: In 1903, Huang organized the Anti-Russia Volunteer Army (Chinese: 拒俄義勇隊; pinyin: Jù-É Yìyǒngduì) of over two hundred fellow students in Japan. The Army, quickly shut down by authorities in Japan, was intended to protest Russia's growing hegemony over Outer Mongolia and its occupation of northeast China after the Boxer Uprising. Later in 1903 Huang returned to China and organized a meeting with Chen Tianhua, Song Jiaoren, and more than 20 other people. The group founded the Huaxinghui, a secret revolutionary party dedicated to the overthrow of the Qing Dynasty. Huang Xing was elected president.
knowledge1: Chi Pu // Chi Pu Nguyễn Thùy Chi (born 14 June 1993 in Hanoi) known by her stage name Chi Pu, is a Vietnamese actress and pop singer. Chi Pu was born on June 14, 1993 in Hanoi, Vietnam. Her father is a member of the Vietnamese military, and her mother is an English teacher. She has an older sister who works in the banking industry. From a young age, Chi Pu was among the top students at her school. She competed a piano competition in 2003 and won first prize. Chi Pu rose to fame in 2009 after reaching the top 20; Chi Pu // the event “Trung thu yêu thương” (Beloved Mid-Autumn) to perform and send out gifts for children at the "Center for Disabled Children" in Ho Chi Minh City. In 2015, Chi Pu was one of the ambassadors for “"Về đi Vàng ơi"” (Come home Golden), a campaign launched by (ACPA). The campaign called for an end to the theft, trade, and cruel actions of dogs. Along with other artists, Chi Pu encouraged people to stop hunting and consuming rhino horns in Vietnam. Chi Pu Nguyễn Thùy Chi (born 14 June 1993 in Hanoi) known by her stage name Chi Pu, is; Chi Pu // the Stars Kids Vietnam 2015 champion Linh Hoa, YouTube star Phở Đặc Biệt, actor B Trần, singer Gil Lê, Băng Di... In December 2016, Chi Pu starred in the comedy/action blockbuster "Saigon Bodyguards, "the first Vietnamese film by Japanese director Ken Ochiai. She released several songs including "Fighting Fighting" (Wake up OST), "Stay with me" (LOVE OST), "Ngày bồng bềnh", "Tada X’mas" (feat. Gil Lê). She earned third place in . In 2015, Chi Pu was honored as Upcoming Female Actress at ELLE Style Awards by ELLE Vietnam. Chi Pu was the first Vietnamese actress who partnered with a fashion; Chi Pu // movies "Chung cư ma "(Hush) and "Hương Ga "(Rise), which won Best Vietnamese Film at the 2016 San Francisco International New Concept Film Festival. In 2014, Chi Pu was the leading role in the television drama "Vẫn có em bên đời" "(You’re Always by my Side)". The drama received high ratings, earning Chi Pu an for Most Favorite Television Drama Actress. Chi Pu produced and acted in her second short movie called "My Sunshine "that same year. The movie received positive reviews and attracted millions of views on with its content and message supporting the community. In 2015, Chi Pu; Chi Pu // contestants in Miss Teen Vietnam - from Lê Quý Đôn High School. Afterward, she joined the entertainment industry and became a teen idol. Chi Pu is the first and only Vietnamese artist with a self-titled mobile game, "Chi Pu - VSao", which was released in 2015. According to Socialbaker, Chi Pu has the most followers of any Vietnamese actress on Facebook, Instagram, and YouTube. In 2013, Chi Pu started her acting career with leading roles in the television dramas "Waterdrop" and "Happy Dream", which were broadcast on Vietnam National Television. That same year, she joined "" a popular television series [sep] knowledge2: Chi Pu: Nguyễn Thùy Chi (born June 14, 1993), commonly known by her stage name Chi Pu, is a Vietnamese actress and singer. She gained popularity with her lead roles in several television dramas and sitcoms including Waterdrop, Happy Dream, and 5S Online. Chi Pu officially started her singing career in 2017. In 2020, Chi Pu was honored among Forbes list of Asia Pacific's 100 most influential digital stars.[2] ; Chi Pu: Chi Pu was born on June 14, 1993[3] in Hanoi, Vietnam. Her father is a member of the Vietnamese military, and her mother is an English teacher.[citation needed] She has an older sister[4] who works in the banking industry. ; Chi Pu: Chi Pu rose to fame after placing Top 20 Miss Teen Vietnam 2009. Afterwards, she joined the entertainment industry and became a teen idol.[5] ; Chi Pu: According to Socialbaker, as of November 2016[update], Chi Pu had the most followers of any Vietnamese actress on Facebook, Instagram, and YouTube.[6] ; Chi Pu: In 2013, Chi Pu started her acting career with leading roles in the television dramas Waterdrop and Happy Dream, which were broadcast on Vietnam National Television. That same year, she joined 5S Online, a popular Vietnamese television series].[7] She produced and acted in her first short film, Under One Sky.[8] The short film was highly rated among audiences and critics, receiving a Golden Kite Award the following year.[citation needed] At the end of 2013, Chi Pu appeared in her first full-length film, Thần tượng (The Talent), which won 6 Golden Kite Awards. Chi Pu also appeared in the horror movies Chung cư ma (Hush) and Hương Ga (Rise), which won Best Vietnamese Film at the 2016 San Francisco International New Concept Film Festival.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Yuyan // Yuyan Yuyan (1918–1997), courtesy name Yanrui, nickname Xiaoruizi, was a Chinese calligrapher of Manchu descent. He was a member of the Aisin Gioro clan, the imperial clan of the Qing dynasty. He claimed that he was appointed by Puyi, the Last Emperor of China, as the heir to the throne. His claim is the subject of the travel adventure book "The Empty Throne" by British journalist Tony Scotland. Born in Wangfujing, Beijing, Yuyan was the second son of Pucheng (溥偁) and Jinggui (敬貴), a lady of the Fuca (富察) clan. His grandfather was Zailian (載濂; 1854–1917), a son of Yicong; Yuyan // and later in a haberdashery factory. He was arrested in 1959 and sent for hard labour at a public security detention centre near Beijing. Yuyan was arrested again in 1966 during the Cultural Revolution and sent to do hard labour in Shanxi. He was only released in 1979 and allowed to return to Beijing, where he became a road sweeper. Yuyan was a calligrapher and poet. In 1987, he was appointed as a state consultant on the restoration of the Prince Gong Mansion in Beijing. Yuyan is the main character in the book "The Empty Throne: The Quest for an; Yuyan // Imperial Heir in the People's Republic of China" (1993) by the British journalist Tony Scotland. Scotland was searching for an heir to the imperial throne of China. Yuyan Yuyan (1918–1997), courtesy name Yanrui, nickname Xiaoruizi, was a Chinese calligrapher of Manchu descent. He was a member of the Aisin Gioro clan, the imperial clan of the Qing dynasty. He claimed that he was appointed by Puyi, the Last Emperor of China, as the heir to the throne. His claim is the subject of the travel adventure book "The Empty Throne" by British journalist Tony Scotland. Born in Wangfujing, Beijing, Yuyan [sep] knowledge2: Yuyan: Yuyan (1918–1997), courtesy name Yanrui, nickname Xiaoruizi, was a Chinese calligrapher of Manchu descent. He was a member of the Aisin Gioro clan, the imperial clan of the Qing dynasty. He claimed that he was appointed by Puyi, the last Emperor of China, as the heir to the throne. His claim is the subject of the travel adventure book The Empty Throne by British journalist Tony Scotland.[1] ; Yuyan: Born in Wangfujing, Beijing, Yuyan was the second son of Pucheng (溥偁) and Jinggui (敬貴), a lady of the Fuca (富察) clan. His grandfather was Zailian (載濂; 1854–1917), a son of Yicong (1831–1889), the fifth son of the Daoguang Emperor. He was a distant cousin of Puyi, the Last Emperor. ; Yuyan: In 1936, Yuyan was summoned by Puyi, who had been enthroned as the ruler of the puppet state Manchukuo in 1934 by the Empire of Japan, to join his imperial court in Changchun, Jilin. Yuyan was very close to Puyi, who called him "Xiaoruizi" (小瑞子; or "Little Rui"). ; Yuyan: After the fall of Manchukuo, Yuyan was arrested by the Soviets and imprisoned from 1945 to 1950 near Khabarovsk in the Soviet Union's Far East Region along with Puyi. He was later sent back to China, where he was incarcerated in the Fushun War Criminals Management Centre in Liaoning from 1950 to 1957. ; Yuyan: Yuyan was a pretender to the Chinese throne. He claimed that Puyi appointed him as heir when they were both imprisoned in the Soviet Union in 1950. In his autobiography, Puyi wrote only that he considered selecting Yuyan as his heir.[2] Under a succession law adopted in 1937, Puyi's younger brother, Pujie, became next in line in succession to the throne.
knowledge1: Minako Honda // Minako Honda She was diagnosed with acute myelogenous leukemia on January 5, 2005. At 4:38 A.M. on November 6, 2005, Honda died at the Juntendo University Hospital in Bunkyō, Tokyo, officially from acute myelogenous leukemia. Minako Kudo was born in Itabashi, Tokyo, and was raised in Asaka, Saitama. In 1989, at the age of 22, she made an attempt to revive her flagging career by forming an edgy girl group called "Minako with Wild Cats". By 1992, however, she reinvented herself. She took formal acting and singing lessons, and became a notable theatrical singer and actress. In auditions for the; Minako Honda // and she lapsed into a coma on November 3. At 4:38 a.m. on November 6, 2005, Honda died at the Juntendo University Hospital in Bunkyō, Tokyo, officially from acute myelogenous leukemia. She was 38 and unmarried at the time of her death. Note: Minako Honda was originally cast as Fantine in Les Misérables for the Japanese tour in 2005, but due to her death, another actor was given the part. Minako Honda She was diagnosed with acute myelogenous leukemia on January 5, 2005. At 4:38 A.M. on November 6, 2005, Honda died at the Juntendo University Hospital in Bunkyō, Tokyo, [sep] knowledge2: Minako Honda: Minako Kudo (Japanese: 工藤美奈子, Hepburn: Kudō Minako), better known as Minako Honda (Japanese: 本田美奈子, Hepburn: Honda Minako, July 31, 1967 – November 6, 2005),[2] later changed to Minako Honda. (Japanese: 本田美奈子., Hepburn: .Honda Minako),[3] was a Japanese idol and musical singer. In 1985, she made her debut with the single "Satsui no Vacance". ; Minako Honda: She was diagnosed with acute myelogenous leukemia on January 5, 2005. At 4:38 A.M. on November 6, 2005, Honda died at the Juntendo University Hospital in Bunkyō, Tokyo.[2] ; Minako Honda: Kudo was born in Japan on July 31, 1967 at Narimasu Maternity Hospital in Narimasu, Itabashi. Kudo's family initially lived in Shibamata, Katsushika but would end up moving to Asaka, Saitama where at an early age she would enroll in Asaka's Shirayuri Kindergarten.[3] ; Minako Honda: As a child Kudo was very involved with singing, largely influenced by her mother who dreamed of becoming a singer. In Kudo's graduation collection from Asaka's 6th Elementary School in Aska City, she wrote that, "It would be nice if I could become an actress or singer." While at Asaka Daiichi Junior High School at the age of 14, she would audition for Star Tanjō!, where in the TV qualifying round she would sing "Hello Goodbye" by Yoshie Kashiwabara which would win her that round and advance her to the battle tournament round, for that she would sing "Blue Angel" by her cousin, Seiko Matsuda, however none of the production companies expressed interest and Kudo would not win the competition.[4] ; Minako Honda: While Kudo was enrolled at Tokyo Seitoku University Junior & Senior High School in 1983, she would visit Harajuku because the record label Bondo Kikaku was recruiting a new member for the group called Shojotai. Bondo Kikaku had also participated in the show Star Tanjō!. While still working with Bondo Kikaku in 1984, she heard a demo of Meiko Nakahara's song "Kimitachi Kiwi Papaya Mango da ne", which had just become a hit, this lead Kudo to believe Bondo Kikaku's President, Keiji Takasugi was taking the company in the wrong direction, and would make her decide to become a solo artist.[4]
knowledge1: Tim Ferguson // as a member of the Senator Online party. In the 1990 Australian federal election, Ferguson stood as an independent candidate for the seat of Kooyong, against the Leader of the Opposition, Andrew Peacock. Following a "Vote For Tim" campaign conducted by the Allstars on "The Big Gig", he gained 3.7% of the vote. Tim Ferguson Timothy Dorcen Langbene "Tim" Ferguson (born 16 November 1963) is an Australian comedian, film director, screenwriter, author and screenwriting teacher. Ferguson grew up on a rural property near the town of Perthville, New South Wales and spent three years at All Saints College, Bathurst, before [sep] knowledge2: Tim Ferguson: Timothy Dorcen Langbene Ferguson (born 16 November 1963) is an Australian comedian, film director, screenwriter, author and screenwriting teacher. ; Tim Ferguson: Timothy Dorcen Langbene Ferguson[2] grew up in Singapore, and later on a rural property near the town of Perthville, New South Wales.[3] He is the son of Tony Ferguson, who was a Vietnam War correspondent, the first reporter to release news of the Tet Offensive to the world media. Tony became executive producer of This Day Tonight and Four Corners at the Australian Broadcasting Corporation, and network liaison for the ABC's managing director, David Hill.[4] ; Tim Ferguson: Tim spent three years at All Saints College, Bathurst,[3] before moving to Canberra, where he attended the radical free-school School Without Walls and Narrabundah College.[5] ; Tim Ferguson: In 1995–96, Ferguson appeared in Funky Squad on ABC Television. ; Tim Ferguson: He hosted the Logie Award-winning series Don't Forget Your Toothbrush on the Nine Network.
knowledge1: Yuu Watase // Yuu Watase Her name is romanized as "Yû Watase" in earlier printings of Viz Media's publications of "Fushigi Yūgi", "Alice 19th", and "Ceres, Celestial Legend" while in Viz Media's "Fushigi Yūgi Genbu Kaiden" and "Absolute Boyfriend" her name is romanized as "Yuu Watase". In Chuang Yi's English-language versions of "Fushigi Yugi" (spelled without a macron or circumflex), her name is romanized as "Yu Watase". Yuu Watase is a pen name. She chose "Yuu" because she liked the name. Watase developed an interest in drawing manga at a young age. However, she did not receive any formal training until after high; Yuu Watase // some of the issues that she has faced as a manga artist. A former editor for "Arata: The Legend" continuously asked her to redraw scenes that he did not like, or understand. It got to the point that Watase was doing redraws all day and pulling late nights just to meet the next morning's deadlines. Because of the constant cycle, she began to lose her interest in working on the manga for the fans, or even the story. She was simply working to try and get it approved for the weekly publication. http://www.viz.com/shojo-beat Yuu Watase Her name is romanized as [sep] knowledge2: Yuu Watase: Yuu Watase[a] (渡瀬 悠宇, Watase Yuu, born March 5, 1970, in Kishiwada, Osaka[1]) is a Japanese manga artist. She debuted in 1989 at the age of 18 with the short story "Pajama de Ojama" (パジャマでおじゃま, "An Intrusion in Pajamas") and has since published more than 50 volumes of one-shots and long-running manga series.[2] One of her most popular titles is Fushigi Yûgi.[3] In 1998, Watase won the 43rd Shogakukan Manga Award in the shōjo (girls') category for Ceres, Celestial Legend.[4] In 2008, she began her first shōnen (boys') serialization, Arata: The Legend.[5] ; Yuu Watase: In 2019, Watase came out as X-gender, a Japanese non-binary gender identity.[6][7][8] Following the announcement, an editor for Viz Media's Shojo Beat imprint clarified that Watase's pronouns in English are still "she" and "her".[9] ; Yuu Watase: Watase developed an interest in drawing manga at a young age. However, Watase did not receive any formal training until after high school when she went to a private art school. There she was taught how to draw manga, but because her first short story, "Pajama de Ojama", had already debuted, Watase quit in the middle of it. ; Category:Yuu Watase: This category lists works by or related to Yuu Watase. ; Category:Yuu Watase: The following 13 pages are in this category, out of  13 total. This list may not reflect recent changes.
knowledge1: Jennifer Sevilla // Jennifer Sevilla Jennifer Sevilla-Go (born May 14, 1974) is an actress in movies and television shows in the Philippines. She was a former member of That's Entertainment. Jeniffer Sevilla was born on May 14, 1974 in Quezon City. She is only child. She studied Communication Arts at the University of Sto. Tomas in the Philippines. She took a break from showbiz when she married Seymour Go, a businessman, on November 11, 2007. Her first child is Simon Rafa. Sevilla started her Philippine showbiz career at age seven in a "Jack 'n Jill" snack food commercial in the early '80s. She; Jennifer Sevilla // and "Guhit Ng Palad" (1998). She did "Kung Ako Na Lang Sana" (2003) with Sharon Cuneta and Aga Muhlach under Star Cinema. She also did a film for Gawad Kalinga "Paraiso: Tatlong Kwento Ng Pag-asa" (2007) with Maricel Soriano. Jennifer Sevilla Jennifer Sevilla-Go (born May 14, 1974) is an actress in movies and television shows in the Philippines. She was a former member of That's Entertainment. Jeniffer Sevilla was born on May 14, 1974 in Quezon City. She is only child. She studied Communication Arts at the University of Sto. Tomas in the Philippines. She took a break from showbiz; Jennifer Sevilla // starred in a movie, "Kapitan Inggo" (1984), that get her nominated as Best Child Actress for the Filipino Academy of Movie Arts and Sciences Awards (aka FAMAS Award). She became a mainstay of That's Entertainment, a youth-oriented TV variety show with fellow teen actors: Vina Morales, Keempee de Leon and Ian Veneracion. During her teen years, she did more TV commercials for Colgate toothpaste and Newtex Napkins sanitary pads. Sevilla an actress for Seiko Film Productions, Inc and played the third wheel to the "Sheryl Cruz"-"Romnick Sarmenta" loveteam movies. She starred in "Puso Sa Puso" (1988), "Langit At Lupa" (1989),; Aurora Sevilla // some businesses, but her luck would soon run out. She is a single parent to Joshua and Ali. Aurora Sevilla Aurora Elvira Gayoso Sevilla is a former beauty queen and actress in the Philippines. She was crowned as Mutya Ng Pilipinas - World 1984. She also represents the Miss World 1984 pageant in London. Sevilla was also named Ms. Press Photography the year before. Just like other beauty titlists, Sevilla entered showbiz after her reign. Her beauty queen status eventually served as her ticket to show business where she appeared as a leading lady in various local action films. Sevilla [sep] knowledge2: Jennifer Sevilla: Jennifer Sevilla-Go[1][2] (born May 14, 1974) is a Filipino actress in movies and television shows. She was a former member of That's Entertainment. ; Jennifer Sevilla: Jeniffer Sevilla was born on May 14, 1974, in Quezon City. She is an only child. She studied Communication Arts at the University of Santo Tomas in the Philippines. Sevilla took a break from showbiz when she married Seymour Go, a businessman, on November 11, 2007. Her first child is Simon Rafa. Her second child is Sean Mavi. ; Jennifer Sevilla: Sevilla started her Philippine showbiz career at age seven in a Jack 'n Jill snack food commercial in the early '80s. She starred in a movie, Kapitan Inggo (1984), that get her nominated as Best Child Actress for the Filipino Academy of Movie Arts and Sciences Awards (aka FAMAS Award). She became a mainstay of That's Entertainment, a youth-oriented TV variety show with fellow teen actors: Vina Morales, Keempee de Leon and Ian Veneracion. ; Jennifer Sevilla: During her teen years, she did more TV commercials for Colgate toothpaste and Newtex Napkins sanitary pads. ; Jennifer Sevilla: Sevilla an actress for Seiko Film Productions, Inc. and played the third wheel to the  Sheryl Cruz-Romnick Sarmenta loveteam movies. She starred in Puso Sa Puso (1988), Langit At Lupa (1989), and Guhit Ng Palad (1998).
knowledge1: Hu Qili // Hu Qili Hu Qili (; born October 1929) is a former high-ranking politician of the Communist Party of China (CPC). He was a member of the Politburo Standing Committee and a member of the Secretariat between 1987 and 1989. In 1989, he was purged because of his sympathy toward the students of the 1989 Tiananmen Square protests and his support for General Secretary Zhao Ziyang. However, he was able to get back into politics in 1991. In 2001, he was named chairman of the Soong Ching-ling Foundation. Hu was born in October 1929 in Yulin, Shaanxi Province. In 1946, he; Hu Qili // Hu Qili were known in the 1980s because of the country's economic reform program champion. After Deng Xiaoping returned to government in 1978, Hu start rise rapidly. Also Hu was once seen as a potential General Secretary (party leader) canadiate. After 1987, Hu was a member of the Standing Committee of the Political Bureau of the CPC Central Committee, was purged apparently because of sympathies he held for the students carrying out the Tiananmen Square protests and opposed use of armed force to suppress those student and public peoples. Hu Qili Hu Qili (; born October 1929) is a former; Hu Qili // was the minister of the Ministry of the Machine-Building and Electronics Industry. In 1998, Hu was elected vice chairman of the Chinese People’s Political Consultative Conference. He had a mandate to restore proper political treatment of leaders of the Party and state. By convention, persons who holding positions of the Vice-Chairs of the NPC, vice chairman of the CPPCC or above are referred to " Leaders of the Party and the State " (党和国家领导人) in the official media. He was appointed the chairman of the China Soong Ching Ling Foundation in 2001, which deals with Chinese charities and welfare projects.; Hu Qili // Schools. From 1972 to 1977, he served as the deputy secretary of the Ningxia County Communist Party Committee, the deputy secretary of the Guyuan district Communist Party Committee, and the office director of the Ningxia Hui Autonomous Region Party Committee. After the Cultural Revolution, he served as the deputy president of Tsing hua University . From 1978 to 1980, Hu was a member of the Secretariat of the Communist Youth League Central Committee and was president of the All-China Youth Federation. From 1980 to 1982, he was the party secretary and the mayor of Tianjin. From 1982 to 1987, he [sep] knowledge2: Hu Qili: Hu Qili (Chinese: 胡启立; born 6 October 1929) is a former high-ranking politician of the Chinese Communist Party (CCP). He was the first-ranked secretary of the CCP Secretariat from 1985 to 1989 and a member of the CCP Politburo Standing Committee from 1987 to 1989. In 1989, he was purged for his sympathy toward the students of the 1989 Tiananmen Square protests and his support for General Secretary Zhao Ziyang. However, he was able to get back into politics in 1991. In 2001, he was named chairman of the Soong Ching-ling Foundation.[1] ; Hu Qili: Hu was born on 6 October 1929 in Yulin, Shaanxi Province. In 1946, he was admitted to Peking University to pursue a major in physics. In 1948, at the age of 19, Hu joined the CCP. When the People's Republic of China was founded in 1949, Hu changed his studies to focus on politics.[2] ; Hu Qili: From 1951 to 1956, Hu was secretary of the Communist Youth League Committee of Peking University. From 1956 to 1966, he served as the president of the All-China Students’ Federation. In 1958, Hu was granted an audience with CCP Chairman Mao Zedong.[3] ; Hu Qili: During the Cultural Revolution, Hu began to work in the lower levels of the May Seventh Cadre Schools. From 1972 to 1977, he served as the deputy secretary of the Ningxia County Communist Party Committee,[clarification needed] the deputy secretary of the Guyuan district Communist Party Committee, and the office director of the Ningxia Hui Autonomous Region Party Committee.[2] ; Hu Qili: After the Cultural Revolution, he served as the deputy president of Tsinghua University. From 1978 to 1980, Hu was a member of the Secretariat of the Communist Youth League Central Committee and was president of the All-China Youth Federation. From 1980 to 1982, he was the party secretary and the mayor of Tianjin. From 1982 to 1987, he was the director of the General Office, a member of the Secretariat, and a member of the Politburo of the CCP Central Committee. From 1985 to 1989, Hu served as the First Secretary of the CCP Secretariat. From 1987 to 1989, Hu served as a member of the Politburo Standing Committee and the Secretariat of the CCP Central Committee.[2]
knowledge1: Bhāskara I // Bhāskara I Bhāskara () (commonly called Bhaskara I to avoid confusion with the 12th-century mathematician Bhāskara II) was a 7th-century mathematician, who was the first to write numbers in the Hindu decimal system with a circle for the zero, and who gave a unique and remarkable rational approximation of the sine function in his commentary on Aryabhata's work. This commentary, "Āryabhaṭīyabhāṣya", written in 629 CE, is among the oldest known prose works in Sanskrit on mathematics and astronomy. He also wrote two astronomical works in the line of Aryabhata's school, the "Mahābhāskarīya" and the "Laghubhāskarīya". On 7 June 1979 the [sep] knowledge2: Bhāskara I: Bhāskara (c. 600 – c. 680) (commonly called Bhāskara I to avoid confusion with the 12th-century mathematician Bhāskara II) was a 7th-century Indian mathematician and astronomer who was the first to write numbers in the Hindu–Arabic decimal system with a circle for the zero, and who gave a unique and remarkable rational approximation of the sine function in his commentary on Aryabhata's work.[3] This commentary, Āryabhaṭīyabhāṣya, written in 629 CE, is among the oldest known prose works in Sanskrit on mathematics and astronomy. He also wrote two astronomical works in the line of Aryabhata's school: the Mahābhāskarīya ("Great Book of Bhāskara") and the Laghubhāskarīya ("Small Book of Bhāskara").[3][4]
knowledge1: Ramli Sarip // also starred in "Talking Cock the Movie," a Singaporean satirical film in 2002. Ramli Sarip Datuk Ramli bin Sarip (born October 15, 1952), better known by his stage name Ramli Sarip, is a Singaporean singer, songwriter, arranger and music producer. Known as "Papa Rock" and "Malaysia's King of Rock", as well as one of the founders of Singapore's rock scene, Ramli was the front man and lead singer of the Singapore-based heavy metal-rock group Sweet Charity until 1986. Most of his songs have proven to be popular and his hits have sold tens of thousands of copies. Christopher Toh of; Ramli Sarip // Ramli Sarip Datuk Ramli bin Sarip (born October 15, 1952), better known by his stage name Ramli Sarip, is a Singaporean singer, songwriter, arranger and music producer. Known as "Papa Rock" and "Malaysia's King of Rock", as well as one of the founders of Singapore's rock scene, Ramli was the front man and lead singer of the Singapore-based heavy metal-rock group Sweet Charity until 1986. Most of his songs have proven to be popular and his hits have sold tens of thousands of copies. Christopher Toh of "Today" described Ramli as "Singapore's most famous rocker around". He was conferred the; Ramli Sarip // Kuala Lumpur." He was awarded the COMPASS Artistic Excellence Award in 1998. He was also a part of Sangkakala, which was a five-man band. A 1990 Malaysian Hari Raya Puasa television special "Bersama Ramli Sarip", in which Ramli hosted, was released on the first day of the season. Three years later, Radio Televisyen Malaysia had imposed a seven-year ban on him due to him maintaining his long hair, which was a strict performing no-no from the broadcaster at the time. Ramli was a vocalist for the 2011 remake of "Home". As of 2011, Ramli has released 12 solo albums. He; Ramli Sarip // title of 'Datuk' by the Yang Dipertua Negeri of the State of Malacca in an investiture ceremony on the occasion of the latter's birthday in 2013. Established in 1964, the Singapore-based Malay rock band Sweet Charity had Ramli as its frontman and lead singer until he left in 1986. Sweet Charity was reportedly so successful in the 1970s to the 1980s that they ignited a "rock explosion" in both Singapore and Malaysia. For some time, Ramli was signed under Warner Music. Ramli is credited as the "first Malay rock singer to hold two solo concerts at the Istana Budaya in [sep] knowledge2: Ramli Sarip: Datuk Ramli Sarip (born 15 October 1952),[1] also known as "Papa Rock",[2][3] is a Singaporean musician, singer, songwriter, arranger and record producer. He is also one of the pioneers of Singapore's rock scene.[4] Ramli was the front man and lead singer of the Singapore-based heavy metal-rock group Sweet Charity until 1986.  ; Ramli Sarip: He was given the title of 'Datuk' by the Yang di-Pertua Negeri of the State of Malacca on the occasion of the latter's birthday in 2013.[5] ; Ramli Sarip: Established in 1964,[6] the Singapore-based[7] Malay rock band Sweet Charity had Ramli as its frontman and lead singer until he left in 1986.[3] Sweet Charity was reportedly so successful in the 1970s to the 1980s that they ignited a "rock explosion" in both Singapore and Malaysia.[8] ; Ramli Sarip: For some time, Ramli was signed under Warner Music.[6] Ramli is credited as the "first Malay rock singer to hold two solo concerts at the Istana Budaya in Kuala Lumpur."[6] He was awarded the COMPASS Artistic Excellence Award in 1998.[9] He formed five-piece band, Sangkakala, to serve as his backing band. [10]  A 1990 Malaysian Hari Raya Puasa television special Bersama Ramli Sarip, in which Ramli hosted, was released on the first day of the season.[10] Three years later, Radio Televisyen Malaysia had imposed a seven-year ban on him due to him maintaining his long hair, which was a strict performing no-no from the broadcaster at the time.[6] ; Ramli Sarip: Ramli was a vocalist for the 2011 remake of "Home".[11] As of 2011, Ramli has released 12 solo albums.[1] He also starred in Talking Cock the Movie,[12] a Singaporean satirical film in 2002. In 2019, after being critically criticised[13] and lambasted[14] for sung the "soulful" and "soul-stirring" version of Singapore's national anthem, he stays low profile for quite some time, whereby even Dr. Rohana Zubir (daughter of the late Zubir Said who was the original composer) came out to criticise heavily the rocker's rendition in an open letter in public, she wrote that, "Sadly, the revised rendition of 'Majulah Singapura' lacks the quality, the oomph, of a national anthem. It is rather tortuous to listen to."[15][16] She further added: "The people of Singapore are wonderfully creative but this creativity should not extend to meddling with the musical score of the country's national anthem. This is one area where there should not be change. It is also important for Singaporeans to be proud of their history and to respect individuals, such as my father, for their contribution to nation-building."
knowledge1: Antonio Leviste // Lt. Commander in the Philippine Navy Reserve Force and is the Honorary Consul General of the State of Palestine. Currently, he is the charter president of the Resort Association of the Philippines and co-founder of the Tourism Council of the Philippines. He is the chief executive officer of the Leviste Group of Companies, a real estate firm engaged in housing, subdivision, condominium and resort development. On January 14, 2009, Leviste was convicted of homicide in the killing of his longtime friend and aide Rafael de las Alas. Leviste had admitted responsibility for de las Alas' death, claiming he only fired; Antonio Leviste // Antonio Leviste José Antonio "Tony" C. Leviste (born January 14, 1940) is a Filipino politician, who served as Governor of Batangas from 1972 to 1980. Born to a distinguished Batangueño family renowned in both business and politics, he was married to Senator Loren Legarda, separating from her before the 2004 election campaign. The be-medalled Asian Games equestrienne Toni Leviste is his daughter from a previous marriage. Leviste was sentenced to six years in prison for the murder of his long-time aide, Rafael de las Alas. Leviste served his sentence at the National Bilibid Prison in Muntinlupa and on December 6,; Antonio Leviste // coveted "Ten Outstanding Young Men of the Philippines" (TOYM) award for Public Administration. He was chosen the "Realtor of the Year" by the Business Writers Association of the Philippines and served as the director in various government agencies, including the People's Homesite and Housing Corporation (now the NHA), Philippine Ports Authority, Philippine Aerospace Development Corporation, Semirara Mining Corporation and the Philippine Tourism Authority. He was co-founder of the Pasay Board of Realtors and the Philippine Association of Real Estate Boards. He also served as Chairman of the Philippine Leisure and Retirement Authority (now the PRA). He holds the rank of; Antonio Leviste // in self-defence. The Makati City Regional Trial Court sentenced him to six to twelve years in prison. Leviste is now serving his sentence at the National Bilibid Prison in Muntinlupa. On December 6, 2013, Leviste was released after six years in prison after his parole has been granted. Antonio Leviste José Antonio "Tony" C. Leviste (born January 14, 1940) is a Filipino politician, who served as Governor of Batangas from 1972 to 1980. Born to a distinguished Batangueño family renowned in both business and politics, he was married to Senator Loren Legarda, separating from her before the 2004 election campaign. [sep] knowledge2: Antonio Leviste: Jose Antonio "Tony" Casals Leviste (born January 16, 1940) is a Filipino politician and businessman, who served as Governor of Batangas from 1972 to 1980. Born to a distinguished Batangueño family renowned in both business and politics, he was married to Senator Loren Legarda, separated from her before the 2004 election campaign. The be-medalled Asian Games equestrienne Toni Leviste is his daughter from a previous marriage. ; Antonio Leviste: Leviste was sentenced to six years in prison for the murder of his long-time aide, Rafael de las Alas. Leviste served his sentence at the National Bilibid Prison in Muntinlupa and on December 6, 2013, he was released after his parole was granted. ; Antonio Leviste: Leviste graduated from the Lyceum of the Philippines in 1959 and became the president of the Student Varsitarian, a reputable campus organization for students hails from different provinces. During his term as Governor of Batangas, he was elected member of the Batasang Bayan chairman of the Regional Development Council, Vice President of the League of Governors and City Mayors, and chairman of the Program for Forest Ecosystem management. ; Antonio Leviste: Leviste was an advocate of the environment. He initiated a forest ecosystem management program which today continues to be a model in reforestation that made him earn the coveted "Ten Outstanding Young Men of the Philippines" (TOYM) award for Public Administration. ; Antonio Leviste: Leviste was chosen the "Realtor of the Year" by the Business Writers Association of the Philippines and served as the director in various government agencies, including the People's Homesite and Housing Corporation (now the NHA), Philippine Ports Authority, Philippine Aerospace Development Corporation, Semirara Mining Corporation and the Philippine Tourism Authority. He was co-founder of the Pasay Board of Realtors and the Philippine Association of Real Estate Boards. He also served as Chairman of the Philippine Leisure and Retirement Authority (now the PRA). He holds the rank of Lt. Commander in the Philippine Navy Reserve Force and is the Honorary Consul General of the State of Palestine.
knowledge1: Sam Michael (footballer) // Thea Michael in 2013. ! scope="row" style="text-align:center" | 2013 ! scope="row" style="text-align:center" | 2014 ! scope="row" style="text-align:center" | 2016 ! colspan=3| Career ! 5 ! 0 ! 0 ! 15 ! 18 ! 33 ! 13 ! 12 ! 37 ! 0.0 ! 0.0 ! 3.0 ! 3.6 ! 6.6 ! 2.6 ! 2.4 ! 7.4 Sam Michael (footballer) Sam Michael (born 5 July 1993) is a former professional Australian rules footballer who played for the Brisbane Lions and Essendon Football Club in the Australian Football League (AFL). He was recruited by the Brisbane Lions as a Queensland zone selection; Sam Michael (footballer) // Sam Michael (footballer) Sam Michael (born 5 July 1993) is a former professional Australian rules footballer who played for the Brisbane Lions and Essendon Football Club in the Australian Football League (AFL). He was recruited by the Brisbane Lions as a Queensland zone selection from the Redland Australian Football Club in the North East Australian Football League (NEAFL) with the 96th selection in the 2012 Rookie Draft. In 2012, Michael won the Andrew Ireland Medal, for best on ground on the North East Australian Football League (NEAFL) inter-conference Grand Final. He made his AFL debut against Carlton in round 9; Sam Michael // Sam Michael Samuel David "Sam" Michael (born 29 April 1971) is an Australian motor sports engineer and designer, who held senior positions with Formula One constructors Williams and McLaren. He is currently employed by Supercar team Triple Eight Race Engineering. Michael was born in Western Australia and grew up in Canberra. After a brief stint working on Neal Bates' Toyota Celica GT-Four rally car, Michael studied mechanical engineering at the University of New South Wales with a thesis on data acquisition systems for racing cars. During his studies, Greg Siddle employed Michael on a part-time basis working on Mark Larkham's; Sam Michael // following a series of failures during pitstops, during the introduction of new equipment and procedures. Martin Whitmarsh defended Michael's position, and shortly afterwards the changes began to pay off. At the end of 2014 Michael returned to Australia, after resigning from McLaren earlier that year. In mid-2016, Michael joined the Australian Institute for Motor Sport Safety board focusing on safety in motor sport. In late 2016, Michael took on a part-time mentoring role with Triple Eight Race Engineering after Ludo Lacroix moved to DJR Team Penske. Sam Michael Samuel David "Sam" Michael (born 29 April 1971) is an Australian motor; Sam Michael (footballer) // of the 2013 AFL season after being upgraded from the rookie list to replace the injured Claye Beams. In February 2015, Michael was given a short-term contract by Essendon to play in the 2015 NAB Challenge as a "top-up" player, due to 26 Essendon players withdrawing from the NAB Challenge because of the ongoing supplements controversy. In February 2016, he signed a one-year contract with the club as a top-up player for the 2016 season. Sam was born in Brisbane, Australia, and moved to Cairns soon after. He played junior AFL with the Cairns Hawks AFC. Michael married long-time girlfriend [sep] knowledge2: Sam Michael: Samuel David Michael (born 29 April 1971) is an Australian motor sports engineer and designer, who held senior positions with Formula One constructors Williams and McLaren. He is currently employed by Supercar team Triple Eight Race Engineering. ; Sam Michael: Michael was born in Western Australia and grew up in Canberra.[1] After a brief stint working on Neal Bates' Toyota Celica GT-Four rally car, Michael studied mechanical engineering at the University of New South Wales with a thesis on data acquisition systems for racing cars. During his studies, Greg Siddle employed Michael on a part-time basis working on Mark Larkham's Formula Holden, so that Michael could continue his studies.[2][3] ; Sam Michael: Michael was recruited by UK-based Lotus in 1993. After Team Lotus went bankrupt in 1994 Gary Anderson, the chief designer at Jordan Grand Prix, took Michael on to establish the team's research and development department. Michael spent two years working in the Jordan factory on data acquisition, and installed a seven-post rig for simulating suspension movement and designing an active differential.[2] ; Sam Michael: In 1997, Michael joined the Jordan test team. In 1998 he was promoted to race engineer for Ralf Schumacher. When the German departed to go to Williams in 1999, Michael inherited Heinz-Harald Frentzen. His partnership with Frentzen was successful, resulting in a win at the French Grand Prix at Circuit de Nevers Magny-Cours, and then again at the Italian Grand Prix at Monza.[1] ; Sam Michael: In 2001, Sir Frank Williams brought Michael to Williams as Senior Operations Engineer. He took over the responsibility of managing the engineers at races and tests. In May 2004, Michael was promoted to Technical Director of Williams, leaving Patrick Head to focus on engineering strategy.[2]
knowledge1: Robert Jennings (rugby league) // Robert Jennings (rugby league) Robert Jennings (born 2 January 1996) is an Australian professional rugby league footballer who last played for the South Sydney Rabbitohs in the National Rugby League. He plays as a and on the . He previously played for the Penrith Panthers. Born in Blacktown, New South Wales, Jennings played his junior football for the Western City Tigers and Minchinbury Jets, before being signed by the Penrith Panthers. Jennings is the younger brother of current Parramatta Eels players Michael Jennings and George Jennings. In 2014, Jennings played for the Penrith Panthers' NYC team. In November and December; Robert Jennings (rugby league) // Eagles at ANZ Stadium. In round 14 he scored 4 tries in the Rabbitohs 42-24 smashing of the Parramatta Eels at ANZ Stadium. Robert Jennings (rugby league) Robert Jennings (born 2 January 1996) is an Australian professional rugby league footballer who last played for the South Sydney Rabbitohs in the National Rugby League. He plays as a and on the . He previously played for the Penrith Panthers. Born in Blacktown, New South Wales, Jennings played his junior football for the Western City Tigers and Minchinbury Jets, before being signed by the Penrith Panthers. Jennings is the younger brother of; Robert Jennings (rugby league) // game time in the 2016 NRL season, Jennings signed a 1-year contract with the South Sydney Rabbitohs starting in 2017. In September, he was named at centre in the 2016 NYC Team of the Year. Jennings was named in the Rabbitohs squad for the 2017 NRL Auckland Nines. He made his Rabbitohs debut against the Manly Warringah Sea Eagles in round 2, scoring a try and setting one up for team mate Robbie Farah. In round 3 of the 2018 NRL season, Jennings scored his first hatrick try for the Rabbitohs in the 34-6 win over the Manly Warringah Sea [sep] knowledge2: Robert Jennings (rugby league): Robert Jennings (born 2 January 1996) is a Tongan international rugby league footballer who plays as a winger and centre for the Dolphins in the National Rugby League (NRL). ; Robert Jennings (rugby league): He previously played for the Penrith Panthers, the Wests Tigers and the South Sydney Rabbitohs in the NRL. ; Robert Jennings (rugby league): Jennings was born in Blacktown, New South Wales, Australia to Tongan-born parents. He is also of Fijian and English descent. Jennings is the younger brother of former Parramatta Eels player Michael Jennings and Melbourne Storm player George Jennings,[2] and nephew of 1960s All Black Arthur Jennings. ; Robert Jennings (rugby league): He played his junior football for the Western City Tigers and Minchinbury Jets, before being signed by the Penrith Panthers. ; Robert Jennings (rugby league): In 2014, Jennings played for the Penrith Panthers' NYC team.[3] In November and December 2014, he played for the Australian Schoolboys.[4] In 2015, he moved on to the Panthers' New South Wales Cup team.[5]
knowledge1: Hoshiar Singh Dahiya // Hoshiar Singh Dahiya Brigadier Hoshiar Singh Dahiya, PVC (5 May 1937 – 6 December 1998) an officer of the Indian Army who was awarded India's highest military honor, the Param Vir Chakra during Indo-Pakistani war of 1971. He served in the Indian Army with dedication, retiring as a Brigadier. He was born in Sisana village, Sonipat district, Haryana to Choudhary Hira Singh. After his schooling and one year's study at the Jat College, Rohtak, he joined the Army. He was commissioned in The Grenadiers Regiment of the Indian Army on 30 June 1963. His first posting was in NEFA. In; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya // stand fast and fight as a result his company repulsed all the attacks inflicting heavy casualties on the Pakistani army. Though seriously wounded, Major Hoshiar Singh refused to be evacuated till ceasefire. Throughout this operation, Major Hoshiar Singh displayed most conspicuous gallantry, indomitable fighting spirit and leadership in the highest traditions of the Army. He was awarded the Param Vir Chakra for his bravery and leadership. He was also Mentioned-in-Despatches. The Param Vir Chakra citation on the Official Indian Army Website reads as follows: Mohanlal reprised Major Hoshiar Singh's character as Major Sahadevan in the 2017 Malayalam film, . Hoshiar; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya // the 1965 Indo-Pakistan war, he saw some action in the Rajasthan sector. During the Indo-Pakistani war of 1971, the 3rd Grenadiers was given the task of establishing a bridgehead across the Basantar River in the Shakargarh Sector from 15–17 December 1971. The river was covered with deep minefields on both sides and protected by well-fortified defence by the Pakistani army. Major Hoshiar Singh, commander 'C' Company, was ordered to capture the Pakistani locality of Jarpal. The Pakistani Army reacted and put in sharp counterattacks. Major Hoshiar Singh went from trench to trench, motivating his command and encouraging his men to [sep] knowledge2: Hoshiar Singh Dahiya: Colonel Hoshiar Singh Dahiya, PVC (5 May 1930 – 6 December 1998) was an Indian military officer and a recipient of India's highest military honour, the Param Vir Chakra, for his gallantry during the Indo-Pakistani war of 1971. ; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya: Hoshiar Singh Dahiya  was born in Sisana village, Sonipat district, Haryana to Choudhary Hira Singh in a Jat family. After his schooling and one year's study at the Jat College, Rohtak, he joined the Army.[6] He was married to Dhano Devi, who is still alive as of December 2021.[7] He was commissioned in The Grenadiers Regiment of the Indian Army on 30 June 1963,[6][5] and was promoted lieutenant on 30 June 1965.[8] ; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya: His first posting was in NEFA.[citation needed] In the 1965 Indo-Pakistan war, he saw some action in the Rajasthan sector,[9] for which he was mentioned in despatches.[10] He was promoted to captain on 30 June 1969. ; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya: MAJOR HOSHIAR SINGH ; Hoshiar Singh Dahiya: On 15 December 1971 a battalion of the Grenadiers was given the task of establishing a bridgehead across the Basantar river in the Shakargarh Sector. Major Hoshiar Singh was commanding the left forward company and he was ordered to capture the enemy locality of Jarpal. This was a well-fortified position and was held in strength by the enemy. During the assault, his company came under intense shelling and effective crossfire from enemy medium machine guns. Undeterred, he led the charge and captured the objective after a fierce hand-to hand fight. The enemy reacted and put in three counter attacks on 16 December 1971, two of them supported by armour, Major Hoshiar Singh unmindful of the heavy shelling and tank fire went from trench to trench, motivating his command and encouraging his men to stand fast and fight. Inspired by his courage and dauntless leadership, his company repulsed all the attacks inflicting heavy casualties on the enemy. Again, on 17 December 1971 the enemy made another attack with a battalion supported by heavy artillery fire. Though seriously wounded by enemy shelling, Major Hoshiar Singh again went from trench to trench moving about in the open with utter disregard to his personal safety when an enemy shell landed near the medium machine gun post injuring the crew and rendering it inoperative. Major Hoshiar Singh, realizing the importance of machine-gun fire, immediately rushed to the machine-gun pit and though seriously wounded himself, manned the gun inflicting heavy casualties on the enemy. The attack was successfully repulsed and the enemy retreated leaving behind 85 dead including their Commanding Officer and three other officers. Though seriously wounded, Major Hoshiar Singh refused to be evacuated till the ceasefire.
knowledge1: Dewi Sartika // Dewi Sartika Dewi Sartika (4 December 188411 September 1947) was a campaigner for and pioneer of education for women in Indonesia. She founded the first school for women in the Dutch East Indies. She was honoured as a National Hero of Indonesia in 1966. Dewi Sartika was born to Sundanese noble parents, R. Rangga Somanegara and R. A. Rajapermas in Cicalengka, on 4 December 1884. As a child, after school she often pretended to be a teacher while playing with her friends. After her father died, she lived with her uncle. She received an education in Sundanese culture while under; Dewi Sartika // its name to Sekolah Raden Dewi. She died on 11 September 1947 at Cineam, Tasikmalaya while she was evacuating from Bandung due to independence war. Her name Dewi Sartika is known as the street that was the place of her school. She was awarded the Order of Orange-Nassau at the 35th anniversary of Sekolah Kaoetamaan Isteri as a tribute to her service in education. On 1 December 1966, she received Heroine of the National Movement title. In 1906, she married Raden Kanduruhan Agah Suriawinata, a teacher at Sekolah Karang Pamulang. Dewi Sartika Dewi Sartika (4 December 188411 September 1947) was [sep] knowledge2: Dewi Sartika: Dewi Sartika (4 December 1884 – 11 September 1947) was an advocate for and pioneer of education for women in Indonesia. She founded the first school for women in the Dutch East Indies. She was honoured as a National Hero of Indonesia in 1966. ; Dewi Sartika: Dewi Sartika [1] was born to Sundanese noble parents, R. Rangga Somanegara and R. A. Rajapermas in Cicalengka, in Cicalengka on 4 December 1884.[2][3] As a child, after school she often pretended to be a teacher while playing with her friends.[2][4] After her father died, she lived with her uncle. She received an education in Sundanese culture while under his care, while her knowledge of Western culture was passed on to her from the wife of a resident assistant.[5] In 1899, she moved to Bandung.[4] ; Dewi Sartika: On 16 January 1904, she founded a school named Sakola Istri at Bandung Regency's Pendopo which later was relocated to Jalan Ciguriang and the school name changed to Sekolah Kaoetamaan Isteri (Wife Eminency School) in 1910.[6][7] In 1912, there were nine Sekolah Kaoetamaan Isteri in cities or regencies in West Java (half of the cities and regencies), and in 1920 all of cities and regencies had one school.[5] In September 1929, this school changed its name to Sekolah Raden Dewi.[5] ; Dewi Sartika: She died on 11 September 1947 at Cineam, Tasikmalaya while she was evacuating from Bandung due to the independence war.[5][8] ; Dewi Sartika: Her name Dewi Sartika is known as the street that was the place of her school, as well as used in various cities in Indonesia.[2][9][10] She was awarded the Order of Orange-Nassau at the 35th anniversary of Sekolah Kaoetamaan Isteri as a tribute to her service in education.[5][8] On 1 December 1966, she received Heroine of the National Movement title.[7][8]
knowledge1: Chris John (boxer) // boxer, John is also a member of the national wushu team. His successful achievements as a wushu athlete include: Chris John (boxer) Yohannes Christian "Chris" John (born 14 September 1979) is an Indonesian former professional boxer and world champion, who competed from 1998 to 2013. He held the WBA (Super) featherweight title from 2004 to 2013, with his near decade-long reign being the second longest in the division's history (after Johnny Kilbane) and his eighteen successful title defenses the second most at featherweight (after Eusebio Pedroza). John is the fourth Indonesian boxer to win a world title, following Ellyas Pical,; Chris John (boxer) // Chris John (boxer) Yohannes Christian "Chris" John (born 14 September 1979) is an Indonesian former professional boxer and world champion, who competed from 1998 to 2013. He held the WBA (Super) featherweight title from 2004 to 2013, with his near decade-long reign being the second longest in the division's history (after Johnny Kilbane) and his eighteen successful title defenses the second most at featherweight (after Eusebio Pedroza). John is the fourth Indonesian boxer to win a world title, following Ellyas Pical, Nico Thomas, and Muhammad Rachman. In 2013, John announced his retirement from boxing, following his only career defeat to; Chris John (boxer) // 2013 at the Indoor Tennis Stadium, Jakarta, Indonesia, John suffered severe bleeding from his temple and forehead due to the headbutt which happened in round 3 of 12. The fight was declared as a technical draw, and John retained his title for the 18th time. John lost the WBA Super World featherweight title to Simpiwe Vetyeka on December 6, 2013, when John retired on his stool after the sixth of twelve rounds. Vetyeka's IBO featherweight title was also on the line. It was John's first professional loss and brought his ten-year WBA title reign to an end. After this loss,; Chris John (boxer) // Simpiwe Vetyeka. Chris John was born as "Yohannes Christian John" in Banjarnegara, 14 September 1979, he is the second son of four siblings of Johan Tjahjadi (aka Tjia Foek Sem) and Maria Warsini. Boxing has been a part of John's life since his childhood. John's father was a former amateur boxer in Indonesia. He introduced boxing to his sons, John and his younger brother Adrian, at an early age of 5. John's Father inspired him by regaling with stories of hard fought battles and triumphant victories. Given the choice to fight or pursue other sports, John chose boxing and became; Chris John (boxer) // John rose when he knocked out the national featherweight Champion in a 12 rounds bout, Muhammad Afaridzi. John was knocked down twice in round one, but he managed to reverse the situation by knocking Alfaridzi in round 12. According to Chris John, his nose was bleeding profusely resulting from a broken nose that occurred in the 1st round. Following the win over Dae-Kyun Park, Chris captured the PABA Featherweight title from the. John was given the opportunity to fight hard-hitting Oscar León of Colombia for the WBA featherweight title on 26 September 2003 in Bali. john was The Ring's #8-ranked [sep] knowledge2: Chris John (boxer): Yohannes Christian "Chris" John (born 14 September 1979) is an Indonesian former professional boxer who competed from 1998 to 2013. He held the WBA (Super) featherweight title from 2004 to 2013, with his near decade-long reign being the second longest in the division's history (after Johnny Kilbane). During his reign, John defended the title against 16 boxers, the second most in featherweight history (after Eusebio Pedroza). ; Chris John (boxer): Chris "The Dragon" John is the fourth Indonesian boxer to win a world title, following Ellyas Pical, Nico Thomas and Muhammad Rachman. In 2013, John announced his retirement from boxing, following his only career defeat to Simpiwe Vetyeka.[1] ; Chris John (boxer): Chris John was born as Yohannes Christian John in Banjarnegara, on 14 September 1979. He is the second son of four siblings of Johan Tjahjadi (real name: Tjia Foek Sem) who is of Chinese descent and Maria Warsini. Boxing has been a part of John's life since his childhood. John's father was a former amateur boxer in Indonesia. He introduced boxing to his sons, John and his younger brother Adrian, at an early age of 5. John's Father inspired him by regaling with stories of hard fought battles and triumphant victories. Given the choice to fight or pursue other sports, John chose boxing and became an amateur champion in Banjarnegara.[2] ; Chris John (boxer): In 1997, Chris caught the attention of renowned boxing trainer, Sutan Rambing. Sutan recruited John into his gym and relocated John to Semarang, a city in Central Java. Sutan served as John's trainer till 2004 and soon after parted ways when John won his first major world title.[2] ; Chris John (boxer): John turned professional in 1997 and was known as "Thin Man" before he proclaimed his new nickname "The Dragon" that he now uses. In his first professional fight, John won by knockout, beating a local fighter Word Kanda. In his 6th bout, the reputation of Chris John rose when he knocked out the national featherweight Champion in a 12 rounds bout, Muhammad Afaridzi. John was knocked down twice in round one, but he managed to reverse the situation by knocking Alfaridzi in round 12. According to Chris John, his nose was bleeding profusely resulting from a broken nose that occurred in the 1st round.[2]
knowledge1: Rana Sanaullah Khan // Provincial Assembly of the Punjab from PP-70 (Faisalabad-XX) as a candidate of (PML-N) in Pakistani general election, 2002. In 2003, he was abducted by alleged intelligence agency Inter-Services Intelligence (ISI) and was badly tortured for speaking against military regime. When freed, he was subsequently shifted to DHQ hospital. He was re-elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab from PP-70 (Faisalabad-XX) as a candidate of (PML-N) in Pakistani general election, 2008. He was re-elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab from PP-70 (Faisalabad-XX) as a candidate of (PML-N) in Pakistani general election, 2013. He was elected to the National; Rana Sanaullah Khan // Assembly of Pakistan from NA-106 (Faisalabad-VI) as a candidate of (PML-N) in Pakistani general election, 2018. In August 2011, he accused American Warren Weinstein of being an American spy although Weinstein had lived in Pakistan for seven years and there was no evidence that he was a spy. Weinstein went missing a week later and was accidentally killed in a January 2015 US drone strike on the Afghanistan-Pakistan border, as announced by U.S. President Barack Obama at a White House press conference on April 23, 2015..<He is not muslim> On 17 June 2014, Punjab Police raided the Minhaj-ul-Quran International's lahore [sep] knowledge2: Rana Sanaullah: Rana Sanaullah Khan (Punjabi, Urdu: رانا ثناء اللہ; born 1 January 1955) is a Pakistani politician[2] who served as the 39th Interior Minister of Pakistan. He had been a member of the National Assembly of Pakistan from August 2018 till August 2023. He is a senior member of PML-N and the President of PML-N in Punjab province[3] since 4 May 2019. Before getting elected to the National Assembly of Pakistan, Sanaullah had been elected to the Provincial Assembly of Punjab five times and had served in high-ranking ministries of the province. ; Rana Sanaullah: Previously, he has served as the Law and Parliamentary Affairs Minister of Punjab from 2008 to 2018, Local Governments and Community Development Minister of Punjab from 2008 to 2014, Revenue Minister of Punjab from 2008 to 2013, Public Prosecution Minister of Punjab from 2008 to 2013, and the Deputy Leader of the Opposition (Punjab) from 1990 to 1993 and again from 2002 to 2007. ; Rana Sanaullah: Rana Sanaullah was born on 1 January 1955 in Faisalabad, Punjab, to Sher Muhammad Khan into a Punjabi Rajput family, and is a practicing lawyer, holding a bachelor's degree in commerce from Government College, Faisalabad and an LLB  from Punjab Law College, Lahore.[4] ; Rana Sanaullah: He's a cousin of former Chief Justice of Pakistan Iftikhar Muhammad Chaudhry.[1] ; Rana Sanaullah: Rana Sanaullah was elected to the Provincial Assembly of the Punjab as a candidate of Pakistan Peoples Party (PPP) in 1990 Pakistani general election.
knowledge1: Thomas Jack (athlete) // Thomas Jack (athlete) Thomas Jack (5 February 1881 – 9 October 1961) was a British track and field athlete. Thomas Jack's introduction to athletics came through racing his brothers on the family farm near the small village of Bellsquarry, to the west of Edinburgh. On the track, he won the Scottish 4 miles title twice (1908, 1912), the 10 miles seven times (1904, 1906–10, 1912), and in 1908 he finished third in the AAA 10 miles. He was twice Scottish cross-country champion (1907, 1912) and ran in the International Championship five times (1907–10, 1912). In the 1908 Olympic marathon his; Thomas Jack // Thomas Jack Tom Jack Johnston, (better known by his stage name Thomas Jack) is an Australian DJ, record producer and musician. He is noted for the "tropical house" subgenre, and first coined the term in 2013. Johnston grew up on a dairy farm in a small rural town in New South Wales before moving to Sydney to enroll in a music production school. Speaking in an interview, he said "I grew up on this massive dairy farm with 2,000 to 3,000 cows, and we would milk them every morning and afternoon. That's what I did growing up, pretty much everything; Thomas Jack (athlete) // early pace was faster than his winning time in the Scottish AAA 4 miles and he dropped out after 5 miles. A graduate of the University of Edinburgh, he was later Headmaster of Castle Hill School and served as President of the Scottish AAA in 1912. Personal Bests: Thomas Jack (athlete) Thomas Jack (5 February 1881 – 9 October 1961) was a British track and field athlete. Thomas Jack's introduction to athletics came through racing his brothers on the family farm near the small village of Bellsquarry, to the west of Edinburgh. On the track, he won the Scottish 4; Thomas Jack // know? It needs to be taken to the next level". Thomas Jack Tom Jack Johnston, (better known by his stage name Thomas Jack) is an Australian DJ, record producer and musician. He is noted for the "tropical house" subgenre, and first coined the term in 2013. Johnston grew up on a dairy farm in a small rural town in New South Wales before moving to Sydney to enroll in a music production school. Speaking in an interview, he said "I grew up on this massive dairy farm with 2,000 to 3,000 cows, and we would milk them every morning and [sep] knowledge2: Thomas Jack: Tom Jack Johnston, (better known by his stage name Thomas Jack) is an Australian DJ, record producer and musician.[1] He is noted for the "tropical house" subgenre, and first coined the term in 2013.[2][3] ; Thomas Jack: Johnston grew up on a dairy farm in a small rural town in New South Wales before moving to Sydney to enroll in a music production school.[4] Speaking in an interview, he said "I grew up on this massive dairy farm with 2,000 to 3,000 cows, and we would milk them every morning and afternoon. That's what I did growing up, pretty much everything to being a farmer. After that, I ended up moving to Sydney to go to school."[4] ; Thomas Jack: Using the PlayStation game eJay he became involved in the production of dance music.[4] He said "I kept learning and started DJing and I always really enjoyed it. You always have that dream of thinking, that'd be so cool if I could do this for a living and you can never expect what's going to happen to you".[4] Johnston eventually moved to Ableton after his father gifted him the software.[5] He previously used a number of stage names while growing up such as Dirty-D, Bassics, Tommy and Tom Foolery but they were never used professionally.[4] ; Thomas Jack: Johnston refers to his summery, laid-back dance tracks as tropical house. Inspired by deep house as well as acoustic rock and jam bands, his tracks heavily feature live instruments, particularly saxophone, flute, piano, and guitar, and generally have a relaxed, sunny, uplifting feel. His tracks often feature samples of speeches.[1] Speaking about his involvement in the genre, Johnston said "I just wanna be Thomas Jack and do my thing. I fear that, in a year, I'm gonna be jammed in this corner. And everyone's gonna know me as just that".[6] ; Thomas Jack: Johnston began a podcast mix series called Tropical House, which featured guest mixes by Felix Jaehn, Bakermat, Robin Schulz, and others. He became well known across EDM websites for his original tracks such as "Symphony" and "The Final Speech" as well as his remixes of popular artists such as Of Monsters & Men and OneRepublic and house producers like Adrian Lux.[1]
knowledge1: Jamie Cripps // Jamie Cripps Jamie Cripps (born 23 April 1992) is an Australian rules footballer who plays for the West Coast Eagles in the Australian Football League (AFL). Cripps is a cousin of two other AFL players, Patrick Cripps (Carlton) and Chris Mainwaring (West Coast; deceased). Originally from Northampton, Western Australia, Cripps played his junior football for Western Australian Football League team East Fremantle Football Club, making his senior debut in 2009, before playing another six games in 2010 and representing Western Australia at the 2010 AFL Under 18 Championships. Cripps was recruited to AFL club with the 24th selection in the; Jamie Cripps // 2010 AFL Draft. Shortly after being drafted, Cripps was admitted to hospital suffering from a diabetes-related illness. It was reported that St Kilda were unaware that Cripps was diabetic before they drafted him. Cripps made his AFL debut as the substitute player in St Kilda's Round 6 match against at AAMI Stadium. He performed well, scoring two goals with his first two kicks of the game. At the end of the 2012 season, he was traded to the West Coast Eagles along with draft pick 46 in exchange for draft picks 41 and 44. Jamie Cripps Jamie Cripps (born 23 [sep] knowledge2: Jamie Cripps: Jamie Cripps (born 23 April 1992) is an Australian rules footballer who plays for the West Coast Eagles in the Australian Football League (AFL). Cripps is a cousin of two other AFL players, Patrick Cripps (Carlton) and Chris Mainwaring (West Coast).[1] ; Jamie Cripps: Originally from Northampton, Western Australia, Cripps participated in the Auskick program at Northampton[2] and played his junior football for Western Australian Football League team East Fremantle Football Club, making his senior debut in 2009, before playing another six games in 2010[3] and representing Western Australia at the 2010 AFL Under 18 Championships.[4] ; Jamie Cripps: Cripps was recruited to AFL club St Kilda with the 24th selection in the 2010 AFL Draft. Shortly after being drafted, Cripps was admitted to hospital suffering from a diabetes-related illness. It was reported that St Kilda were unaware that Cripps was diabetic before they drafted him.[5] ; Jamie Cripps: Cripps made his AFL debut as the substitute player in St Kilda's Round 6 match against Adelaide at AAMI Stadium.  He performed well, scoring two goals with his first two kicks of the game.[6] ; Jamie Cripps: At the end of the 2012 season, he was traded to the West Coast Eagles along with draft pick 46 in exchange for draft picks 41 and 44.
knowledge1: Fumiko Kaneko // Fumiko Kaneko Fumiko Kaneko was born in the Kotobuki district of Yokohama during the Meiji period in Japan. Her parents were Fumikazu Saeki, a man from a samurai family, and Kikuno Kaneko, the daughter of a peasant, and because they were not officially married, Fumiko could not be registered as a Saeki. She remained unregistered until she was 8 years old, at which point she was registered as her mother’s sister, a fairly common practice for children born out of wedlock. Kaneko recalls that the first few years of her life were fairly happy, as her father was employed as; Fumiko Kaneko // wages in order to pay her enrollment fees at two different co-ed schools, and started to take classes in mathematics and English. Her job introduced her to a number of groups, most notably the Christian Salvation Army and members of the socialist movement who advocated their philosophies on the street. However, the job was difficult, her employer exploited his workers and was immoral in his personal life, and she hardly had any time to keep up with her school work, so she eventually quit. She then briefly maintained a relationship with the Salvation Army group, but she was not compelled; Fumiko Kaneko // means of one’s own will and this leads to the destruction of one’s body, this is not a negation of life. It is an affirmation.” The anarchist cause that she eventually followed was supported ideologically by her rejection of nationalism and the idea of the emperor, as well as a pessimistic belief about the nature of revolutions. In her testimony at her trial, she explained that she and Pak “thought of throwing a bomb [at the emperor] to show he too will die like any other human being,” and rejected “the concepts of loyalty to the emperor and love of; Fumiko Kaneko // was sent back to her maternal family in Japan, presumably because she was of marriageable age and her grandmother and aunt did not want to have to arrange a match for her. She stayed with her maternal grandparents again and began to form a strong relationship with her Uncle Motoei, who, because of the way she was registered, was officially her brother. By this time, she had reconnected with her birth father, living with him for short periods of time, and he attempted to arrange a marriage between Fumiko and Motoei. The arrangement fell through, because Motoei discovered that Fumiko; Fumiko Kaneko // to anarchism and nihilism, began in 1922, when she met Hatsuyo Niiyama at her night school classes. In her memoirs, Fumiko calls Hatsuyo her “closest friend,” and mentions that she introduced her to foundational nihilist thinkers like Max Stirner, Mikhail Artsybashev, and Friedrich Nietzsche. Around this time, Fumiko was also introduced to a Korean activist named Pak Yol, who shared many of her ideas, and when she finally abandoned the socialist movement, she worked with Pak to attempt to accomplish her vision. Together, Fumiko and Pak published two magazines which highlighted the problems Koreans faced under Japanese imperialism (though they [sep] knowledge2: Kaneko Fumiko: Kaneko Fumiko (金子 文子, Kaneko Fumiko, January 25, 1903 – July 23, 1926[1]) or rarely Pak Fumiko and Pak Munja (Korean: 박문자; Hanja: 朴文子), was a Japanese anarchist and nihilist. She was convicted of plotting to assassinate members of the Japanese Imperial family. ; Kaneko Fumiko: Kaneko Fumiko was born in the Kotobuki district of Yokohama during the Meiji period in Japan. Her parents were Fumikazu Saeki, a man from a samurai family, and Kikuno Kaneko, the daughter of a peasant. Because they were not officially married, Kaneko could not be registered as a Saeki. She remained unregistered until she was 8 years old, at which point she was registered as her mother's sister, a fairly common practice for children born out of wedlock. Kaneko recalls that the first few years of her life were fairly happy, as her father was employed as a detective at a police office and cared for his family, though they were fairly poor. However, Fumikazu left his job at the police station, and the family moved around a considerable amount over the next few years. Fumikazu was also increasingly drawn to gambling and drinking, and began to abuse Kikuno, and became involved with other women, including Kikuno's sister Takano. Eventually, Fumikazu left Kikuno and married Takano.[2] ; Kaneko Fumiko: During this time, Kaneko was first confronted with the problems of being an unregistered child. Her circumstances made her "invisible to educational authorities," and she was not technically allowed to attend school.[3] Some schools eventually permitted her to attend classes, but she was not called in attendance, did not receive report cards, and was ineligible to receive the official certificate of graduation at the end of a class year. Despite these difficulties, including frequent gaps in her attendance, she did very well in school.[4] After Kaneko's father left, her mother was involved with several other men, but none of these relationships led to better living circumstances and they were nearly always extremely impoverished. Kikuno even considered selling Kaneko to a brothel, claiming that it would be a better life for her, but she abandoned this plan when it turned out that Kaneko would be sent far away to another region of Japan.[5] After several years of these difficult circumstances, Kaneko lived briefly with her maternal grandparents while her mother remarried again. In 1912, her father's mother, Mutsu Sakei-Iwashita, came to visit, and it was agreed that Kaneko would go back with her to her home in Korea, where she would be adopted by her aunt, who was childless. Before leaving Japan, Kaneko was finally registered as the daughter of her maternal grandparents.[6] ; Kaneko Fumiko: Shortly after her arrival in Korea, it became clear that Kaneko would not be adopted or provided with the higher level of living that she expected. For the first year or so, they kept up the pretense of including her in their family by allowing her to use the name Iwashita, but after that she was called Kaneko. Her grandmother introduced her to visitors as a child she had taken in out of pity from some people she barely knew and her grandmother and aunt treated her like a maid. It appears that they did initially intend to adopt her, but, at least from Kaneko's perspective, they decided quickly that she was too poorly brought up and unrefined to be their family heir.[7] ; Kaneko Fumiko: The only advantage she had was finally being able to attend school regularly, and even her education was limited because her relatives refused to let her read anything besides her required work for school.[8] She was initially promised a high level of education that would eventually lead her to college, but they only allowed her to continue her schooling through the lower primary and higher primary grades and did not attempt to enroll her in a high school. After she finished school, she had to spend all her time working in the house, and she cites this period as the worst of her time in Korea.[9]
knowledge1: G. Venugopal // G. Venugopal G Venugopal (born 10 December 1960) is an Indian playback singer known for his work in Malayalam films. He started his singing career in the film "Odaruthammaava Aalariyaam"(1984). Since then he has sung in more than 300 films; and has over 500 private albums to his credit. The many awards he has won include the coveted Best Playback Singer (Kerala State) which he won thrice, the Film Critics award and the Kerala Kaumudi Gallop Poll award (twice). He won The Kerala State award for Best Playback singer (2004) third time for the song "aadedee..aadaadedee" from the film "Ullam".Venugopal; G. Venugopal // maternal aunts of G Venugopal. Noted singers Sujatha Mohan & Radhika Thilak are his cousins. Venugopals formal schooling commenced from Carmel School, Trivandrum where he studied till his fourth standard. He later moved to Thycaud Model School from where he completed his tenth standard. In 1978, he completed his Pre University from Arts College Trivandrum. Nursing dreams of becoming a doctor, he joined for BSC Zoology at Trivandrum University College. From the first year onwards University festivals became an addiction to him. From 1980 to 1985 he was the undisputed winner in light music competition in university festivals. It was; G. Venugopal // drive under the banner ‘Clean Kerala’. Kerala State Film Awards: Kerala Film Critics Award Kerala State Government Award (Professional Drama): Asianet Film Awards: Kerala Kaumadi Gallup Poll Award: Academic G. Venugopal G Venugopal (born 10 December 1960) is an Indian playback singer known for his work in Malayalam films. He started his singing career in the film "Odaruthammaava Aalariyaam"(1984). Since then he has sung in more than 300 films; and has over 500 private albums to his credit. The many awards he has won include the coveted Best Playback Singer (Kerala State) which he won thrice, the Film Critics award; G. Venugopal // has composed two songs, one for the album-‘Mizhiyariyathe’. His mentors and teachers include Shri Cherthala Gopalan Nair, Shri Mangad Natesan, Shri B Sashikumar, Sreemathy Palkulangara Ambikadevi, Shri Perumbavoor Raveendranath, and Shri V Subramanyam. Popular musician M G Radhakrishnan was influential in shaping his career. G Venugopal was born in Thattathumala, Kilimanoor. Venugopal is the eldest of the two children of Shri Gopinathan Nair who hails from Thattathumala and Sreemathi Sarojini, his mother who retired as the head of the dept of music, Govt Women's College, Trivandrum. K Sharadamani and K Radhamani who were popularly known as Paravur sisters are the [sep] knowledge2: G. Venugopal: Gopinathan Nair Venugopal (born 10 December 1960), popularly known as G. Venugopal, is an Indian playback singer known for his works in Malayalam films. He started his singing career in the film Odaruthammava Aalariyam (1984).[1][2] Since then he has sung in more than 4000 films; and has over 500 private albums to his credit.[3] ; G. Venugopal: Venugopal was born in Thattathumala, near Kilimanoor. Venugopal is the eldest of the two children of Gopinathan Nair, who hails from Thattathumala and Sarojini, who was the head of the department of music, Government College for Women, Thiruvananthapuram. K. Sharadamani and K. Radhamani, who were popularly known as Parur sisters, are the maternal aunts of Venugopal.[4] Singers Sujatha Mohan and Radhika Thilak are his cousins and Shweta Mohan is his niece.[5] ; G. Venugopal: Venugopal married Reshmi on 8 April 1990 and they have two children, Arvind and Anupallavi. Arvind is also a playback singer.[6] ;  G. Venugopal : G Venugopal (born 10 December 1960) is an Indian playback singer known for his work in Malayalam films. He started his singing career in the film "Odaruthammaava Aalariyaam"(1984). Since then he has sung in more than 300 films; and has over 500 private albums to his credit.;  G. Venugopal : His mentors and teachers include Shri Cherthala Gopalan Nair, Shri Mangad Natesan, Shri B Sashikumar, Sreemathy Palkulangara Ambikadevi, Shri Perumbavoor Raveendranath, and Shri V Subramanyam. Popular musician M G Radhakrishnan was influential in shaping his career.
knowledge1: Pogo (musician) // Pogo (musician) Christopher Nicholas "Nick" Bertke (born 26 July 1988), better known by his stage name Pogo, is a South African-born, Australian electronic music artist whose work consists of recording small sounds, quotes, and melodies from films, TV programmes or other sources, and sequencing the sounds together to form a new piece of music. A number of Pogo's works consist almost entirely of the sounds he samples, with few or no additional music or sound samples. Nick Bertke, under his band name Pogo, has produced tracks using samples from films and TV shows such as "Pulp Fiction". He has also; Pogo (musician) // "homophobic rhetoric" to the 2015 video, which he similarly tried to explain as a social experiment. Writing for The Verge, Megan Farokhmanesh saw this explanation as a transparent attempt at plausible deniability. As a result of this video coming to light, Disney removed Bertke's songs from a restaurant playlist at its California Adventure location due to pressure from fans. Pogo (musician) Christopher Nicholas "Nick" Bertke (born 26 July 1988), better known by his stage name Pogo, is a South African-born, Australian electronic music artist whose work consists of recording small sounds, quotes, and melodies from films, TV programmes or other [sep] knowledge2: Pogo (musician): Christopher Nicholas "Nick" Bertke (born 26 July 1988), better known by his stage name Pogo, which is symbolized by an icon of a rabbit, is a South African-born[4] Australian electronic musician. Much of his work consists of recording small sounds, quotes, and melodies from films, TV programmes or other sources, and sequencing the sounds together to form a new piece of music (a genre also known as plunderphonics). A number of Pogo's works consist almost entirely of the sounds he samples, with few or no additional music or sound samples.[5] ; Pogo (musician): Pogo has produced tracks using samples from films and TV shows such as Pulp Fiction.[1] He has also sampled from other sources, such as field recordings for his project Remix the World. Remix the World was an ambitious project, consisting of all original content. Bertke shot real-world footage and then used those sounds and images to capture the essence of the places he visited. The Real World Remix was shot in Kenya, South Africa, Bhutan, and Perth (AU).[6] ; Pogo (musician): Bertke is best known for his use of video sampling to produce music videos, which he uploads on the video-sharing website YouTube.[7] As of October 2017, his most popular YouTube video is Alice, made of samples of Disney's animated film Alice in Wonderland, with more than 30 million views.[7] In 2010, his music video Gardyn, created from footage of his mother working in her garden, was juried along with 24 other YouTube videos for an exhibition at the Guggenheim Museum in New York City.[8] On 29 September 2016, Pogo released a song called "Trumpular" on SoundCloud which consisted of quotes from Republican nominee, and later President, Donald Trump.[9] Later, in 2019, he made a music video called "Homarge", based on The Simpsons (mostly from the episode "Simpson and Delilah"), which gained over a million views. On August 27, 2021, Pogo released a remix called "Strangerous", taking voices and sounds from Stranger Things, which has become Pogo's second most viewed on SoundCloud, and on November 5, 2021, he released "Cabin Fever", which samples Muppet Treasure Island. ; Pogo (musician): Pogo's music is used on the conservative YouTube talk show Louder with Crowder, hosted by Steven Crowder, and is used as bumper music to transition in and out of commercial breaks.[10] ; Pogo (musician): In January 2020, Pogo's YouTube channel was hacked and hijacked by an unknown user, who renamed the channel "Ethereum 2.0 Foundation" and deleted all the videos on the channel. The hacker then started a scam livestream promoting Ethereum cryptocurrency, and claiming that any amount of crypto sent to them during the stream would be multiplied and sent back. Pogo took to Twitter to let fans know that he was aware of the hack and has contacted YouTube for help.[13] The hacked channel was terminated by YouTube on January 17,[14] and Pogo remained without a channel for four days while fans created accounts hosting temporary re-uploads of his videos and music. On January 22, YouTube restored the account, including his view counts, subscribers, and comments sections.[15]
knowledge1: Brianna Keilar // Brianna Keilar Brianna Marie Keilar (born September 21, 1980) is the senior political correspondent and anchor for CNN in the Washington, D.C. bureau. She previously worked as a White House correspondent, Congressional correspondent and general assignment correspondent for CNN in Washington. Prior to that, Keilar worked at CNN Newsource as a national correspondent, also in Washington. She began hosting "CNN Right Now with Brianna Keilar", which airs at 1:00 PM ET, on November 12, 2018. Keilar was born in Canberra, ACT, Australia. Her father Glenn is Australian, and her mother Miriam was American. The Keilars were stationed in Australia at; Brianna Keilar // on June 8, 2018. Brianna Keilar Brianna Marie Keilar (born September 21, 1980) is the senior political correspondent and anchor for CNN in the Washington, D.C. bureau. She previously worked as a White House correspondent, Congressional correspondent and general assignment correspondent for CNN in Washington. Prior to that, Keilar worked at CNN Newsource as a national correspondent, also in Washington. She began hosting "CNN Right Now with Brianna Keilar", which airs at 1:00 PM ET, on November 12, 2018. Keilar was born in Canberra, ACT, Australia. Her father Glenn is Australian, and her mother Miriam was American. The Keilars were; Brianna Keilar // the time of Brianna's birth. In 1982, Keilar and her family moved to the United States and settled in Orange County, California. Keilar graduated from Mission Viejo High School in 1998, where she was voted homecoming queen in her senior year. Keilar graduated in 2001 from the University of California, Berkeley, where she was admitted into the Phi Beta Kappa Society. She received her dual bachelor's degrees in Mass Communications and Psychology in 2001. Keilar joined CNN as a correspondent for CNN Newsource, providing breaking news coverage and reports from the nation’s capital for approximately 800 CNN Newsource partner stations.; Brianna Keilar // Virginia Tech massacre, where she was the first CNN correspondent on the ground. In 2013, she spoke at the commencement ceremony for her alma mater. Keilar married Dave French on May 2, 2009. They later divorced. Keilar's mother died on May 17, 2016. In July 2016, Keilar announced that she was engaged to Fernando Lujan, a director on the National Security Council at the White House. During CNN's New Year's Eve special on December 31, 2016, Brooke Baldwin announced that Keilar and Lujan had married the previous evening in Las Vegas. She gave birth to a baby boy named Antonio; Brianna Keilar // She had joined Newsource from CBS News, where she served as an anchor, reporter and producer for a CBS newscast that aired on mtvU, MTV's college network. She was also a fill-in anchor on CBS News’ overnight newscast, Up to the Minute, and a freelance reporter for CBS Evening News Weekend Edition. While covering Congress, Keilar earned the 2009 National Press Foundation Everett McKinley Dirksen Award for Distinguished Reporting of Congress for her fall 2008 coverage of the $700 billion bank bailout. As a general assignment correspondent for the network, she covered a wide range of stories, including the 2007 [sep] knowledge2: Brianna Keilar: Brianna Marie Keilar (born September 21, 1980) is an American journalist who currently serves as a co-anchor of the afternoon edition of CNN News Central.[1] She previously worked as a White House correspondent, senior political correspondent, Congressional correspondent and general assignment correspondent for CNN in Washington. Prior to that, Keilar worked at CNN Newsource as a national correspondent, also in Washington. Before joining New Day, she was the host of CNN Right Now with Brianna Keilar.[2] ; Brianna Keilar: Keilar was born in Canberra, Australian Capital Territory, Australia. Her father Glenn is Australian, and her mother Miriam was American. The Keilars were stationed in Australia at the time of Brianna's birth.[3] In 1982, Keilar and her family moved to the United States and settled in Orange County, California. Keilar graduated from Mission Viejo High School in 1998, where she was voted homecoming queen in her senior year. Keilar then attended the University of California, Berkeley, from which she graduated in 2001 with dual bachelor's degrees in mass communications and psychology.[4] ; Brianna Keilar: Keilar began her on-air career in Yakima, Washington, at the CBS affiliate KIMA. She also co-hosted the morning drivetime show Billy, Blue and Brianna, too: The Morning Zoo on contemporary hits station, KFFM.[5] She then moved to CBS News, where she served as an anchor, reporter and producer for a CBS newscast that aired on MTVU, MTV's college network. She was also a fill-in anchor on the CBS News overnight newscast, Up to the Minute, and a freelance reporter for the weekend edition of CBS Evening News. ; Brianna Keilar: From CBS, Keilar joined CNN as a correspondent for CNN Newsource, providing breaking news coverage and reports from the nation’s capital for approximately 800 CNN Newsource partner stations. As a general assignment correspondent for the network, she covered a wide range of stories, including the 2007 Virginia Tech massacre, where she was the first CNN correspondent at the scene.[6] ; Brianna Keilar: While covering Congress, Keilar earned the 2009 National Press Foundation Everett McKinley Dirksen Award for Distinguished Reporting of Congress for her fall 2008 coverage of the $700 billion bank bailout.[7] While covering the Obama White House, Keilar earned the White House Correspondents' Association's 2014 Aldo Beckman Memorial Award for her coverage of the rollout of Obamacare.[8]
knowledge1: Kerwin Bell // Kerwin Bell Kerwin Douglas Bell (born June 15, 1965) is an American football coach and former player who is currently the head football coach of the Valdosta State Blazers of Valdosta State University. Bell was a professional quarterback in the National Football League (NFL), World League of American Football (WLAF) and the Canadian Football League (CFL) for fourteen seasons in the 1980s, 1990s and early 2000s. Though he started dozens of games in the WLAF and the CFL, he never started an NFL contest and threw only five regular season passes in his NFL career. However, he completed all five; Kerwin Bell // January 2016, Bell was named the new head coach of the Blazers of Valdosta State University, a scholarship football program that competes in NCAA Division II. In 2018, Bell led the Blazers to an undefeated regular season in which they scored the most points in NCAA Division II history. In December 2018, the Blazers capped a perfect 14-0 season by winning the Division II national championship. Kerwin Bell Kerwin Douglas Bell (born June 15, 1965) is an American football coach and former player who is currently the head football coach of the Valdosta State Blazers of Valdosta State University. Bell; Kerwin Bell // season and the NCAA Division II national championship in 2018. Bell was born in Live Oak, Florida in 1965. He attended Lafayette County High School in Mayo, where he was the star quarterback and earned the nickname "The throwin' Mayoan." Despite some high school success, Bell was lightly recruited with few scholarship offers. Instead of attending a smaller school, he decided to walk-on at the University of Florida in nearby Gainesville and join the Florida Gators football team without an athletic scholarship. He was eighth on the Gators' quarterback depth chart during his freshman season of 1983 under head coach [sep] knowledge2: Kerwin Bell: Kerwin Douglas Bell (born June 15, 1965) is an American football coach and former player who has been the head coach of the Western Carolina Catamounts football team since 2021. Bell was born in the rural North Central Florida town of Live Oak and was a star high school football quarterback at Lafayette County High School. Though he led the Lafayette Hornets to their only state championship, he did not attract the attention of top college football programs while playing at the small high school. He enrolled at the University of Florida, made the football team as a walk-on, and was redshirted during his freshman season of 1983. ; Kerwin Bell: Injuries to more experienced players just before the 1984 season pushed Bell into a starting role for the Gators' season opening game against the defending national champion Miami Hurricanes in what was one of the first prime time college football broadcasts on ESPN. He played well in his first collegiate appearance, throwing a go-ahead touchdown pass with under a minute remaining. Though Miami responded and scored the winning touchdown with seven seconds left, Bell's performance under difficult circumstances cemented his position as the team's starting quarterback. Even as head coach Charley Pell was fired mid-season due to NCAA rules violations, Bell and interim coach Galen Hall led the Gators to a conference-best 9–1–1 record, and he was named the Southeastern Conference (SEC) player of the year. Bell played at Florida for four seasons and was named to several more All-SEC and All-American lists before graduating in 1987.[1] ; Kerwin Bell: After college, Bell played professionally in the National Football League (NFL), World League of American Football (WLAF) and the Canadian Football League (CFL) for fourteen seasons in the 1980s, 1990s and early 2000s. Though he started dozens of games in the WLAF and the CFL, he never started an NFL contest and threw only five regular season passes in his NFL career. However, he completed all five of those passes for 75 yards and a touchdown, leaving him with the highest career passer rating in league history, albeit in a very small sample size.[2] ; Kerwin Bell: Bell became the head football coach at Western Carolina in 2021. The Catamounts had not won more than three games for several seasons until Bell led them to their first winning record in six years in 2022. ; Kerwin Bell: Bell was born in Live Oak, Florida in North Central Florida to Doyle and Zelda Bell and grew up in nearby Mayo, Florida, population 800.[6][7] His parents were tobacco farmers, and Kerwin helped with various farming tasks throughout his youth.[8] Bell attended Lafayette County High School, where he was the president of the student council and a multi-sport athlete, playing shortstop on the baseball team, leading the basketball team in scoring as a starting guard, and starting at quarterback on the football team.[6] In 1981, he led the Lafayette Hornets to their only state football championship, earning the nickname "The Throwin' Mayoan."[9][10]
knowledge1: Tom Coburn // Tom Coburn Thomas Allen Coburn (born March 14, 1948) is an American politician and physician. A member of the Republican Party, he was the junior United States Senator from Oklahoma. Coburn was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives in 1994 as part of the Republican Revolution. He upheld his campaign pledge to serve no more than three consecutive terms and did not run for re-election in 2000. In 2004, he returned to political life with a successful run for the U.S. Senate. Coburn was re-elected to a second term in 2010 and pledged not to seek a third term; Tom Coburn // and the Florida Gators, Coburn made a bet over the outcome of the game with Florida Senator Bill Nelson—the loser had to serenade the winner with a song. The Gators defeated the Sooners and Coburn sang Elton John's "Rocket Man" to Nelson, who had once flown into space. Tom Coburn Thomas Allen Coburn (born March 14, 1948) is an American politician and physician. A member of the Republican Party, he was the junior United States Senator from Oklahoma. Coburn was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives in 1994 as part of the Republican Revolution. He upheld his campaign pledge; Tom Coburn // in 2016. In January 2014, Coburn announced he would retire before the expiration of his final term. He submitted a letter of resignation to Oklahoma Governor Mary Fallin, effective at the end of the 113th Congress. Coburn is a fiscal and social conservative, known for his self-proclaimed global warming denial, opposition to deficit spending and pork barrel projects, and for his opposition to abortion. Described as "the godfather of the modern conservative, austerity movement", he supports term limits, gun rights and the death penalty and opposes same-sex marriage and embryonic stem cell research. Democrats have referred to him as "Dr. [sep] knowledge2: Tom Coburn: Thomas Allen Coburn (March 14, 1948 – March 28, 2020) was an American politician and physician who served as a United States senator from Oklahoma from 2005 to 2015. A Republican, Coburn previously served as a United States representative from 1995 to 2001. ; Tom Coburn: Coburn was an obstetrician who operated a private medical practice in Muskogee, Oklahoma. He was elected to the United States House of Representatives in 1994 as part of the Republican Revolution. After being re-elected twice, Coburn upheld his campaign pledge to serve no more than three consecutive terms and did not seek re-election in 2000. In 2004, he returned to political life with a successful run for the United States Senate. Coburn was re-elected to a second Senate term in 2010 and kept his pledge not to seek a third term in 2016.[1] In January 2014, Coburn announced that he would resign before the expiration of his final term due to a recurrence of prostate cancer.[2] He submitted a letter of resignation to Oklahoma Governor Mary Fallin, effective at the end of the 113th Congress.[3] ; Tom Coburn: Coburn was a fiscal and social conservative known for his opposition to deficit spending, pork barrel projects,[4][5][6] and abortion. Described as "the godfather of the modern conservative austerity movement",[7] he supported term limits, gun rights and the death penalty,[8] and opposed same-sex marriage and embryonic stem cell research.[9][10] Many Democrats referred to him as "Dr. No" due to his frequent use of technicalities to block federal spending bills.[11][12] ; Tom Coburn: Coburn was born in Casper, Wyoming, the son of Anita Joy (née Allen) and Orin Wesley Coburn.[18] Coburn's father was an optician and founder of Coburn Optical Industries, and a named donor to O. W. Coburn School of Law at Oral Roberts University.[19] ; Tom Coburn: Coburn graduated with a B.S. in accounting from Oklahoma State University,[20] where he was also a member of Sigma Nu fraternity. In 1968, he married Carolyn Denton,[20] the 1967 Miss Oklahoma;[21] their three daughters are Callie,[22] Katie and Sarah, a leading operatic soprano.[23] One of the top ten seniors in the School of Business, Coburn served as president of the College of Business Student Council.[24]
knowledge1: Kari Matchett // Kari Matchett Kari Matchett (born March 25, 1970) is a Canadian actress. She has appeared in films such as "Apartment Hunting" (2000), "Angel Eyes" (2001), "Men with Brooms" (2002), "Cypher" (2002), "Civic Duty" (2006), "The Tree of Life" (2011), and "Maudie" (2016). She is perhaps best known for her roles as Joan Campbell on "Covert Affairs" and as Kate Filmore in the science fiction movie "". Matchett was born in Spalding, Saskatchewan. She attended high school at Lethbridge Collegiate Institute in Lethbridge, Alberta. She attended the National Theatre School in Montreal and the Moscow Theatre School. Matchett performed on stage; Kari Matchett // the USA Network series "Covert Affairs" (2010–2014). In 2016, Matchett appeared as Sandra in "Maudie" with Ethan Hawke. Matchett also played a supporting role in Terrence Malick's "The Tree of Life", with Sean Penn and Brad Pitt. Shot in 2008, the film premiered in competition at the Cannes Film Festival in May 2011 and received the Palme d'Or. Kari Matchett Kari Matchett (born March 25, 1970) is a Canadian actress. She has appeared in films such as "Apartment Hunting" (2000), "Angel Eyes" (2001), "Men with Brooms" (2002), "Cypher" (2002), "Civic Duty" (2006), "The Tree of Life" (2011), and "Maudie" (2016).; Kari Matchett // for three years at the Stratford Shakespeare Festival in Ontario. In Canada, her first major role was on "The Rez," and her first starring role was as Colleen Blessed in "Power Play" (1998–2000). Matchett was a cast member on the A&E Network TV series "A Nero Wolfe Mystery" (2001–2002), with Timothy Hutton in which she played several characters, including a recurring role as Lily Rowan. On "Wonderfalls", she played Beth, the bisexual love interest of the main character's lesbian sister. In 2002, she played Kate Filmore in the science fiction horror thriller "". In 2003, she starred with Timothy Hutton; Kari Matchett // in the Syfy miniseries "Five Days to Midnight". Her next role was as Detective Elaine Bender in "Blue Murder" in 2004. She previously guest starred on "Blue Murder" in 2001 as a suspect in a murder investigation, for which she won a Gemini Award. In 2005, Matchett starred in the ABC series "Invasion", about aliens taking the form of humans. She also appeared in "". She also appeared as Mary Tate on "Studio 60 on the Sunset Strip". She appeared in both "Shark" and "Wild Card". She played a single mother stalked by her boyfriend in "Intimate Stranger", in 2006.; Kari Matchett // In the same year she starred with Peter Krause in "Civic Duty". In 2007, she joined the cast of "24", as . In June 2007, Matchett played Kate Armstrong in the TNT series "Heartland". In 2007 and 2008, Matchett was cast as ER chief Skye Wexler on "ER". In 2008 and 2009, she played Dennis Hopper's character's daughter, Jules, in the critically acclaimed Starz series "Crash". She had a recurring role in the TNT series "Leverage", reuniting with "Nero Wolfe" co-star Timothy Hutton, portraying Maggie Collins, the ex-wife of Hutton's character, Nathan "Nate" Ford. Matchett starred as Joan Campbell in [sep] knowledge2: Kari Matchett: Kari Matchett is a Canadian actress.[1] She is known for her roles as Colleen Blessed on Power Play, Joan Campbell on Covert Affairs, Kate Filmore in the science fiction movie Cube 2: Hypercube, and U.S. president Michelle Travers on The Night Agent. She has also appeared in films such as Apartment Hunting (2000), Angel Eyes (2001), Men with Brooms (2002), Cypher (2002), Civic Duty (2006), The Tree of Life (2011), and Maudie (2016). ; Kari Matchett: Matchett was born in Spalding, Saskatchewan.[2] She attended high school at Lethbridge Collegiate Institute in Lethbridge, Alberta. She attended the National Theatre School in Montreal and the Moscow Theatre School.[3] ; Kari Matchett: Matchett performed on stage for three years at the Stratford Shakespeare Festival in Ontario.[4] ; Kari Matchett: In Canada, her first major role was on The Rez, and her first starring role was as Colleen Blessed in Power Play (1998–2000).[3] Matchett was a cast member on the A&E Network TV series A Nero Wolfe Mystery[5] (2001–2002), with Timothy Hutton in which she played several characters, including a recurring role as Lily Rowan. On Wonderfalls, she played Beth, the bisexual love interest of the main character's lesbian sister. ; Kari Matchett: In 2001, she played Candace in the drama film Angel Eyes.[6] In 2002, she played Kate Filmore in the science fiction horror thriller Cube 2: Hypercube.[7]
knowledge1: Clancy Brown // Clancy Brown Clarence J. Brown III (born January 5, 1959) is an American actor and voice actor known for his roles as the Kurgan in the fantasy film "Highlander" (1986), Captain Byron Hadley in the prison drama film "The Shawshank Redemption" (1994), Charles Zim in the sci-fi film "Starship Troopers" (1997), David Hennessy in "Vendetta" (1999), and Brother Justin Crowe in the television series "Carnivàle" (2003–2005). He has also provided his voice to films, television series and video games, including Mr. Krabs in "SpongeBob SquarePants" (1999–present), Lex Luthor in various media, Doctor Neo Cortex in the "Crash Bandicoot" video games; Clancy Brown // Punisher" he plays Major Schoonover, Frank Castle's former commanding officer. In "", he voices the fire demon Surtur. Brown has been married to Jeanne Johnson since 1993; they have a son, James Johnson-Brown, and a daughter. Clancy Brown Clarence J. Brown III (born January 5, 1959) is an American actor and voice actor known for his roles as the Kurgan in the fantasy film "Highlander" (1986), Captain Byron Hadley in the prison drama film "The Shawshank Redemption" (1994), Charles Zim in the sci-fi film "Starship Troopers" (1997), David Hennessy in "Vendetta" (1999), and Brother Justin Crowe in the television series; Clancy Brown // played a role of a band manager in "Thunder Alley" (1985), vicious killer Steve in "Shoot to Kill" (1988), the police officer in Michael Jackson's short movie "Speed Demon" (1988), "Dead Man Walking", Sheriff Gus Gilbert in "Pet Sematary Two", Sergeant Zim in "Starship Troopers" (a role he would reprise in the animated series ""), and Captain William Hadley in "The Guardian". He also played a role in "Flubber" as one of the evil henchmen that get harmed by uncontrollably bouncing sports equipment. In 1989, he appeared in the action thriller "Blue Steel". Brown has played prison officers in three [sep] knowledge2: Clancy Brown: His film roles include Viking Lofgren in Bad Boys (1983), Rawhide in The Adventures of Buckaroo Banzai Across the 8th Dimension (1984), The Kurgan in Highlander (1986), Sheriff Gus Gilbert in Pet Sematary Two (1992), Capt. Byron Hadley in The Shawshank Redemption (1994), Sgt. Charles Zim in Starship Troopers (1997), Stanley Thomas in Promising Young Woman (2020), and The Harbinger in John Wick: Chapter 4 (2023). On television, he has played Brother Justin Crowe on the HBO series Carnivàle (2003–2005), Waylon "Jock" Jeffcoat on the Showtime series Billions (2018–2019, 2023), and Kurt Caldwell on the Showtime series Dexter: New Blood (2021–2022). ; Clancy Brown: Clancy Brown was born on January 5, 1959,[1] in Urbana, Ohio,[2] and had an older sister, Beth, who died in 1964. Their mother, Joyce Helen (née Eldridge), was a conductor, composer and concert pianist. His father, Clarence J. "Bud" Brown Jr. (1927–2022),[3] was a newspaper publisher who helped manage the Brown Publishing Company, the family-owned newspaper business started by Clancy's grandfather, Congressman Clarence J. Brown. From 1965 to 1983, Bud Brown also served as a congressman, in the same seat as his own father, and later as Chairman of the Board of Brown Publishing.[4] The family continued to operate the business until 2010. ; Clancy Brown: Brown graduated from St. Albans School in Washington, D.C., and Northwestern University.[5] At St. Albans, Brown performed the role of Deputy Governor Thomas Danforth in The Crucible.[6] Brown has been married to Jeanne Johnson since 1993.[7] They have a son and a daughter.[7] Brown is a member of the Sigma Chi Fraternity. ; Clancy Brown: In Brown's first mainstream movie, he was cast as Viking Lofgren alongside Sean Penn in the 1983 crime drama Bad Boys. Brown is known for his role as the Kurgan in the 1986 film Highlander, his role as Captain Byron Hadley in The Shawshank Redemption, Rawhide in The Adventures of Buckaroo Banzai Across the 8th Dimension (1984), Frankenstein's monster in The Bride (1985), Army mercenary Larry McRose in Extreme Prejudice, the role of a band manager in Thunder Alley (1985), vicious killer Steve in Shoot to Kill (1988), the police officer in Michael Jackson's short movie Speed Demon (1988), Dead Man Walking, Sheriff Gus Gilbert in Pet Sematary Two, Sergeant Zim in Starship Troopers (a role he would reprise in the animated series Roughnecks: Starship Troopers Chronicles), and Captain William Hadley in The Guardian. He also played a role in Flubber as one of the evil henchmen that get harmed by uncontrollably bouncing sports equipment. In 1989, he appeared in the action thriller Blue Steel. ; Clancy Brown: He starred in several independent films in 2008: The Burrowers, screened at the Toronto International Film Festival in 2008, and released in the United States on DVD in April 2009, and The Twenty. He appeared in Steven Soderbergh's 2009 film The Informant! opposite Matt Damon in which he played an attorney. He also portrayed Alan Smith in Samuel Bayer's 2010 remake of the horror film A Nightmare on Elm Street.[8] In 2011, he appeared in Cowboys & Aliens (directed by Jon Favreau) with Daniel Craig, Harrison Ford and Olivia Wilde. He was cast as the voice of The Goon in the animated feature film. He also starred as Albert Marconi in the film adaptation of the David Wong novel John Dies at the End, directed by Don Coscarelli.[9]
knowledge1: Gary Woodland // Gary Woodland Gary Woodland (born May 21, 1984) is an American professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour. Woodland was born in Topeka, Kansas, the son of Dan and Linda Woodland. He attended Shawnee Heights High School in the suburb of Tecumseh. After high school, he attended Washburn University on a basketball scholarship, but left after his freshman year to attend the University of Kansas on a golf scholarship. He studied Sociology while at KU. Woodland had a successful collegiate golf career, winning four tournaments before turning professional in 2007. After turning professional, Woodland played in a handful of; Gary Woodland // of 39th. In November 2011, he won the Omega Mission Hills World Cup with Matt Kuchar. He finished 2011 ranked 17th on the PGA Tour money list and 51st in the OWGR. He had ended 2009 ranked 959th and 2010 588th. Woodland reached the final of the 2015 WGC-Cadillac Match Play, where he lost to Rory McIlroy, and moved to a career-best 32nd in the OWGR. In February 2018, Woodland won his third PGA Tour event, at the Waste Management Phoenix Open in a sudden-death playoff over Chez Reavie. After finishing tied at 18 under, Woodland won with a par; Gary Woodland // Modified Stableford scoring." PGA Tour playoff record (1–2) CUT = missed the half-way cut WD = withdrew "T" indicates a tie for a place "Results not in chronological order prior to 2015." QF, R16, R32, R64 = Round in which player lost in match play<br> "T" = Tied<br> Professional Gary Woodland Gary Woodland (born May 21, 1984) is an American professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour. Woodland was born in Topeka, Kansas, the son of Dan and Linda Woodland. He attended Shawnee Heights High School in the suburb of Tecumseh. After high school, he attended Washburn University on [sep] knowledge2: Gary Woodland: Gary Lynn Woodland[2] (born May 21, 1984) is an American professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour. He won the U.S. Open in 2019, his first major championship and sixth professional victory.  Following a successful college career, he turned professional in 2007 and briefly competed on the Nationwide Tour. ; Gary Woodland: Woodland was born in Topeka, Kansas, the son of Dan and Linda Woodland.[3] He attended Shawnee Heights High School in the suburb of Tecumseh.[4] After high school, he attended Washburn University in Topeka on a basketball scholarship, but left after his freshman year to attend the University of Kansas in Lawrence on a golf scholarship.[5] He studied sociology while at KU. Woodland had a successful college golf career, winning four tournaments before turning professional in 2007. ; Gary Woodland: Woodland's second tournament of 2011 was the Bob Hope Classic, where he and Jhonattan Vegas finished tied for first place at 27-under-par; Vegas edged out Woodland in a playoff for the title.[8] This was his first top-10 finish on either of the two main tours. ; Gary Woodland: In March 2011, Woodland won his first PGA Tour title at the Transitions Championship by one stroke when fellow American Webb Simpson missed a par putt on the final hole. Just a few moments earlier Woodland had scrambled a fantastic par from the same position as Simpson on the last, after hitting his second shot over the back of the green. This win secured Woodland a place at the 2011 Masters Tournament and also elevated him to what was then a career high 53rd in the Official World Golf Ranking.[9] He later earned an invitation into the U.S. Open after moving into the Top 50. He left the tournament with an OWGR ranking of 39th. In November 2011, he won the Omega Mission Hills World Cup with Matt Kuchar. He finished 2011 ranked 17th on the PGA Tour money list and 51st in the OWGR. He had ended 2009 ranked 962 and 2010 591.[10] ; Gary Woodland: Woodland reached the final of the 2015 WGC-Cadillac Match Play, where he lost to Rory McIlroy, and moved to a career-best 32nd in the OWGR.
knowledge1: Bif Naked // Bif Naked Beth Torbert (born June 15, 1971) is an Indo-Canadian singer-songwriter, actress, and motivational speaker best known by her stage name Bif Naked. Bif Naked was born in New Delhi to teenage parents attending private school. She was subsequently adopted by American missionaries. She spent part of her childhood in Lexington, Kentucky, where her father was a professor at the University of Kentucky. She went to Kelsey Elementary School in The Pas, Manitoba for a couple of years. After living for a time in Dauphin, Manitoba, her family eventually settled in Winnipeg. She graduated from John Taylor Collegiate and; Bif Naked // studied theatre at the University of Winnipeg. The name "Bif" started as a nickname based on the mispronunciation of her real name, Beth. Bif Naked released a self-titled solo album, "Bif Naked", in 1996, and "I Bificus" in 1998. In 1999 she toured across Canada, including a performance in Toronto with Birth Through Knowledge. Another solo album, "Purge" was released in 2001. She also released a spoken word album called "Okenspay Ordway: Things I Forgot To Tell Mommy". In 2005, after narrowing it down from over fifty songs, she released "Superbeautifulmonster", which featured thirteen tracks. "The Promise", which was recorded; Bif Naked // solidarity with the people of Iran. They performed the song "Someday" written and produced by Peter Karroll. Bif Naked Beth Torbert (born June 15, 1971) is an Indo-Canadian singer-songwriter, actress, and motivational speaker best known by her stage name Bif Naked. Bif Naked was born in New Delhi to teenage parents attending private school. She was subsequently adopted by American missionaries. She spent part of her childhood in Lexington, Kentucky, where her father was a professor at the University of Kentucky. She went to Kelsey Elementary School in The Pas, Manitoba for a couple of years. After living for a; Bif Naked // has toured Europe, the United States, and Canada as a headlining act, and has performed on bills with: Snoop Dogg, Billy Idol, Dido, Devin Townsend, Sarah McLachlan, Sheryl Crow, Chrissie Hynde, Foo Fighters, The Cult Prodigy, Smashing Pumpkins, Ministry, Green Day, and many more. Bif's music has been featured in and on soundtracks for shows including "Buffy the Vampire Slayer", "Charmed", "Moonlight", "", "Ready To Rumble", "The West Wing" and "Celebrity Deathmatch". She recorded a rendition of the Christmas classic, "I Saw Mommy Kissing Santa Claus" for MTV's "Total Request Live" CD "" in 1999 and was also featured on; Bif Naked // she recorded a duet with Vancouver-based yogi and Nettwerk recording artist Will Blunderfield for the international version of his album "Hallelujah". Bif Naked has also appeared in music videos for other artists including: The Offspring's "The Kids Aren't Alright", "Believe Me" and "Silver" by Moist and Liveonrelease's "Get with It." In 2009, she appeared in the video for Simple Plan's "Save You" near the end along with other people (such as Sharon Osbourne and René Angélil) who have survived or have been treated for cancer. Aside from her music career, Bif has also pursued acting. In 1990, she appeared in [sep] knowledge2: Bif Naked: Beth Torbert is a Canadian singer best known by her stage name Bif Naked. Between 1996 and 2016, she was among the top 150 selling Canadian artists in Canada.[1] ; Bif Naked: Bif Naked was born in New Delhi, India, to teenage parents attending private school. She was subsequently adopted by American missionaries.[2] She spent part of her childhood in Lexington, Kentucky,[3] where her father was a professor at the University of Kentucky. She went to Kelsey Elementary School in The Pas, Manitoba, for a couple of years.[3] After living for a time in Dauphin, Manitoba, her family eventually settled in Winnipeg.[4][5] She graduated from John Taylor Collegiate and studied theatre at the University of Winnipeg. After University, she began pursuing a career as a stand-up comic.[citation needed] ; Bif Naked: The name "Bif" started as a nickname based on the mispronunciation of her real name, Beth.[6] ; Bif Naked: After spending several years singing with several underground bands, Bif Naked independently released a self-titled solo album, Bif Naked, in 1994,[3] and I Bificus in 1998. In 1999 she toured across Canada.[7] ; Bif Naked: Another solo album, Purge was released in 2001.[8] She also released a spoken word album called Okenspay Ordway: Things I Forgot To Tell Mommy. In 2005, after narrowing it down from over fifty songs, she released Superbeautifulmonster, which featured thirteen tracks. The Promise, which was recorded while Bif was undergoing chemotherapy for breast cancer, was released in 2009 and was dedicated to her fans. The album featured tracks mixed by Juno Award winner Mike Fraser. In 2011, after doing acoustic sets on tour, Bif released an acoustic record on Her Royal Majesty's Records late-2013, featuring acoustic versions of her past songs as well as four previously unreleased tracks. The album is entitled BIF NAKED FOREVER: Acoustic Hits and Other Delights. Bif has also been involved on a side project, Jakkarta.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Michael Collins (astronaut) // Michael Collins (astronaut) Michael Collins (born October 31, 1930) (Major General, USAF, Retired) is an American former astronaut and test pilot. Selected as part of the third group of fourteen astronauts in 1963, he flew into space twice. His first spaceflight was on Gemini 10, in which he and Command Pilot John Young performed two rendezvous with different spacecraft and undertook two extra-vehicular activities (EVAs, also known as spacewalks). His second spaceflight was as the Command Module Pilot for Apollo 11. While he stayed in orbit around the Moon, Neil Armstrong and Buzz Aldrin left in the Lunar Module to; Michael Collins (astronaut) // it weren't for me them boys would still be there." In the 2018 film "First Man", he was portrayed by Lukas Haas. Michael Collins (astronaut) Michael Collins (born October 31, 1930) (Major General, USAF, Retired) is an American former astronaut and test pilot. Selected as part of the third group of fourteen astronauts in 1963, he flew into space twice. His first spaceflight was on Gemini 10, in which he and Command Pilot John Young performed two rendezvous with different spacecraft and undertook two extra-vehicular activities (EVAs, also known as spacewalks). His second spaceflight was as the Command Module Pilot; Michael Collins (astronaut) // by Frank Borman, whom Collins knew well from their days at Edwards, with Jim Lovell as the pilot. Collins made a point of providing a daily briefing to their wives, Susan Borman and Marilyn Lovell, on the progress of the two-week Gemini 7 mission. After the successful completion of Gemini 7, on January 24, 1966, Collins was assigned to the prime crew of Gemini 10, but with John Young as mission commander, as White moved on to the Apollo program. Jim Lovell and Buzz Aldrin were designated as the backup commander and pilot respectively. The arrangements were disturbed by the; Michael Collins (astronaut) // Collins remained in the U.S. Air Force Reserves. He attained the rank of major general in 1976, and retired in 1982. In 1971, Collins was appointed director of the National Air and Space Museum. He held this position until 1978, when he stepped down to become undersecretary of the Smithsonian Institution. Collins completed the Harvard Business School's Advanced Management Program in 1974, and in 1980 became Vice President of LTV Aerospace in Arlington, Virginia. He resigned in 1985 to start his own consulting firm, Michael Collins Associates. He wrote an autobiography in 1974 entitled "". New York Times writer John; Michael Collins (astronaut) // the U.S. Astronaut Hall of Fame (1993), and the National Aviation Hall of Fame (1985). In 2008 he was inducted into the Aerospace Walk of Honor in Lancaster, California. The International Astronomical Union honored him by naming an asteroid after him, 6471 Collins. Also, like the other two Apollo 11 crew members, he has a lunar crater named after him. He was awarded the Air Force Distinguished Flying Cross in 1966 for his work in the Gemini Project. Deputy Administrator Robert Seamans pinned the NASA Exceptional Service Medal on Collins and Young in 1966 for their role in the Gemini [sep] knowledge2: Michael Collins (astronaut): Michael Collins (October 31, 1930 – April 28, 2021) was an American astronaut who flew the Apollo 11 command module Columbia  around the Moon in 1969 while his crewmates, Neil Armstrong and Buzz Aldrin, made the first crewed landing on the surface. He was also a test pilot and major general in the U.S. Air Force Reserve. ; Michael Collins (astronaut): Born in Rome, Italy, where his father was serving as the U.S. military attaché, Collins graduated in the Class of 1952 from the United States Military Academy. He followed his father, brother, uncle, and cousin into the military. He joined the United States Air Force, and flew F-86 Sabre fighters at Chambley-Bussières Air Base, France. He was accepted into the U.S. Air Force Experimental Flight Test Pilot School at Edwards Air Force Base in 1960, also graduating from the Aerospace Research Pilot School (Class III). ; Michael Collins (astronaut): Selected as part of NASA's third group of 14 astronauts in 1963, Collins flew in space twice. His first spaceflight was on Gemini 10 in 1966, in which he and Command Pilot John Young performed orbital rendezvous with two spacecraft and undertook two extravehicular activities (EVAs, also known as spacewalks). On the 1969 Apollo 11 mission, he became one of 24 people to fly to the Moon, which he orbited thirty times. He was the fourth person (and third American) to perform a spacewalk, the first person to have performed more than one spacewalk, and, after Young, who flew the command module on Apollo 10, the second person to orbit the Moon alone. ; Michael Collins (astronaut): After retiring from NASA in 1970, Collins took a job in the Department of State as Assistant Secretary of State for Public Affairs. A year later, he became the director of the National Air and Space Museum, and held this position until 1978, when he stepped down to become undersecretary of the Smithsonian Institution. In 1980, he took a job as vice president of LTV Aerospace. He resigned in 1985 to start his own consulting firm. Along with his Apollo 11 crewmates, Collins was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 1969 and the Congressional Gold Medal in 2011. ; Michael Collins (astronaut): Collins was born on October 31, 1930, in Rome, Italy.[1][2] He was the second son of James Lawton Collins,[3] a career U.S. Army officer, who was the U.S. military attaché there from 1928 to 1932, and Virginia C. Collins (née Stewart.[4] Collins had an older brother, James Lawton Collins Jr.[5][6] and two older sisters, Virginia and Agnes. Collins' mother was of Scottish descent, and his father's family hailed from Ireland.[7]
knowledge1: Peter Gallagher // Peter Gallagher Peter Killian Gallagher (born August 19, 1955) is an American actor, musician and writer. Since 1980, Gallagher has played roles in numerous Hollywood films. He is best known for starring as Sandy Cohen in the television drama series "The O.C." from 2003 to 2007, and a recurring role as Deputy Chief William Dodds on "". Gallagher was born in the Manhattan borough of New York City. His mother, Mary Ann (née O'Shea; August 23, 1915 - June 6, 2004), was a bacteriologist, and his father, Thomas Francis Gallagher, Jr. (June 10, 1912 - November 16, 1999), was an; Peter Gallagher // and singer, and in 2015 performed in Deaf West Theatre's production of "Spring Awakening" on Broadway as the voice of Martha. Peter Gallagher Peter Killian Gallagher (born August 19, 1955) is an American actor, musician and writer. Since 1980, Gallagher has played roles in numerous Hollywood films. He is best known for starring as Sandy Cohen in the television drama series "The O.C." from 2003 to 2007, and a recurring role as Deputy Chief William Dodds on "". Gallagher was born in the Manhattan borough of New York City. His mother, Mary Ann (née O'Shea; August 23, 1915 - June [sep] knowledge2: Peter Gallagher: Peter Killian Gallagher (born August 19, 1955)[1] is an American actor. Since 1980, he has played roles in numerous Hollywood films. He is best known for starring as Sandy Cohen in the television drama series The O.C. from 2003 to 2007, recurring roles such as Deputy Chief William Dodds on Law & Order: Special Victims Unit,  Stacey Koons on the Showtime comedy-drama Californication, Nick on the Netflix series Grace & Frankie, and Chuck Cedar in Mr. Deeds. He also played CIA Director of Clandestine Services (DCS) Arthur Campbell on Covert Affairs. He also is known for his roles in musical theatre, his most well known role being Sky Masterson in the 1992 Broadway revival of Guys and Dolls. ; Peter Gallagher: Gallagher was born in New York City. His mother, Mary Ann (née O'Shea), was a bacteriologist, and his father, Thomas Francis Gallagher, Jr., was an advertising executive.[2][3][4] Gallagher is the youngest of their three children. He is of Irish Catholic background[5] and was raised in Armonk, New York. Gallagher graduated from Tufts University, where he was active in theater, appearing in such shows as Stephen Sondheim's Company and singing with the all-male a cappella group the Beelzebubs. He studied acting at the William Esper Studio[6] and with Mira Rostova.[7] ; Peter Gallagher: Gallagher appeared on Broadway with Glenn Close in Tom Stoppard's The Real Thing and made his feature film debut in the Taylor Hackford film The Idolmaker, but first achieved fame for his role in Steven Soderbergh's sex, lies, and videotape (1989). He also starred as Sky Masterson in the 1992 Broadway hit revival of Guys and Dolls. ; Peter Gallagher: Gallagher played a potential career threat to Tim Robbins's studio executive in The Player (1992); the comatose fiancé of Sandra Bullock in While You Were Sleeping (1995); a major real estate salesman having an affair with Annette Bening in American Beauty (1999); a media executive in Mr. Deeds (2002); and a political reporter exposing media ethics during a presidential debate in The Last Debate. ; Peter Gallagher: Gallagher released an album titled 7 Days in Memphis in 2005, on the Sony BMG label. This includes a studio recording of his performance of "Don't Give Up On Me" (originally by Solomon Burke), which was featured in an episode of The O.C. He also has a video for his single "Still I Long For Your Kiss", in which he starred with his TV-wife Kelly Rowan.
knowledge1: Melvin Van Peebles // featured Van Peeples and his narration of poetic work with accompaniment of music by The Heliocentrics. see List of Melvin Van Peebles Songs Melvin Van Peebles Melvin "Block" Van Peebles (born August 21, 1932) is an American actor, filmmaker, playwright, novelist and composer. He is most famous for creating (and starring in) the acclaimed film "Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song", which heralded a new era of African-American focused films. He is the father of actor and director Mario Van Peebles. Born Melvin Peebles, in Chicago, Illinois, to a black tailor, he joined the Air Force in 1954, thirteen days after graduating; Melvin Van Peebles // Melvin Van Peebles Melvin "Block" Van Peebles (born August 21, 1932) is an American actor, filmmaker, playwright, novelist and composer. He is most famous for creating (and starring in) the acclaimed film "Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song", which heralded a new era of African-American focused films. He is the father of actor and director Mario Van Peebles. Born Melvin Peebles, in Chicago, Illinois, to a black tailor, he joined the Air Force in 1954, thirteen days after graduating with a B.A. in literature from Ohio Wesleyan University, staying for three and a half years in the Force. He married the German; Melvin Van Peebles // for a screening of "The Kid" (1921) and was a judge at the Charlie Chaplin Dress-Alike Contest that was after the screening. He wore a bowler hat and baggy pants in honor of Chaplin. In September 2013, Van Peebles made his public debut as a visual artist, as a part of a gallery featured called "eMerge 2.0: Melvin Van Peebles & Artists on the Cusp". It features "Ex-Voto Monochrome (A Ghetto Mother's Prayer)", one of many pieces of art he created to be on display in his home. In 2017, a short film directed by Alain Rimbert entitled "Methane Momma"; Melvin Van Peebles // All I can say is that after I did one thing he would say, 'Well, aren't you gonna put sound on it?' and I would go, 'Oh shit!' That's all I could say." After Peebles completed his first short films, he took them with him to Hollywood to try to find work, but was unable to find anyone who wanted to hire him as a director. In New York City, he met a man who saw his films and wanted to screen them in France. In 1959 the family went to the Netherlands, where he worked for the Dutch National; Melvin Van Peebles // actress and photographer, Maria Marx. They lived in Mexico for a brief period, where he painted portraits, before coming back to the United States, where he worked as a cable car gripman in San Francisco. Melvin Van Peebles began writing about his experiences as a cable car gripman. His first book, "The Big Heart", credited to Melvin Van, evolved from a small article and series of photographs According to Van Peebles, a passenger suggested that he should become a filmmaker. Van Peebles shot his first short film, "Pickup Men for Herrick" in 1957, and made two more short films during [sep] knowledge2: Melvin Van Peebles: Melvin Van Peebles (born Melvin Peebles; August 21, 1932 – September 21, 2021) was an American actor, filmmaker, writer, and composer. He worked as an active filmmaker into the 2000s. His feature film debut, The Story of a Three-Day Pass (1967), was based on his own French-language novel La Permission and was shot in France, as it was difficult for a black American director to get work at the time. The film won an award at the San Francisco International Film Festival which gained him the interest of Hollywood studios, leading to his American feature debut Watermelon Man, in 1970. Eschewing further overtures from Hollywood, he used the successes he had so far to bankroll his work as an independent filmmaker. ; Melvin Van Peebles: In 1971, he released his best-known work, creating and starring in the film Sweet Sweetback's Baadasssss Song, considered one of the earliest and best-regarded examples of the blaxploitation genre. He followed this up with the musical, Don't Play Us Cheap, based on his own stage play, and continued to make films, write novels and stage plays in English and in French through the next several decades; his final films include the French-language film Le Conte du ventre plein (2000) and the absurdist film Confessionsofa Ex-Doofus-ItchyFooted Mutha (2008). His son, filmmaker and actor Mario Van Peebles, appeared in several of his works and portrayed him in the 2003 biographical film Baadasssss!. ; Melvin Van Peebles: Born Melvin Peebles[1] in Chicago, Illinois, he was the son of Edwin Griffin and Marion Peebles.[2] In 1953 Peebles graduated with a B.A. in literature from Ohio Wesleyan University and, 13 days later, joined the Air Force, serving for three and a half years.[3] He added "Van" to his name when he lived in the Netherlands in his late 20s.[4] ; Melvin Van Peebles: According to Van Peebles, a passenger suggested that he should become a filmmaker. Van Peebles shot his first short film, Pickup Men for Herrick in 1957 and made two more short films during the same period. About these films, Van Peebles said: "I thought they were features. Each one turned out to be eleven minutes long. I was trying to do features. I knew nothing." As he learned more about the filmmaking process, he found out that "I could make a feature for five hundred dollars. That was the cost of 90 minutes of film. I didn't know a thing about shooting a film sixteen to one or ten to one or none of that shit. Then I forgot you had to develop film. And I didn't know you needed a work print. All I can say is that after I did one thing he would say, 'Well, aren't you gonna put sound on it?' and I would go, 'Oh shit!' That's all I could say."[3] ; Melvin Van Peebles: After Van Peebles completed his first short films, he took them with him to Hollywood to try to find work, but was unable to find anyone who wanted to hire him as a director. Van Peebles decided to move his family to the Netherlands where he planned to study astronomy. On the way to Europe, in New York City, he met Amos Vogel, founder of the avant-garde Cinema 16 who agreed to place two of Van Peebles's shorts in his rental catalog.[5] Vogel screened Van Peebles's Three Pickup Men for Herrick at Cinema 16 on a program with City of Jazz in the spring of 1960 with Ralph Ellison leading a post-film discussion.[6]
knowledge1: Carol Dweck // Carol Dweck Carol S. Dweck (born October 17, 1946) is the Lewis and Virginia Eaton Professor of Psychology at Stanford University. Dweck is known for her work on the mindset psychological trait. She has taught at Columbia University, Harvard University, and the University of Illinois before joining the Stanford University faculty in 2004. Carol Dweck was born in New York. Her father worked in export-import and her mother in advertising. She was the only daughter and the middle sibling of three children. Members of her sixth-grade class at P.S. 153 in Brooklyn, New York were seated in order of their; Carol Dweck // implemented and approached in schools, rather than on Dweck's research. Carol is married to David Goldman, who is a national theatre director and critic and the founder and director of the National Center for New Plays at Stanford University. Although she did not have children of her own, her husband has two grown children, whose children call Dweck "grandma". She notes the grandchildren have growth mindset and says, "Their parents did very well with that!" Carol Dweck Carol S. Dweck (born October 17, 1946) is the Lewis and Virginia Eaton Professor of Psychology at Stanford University. Dweck is known for [sep] knowledge2: Carol Dweck: Carol Susan Dweck (born October 17, 1946) is an American psychologist. She holds the Lewis and Virginia Eaton Professorship of Psychology at Stanford University. Dweck is known for her work on motivation and mindset. She was on the faculty at the University of Illinois, Harvard, and Columbia before joining the Stanford University faculty in 2004. She was named an Association for Psychological Science (APS) James McKeen Cattell Fellow in 2013, an APS Mentor Awardee in 2019, and an APS William James Fellow in 2020, and has been a member of the National Academy of Sciences since 2012. ; Carol Dweck: Dweck was born in New York. Her father worked in the export-import business and her mother in advertising. She was the only daughter and the middle sibling of three children.[2] ; Carol Dweck: In her sixth grade class at the P.S. 153 elementary school in Brooklyn, New York, students were seated in order of their IQ; some responsibilities like erasing the blackboard and carrying the flag were reserved to students with the highest IQs.[3][4] She later described becoming "increasingly afraid to risk her reputation as one of the most intelligent children in the class", by avoiding participation in a spelling bee and a French competition.[3] ; Carol Dweck: She graduated from Barnard College in 1967,[5] and earned a Ph.D. in psychology from Yale University in 1972.[4][6] ; Carol Dweck: Dweck's key contribution to social psychology relates to the concept of implicit theories of intelligence and personality, which she first introduced in a 1988 paper.[11][12] In the academic literature, the term "implicit theories" is often treated as synonymous with "implicit beliefs", "self-theories", or "mindsets", and is defined by Dweck as "core assumptions about the malleability of personal attributes". Dweck later popularized the concept in her 2006 non-academic book Mindset: The New Psychology of Success.[11]
knowledge1: Lisa Ling // Lisa Ling Lisa J. Ling (born August 30, 1973) is an American journalist, television presenter, and author. She is currently the host of "This Is Life with Lisa Ling" on CNN. She is the former host of "Our America with Lisa Ling" on OWN: The Oprah Winfrey Network, former co-host of ABC's "The View" (from 1999–2002), host of "National Geographic Explorer", reporter on Channel One News, and special correspondent for "The Oprah Winfrey Show" and CNN. She was the host of reality television show "The Job". Ling is the older sister of journalist Laura Ling. Ling was born in Sacramento,; Lisa Ling // to Bring Her Home", published in May 2010. Lisa Ling identifies herself as a "die-hard feminist". She was diagnosed with attention deficit disorder. Lisa Ling Lisa J. Ling (born August 30, 1973) is an American journalist, television presenter, and author. She is currently the host of "This Is Life with Lisa Ling" on CNN. She is the former host of "Our America with Lisa Ling" on OWN: The Oprah Winfrey Network, former co-host of ABC's "The View" (from 1999–2002), host of "National Geographic Explorer", reporter on Channel One News, and special correspondent for "The Oprah Winfrey Show" and CNN. She; Lisa Ling // anonymously. On February 16, 2011, her show "Our America with Lisa Ling" premiered on OWN: The Oprah Winfrey Network. It ran for five seasons. On April 14, 2014, CNN announced that Ling will host a new documentary series, "This is Life with Lisa Ling", to join its primetime lineup. The show premiered on September 28, 2014. On January 3, 2007, Ling announced her engagement to radiation oncologist Paul Song. They married on May 26, 2007, in Los Angeles, California. The wedding party included guests such as Connie Chung, one of Lisa's personal heroes, and actresses Kelly Hu and Diane Farr.; Lisa Ling // California. Ling's father, Doug, is a Chinese immigrant, born in China during the 1920s; her mother, Mary Mei-yan (née Wang), is a Taiwanese immigrant from Tainan, Taiwan, and formerly served as the head of the Los Angeles office of the Formosan Association for Public Affairs. Her grandfather, who was from Guangzhou, Guangdong, was one of the first Chinese students allowed to study in the United States in the 1930s. He received his graduate degree from New York University and an M.B.A degree from University of Colorado. He struggled to find a job in the United States and eventually opened the; Lisa Ling // to USC students in 2016, Ling explained, "I think traveling is the best education. If there’s one takeaway here tonight, it’s to travel … I’m convinced that you are better, smarter, more marketable as a job candidate if you travel." She is fluent in Spanish. Ling started in television when she was chosen as one of the four hosts of "Scratch", a nationally syndicated teen magazine show based in Sacramento. At 18, she joined Channel One News as one of their youngest reporters and anchors. Among her roles was war correspondent, including assignments in Iraq and Afghanistan. She won several [sep] knowledge2: Lisa Ling: Lisa J. Ling (born August 30, 1973) is an American journalist, television personality, and author. She is a news contributor for CBS News. Previously, she was the host for This Is Life with Lisa Ling  on CNN, a reporter on Channel One News, a co-host on the ABC daytime talk show The View (1999–2002), the host of National Geographic Explorer (2003–2010), and a special correspondent for The Oprah Winfrey Show. Ling later hosted Our America with Lisa Ling on the Oprah Winfrey Network from 2011 to 2014. ; Lisa Ling: Ling was born in Sacramento, California.[1] Her mother, Mary Mei-yan (née Wang), is a Taiwanese immigrant from Tainan, Taiwan, who served as the head of the Los Angeles office of the Formosan Association for Public Affairs.[2][3][1] Ling's father, Chung Teh "Douglas" Ling, is a Hong Konger immigrant, born in Hong Kong in 1937.[4] Her paternal grandmother was born on Labuan, now in modern-day Malaysia.[4] Her paternal grandfather, who was from Guangzhou, Guangdong,[4] was one of the first Chinese students allowed to study in the United States[dubious  – discuss] in the 1930s.[when?] He earned a degree from New York University and an M.B.A degree from University of Colorado. He struggled to find a job in the United States. He moved to California where he eventually opened the first Chinese restaurant in Folsom.[5] ; Lisa Ling: Ling's parents divorced when she was seven years old.[1][6] Following the divorce, she and her sister Laura were raised by their father in Carmichael, near Sacramento. Ling admired reporter Connie Chung and aspired to become a journalist.[7] ; Lisa Ling: Ling was educated at Del Campo High School in Fair Oaks, California, graduating in 1991.[8] She studied at the University of Southern California in Los Angeles.[9] ; Lisa Ling: Ling chose to leave USC before graduating, starting work as a reporter for Channel One News, and electing to "find her education by visiting different countries instead." Speaking to USC students in 2016, Ling explained, "I think traveling is the best education. If there's one takeaway here tonight, it's to travel. I'm convinced that you are better, smarter, more marketable as a job candidate if you travel."[10]  She is fluent in Spanish.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Dana Ashbrook // Dana Ashbrook Dana Vernon Ashbrook (born May 24, 1967) is an American actor, best known for playing Bobby Briggs on the cult TV series "Twin Peaks" (1990–1991, 2017) and its 1992 prequel film "". Ashbrook was born in San Diego, California; his mother, D'Ann (née Paton) is a teacher and his father, Vernon L. ('Buddy') Ashbrook, was a director of the Palomar College drama department. He is the brother of writer Taylor Ashbrook and actress Daphne Ashbrook. In 1978, Ashbrook made his film debut in an uncredited role in "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!". A decade later, after an acting; Dana Ashbrook // film "". In 2017, Ashbrook reprised his role as Bobby Briggs in David Lynch's revival series "Twin Peaks: The Return". Ashbrook married actress Kate Rogal on August 15, 2015 in a private ceremony in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. Dana Ashbrook Dana Vernon Ashbrook (born May 24, 1967) is an American actor, best known for playing Bobby Briggs on the cult TV series "Twin Peaks" (1990–1991, 2017) and its 1992 prequel film "". Ashbrook was born in San Diego, California; his mother, D'Ann (née Paton) is a teacher and his father, Vernon L. ('Buddy') Ashbrook, was a director of the Palomar College drama; Dana Ashbrook // series. In 1995, Ashbrook starred in the film "Comfortably Numb". In 1996, Ashbrook guest starred on the television series "The Outer Limits". The following year, Ashbrook was cast as Gary McDermott on the short-lived television series "Crisis Center". In 1998, he portrayed Seth in the film "Interstate 5" and guest starred on the television series "Welcome to Paradox". Ashbrook has appeared on The WB's "Charmed" in the 2001 episode "Just Harried", on NBC's "The Pretender" in the 2000 episode "Rules of Engagement", on "The Outer Limits" in the 1996 episode "Resurrection", and on "" in the 2007 episode "". Ashbook; Dana Ashbrook // played the recurring role of Rich Rinaldi on the television series "Dawson's Creek" (2002–2003). In 2009, Ashbrook joined the cast of the series "Crash" for the regular part of Jimmy. In 2010, he reunited with some of the cast of "Twin Peaks" on the comedy-tribute episode of "Psych", titled Dual Spires. In 2012, Ashbrook starred alongside Ray Wise and Derek Mears in the Steven C. Miller psycho-thriller "The Aggression Scale". In 2014, he was cast in the werewolf horror film "Late Phases". The same year, deleted footage that he filmed for "Fire Walk With Me" was used for David Lynch's [sep] knowledge2: Dana Ashbrook: Dana Vernon Ashbrook (born May 24, 1967) is an American actor, best known for playing Bobby Briggs on the television series Twin Peaks (1990–1991, 2017) and its 1992 prequel film Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me.[2] ; Dana Ashbrook: Ashbrook was born in San Diego, California;[1] his mother, D'Ann (née Paton)[3] is a teacher and his father, Vernon L. "Buddy" Ashbrook,[4] was a director of the Palomar College drama department.[5] He is the brother of writer Taylor Ashbrook and actress Daphne Ashbrook.[6] ; Dana Ashbrook: In 1978, Ashbrook made his film debut in an uncredited role in Attack of the Killer Tomatoes! A decade later, after an acting hiatus, Ashbrook guest starred on the television series Cagney & Lacey, Knots Landing, and ABC Afterschool Special before starring as Tom Essex in the 1988 horror film Return of the Living Dead Part II. The same year, he starred in the horror film Waxwork alongside Deborah Foreman and guest starred on an episode of 21 Jump Street. ; Dana Ashbrook: In 1989, Ashbrook portrayed Joey in She's Out of Control. From 1990-1991, Ashbrook played Bobby Briggs on the cult TV series Twin Peaks. While starring on Twin Peaks, Ashbrook appeared in the films Sundown: The Vampire in Retreat (1990), Ghost Dad (1990), Girlfriend from Hell (1990), and The Willies (1990) as well as on an episode of the television series The Hidden Room.[7] ; Dana Ashbrook: In 1992, Ashbrook reprised his role as Bobby Briggs in the prequel film Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me and portrayed Clyde Barrow in the television film Bonnie & Clyde: The True Story alongside Tracey Needham. In 1994, Ashbrook appeared in the short film The Coriolis Effect (alongside Jennifer Rubin and Quentin Tarantino) and in the film Cityscrapes: Los Angeles. He acted in the 1995 science fiction television pilot W.E.I.R.D. World, written and produced by the makers of the Tales from the Crypt series.
knowledge1: Nikole Hannah-Jones // Nikole Hannah-Jones Nikole Hannah-Jones (born April 9, 1976) is an American investigative journalist known for her coverage of civil rights in the United States. In April 2015, she became a staff writer for "The New York Times". Hannah-Jones grew up in Waterloo, Iowa, to father Milton Hannah, who is African-American, and mother Cheryl A. Novotny, who is of Czech and English descent. She is the second of three sisters. In 1947, when her father was two years old, his family moved to Iowa from Greenwood, Mississippi, in the Mississippi Delta region, along with many other African-American families. Hannah-Jones and her; Nikole Hannah-Jones // was launched in Memphis, Tennessee in 2016, with the purpose of promoting investigative journalism, which is the least common type of reporting. Following in the footsteps of Ida B. Wells, this society encourages minority journalists to expose injustices perpetuated by the government and defend people who are susceptible to being taken advantage of. This organization was created with much support from the Open Society Foundations, Ford Foundation, and CUNY Graduate School of Journalism. Hannah-Jones lives in the Bedford–Stuyvesant neighborhood of Brooklyn with her husband, Faraji Hannah-Jones, and their daughter. Nikole Hannah-Jones Nikole Hannah-Jones (born April 9, 1976) is an American; Nikole Hannah-Jones // as an authority on topics such as racial segregation, desegregation and resegregation in American schools and housing discrimination, and has spoken about these issues on national public radio broadcasts. She writes to discover and expose the systemic and Institutional racism perpetuated by official laws and acts. Her stories have been quoted in numerous other publications as being particularly important regarding race relations. Hannah-Jones reported on the school district where teenager Michael Brown had been shot, one of the "most segregated, impoverished districts in the entire state" of Missouri. Reviewer Laura Moser of "Slate magazine" praised her report on school resegregation,; Nikole Hannah-Jones // Schools, for the Raleigh "News & Observer," a position she held for three years. In 2006, Hannah-Jones moved to Portland, Oregon, where she wrote for "The Oregonian" for six years. During this time she covered an enterprise assignment that included feature work, then the demographics beat, and then the government & census beats. In 2007, to commemorate the 40th anniversary of the 1965 Watts Riots, Hannah-Jones wrote about its impact on the community for the National Advisory Commission on Civil Disorders, also known as the Kerner Commission. From 2008 to 2009, Hannah-Jones received a fellowship from the Institute for Advanced; Nikole Hannah-Jones // which showed how educational inequality may have been a factor in the unfortunate death of Brown. Hannah-Jones is a 2017 Emerson Fellow at the New America Foundation, where she is working on a book on school segregation. The book, "The Problem We All Live With", is due out in June 2020 from Chris Jackson's One World imprint at Random House. Hannah-Jones is a 2017 award winner of the MacArthur Foundation "Genius Award." In early 2015, Nikole Hannah-Jones, along with Ron Nixon, Corey Johnson, and Topher Sanders, began dreaming of creating the Ida B. Wells Society for Investigative Reporting. This organization [sep] knowledge2: Nikole Hannah-Jones: Nikole Sheri Hannah-Jones (born April 9, 1976)[1][2] is an American investigative journalist, known for her coverage of civil rights in the United States. She joined The New York Times as a staff writer in April 2015, was awarded a MacArthur Fellowship in 2017, and won the Pulitzer Prize for Commentary in 2020 for her work on The 1619 Project. Hannah-Jones is the inaugural Knight Chair in Race and Journalism at the Howard University School of Communications, where she also founded the Center for Journalism and Democracy.[3][4][5] ; Nikole Hannah-Jones: Hannah-Jones was born in Waterloo, Iowa, to father Milton Hannah, who is African-American, and mother Cheryl A. Novotny, who is white and of Czech and English descent.[6] Hannah-Jones is the second of their three daughters.[7] She was raised Catholic.[8] ; Nikole Hannah-Jones: Hannah-Jones and her sister attended predominately white schools as part of a voluntary program of desegregation busing.[9] She attended Waterloo West High School, where she wrote for the high-school newspaper and graduated in 1994.[10] ; Nikole Hannah-Jones: After high school, Hannah-Jones attended the University of Notre Dame, where she earned a Bachelor of Arts degree in history and African-American studies in 1998.[citation needed] ; Nikole Hannah-Jones: In 1995, in response to an article published in the Notre Dame student newspaper that called American Indians "savages", Hannah-Jones replied with an article titled "Modern Savagery." She stated: "I find it hard to believe that any member of the white race can have the audacity and hypocrisy to call any other culture savage. The white race is the biggest murderer, rapist, pillager and thief of the modern world....The crimes they committed were unnecessarily cruel and can only be described as acts of the devil."[11]
knowledge1: Don DeLillo // Don DeLillo Donald Richard "Don" DeLillo (born November 20, 1936) is an American novelist, playwright and essayist. His works have covered subjects as diverse as television, nuclear war, sports, the complexities of language, performance art, the Cold War, mathematics, the advent of the digital age, politics, economics, and global terrorism. Initially he was a well-regarded cult writer; however, the publication in 1985 of "White Noise" brought him widespread recognition, and won him the National Book Award for fiction. It was followed in 1988 by "Libra", a bestseller. DeLillo has twice been a Pulitzer Prize for Fiction finalist (for "Mao II"; Don DeLillo // nature, must oppose things, oppose whatever power tries to impose on us." DeLillo was born on November 20, 1936 and grew up in a working-class Italian Catholic family, from Molise, in an Italian-American neighborhood of the Bronx in New York City, not far from Arthur Avenue. Reflecting on his childhood in The Bronx, DeLillo later described how he was "...always out in the street. As a little boy I whiled away most of my time pretending to be a baseball announcer on the radio. I could think up games for hours at a time. There were eleven of us in; Don DeLillo // his career as a reader as well as a writer, recalling examining his personal book collection and feeling a profound sense of personal connection to literature: "Here I’m not the writer at all, I’m a grateful reader. When I look at my book shelves I find myself gazing like a museum-goer." In February 2016, DeLillo was the guest of honor at an academic conference dedicated to his work, "Don DeLillo: Fiction Rescues History", a three-day event held at the Sorbonne Nouvelle in Paris, France. Speaking to "The Guardian" in November 2018, DeLillo revealed work on a new novel, his eighteenth,; Don DeLillo // life; love, awe, "the intimate touch of earth and sun." Brilliantly observed and infused with humor, Don Delillo’s "Zero K" is an acute observation about the fragility and meaning of life, about embracing our family, this world, our language, and our humanity. In November 2015, DeLillo received the 2015 Medal for Distinguished Contribution to American Letters at the 66th National Book Awards Ceremony. The ceremony was held on November 8 in New York City, and he was presented his award by Pulitzer Prize winner Jennifer Egan, a writer profoundly influenced by DeLillo's work. In his acceptance speech, DeLillo reflected upon; Don DeLillo // the evolving story of the interviewee in "Valparaiso"). The psychology of crowds and the capitulation of individuals to group identity is a theme DeLillo examines in several of his novels, especially in the prologue to "Underworld", "Mao II", and "Falling Man". In a 1993 interview with Maria Nadotti, DeLillo explained Many younger English-language authors such as Bret Easton Ellis, Jonathan Franzen and David Foster Wallace have cited DeLillo as an influence. Literary critic Harold Bloom named him as one of the four major American novelists of his time, along with Thomas Pynchon, Philip Roth, and Cormac McCarthy, though he questions [sep] knowledge2: Don DeLillo: Donald Richard DeLillo (born November 20, 1936) is an American novelist, short story writer, playwright, screenwriter and essayist. His works have covered subjects as diverse as television, nuclear war, the complexities of language, art, the advent of the Digital Age, mathematics, politics, economics, and sports. ; Don DeLillo: DeLillo was already a well-regarded cult writer in 1985, when the publication of White Noise brought him widespread recognition and the National Book Award for fiction. He followed this in 1988 with Libra, a novel about the Kennedy assassination. DeLillo won the PEN/Faulkner Award for Mao II, about terrorism and the media's scrutiny of writers' private lives, and the William Dean Howells Medal for Underworld, a historical novel that ranges in time from the dawn of the Cold War to the birth of the Internet.[1][2] He was awarded the 1999 Jerusalem Prize, the 2010 PEN/Saul Bellow Award for Achievement in American Fiction in 2010, and the 2013 Library of Congress Prize for American Fiction.[3] ; Don DeLillo: DeLillo was born on November 20, 1936, in New York City and grew up in an Italian Catholic family with ties to Molise, Italy, in an Italian-American neighborhood of the Bronx not far from Arthur Avenue.[6] Reflecting on his childhood in the Bronx, DeLillo said he was "always out in the street. As a little boy I whiled away most of my time pretending to be a baseball announcer on the radio. I could think up games for hours at a time. There were eleven of us in a small house, but the close quarters were never a problem. I didn't know things any other way. We always spoke English and Italian all mixed up together. My grandmother, who lived in America for fifty years, never learned English."[7] ; Don DeLillo: After graduating from Cardinal Hayes High School in the Bronx in 1954 and from Fordham University in the Bronx with a bachelor's degree in communication arts in 1958, DeLillo took a job in advertising because he could not get one in publishing. He worked for five years as a copywriter at Ogilvy & Mather on Fifth Avenue,[13] writing image ads for Sears Roebuck among others, working on "Print ads, very undistinguished accounts....I hadn't made the leap to television. I was just getting good at it when I left, in 1964."[14] ; Don DeLillo: DeLillo published his first short story in 1960—"The River Jordan", in Epoch, Cornell University's literary magazine—and began to work on his first novel in 1966. Of the beginning of his writing career, DeLillo has said, "I did some short stories at that time but very infrequently. I quit my job just to quit. I didn't quit my job to write fiction. I just didn't want to work anymore."[15] Reflecting in 1993 on his relatively late start in writing novels, DeLillo said, "I wish I had started earlier, but evidently I wasn't ready. First, I lacked ambition. I may have had novels in my head but very little on paper and no personal goals, no burning desire to achieve some end. Second, I didn't have a sense of what it takes to be a serious writer. It took me a long time to develop this."[16] He cites William Gaddis's The Recognitions as a formative influence: "It was a revelation, a piece of writing with the beauty and texture of a Shakespearean monologue-or, maybe more apt, a work of Renaissance art impossibly transformed from image into words. And they were the words of a contemporary American. This, to me, was the wonder of it."[17]
knowledge1: Charles B. McVay III // McVay). After years of mental health problems, he took his own life aged 70 years. Following years of efforts by some survivors and others to clear his name, McVay was posthumously exonerated by the 106th United States Congress and President Bill Clinton on October 30, 2000. Charles Butler McVay III was born in Ephrata, Pennsylvania on July 30, 1898 to a Navy family. His father, Charles Butler McVay Jr. (September 9, 1868 – October 28, 1949), who had commanded the tender during the cruise of the Great White Fleet (1907–1909), was an admiral in the United States Navy during World; Charles B. McVay III // Charles B. McVay III Charles B. McVay III (July 30, 1898 – November 6, 1968) was an American naval officer and the commanding officer of when it was lost in action in 1945, resulting in a massive loss of life. Of all captains in the history of the United States Navy, he is the only one to have been subjected to court-martial for losing a ship sunk by an act of war, despite the fact that he was on a top secret mission maintaining radio silence (the testimony of the Japanese commander who sank his ship also seemed to exonerate; Charles B. McVay III // B. Ferzacca. The 1991 made-for-television movie "Mission of the Shark: The Saga of the U.S.S. Indianapolis" depicts the ordeal of the men of the "Indianapolis" during her last voyage (with McVay portrayed by Stacy Keach), as does the 2016 film "" (with McVay portrayed by Nicolas Cage). Also in 2016, "USS Indianapolis: The Legacy" was released. It is an in-depth film where the survivors tell the story of what really happened and they speak about the aftermath of the tragic event. Charles B. McVay III Charles B. McVay III (July 30, 1898 – November 6, 1968) was an American naval; Charles B. McVay III // widely felt that he had been a fall guy for the Navy. The conviction effectively ended McVay's career as he lost seniority, although the sentence was overturned by Secretary James Forrestal owing to McVay's bravery prior to the sinking, and McVay was finally promoted to rear admiral when he retired from the navy in 1949, although he apparently never got over his treatment. In his book "Abandon Ship", author Richard F. Newcomb posits a motive for Admiral King's ordering McVay's court-martial. According to Captain McVay III's father, Admiral Charles B McVay Jr., "'King never forgot a grudge," he exploded. King [sep] knowledge2: Charles B. McVay III: Charles Butler McVay III (August 31, 1898 – November 6, 1968) was an American naval officer and the commanding officer of the cruiser USS Indianapolis which was lost in action in 1945, resulting in a significant loss of life. Of all captains in the history of the United States Navy, he is the only one to have been subjected to court-martial for losing a ship sunk by an act of war, despite the fact that he was on a top secret mission maintaining radio silence.   ; Charles B. McVay III: Charles Butler McVay III was born in Ephrata, Pennsylvania, on August 31, 1898, to a Navy family.[2] His father, Charles Butler McVay Jr. (1868–1949), commanded the tender Yankton during the cruise of the Great White Fleet (1907–1909), was an admiral in the United States Navy during World War I, and served as Commander-in-Chief of the Asiatic Fleet in the early 1930s. ; Charles B. McVay III: Charles III was a 1920 graduate of the United States Naval Academy at Annapolis, Maryland. Before taking command of Indianapolis in November 1944, McVay was chairman of the Joint Intelligence Committee of the Combined Chiefs of Staff in Washington, D.C., the Allies' highest intelligence unit. Earlier in World War II, he was awarded the Silver Star for displaying courage under fire. ; Charles B. McVay III: McVay led the ship through the invasion of Iwo Jima, then the bombardment of Okinawa in the spring of 1945, during which Indianapolis anti-aircraft guns shot down seven enemy planes before the ship was struck by a kamikaze on March 31, inflicting heavy casualties, including eight dead, and penetrating the ship's hull. McVay returned the ship safely to Mare Island in California for repairs. ; Charles B. McVay III: Early in the morning of July 30, 1945, Indianapolis was attacked by the Japanese submarine I-58 under Commander Mochitsura Hashimoto. Hashimoto launched six torpedoes and hit Indianapolis twice, the first removing over forty feet of her bow, the second hitting the starboard side at frame forty (below the bridge). Indianapolis immediately took a fifteen degree list, capsized and sank within 12 minutes. Of the crew of 1,195 men, 879 men died, becoming one of the greatest US Navy disasters ever.
knowledge1: Stephen Miller (political advisor) // Stephen Miller (political advisor) Stephen Miller (born August 23, 1985) is an American far-right political activist who serves as a senior advisor for policy for President Donald Trump. He was previously the communications director for then-Senator Jeff Sessions. He was also a press secretary for Republican representatives Michele Bachmann and John Shadegg. As a speechwriter for Trump, Miller helped write Trump's inaugural address. He has been a key adviser since the early days of Trump's presidency. Miller was a chief architect of Trump's travel ban, the administration's reduction of refugees accepted to the United States, and Trump's policy of separating; Stephen Miller (political advisor) // has been a popular talking point among the white supremacist segments of the alt-right. "The Washington Post"s Michelle Ye Hee Lee stated that "Neither got it quite right about the Statue of Liberty ... While the poem itself was not a part of the original statue, it actually was commissioned in 1883 to help raise funds for the pedestal" and "gave another layer of meaning to the statue beyond its abolitionist message." Stephen Miller (political advisor) Stephen Miller (born August 23, 1985) is an American far-right political activist who serves as a senior advisor for policy for President Donald Trump.; Stephen Miller (political advisor) // a controversial meeting which included Wikistrat CEO Joel Zamel, George Nader, Erik Prince, and Donald Trump Jr. in August 3, 2016. The New York Time had previously reported in November 2017 that Miller was in regular contact with George Papadopoulos during the campaign about his discussions with Russian government officials. On January 7, 2018, Miller appeared on Jake Tapper's "State of the Union" on CNN. In the course of Tapper's interview of him, Miller called Steve Bannon's comments about the Trump Tower meeting in Michael Wolff's book "Fire and Fury" "grotesque". Miller then went on to state, "The president is; Stephen Miller (political advisor) // migrant children from their parents. On February 12, 2017, he appeared to question the power of the judiciary to limit the executive's role in setting immigration policy. As a White House spokesman, Miller has on multiple occasions made false and unsubstantiated claims regarding widespread electoral fraud. Miller was born on August 23, 1985, the second of three children in the Jewish family of Michael D. Miller, a real estate investor, and Miriam (Glosser) Miller. He grew up in Santa Monica, California. His mother's ancestors had immigrated to the United States in the early 1900s from Belarus, escaping the anti-Jewish pogroms [sep] knowledge2: Stephen Miller (political advisor): Stephen Miller (born August 23, 1985)[1] is an American political advisor who served as a senior advisor for policy and White House director of speechwriting to President Donald Trump.[2] His politics have been described as far-right and anti-immigration.[1][3] He was previously the communications director for then-Senator Jeff Sessions. He was also a press secretary for U.S. representatives Michele Bachmann and John Shadegg. ; Stephen Miller (political advisor): As a speechwriter for Trump, Miller helped write Trump's inaugural address.[4][5][6] He was a key adviser from the early days of Trump's presidency. An immigration hardliner, Miller was a chief architect of Trump's travel ban,[7][8][9] the administration's reduction of refugees accepted to the United States,[10] and Trump's policy of separating migrant children from their parents.[11] He prevented the publication of internal administration studies that showed that refugees had a net positive effect on government revenues.[12][13] Miller reportedly played a central role in the resignation in April 2019 of Secretary of Homeland Security Kirstjen Nielsen, who he believed was insufficiently hawkish on immigration.[14][15] ; Stephen Miller (political advisor): Miller was born on August 23, 1985, in Santa Monica, California, where he was raised, the second of three children in the Jewish family of Michael D. Miller, a real estate investor, and Miriam (née Glosser).[1] His mother's ancestors—Wolf Lieb Glotzer and his wife, Bessie—emigrated to the United States from the Russian Empire's Antopol, in what is present-day Belarus, arriving in New York on January 7, 1903, on the German ship S.S. Moltke,[21] thus escaping the 1903–06 anti-Jewish pogroms in Belarus and other parts of the Russian Empire.[22][23][24] When his great-grandmother arrived in the U.S. in 1906, she spoke only Yiddish, the historical language of the Ashkenazi Jews of Eastern Europe.[25] ; Stephen Miller (political advisor): In 2007,[37] Miller earned his bachelor's degree from Duke University, where he studied political science.[26] He served as president of the Duke chapter of Horowitz's Students for Academic Freedom and wrote conservative columns for the school newspaper. Miller gained national attention for his defense of the students who were wrongly accused of rape in the Duke lacrosse case.[26][38] While attending Duke, Miller accused poet and civil rights activist Maya Angelou of "racial paranoia" and described student organization Chicano Student Movement of Aztlán (MEChA) as a "radical national Hispanic group that believes in racial superiority."[39] ; Stephen Miller (political advisor): Miller and the Duke Conservative Union helped co-member Richard Spencer, a Duke graduate student at the time, with fundraising and promotion for an immigration policy debate in March 2007 between Peter Laufer, an open-borders activist and University of Oregon professor, and journalist Peter Brimelow, founder of the anti-immigration website VDARE. Spencer later became an important figure in the white supremacist movement and president of the National Policy Institute; he coined the term "alt-right". In a 2016 interview, Spencer said he had mentored Miller at Duke. Describing their close relationship, Spencer said that he was "kind of glad no one's talked about this", for fear of harming Trump.[2] In a later blog post, he said the relationship had been exaggerated. Miller has said he has "absolutely no relationship with Mr. Spencer" and that he "completely repudiate[s] his views, and his claims are 100 percent false."[40][41][42]
knowledge1: Shawn Ashmore // Shawn Ashmore Shawn Robert Ashmore (born October 7, 1979) is a Canadian film and television actor. He is known for his roles as Bobby Drake / Iceman in the "X-Men" film series, Jake Berenson in the television series "Animorphs", Agent Mike Weston in the television drama series "The Following", Eric in the horror film "The Ruins" and Sam Spencer in the ABC series "Conviction". Ashmore also plays the main character, Jack Joyce, in the 2016 video game "Quantum Break". He is the identical twin brother of actor Aaron Ashmore. Ashmore was born in Richmond, British Columbia, the son of Linda,; Shawn Ashmore // the 2008 horror film "The Ruins". Ashmore was cast in Adam Green's 2010 dramatic thriller "Frozen" as Joe Lynch. Ashmore starred in the apocalyptic siege warfare film "The Day" with Dominic Monaghan, Michael Eklund, Shannyn Sossamon, and Ashley Bell. Ashmore also starred in the television drama series "The Following", starring Kevin Bacon. He reprised his role as Iceman in the 2014 film "". In April 2016, Shawn appeared in Quantum Break, a singleplayer third-person shooter video game developed by Remedy Entertainment and published by Microsoft Studios, that features high budget live action TV show-like cut scenes where Shawn plays the; Shawn Ashmore // main character, Jack Joyce. He also did the motion capture and voice acting for the character. Beginning 3 October 2016, he began his role as Sam Spencer of New York City's newly created Conviction Integrity Unit on the new U.S. legal drama on ABC, "Conviction". The pilot was actually filmed in Toronto, and the series shoots there as well. On July 27, 2012, Ashmore married film executive Dana Renee Wasdin, whom he met while filming "Frozen". The couple has one son, born in 2017. Shawn Ashmore Shawn Robert Ashmore (born October 7, 1979) is a Canadian film and television actor. [sep] knowledge2: Shawn Ashmore: Shawn Robert Ashmore (born October 7, 1979)[1] is a Canadian actor. He is known for his roles as Bobby Drake / Iceman in the X-Men film series, Jake in the television series Animorphs, Agent Mike Weston in the television drama series The Following, Eric in the horror film The Ruins, Sam Spencer in the ABC series Conviction, Wesley Evers in the ABC series The Rookie, and Lamplighter in the Amazon Prime Video superhero series The Boys. Ashmore also plays the main character, Jack Joyce, in the 2016 video game Quantum Break, as well as Conrad in 2019's Man of Medan. He is the identical twin brother of actor Aaron Ashmore. ; Shawn Ashmore: Ashmore was born in Richmond, British Columbia,[1] the son of Linda (née Davis), a homemaker, and Rick Ashmore,[2] a manufacturing engineer. He was raised in St. Albert, Alberta and Brampton, Ontario, where he attended Earnscliffe Senior Public School and Turner Fenton Secondary School. His identical twin brother, Aaron Ashmore, is also an actor. Aaron and Shawn have played twins in several movies, but have also pursued roles independently. Aaron is slightly taller than Shawn and, according to Aaron, Shawn often gets cast as the nice guy while Aaron himself is cast as the bully.[3] They have a "GMA" tattoo on their wrists that stands for "Good Man Ashmore"; their grandfather had a similar tattoo.[4] ; Shawn Ashmore: One of Ashmore's notable roles was as Iceman in X-Men and its sequels X2 and X-Men: The Last Stand. Ashmore also reprised his role as Iceman in the animated series The Super Hero Squad Show, as well as voicing the role for X-Men: The Official Game.[5][6] ; Shawn Ashmore: Ashmore starred as Cadet Major Brad Rigby in Cadet Kelly,[7] a Disney Channel original film which aired in 2002 and he guest-starred as Eric Summers in two episodes of Smallville, a series on which his brother was later cast in the role of Jimmy Olsen.[8] Ashmore had starring roles on Animorphs as Jake and In a Heartbeat as Tyler Connell.[9][10] ; Shawn Ashmore: In December 2004, Ashmore was cast in the lead role in the SciFi Channel mini series Legend of Earthsea, based on the novels by Ursula K. Le Guin.[11] He played the role of Ged, a young wizard-in-training, who takes advice from a Magus (Danny Glover) and falls in love with Tenar (Kristin Kreuk), the protege of the High Priestess of the Tombs of Atuan (Isabella Rossellini).[12]
knowledge1: Paul Anka // Paul Anka Paul Albert Anka, (, Arabic: بول عنقا; born July 30, 1941) is a Canadian singer, songwriter and actor. Anka became famous during the late 1950s, 1960s, and 1970s with hit songs like "Diana", "Lonely Boy", "Put Your Head on My Shoulder", and "(You're) Having My Baby". He wrote such well-known music as the theme for "The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson" and one of Tom Jones's biggest hits, "She's a Lady". He also wrote the English lyrics to Claude François and Jacques Revaux's music for Frank Sinatra's signature song, "My Way", which has been covered by many, including; Paul Anka // Christians. Anka's father (Andy) was Syrian-American from 'Uyūn al-Wādī, Syria, from the Na'Nou' (Arabic: نعنوع) family and his mother (Camelia) was Canadian-Lebanese "from the town of Kfar Mechki, Rashaya District, in Lebanon". Anka sang with the St. Elias Antiochian Orthodox Cathedral choir under the direction of Frederick Karam, with whom he studied music theory. He studied piano with Winnifred Rees. He attended Fisher Park High School, where he was part of a vocal trio called the Bobby Soxers. Paul Anka recorded his first single, "I Confess", when he was 14. In 1957, with $100 given to him by his uncle,; Paul Anka // her Polish Lowland Sheepdog after Anka. Series co-creator Daniel Palladino chose the name after hearing the "Rock Swings" album at a coffeehouse. In the cold open to the episode "The Real Paul Anka", both Paul Ankas were featured in a dream sequence Lorelai describes to her daughter, Rory. In 1978, Anka opened Jubilation, a restaurant and club considered one of the first modern-era nightclubs in Las Vegas; County Commissioner Chris Giunchigliani is its first female bartender. In 2012, Anka co-founded the holographic tech startup, ARHT Media. He is currently a member of ARHT Media's Board of Advisors, alongsisde Kevin O'Leary; Paul Anka // of the best moments of the show. In 1972, a street in Ottawa was named Paul Anka Drive. In 1981, the Ottawa City Council named August 26 as "Paul Anka Day" to celebrate his quarter-century in show business. Anka won the Juno Award for Composer of the Year (an award given for songwriting) in 1975. He has been nominated for Juno Awards many other times. He was inducted into the Canadian Music Hall of Fame in 1980. Anka was inducted into Canada's Walk of Fame in 2005. In the mid-1980s, Anka was secretly recorded while launching a tirade against his; Paul Anka // his career. This time he signed with United Artists and in 1974 teamed up with Odia Coates to record the 1 hit, "(You're) Having My Baby", exposing Anka to a new generation of fans and proved his staying power among his original fan base that was now maturing. Anka also wrote five songs which were included on an album by Don Goodwin. Anka and Coates would record two more duets that made it into the Top 10, "One Man Woman/One Woman Man" ( 7) and "I Don't Like to Sleep Alone" ( 8), and the 15 duet "(I Believe) There's [sep] knowledge2: Paul Anka: Paul Albert Anka OC (born July 30, 1941) is a Canadian and American singer, songwriter and actor. He is best known for his signature hit songs including "Diana", "Lonely Boy", "Put Your Head on My Shoulder", and "(You're) Having My Baby". Anka also wrote the theme for The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson; one of Tom Jones' biggest hits, "She's a Lady"; and the English lyrics to Claude François and Jacques Revaux's music for Frank Sinatra's signature song "My Way", which has been recorded by many, including Elvis Presley. He co-wrote three songs with Michael Jackson: "This Is It" (originally titled "I Never Heard")[1] "Love Never Felt So Good", and "Don't Matter to Me", which became posthumous hits for Jackson in 2009, 2014, and 2018, respectively. ; Paul Anka: Anka was born in Ottawa, Ontario, to Camelia (née Tannis) and Andrew Emile "Andy" Anka Sr., who owned a restaurant called the Locanda.[2] His father came to Canada from Bab Tuma, Damascus, Syria, and his mother was an immigrant from Lebanon.[3][4] His mother died when he was 18.[5] ; Paul Anka: Anka sang with the St. Elias Antiochian Orthodox Cathedral choir under the direction of Frederick Karam, with whom he studied music theory. He studied piano with Winnifred Rees.[6] He attended Fisher Park High School, where he was part of a vocal trio called the Bobby Soxers.[7][8] ; Paul Anka: Anka recorded his first single, "I Confess", when he was 14. In 1956, with $100 given to him by his uncle, he went to New York City where he auditioned for Don Costa at ABC Records, singing what was widely believed to be a lovestruck verse he had written to a former babysitter. In an interview with NPR's Terry Gross in 2005, he stated that it was to a girl at his church whom he hardly knew.[9] The resulting song "Diana" brought Anka stardom as it went to No. 1 on the Canadian and US music charts.[10] "Diana" is one of the best selling singles ever by a Canadian recording artist.[11] He followed up with four songs that made it into the Top 20 in 1958,[12] including "It's Time to Cry", which hit No. 4 and "(All of a Sudden) My Heart Sings", which reached No. 15, making him (at 17) one of the biggest teen idols of the time. He toured Britain, then Australia with Buddy Holly. Anka also wrote "It Doesn't Matter Anymore" – a song written for Holly, which Holly recorded just before he died in 1959. Anka stated shortly afterward: ; Paul Anka: Anka's talent included the theme for The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson (reworked in 1962 from a song Anka wrote earlier called "Toot Sweet"; it had been rewritten with lyrics and recorded by Annette Funicello in 1959 as "It's Really Love").[14] He wrote "Teddy" – a Top 20 hit for Connie Francis in 1960. Anka wrote the English lyrics to "My Way", Frank Sinatra's signature song (originally the French song "Comme d'habitude"). In the 1960s, Anka began acting in motion pictures as well as writing songs for them, most notably the theme for the hit film The Longest Day (which also was the official march of the Canadian Airborne Regiment), in which he made a cameo appearance as a U.S. Army Ranger. For his film work he wrote and recorded one of his greatest hits "Lonely Boy". He also wrote and recorded "My Home Town", which was a No. 8 pop hit for him the same year. He then went on to become one of the first pop singers to perform at the Las Vegas casinos. In 1960, he appeared twice as himself in NBC's short-lived crime drama Dan Raven.
knowledge1: Tacko Fall // Tacko Fall Elhadji Tacko Sereigne Diop Fall (born December 10, 1995) is a Senegalese basketball player who currently plays college basketball for the UCF Knights. At , he is among the tallest college players in the US. Born and raised in Dakar, Senegal, Fall moved from Senegal to the United States at age 16. Initially, he played soccer and had no interest in basketball. Fall visited the International Sports Training Institute at Dakar, known as ISTI-Dakar, in Senegal. Fall lived with Ben Simmons for one year in Houston, Texas and played for his first organized basketball school team there. He; Tacko Fall // His younger brother was reportedly at age 7, while two of his uncles are . Tacko Fall Elhadji Tacko Sereigne Diop Fall (born December 10, 1995) is a Senegalese basketball player who currently plays college basketball for the UCF Knights. At , he is among the tallest college players in the US. Born and raised in Dakar, Senegal, Fall moved from Senegal to the United States at age 16. Initially, he played soccer and had no interest in basketball. Fall visited the International Sports Training Institute at Dakar, known as ISTI-Dakar, in Senegal. Fall lived with Ben Simmons for one; Tacko Fall // to his height and wingspan, Fall was one of the most highly scouted high school basketball centers in the country. Fall first played for Jamie's House Charter School in Houston, where his team won the state championship in 2012. Tacko played with ISTI all-stars summer travel team. He played in several NCAA certified events. Fall then attended with Liberty Christian Preparatory School in Tavares, Florida. With nearly forty different schools expressing interest in him, Fall committed to the University of Central Florida in Orlando, who had officially signed him on October 28, 2014. He would play with the UCF Knights; Tacko Fall // trained with Simmons and NBA Hall of Famer Hakeem Olajuwon. Fall went to Liberty Christian Prep (LCP), in Florida, for his final two years of high school, and now plays college basketball at the University of Central Florida (UCF). Given his size, he plays the center position. His shoe size is 22 and he has large hands with an armspan of and a standing reach of . Fall is and was still growing around his senior year, making him the tallest high school basketball player in the country while he played for Jamie's House Charter and Liberty Christian Prep. Due [sep] knowledge2: Tacko Fall: Elhadji Tacko Sereigne Diop Fall (born December 10, 1995) is a Senegalese professional basketball player for the Nanjing Monkey Kings of the Chinese Basketball Association (CBA). ; Tacko Fall: Fall was born and raised in Dakar, Senegal. He moved to the United States at age 16 and later played college basketball for the University of Central Florida (UCF). Fall went undrafted in the 2019 NBA draft, but later signed with the Boston Celtics. During his two seasons in Boston, he became a fan favorite.[1] He signed with the Cleveland Cavaliers as a free agent in 2021.[2] ; Tacko Fall: At 7 feet 6 inches (2.29 metres), Fall was one of the tallest NBA players and is one of the tallest living humans.[3][4] At the 2019 NBA Draft Combine, his measurements set all-time NBA records for tallest height in shoes (7 ft 7 in; 2.31 m), longest wingspan (8 ft 2.25 in; 250 cm), and highest standing reach (10 ft 2.5 in; 3.11 m).[5] The NBA now lists players' heights without shoes, so Fall is listed at 7 ft 6 in (2.29 m).[6][7] ; Tacko Fall: Fall was born and raised in Dakar, Senegal. In 2011, Senegalese basketball coach Ibrahima N'Diaye, the brother of former NBA player Mamadou N'Diaye, heard from a friend about an exceptionally tall teenager he had seen playing with friends in a local street.[8]  After identifying him, they visited the 15-year-old Fall—who already stood 7 ft 3 in (2.21 m) tall—at his home and persuaded Fall's mother, Marianne Diop Sene, to allow Fall to start attending N'Diaye's basketball academy.[8] Fall moved to the United States at age 16. He first played organized basketball in Houston, Texas, and trained with NBA Hall of Famer Hakeem Olajuwon.[9] ; Tacko Fall: He was listed as 7 ft 6 in (2.29 m) and was purportedly still growing around his senior year, making him the tallest high school basketball player in the country while he played for Jamie's House Charter and Liberty Christian Prep.[10]
knowledge1: Phife Dawg // Phife Dawg Malik Izaak Taylor (November 20, 1970March 22, 2016), known professionally as Phife Dawg (or simply Phife), was an American rapper and a member of the group A Tribe Called Quest with Q-Tip and Ali Shaheed Muhammad (and for a short time Jarobi White). He was also known as the "Five-Foot Assassin" and "The Five-Footer", because he stood at . Phife Dawg initially formed A Tribe Called Quest, then simply named Quest, with childhood friend Q-Tip and DJ Ali Shaheed Muhammad in 1985; the group was later expanded with the addition of Jarobi White. A Tribe Called Quest were; Phife Dawg // features Dwele and Mike City. The album is set to feature the previously released singles "Nutshell" and "Dear Dilla". It is unknown, however, if "Sole Men" will be included. Phife Dawg was born Malik Izaak Taylor to Cheryl Allison Boyce-Taylor and Walt Taylor on November 20, 1970. He was born premature and his twin Mikal died shortly after birth. His mother, who was born in Arima, Trinidad and Tobago, moved to St Albans in Queens, New York when she was 13 years old. Phife described himself as a "West Indian" of Trinidadian descent. He was a cousin of writer Zinzi; Phife Dawg // greatest hip-hop albums ever released. Phife Dawg Malik Izaak Taylor (November 20, 1970March 22, 2016), known professionally as Phife Dawg (or simply Phife), was an American rapper and a member of the group A Tribe Called Quest with Q-Tip and Ali Shaheed Muhammad (and for a short time Jarobi White). He was also known as the "Five-Foot Assassin" and "The Five-Footer", because he stood at . Phife Dawg initially formed A Tribe Called Quest, then simply named Quest, with childhood friend Q-Tip and DJ Ali Shaheed Muhammad in 1985; the group was later expanded with the addition of Jarobi White.; Phife Dawg // and by 2012 he once again required a transplant. Phife died in his home in Contra Costa County, California, on March 22, 2016, due to complications relating to diabetes, at the age of 45. Phife has been described as having had a "self-deprecating swagger", and his work with A Tribe Called Quest helped to challenge the "macho posturing" of rap and hip-hop music during the late 1980s and early 1990s. Phife's work has been cited as an influence on Kanye West, Jill Scott, The Roots and Common, while the 1991 album "The Low End Theory" is considered one of the; Phife Dawg // closely associated with fellow hip-hop acts De La Soul and Jungle Brothers, with the groups being collectively known as the Native Tongues. A Tribe Called Quest were initially offered a demo deal by Geffen Records in 1989, but signed to Jive Records to release their 1990 début "People's Instinctive Travels and the Paths of Rhythm". Phife Dawg's contributions to the group increased on their second album, 1991's "The Low End Theory", which saw Phife—often referring to himself as "the Five-Foot Assassin"—rapping about social and political issues; the record has since been acclaimed by critics and fellow musicians. The group released [sep] knowledge2: Phife Dawg: Malik Izaak Taylor[2] (November 20, 1970 – March 22, 2016), known professionally as Phife Dawg (or simply Phife), was an American rapper and a member of the group A Tribe Called Quest with Q-Tip and Ali Shaheed Muhammad (and for a short time Jarobi White). He was also known as the "Five-Foot Assassin" and "the Five-Footer", because he stood at 5 feet 3 inches (1.60 m). ; Phife Dawg: Phife Dawg was born Malik Izaak Taylor on November 20, 1970, in Queens, New York City, the son of Trinidadian immigrant parents Cheryl Boyce-Taylor, a poet, and Walt Taylor.[3][4][5] Born prematurely, his twin brother Mikal died shortly after birth.[6] His mother settled in the St. Albans neighborhood of Queens, where Phife Dawg was raised, when she was 13 years old.[5] He was a cousin of writer Zinzi Clemmons.[7] ; Phife Dawg: He first met his friend Q-Tip at the age of two, and at nine years old, Phife Dawg suggested that they should rap, after hearing "Rapper's Delight" by the Sugarhill Gang for the first time.[8][9] He attended Pine Forge Academy, a Seventh-day Adventist boarding school near Philadelphia, for his freshman year of high school, later transferring to Springfield Gardens High School in Queens.[10] ; Phife Dawg: Phife Dawg formed A Tribe Called Quest, then simply named Quest, with Q-Tip and DJ Ali Shaheed Muhammad in 1985;[1] the group was later expanded with the addition of Jarobi White. A Tribe Called Quest were closely associated with fellow hip-hop acts De La Soul and Jungle Brothers, with the groups collectively known as the Native Tongues.[11] A Tribe Called Quest was initially offered a demo deal by Geffen Records in 1989, but signed to Jive Records to release its 1990 début People's Instinctive Travels and the Paths of Rhythm.[11] ; Phife Dawg: Phife Dawg's contributions to the group increased on its second album, 1991's The Low End Theory, which saw Phife—often calling himself "the Five-Foot Assassin"—rapping about social and political issues; the record has since been acclaimed by critics and musicians.[11] The group released three more albums that decade—Midnight Marauders in 1993, Beats, Rhymes and Life in 1996, and The Love Movement in 1998—before disbanding as a result of conflict both with their record label and internally. The group's troubles, especially the sometimes tense relationship between Phife and Q-Tip, were featured in the 2011 documentary Beats, Rhymes & Life: The Travels of A Tribe Called Quest, directed by Michael Rapaport.[11]
knowledge1: Jose Canseco // Jose Canseco José Canseco Capas Jr. (born July 2, 1964), is a Cuban-American former Major League Baseball (MLB) outfielder and designated hitter. During his time with the Oakland A's, he established himself as one of the premier power hitters in the game. He won the Rookie of the Year (1986), and Most Valuable Player award (1988), and was a six-time All-Star. Canseco is a two-time World Series winner with the Oakland A's (1989) and the New York Yankees (2000). Canseco won the Silver Slugger award four times: three as an AL outfielder (1988, 1990, 1991), and once as a Designated; Jose Canseco // a suspect in a rape allegation in Las Vegas. He broke the news himself on Twitter, denying the allegations and posting pictures and defamatory information about his accuser. On June 7, 2013, Canseco was cleared of any wrongdoing following an investigation. He was never charged. Jose Canseco José Canseco Capas Jr. (born July 2, 1964), is a Cuban-American former Major League Baseball (MLB) outfielder and designated hitter. During his time with the Oakland A's, he established himself as one of the premier power hitters in the game. He won the Rookie of the Year (1986), and Most Valuable Player award; Jose Canseco // martial arts. Canseco was born in Havana, Cuba, the son of Jose Sr. and Barbara Canseco. He has a twin brother Ozzie, who is also a former major league player. When Fidel Castro came into power in 1959, Jose Sr., a territory manager for the oil and gasoline corporation Esso as well as a part-time English teacher, lost his job and eventually his home. The family was allowed to leave Cuba in 1965, when the twins were barely 1 year old, and settled in the Miami area, where Jose Sr. became a territory manager for another oil and gasoline concern,; Jose Canseco // Amoco, and a part-time security guard. The younger Jose Canseco played baseball at Miami Coral Park High School, where he failed to make the varsity team until his senior year. He was named Most Valuable Player of the junior varsity team in his junior year, and of the varsity team the following year. He graduated in 1982 and was drafted by the Oakland Athletics. The Oakland Athletics drafted Canseco in the 15th round of the 1982 Major League Baseball draft. He made his professional baseball debut with the Miami Marlins of the Florida State League and also played minor league; Jose Canseco // baseball with the Medford A's, Madison Muskies, Idaho Falls A's, and the Modesto A's. Canseco started the 1985 season with the Class-AA Huntsville Stars and became known as "Parkway Jose" for his long home runs (25 in half a season) that went close to the Memorial Parkway behind Joe Davis Stadium. Canseco was nicknamed "The Natural", with some analyst saying he was the best prospect since Willie Mays. Former Oakland A's hitting coach Bob Watson said that Canseco was a mixture of Roberto Clemente, Dale Murphy, and Reggie Jackson. While others touted Canseco as the next Micky Mantle. In 1985, [sep] knowledge2: Jose Canseco: José Canseco Capas Jr. (born July 2, 1964),[1] nicknamed "Parkway Jose", "Mr. 40-40", and "El Cañonero Cubano" (The Cuban Cannon), is a Cuban-American former professional baseball outfielder and designated hitter who played 17 seasons in Major League Baseball (MLB). During his time with the Oakland Athletics, he established himself as one of the premier power hitters in the game. He won the Rookie of the Year (1986), and Most Valuable Player award (1988), and was a six-time All-Star. Canseco is a two-time World Series champion with the Oakland Athletics (1989) and the New York Yankees (2000). ; Jose Canseco: In 1988, Canseco became the first player in MLB history to hit 40 home runs and steal 40 bases in one season. He won the Silver Slugger Award four times: three as an American League (AL) outfielder (1988, 1990, 1991), and once as a designated hitter (1998). He ranks fourth all time in Athletics history with 254 home runs and is one of 14 players in MLB history with 400 home runs and 200 stolen bases. Despite many injuries during the later part of his career, Canseco averaged 40 home runs, 120 runs batted in, and 102 runs scored every 162 games, playing a total of 1,887 games in 17 seasons with seven different teams. His 462 career home runs are the 12th-highest total in AL history.  ; Jose Canseco: Canseco admitted using performance-enhancing drugs during his major-league playing career, and in 2005 wrote a tell-all book, Juiced: Wild Times, Rampant 'Roids, Smash Hits & How Baseball Got Big, in which he said that the vast majority of MLB players use steroids. After retiring from MLB, he also competed in boxing and mixed martial arts. ; Jose Canseco: Canseco was born in Havana, Cuba, the son of Jose Sr. and Barbara Canseco. He has a twin brother, Ozzie Canseco, who is also a former major league player. When Fidel Castro came into power in 1959, Jose Sr., a territory manager for the oil and gasoline corporation Esso as well as a part-time English teacher, lost his job and eventually his home. The family was allowed to leave Cuba in 1965, when the twins were barely 1 year old, and settled in the Miami area, where Jose Sr. became a territory manager for another oil and gasoline concern, Amoco, and a part-time security guard.[citation needed] ; Jose Canseco: The younger Jose Canseco played baseball at Miami Coral Park High School, where he failed to make the varsity team until his senior year. He was named Most Valuable Player of the junior varsity team in his junior year, and of the varsity team the following year. He graduated in 1982.[1]
knowledge1: Carrie Ann Inaba // Carrie Ann Inaba Carrie Ann Inaba (born January 5, 1968) is an American dancer, choreographer, television dance competition judge, actress, game show host, and singer. She is best known for her work on ABC TV's "Dancing with the Stars", and as Fook Yu in "Austin Powers in Goldmember". She started her career as a singer in Japan, but became best known for her dancing, first introducing herself to American audiences as one of the original Fly Girls on the Fox sketch comedy series "In Living Color" from 1990 to 1992. Inaba was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii, graduating from; Carrie Ann Inaba // Punahou School in 1986. She is of Irish, Chinese, and Japanese descent. Her first dance instruction was at three years old in a "creative movement" class, where children danced on their own with scarves. As a child, she would dance in her backyard that overlooked the Pacific Ocean. She attended Sophia University and University of California, Irvine before graduating from the University of California, Los Angeles with a B.A. degree in world arts and cultures. In 1986, an 18-year-old Inaba won a talent show in Hawaii. She was then groomed to be a pop star in Japan, given songs to; Carrie Ann Inaba // gives her, in her words, a "soft-focus morning" until she's ready to "deal with the world." She also revealed that she suffers from spinal stenosis, which she thinks began with a neck injury during gymnastics when she was eight years old. She also has Sjogren's Syndrome, a chronic autoimmune inflammatory disease that destroys moisture producing glands. As the Sjogren Syndrome Foundation's National Awareness Ambassador & Spokesperson, she has expressed her commitment to increasing awareness of SS and promoting funding for research, treatment, and a cure. Inaba has worked with the Entertainment Industry Foundation's iParticipate campaign, an American volunteer advocacy group,; Carrie Ann Inaba // and Drea's Dream, a dance therapy initiative for children who have cancer. She's also a founding member of Nigel Lythgoe's dance education organization, the Dizzy Feet Foundation. After her mother's battle with cancer in 2008, both women began to participate in the EIF Revlon Run/Walk for Women. Prevention magazine called her judging style "warm, cheerful, and empathetic." Carrie Ann Inaba Carrie Ann Inaba (born January 5, 1968) is an American dancer, choreographer, television dance competition judge, actress, game show host, and singer. She is best known for her work on ABC TV's "Dancing with the Stars", and as Fook Yu; Carrie Ann Inaba // read phonetically in Japanese from a lyric sheet. Even though her first single made the Top 50, she "realized it has nothing to do with how artistic you are. Your face becomes a logo they sell." Inaba, lived in Tokyo from 1986 to 1988 and was a popular singer. She released three singles, "Party Girl" (backed with "China Blue"), "Be Your Girl" (backed with "6½ Capezio"), and "Yume no Senaka" (backed with "Searching") and hosted weekly radio and television series. After returning to America, Inaba appeared as one of the "Fly Girls"—a group of backup dancers on the television series [sep] knowledge2: Carrie Ann Inaba: Carrie Ann Inaba (born January 5, 1968)[1] is an American television personality, dancer, choreographer, actress, and singer. She is best known for her work on ABC TV's Dancing with the Stars for which she has served as a judge since 2005. She co-hosted and moderated the CBS Daytime talk show, The Talk from 2019 to 2021. She started her career as a singer in Japan, but became best known for her dancing, introducing herself to American audiences as one of the original Fly Girls on the Fox sketch comedy series In Living Color from 1990 to 1992. ; Carrie Ann Inaba: Inaba was born and raised in Honolulu, Hawaii,[2] graduating from Punahou School in 1986.[3] She is of Irish, Japanese, and Chinese descent.[4][5] Her first dance instruction was at three years old in a "creative movement" class, where children danced on their own with scarves.[6] As a child, she would dance in her backyard that overlooked the Pacific Ocean.[5] ; Carrie Ann Inaba: She attended Sophia University and University of California, Irvine before graduating from the University of California, Los Angeles with a B.A. degree in world arts and cultures.[7] ; Carrie Ann Inaba: In 1986, an 18-year-old Inaba won a talent show in Hawaii.[4] She was then groomed to be a pop star in Japan and given songs to read phonetically in Japanese from a lyric sheet.[4] Even though her first single made the Top 50, she "realized it has nothing to do with how artistic you are. Your face becomes a logo they sell."[4] Inaba lived in Tokyo from 1986 to 1988 and was a popular singer.[6] She released three singles, "Party Girl" (backed with "China Blue"), "Be Your Girl" (backed with "6½ Capezio"), and "Yume no Senaka" (backed with "Searching") and hosted weekly radio and television series.[8] ; Carrie Ann Inaba: Inaba, to People magazine, on her experience as a Fly Girl on In Living Color[4]
knowledge1: Maurice Jones-Drew // Maurice Jones-Drew Maurice Christopher Jones-Drew (born March 23, 1985) is a former American football running back who played in the National Football League (NFL) for nine seasons. He played college football at UCLA and received consensus All-American recognition. Jones-Drew was selected by the Jacksonville Jaguars in the second round of the 2006 NFL Draft, 60th overall, was named to the Pro Bowl three times, and led the NFL in rushing yards in 2011. He played his first eight seasons with the Jaguars, through 2013. In his final season in 2014, he played for the Oakland Raiders. Following his retirement, Jones-Drew; Maurice Jones-Drew // legal surname affixed to his jersey, making him "Maurice Jones-Drew." Jones-Drew is a father of three with two sons (Maurice II and Madden) and one daughter (Alayah). He is married to Ashley Jones-Drew (2012–present) He is also a cousin of Tampa Bay Buccaneers safety T. J. Ward. Since retiring from the NFL, Jones-Drew has become a vegan. Maurice Jones-Drew Maurice Christopher Jones-Drew (born March 23, 1985) is a former American football running back who played in the National Football League (NFL) for nine seasons. He played college football at UCLA and received consensus All-American recognition. Jones-Drew was selected by the; Maurice Jones-Drew // entered broadcasting, serving as a football color analyst for "NFL Now" and other shows on NFL Network. He is currently the color analyst for the Los Angeles Rams. Born in Oakland, California, Jones-Drew's name at birth was Maurice Christopher Drew. He was raised in Antioch and graduated from De La Salle High School in Concord. De La Salle owns the longest winning streak in high school football history at 151 games. The Spartan football teams that Jones-Drew played on never lost a single game during his 3-year varsity career. He was an elusive, high-scoring running back and return specialist on; Maurice Jones-Drew // at UCLA in 2013 to complete his bachelor's degree, and lived in a dormitory. Born to Sidney Gayles and Andrea Drew, Jones-Drew was raised by his maternal grandparents, Maurice and Christina Jones. At the height of his college career in 2005, his grandfather died of a heart attack while watching him play at the Rose Bowl against Rice University on September 10. Coach Dorrell broke the news to Drew on the sideline during the game, and he ran to the locker room and left to go to the hospital. To honor the man who raised him, he had his entire; Maurice Jones-Drew // also ran track for the De La Salle track team and was a member of the Spartans' 4 x 100 metres relay state champion team, with a time of 42.20 seconds. At the age of 16, he posted a personal best time of 10.80 seconds in the 100 meters. He also ran for the Bruins' track team at UCLA. Jones-Drew accepted a football scholarship to University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA), where he played for the Bruins under head coach Karl Dorrell from 2003 to 2005. Despite being undersized, Jones-Drew led the Bruins in rushing all three years he was [sep] knowledge2: Maurice Jones-Drew: Maurice Christopher Jones-Drew[1] (born March 23, 1985), often called "MJD", is an American former football running back who played in the National Football League (NFL) for nine seasons. He played college football for the UCLA Bruins, earning unanimous All-American honors in 2005. ; Maurice Jones-Drew: Jones-Drew was selected by the Jacksonville Jaguars in the second round of the 2006 NFL Draft, 60th overall, was named to the Pro Bowl three times, and led the NFL in rushing yards in 2011. He played his first eight seasons with the Jaguars, through 2013. In his final season in 2014, he played for the Oakland Raiders. ; Maurice Jones-Drew: Following his retirement, Jones-Drew entered broadcasting, serving as a football color analyst for NFL Now and other shows on NFL Network, in addition to hosting for CBS Sports their Monday Night studio show for their UK networks.[2] He is currently the color analyst for the Los Angeles Rams.[3] ; Maurice Jones-Drew: De La Salle owns the longest winning streak in high school football history at 151 games.[5] The Spartan football teams that Jones-Drew played on never lost a single game during his three-year varsity career. He was an elusive, high-scoring running back and return specialist on offense and a punishing linebacker on defense. Jones-Drew somersaulted into the national consciousness as a high school junior in 2001 when he scored all four of De La Salle's touchdowns in a 29-15 nationally televised victory over Long Beach Poly on October 6.[6] It was the first game that ever matched up the nation's No. 1 and No. 2 ranked high school football teams.[7] On the Spartans' opening drive, Jones-Drew received a short pass in the right flat on third-and-eight from the Poly 25-yard line. He broke a tackle and then sprinted down the right sideline before launching a spectacular forward somersault into the end zone.[7] Drew next scored on a 29-yard reception on fourth down in which he ran a circle route out of the backfield down the left sideline and hauled in an over-the-shoulder touch pass at the goal line from quarterback Matt Gutierrez. Drew’s third touchdown came in the second quarter when he burst through the line, shook off two tacklers, before hitting paydirt 17 yards later. Drew’s final score salted away the historic De La Salle victory. It was a similar effort to his third touchdown and came on a 22-yard run with just under seven minutes remaining. Drew finished with nine carries for 86 yards and three catches for another 79 yards.[citation needed] ; Maurice Jones-Drew: During his junior season, Jones-Drew rushed for nearly 2,000 yards, averaged nearly 12 yards per carry, and scored 26 touchdowns. He was rated as a four-star recruit and ranked as the No. 1 all-purpose back in the nation in 2003 by Rivals.com.[8] He is pictured outrunning a slew of defenders on the cover of the book When the Game Stands Tall, which chronicles the De La Salle Spartans' all-time-record 151-game winning streak.[9]
knowledge1: Raúl Esparza // 2011 and opened on March 17, 2011. Esparza appeared in the musical "Leap of Faith" in the role of the "Reverend" Jonas Nightingale. He was involved in the workshop in 2008, the out-of-town tryout at the Ahmanson Theatre (Los Angeles) in 2010, and the Broadway production in 2012, for which he received a 2012 Drama Desk Award nomination for Outstanding Actor in a Musical. In 1999, Esparza portrayed Che in the national tour of "Evita", opposite Natalie Toro. The tour was intended to open on Broadway, but failed to do so. In 2001, he appeared Off-Broadway in "tick, tick... BOOM!" [sep] knowledge2: Raúl Esparza: A Broadway ha recitato in Rocky Horror Show (2000), Cabaret (2002), Taboo (2003), Chitty Chitty Bang Bang (2005), Company (2006), Il ritorno a casa (2008), Speed-the-plow (2009), Arcadia (2011) e Leap of Faith (2012). Altre interpretazioni teatrali di rilievo sono state quelle in Evita (1998), Sunday in the Park with George (2002), Merrily We Roll Along (2002), Hair (2004) e The Craddle Will Rock (2013).
knowledge1: Tony Bellew // Tony Bellew Anthony Lewis Bellew (born 30 November 1982) is a British former professional boxer who competed from 2007 to 2018. He held the WBC cruiserweight title from 2016 to 2017, and challenged once for the undisputed championship in his final fight. At regional level, Bellew held the British and Commonwealth light-heavyweight titles between 2010 and 2014, the European cruiserweight title from 2015 to 2016, and is a three-time ABA heavyweight champion as an amateur. Outside of boxing, he featured in the 2015 film "Creed". Fighting out of Liverpool's Rotunda ABC, Bellew claimed both the 2002 and 2003 novice ABA; Tony Bellew // ring to the theme from "Z-Cars", the same song that the players enter the pitch to during matches at Everton's home ground (Goodison Park). Tony Bellew Anthony Lewis Bellew (born 30 November 1982) is a British former professional boxer who competed from 2007 to 2018. He held the WBC cruiserweight title from 2016 to 2017, and challenged once for the undisputed championship in his final fight. At regional level, Bellew held the British and Commonwealth light-heavyweight titles between 2010 and 2014, the European cruiserweight title from 2015 to 2016, and is a three-time ABA heavyweight champion as an amateur. Outside [sep] knowledge2: Tony Bellew: Anthony Lewis Bellew (born 30 November 1982) is an English former professional boxer who competed from 2007 to 2018, and has since worked as a boxing analyst and commentator. He held the WBC cruiserweight title from 2016 to 2017, and challenged for the undisputed cruiserweight championship in 2018. At regional level, he held the British and Commonwealth light-heavyweight titles between 2010 and 2014, the European cruiserweight title from 2015 to 2016, and is a three-time ABA heavyweight champion as an amateur.[2] He portrayed antagonist boxer Ricky Conlan in the films Creed and Creed III. ; Tony Bellew: Anthony Lewis Bellew was born in the Toxteth area of Liverpool on 30 November 1982,[3] the son of a black mother and white father.[4][5] He first lived on Mulgrave Street in Toxteth, later moving to Smithdown Road in nearby Wavertree.[6] ; Tony Bellew: Bellew made his professional boxing debut on 6 October 2007 with a 2nd-round TKO against journeyman Jamie Ambler.[7] He followed up the victory with further wins in 2007 over Adam Wilcox, fighting at the Millennium Stadium in Cardiff and Wayne Brooks at the Bolton Arena.[8] ; Tony Bellew: In 2008 Bellew defeated Paul Bonson, Ayitey Powers, Hastings Rasani, Jevgēņijs Andrejevs, and Phil Goodwin to take his record up to 8–0. During 2009 he advanced to an unbeaten 12–0 with further wins against Matthew Ellis, Nick Okoth, Jindrich Velecky, and Martial Bella Oleme.[8] ; Tony Bellew: On 12 March 2010 Bellew challenged for the vacant Commonwealth light-heavyweight title, defeating Atoli Moore at the Echo Arena in Liverpool.[9] He made his first defence of the title on 24 September 2010, defeating Bob Ajisafe at the Grosvenor House Hotel in London with Bellew having to recover from a flash knockdown during the fight.[2] He made his second defence of the title on 9 December 2010, returning to the Echo Arena to stop former Commonwealth champion Ovill McKenzie in the eighth-round despite suffering two knockdowns himself in both the first and second rounds.[10]
knowledge1: Daniel Bedingfield // and mentors in the voluntary sector and business world. His mother, Molly Bedingfield, is founder and CEO of Global Angels, for which Daniel is doing fundraising work. Bedingfield also helped to launch the Stop the Traffik coalition against modern day slavery. ! Year !! Awards !! Category !! Work !! Result Daniel Bedingfield Daniel John Bedingfield (born 3 December 1979) is an English-New Zealand singer, songwriter and record producer. He is the brother of fellow singers Natasha Bedingfield and Nikola Rachelle. He was a judge on "The X Factor New Zealand" in 2013. He released his first single, "Gotta Get; Daniel Bedingfield // Daniel Bedingfield Daniel John Bedingfield (born 3 December 1979) is an English-New Zealand singer, songwriter and record producer. He is the brother of fellow singers Natasha Bedingfield and Nikola Rachelle. He was a judge on "The X Factor New Zealand" in 2013. He released his first single, "Gotta Get Thru This" in November 2001. It gathered momentum on white label through the UK garage music scene, and peaked at number one on the UK Singles Chart. He has since had two more number-one singles on the chart ― "If You're Not The One" and "Never Gonna Leave Your Side" ―; Daniel Bedingfield // first English language single "I Did It". He was also the group's vocal director. In 2015 he co-wrote the song "Testify" which was included on "The X Factor UK" 2014 winner Ben Haenow's self-titled debut studio album. From February 2016, Bedingfield appeared in the West End musical "The War of the Worlds" as The Artilleryman. While on holiday visiting his parents in New Zealand in 2004, Bedingfield nearly lost his life in a serious car accident. As a result, he was left with severe head and neck injuries because of the car rolling on him. His parents are leadership trainers; Daniel Bedingfield // He co-wrote the song "Works for Me!" for "American Idol" finalist David Archuleta. He has also worked with Pixie Lott, and contributed guest vocals on a track by a former member of The Roots. In December 2009, he co-wrote material with Tessanne Chin as well as recorded three songs with Busy Signal at DJ Karim's Stainless Records studios in Kingston, Jamaica. Bedingfield provided backing vocals for the Kirsten Morrell track "He Walked In" from the album Ultraviolet, which was released in May 2010. In December 2010, Bedingfield spent a month in Tel Aviv, Israel, where he wrote and recorded a; Daniel Bedingfield // song with a local freak folk band, The Raw Men Empire. He concluded his visit with a Tel Aviv gig, hosting Uzi Feinerman, The Raw Men Empire and a variety of other Israeli musicians. In July 2011, he recorded on a dancehall riddim called the Overproof Riddim. Like many of the songs on this riddim, it has been getting good rotation in Jamaica. In February 2012, Bedingfield released the single "Rocks Off" with an accompanying video on MTV which can be viewed here. "Rocks Off" was released alongside B-side "It's Not Me, It's You". On 24 April, Bedingfield released the [sep] knowledge2: Daniel Bedingfield: Daniel John Bedingfield (born 3 December 1979) is a New Zealand-British singer, songwriter, record producer and actor. He is the eldest brother of fellow singers Natasha Bedingfield and Nikola Rachelle. He was a judge on The X Factor New Zealand in 2013. ; Daniel Bedingfield: Bedingfield spent much of his early life in Auckland, New Zealand, and attended Lynfield College.[2] ; Daniel Bedingfield: He released his first single, "Gotta Get Thru This" in November 2001. It gathered momentum on white label through the UK garage music scene, and peaked at number one on the UK Singles Chart. He has since had two more number-one singles on the chart, "If You're Not the One" and "Never Gonna Leave Your Side", as well as three further top ten hits. His debut album, also titled Gotta Get Thru This, which was recorded at home using Making Waves Audio software and Reason,[3][4] peaked at number two on the UK Albums Chart and went on to sell more than 4 million copies worldwide.[5] ; Daniel Bedingfield: In 2004, Bedingfield won a BRIT Award for Best British Male Artist. He then moved to the Universal Music subsidiary label Polydor Records to release his second album, Second First Impression, which reached number 8 in the UK. The album sold poorly compared to his first offering, though it did include two UK Top 20 singles, "Nothing Hurts Like Love" (which reached number three) and "Wrap My Words Around You" (which peaked at number 12). The third and final single, "The Way", became his first to miss the top 40, reaching number 41. The album was also released in Singapore (featuring 'If You're Not The One' as a bonus track). ; Daniel Bedingfield: In an interview with the New Zealand Herald in April 2007, Bedingfield said that, after a four-year hiatus, he had three albums recorded and awaiting release.[6]
knowledge1: Prince Carl Philip, Duke of Värmland // 2011, Prince Carl Philip finished his studies in Agricultural and Rural Management at the Swedish University of Agricultural Sciences in Alnarp. Prince Carl Philip has been a scout and is fond of outdoor life. He is keen on sport and athletics, especially football, swimming, sailing and skiing. In 2003, he completed the historic Swedish "Vasaloppet", the longest cross country ski race in the world. Carl Philip also enjoys car racing, a passion he inherited from his great-uncle and godfather, Prince Bertil, and has a licence to compete. Prince Carl Philip has taken part in the racing series Porsche Carrera Cup [sep] knowledge2: Wedding of Prince Carl Philip and Sofia Hellqvist: The prince's close friend Jan-Åke Hansson served as his best man. The Prince's niece Princess Estelle, his cousin Patrick's children Anaïs Sommerlath and Chloé Sommerlath and Sofia's goddaughter Tiara Larsson served as bridesmaids. Sofia was escorted halfway down the aisle by her father. She and Prince Carl Philip walked together for the other half. During the marriage ceremony lead vocals were performed by Salem Al Fakir, David Pagmar and Samuel Ljungblahd.[8]
knowledge1: Chris Woakes // bat as England 321/8. He took figures of 2–75 as England won by five runs. In the first ODI against the West Indies Woakes took figures of 4–47 as England won by 45 runs. He took 0–28 in the second ODI and then made an unbeaten 68 with the bat as England won by four wickets. In the final match of the series Woakes made 13 and then took figures of 3–16 as England won by 186 runs. Chris Woakes Christopher Roger "Chris" Woakes (born 2 March 1989) is an English cricketer who plays for Warwickshire and England. He is; Chris Woakes // his first Test century against India (137 not out) at the 2nd Test at Lord's in August 2018. Woakes was born in March 1989 in Birmingham, and attended Barr Beacon Language College from 2000–2007. He began playing cricket when he was seven years old. He started out with Aston Manor Cricket Club. He then played three games in the 2006 Minor Counties Trophy for Herefordshire, and for Warwickshire's under-15, under-17, Academy and Second XI teams between 2004 and 2007. He obtained 10 GCSEs including A's in Health and Social, Childcare, Hospitality and Business. Chris married his long term girlfriend Amie; Chris Woakes // able to pick up the wickets of Ricky Ponting and Mike Hussey. Woakes claimed his 200th first-class wicket in Warwickshire's victory over Sussex in the County Championship in July 2011. Woakes made his International Twenty20 debut on 12 January 2011 against Australia in Adelaide. Opening the bowling, he took figures of 1/34, taking the wicket of Australian captain Cameron White with his final delivery. He later scored the winning runs, as England won off the last ball with just one wicket left and one run required. In the second match he made 11 not out and took 1–29 with the [sep] knowledge2: Chris Woakes: Christopher Roger Woakes (born 2 March 1989) is an English cricketer who plays internationally for England in all formats. In domestic cricket, he represents Warwickshire, and has played in multiple Twenty20 leagues, including for Kolkata Knight Riders, Royal Challengers Bangalore and Delhi Capitals in the Indian Premier League. ; Chris Woakes: Woakes made his One Day International (ODI) and Twenty20 International (T20I) debuts in 2011, and Test debut in 2013. He was part of the England teams that won the 2019 Cricket World Cup[2] and 2022 T20 World Cup.[3] ; Chris Woakes: Woakes plays as a right-handed all-rounder, bowling fast medium. ; Chris Woakes: Woakes was born in March 1989 in Birmingham, he attended Barr Beacon Language College in Walsall from 2000 to 2007. He began playing cricket when he was seven years old with Four Oaks Saints Cricket Club.  He played three games in the 2006 Minor Counties Trophy for Herefordshire County Cricket Club, and played for Warwickshire's under-15, under-17, academy and Second XI teams between 2004 and 2007.[4] Woakes is an avid supporter of local football club Aston Villa F.C.[5] He was a trainee footballer with Walsall F.C. as a winger until the age of 14.[6] ; Chris Woakes: Woakes represented Warwickshire in one match during the 2006 season, during a West Indian tour of England. Woakes picked up three wickets in the match. He has since represented Warwickshire in the Second XI Championship.[7]
knowledge1: Aleksandar Kolarov // Aleksandar Kolarov Aleksandar Kolarov (, ; born 10 November 1985) is a Serbian professional footballer who plays for Italian club Roma and captains the Serbia national team. Although primarily a left-back, Kolarov can also operate as a centre-back and anywhere along the left flank and is known for his overlapping attacking runs on the wing, his powerful ball-striking ability with his left foot, and his accuracy from free kicks. He was named Serbian Player of the Year in 2011. Kolarov began his career at Red Star Belgrade, but he did not break through and moved onto Čukarički in 2004. Two; Aleksandar Kolarov // years later, he joined OFK Beograd before moving abroad for the first time by signing for Lazio in Serie A, where he won the Coppa Italia and Supercoppa Italiana in 2009. In 2010, he joined Manchester City, with which he won two Premier League titles, the FA Cup and the League Cup. Kolarov made his senior international debut for Serbia in 2008 and has since earned over 70 caps. Kolarov was a member of Serbia's squads for the 2008 Olympics, 2010 FIFA World Cup and the 2018 FIFA World Cup. Kolarov's football career started in the Red Star Belgrade youth; Aleksandar Kolarov // president of OFK) who made sure young promising players signed for OFK and then raise their transfer price by making sure they get playing time in the under-21 national team. In December 2012, Kolarov appeared in a Christmas video uploaded to Manchester City's website, reciting the carol "Jingle Bells" in a deadpan style that went viral on the internet. Following the popularity from the last year's video, in December 2013 Kolarov delivered his rendition of "Santa Claus is Coming to Town" which also went viral following much anticipation. Lazio Manchester City Individual Aleksandar Kolarov Aleksandar Kolarov (, ; born 10; Aleksandar Kolarov // League for the first time, making his debut on 24 October 2007 away at Werder Bremen in a 2-1 victory. In his second season in Italy, Kolarov established himself as Lazio's first choice at left back, scoring a spectacular goal against Lecce at the Stadio Via del Mare. It got even better for the Serbian in the second "Derby della Capitale" of the season, against city rivals Roma. With Lazio 3–2 up, Kolarov received the ball in defence from goalkeeper Fernando Muslera and proceeded to run the length of the pitch virtually unopposed. Having run 85 metres, Kolarov then slotted; Aleksandar Kolarov // he scored a free-kick from long range. He also represented Serbia at the 2010 FIFA World Cup and played a major role in UEFA Euro 2012 qualifiers and friendlies. Kolarov was eventually rewarded for an impressive 2011 with the Serbian Footballer of the Year award. On 11 September 2012, Kolarov scored his first goal for Serbia during a 6–1 win against Wales in a 2014 World Cup qualifier. On 7 June 2013, he scored from a free kick against Belgium in a 2014 World Cup qualifier. On 7 September 2014, he scored the equalizer in a 1–1 draw with France. [sep] knowledge2: Aleksandar Kolarov: Aleksandar Kolarov (Serbian Cyrillic: Александар Коларов, Serbian pronunciation: [alɛksǎːndar kɔlǎrɔʋ]; born 10 November 1985) is a Serbian former professional footballer who played as a left back. ; Aleksandar Kolarov: Kolarov began his career at Red Star Belgrade, but he did not break through and moved onto Čukarički in 2004. Two years later, he joined OFK Beograd before moving abroad for the first time by signing for Lazio in Serie A, where he won the Coppa Italia and Supercoppa Italiana in 2009. In 2010, he joined Manchester City, with which he won two Premier League titles, the FA Cup and the League Cup. He returned to Serie A in 2017 and saw out the remaining five years of his career with Roma and Inter Milan. ; Aleksandar Kolarov: Kolarov made his senior international debut for Serbia in 2008 and earned 94 caps. Kolarov was a member of Serbia's squads for the 2008 Olympics,[3] 2010 FIFA World Cup and the 2018 FIFA World Cup. He was named Serbian Player of the Year in 2011. ; Aleksandar Kolarov: Kolarov's football career started in the Red Star Belgrade youth system.[4] He later joined the youth system of Obilić.[5] ; Aleksandar Kolarov: In 2004, 18-year-old Kolarov moved across Belgrade to Čukarički, which played in the top-tier Serbia-Montenegro League. Signing a three-year contract, he finished the 2003–04 season in the club's youth setup and during the summer of 2004 was introduced to the first-team squad. Making 27 league appearances in his debut season, the youngster left a good impression but could not help the beleaguered team avoid relegation.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Thomas Piketty // Thomas Piketty Thomas Piketty (; born 7 May 1971) is a French economist whose work focuses on wealth and income inequality. He is a professor (directeur d'études) at the School for Advanced Studies in the Social Sciences (EHESS), associate chair at the Paris School of Economics and Centennial professor at the International Inequalities Institute, which is part of the London School of Economics (LSE). Piketty is the author of the best-selling book "Capital in the Twenty-First Century" (2013), which emphasises the themes of his work on wealth concentrations and distribution over the past 250 years. The book argues that the; Thomas Piketty // book. Thomas Piketty Thomas Piketty (; born 7 May 1971) is a French economist whose work focuses on wealth and income inequality. He is a professor (directeur d'études) at the School for Advanced Studies in the Social Sciences (EHESS), associate chair at the Paris School of Economics and Centennial professor at the International Inequalities Institute, which is part of the London School of Economics (LSE). Piketty is the author of the best-selling book "Capital in the Twenty-First Century" (2013), which emphasises the themes of his work on wealth concentrations and distribution over the past 250 years. The book argues that; Thomas Piketty // serve as an economic advisor to Socialist Party candidate Ségolène Royal during the French presidential campaign. Piketty resumed teaching at the EHESS and Paris School of Economics in 2007. He is a columnist for the French newspaper "Libération", and occasionally writes op-eds for "Le Monde". Thomas Piketty was the partner of the politician Aurélie Filippetti. In 2009, she sued him for domestic violence. Thomas Piketty acknowledged the complaint and apologized, following which Aurélie Filipetti withdrew her complaint. In April 2012, Piketty co-authored along with 42 colleagues an open letter in support of then socialist party candidate for the French presidency; Thomas Piketty // rate of capital return in developed countries is persistently greater than the rate of economic growth, and that this will cause wealth inequality to increase in the future. To address this problem Piketty proposes redistribution through a progressive global tax on wealth. Piketty was born on 7 May 1971, in the Parisian suburb of Clichy, Hauts-de-Seine. His parents had been involved with a Trotskyist group and the May 1968 protests in Paris, but they had moved away from this political position before Piketty was born, and a visit to the Soviet Union in 1991 was enough to make him a [sep] knowledge2: Thomas Piketty: Thomas Piketty (French: [tɔmɑ pikɛti]; born 7 May 1971) is a French economist who is a professor of economics at the School for Advanced Studies in the Social Sciences, associate chair at the Paris School of Economics[1] and Centennial Professor of Economics in the International Inequalities Institute at the London School of Economics. ; Thomas Piketty: Piketty was born in the Parisian suburb of Clichy, Hauts-de-Seine. His parents had been involved with a Trotskyist group and the May 1968 protests in Paris but they had moved away from this political position before Piketty was born. A visit to the Soviet Union in 1991 was enough to make him a firm "believe[r] in capitalism, private property and the market".[5] ; Thomas Piketty: Piketty earned a C-stream (scientific) Baccalauréat, and after taking scientific preparatory classes, he entered the École Normale Supérieure (ENS) at the age of 18 where he studied mathematics and economics.[6] At the age of 22, Piketty was awarded his PhD for a thesis on wealth redistribution, which he wrote at the London School of Economics (LSE) and EHESS under Roger Guesnerie[7] and winning the French Economics Association's award for the best thesis of the year.[8] He also met Daron Acemoglu for the first time at the LSE, who was also a PhD student at the time.[9] ; Thomas Piketty: Piketty won the 2002 prize for the best young economist in France, and according to a list dated 11 November 2003, he is a member of the scientific orientation board of the association À gauche, en Europe, founded by Michel Rocard and Dominique Strauss-Kahn.[10] ; Thomas Piketty: In 2006, Piketty became the first head of the Paris School of Economics, which he helped set up.[11] He left after a few months to serve as an economic advisor to Socialist Party candidate Ségolène Royal during the French presidential campaign.[12][13] Piketty resumed teaching at the EHESS and Paris School of Economics in 2007.[14]
knowledge1: Cicero // Cicero Marcus Tullius Cicero (; ; 3 January 106 BC – 7 December 43 BC) was a Roman statesman, orator, lawyer and philosopher, who served as consul in the year 63 BC. He came from a wealthy municipal family of the Roman equestrian order, and is considered one of Rome's greatest orators and prose stylists. His influence on the Latin language was so immense that the subsequent history of prose, not only in Latin but in European languages up to the 19th century, was said to be either a reaction against or a return to his style. Cicero introduced the; Cicero // Cicero's character is depicted in a more balanced way than in those of McCullough, with his positive traits equaling or outweighing his weaknesses (while conversely Caesar is depicted as more sinister than in McCullough). Cicero is a major recurring character in the "Roma Sub Rosa" series of mystery novels by Steven Saylor. He also appears several times as a peripheral character in John Maddox Roberts' "SPQR" series. Cicero Marcus Tullius Cicero (; ; 3 January 106 BC – 7 December 43 BC) was a Roman statesman, orator, lawyer and philosopher, who served as consul in the year 63 BC. He; Personal life of Cicero // greater self-control and adversity with more fortitude!" wrote C. Asinius Pollio, a contemporary Roman statesman and historian. Cicero was born January 3, 106 BC, in Arpinum (modern-day Arpino), a hill town south of Rome. The Arpinians received Roman citizenship in 188 BC, but had started to speak Latin rather than their native Volscian before they were enfranchised by the Romans. The assimilation of nearby Italian communities into Roman society, which took place during the Second and First Centuries, made Cicero's future as a Roman statesman, orator and writer possible. Although a great master of Latin rhetoric and composition, Cicero was [sep] knowledge2: Cicero: Marcus Tullius Cicero[a] (/ˈsɪsəroʊ/ SISS-ə-roh; Latin: [ˈmaːrkʊs ˈtʊlli.ʊs ˈkɪkɛroː]; 3 January 106 BC – 7 December 43 BC) was a Roman statesman, lawyer, scholar, philosopher, writer and Academic skeptic,[4] who tried to uphold optimate principles during the political crises that led to the establishment of the Roman Empire.[5] His extensive writings include treatises on rhetoric, philosophy and politics. He is considered one of Rome's greatest orators and prose stylists and the innovator of what became known as "Ciceronian rhetoric".[6][7][8] Cicero was educated in Rome and in Greece. He came from a wealthy municipal family of the Roman equestrian order, and served as consul in 63 BC. ; Cicero: Though he was an accomplished orator and successful lawyer, Cicero believed his political career was his most important achievement. It was during his consulship that the Catiline conspiracy attempted to overthrow the government through an attack on the city by outside forces, and Cicero suppressed the revolt by summarily and controversially executing five conspirators without trial. During the chaotic middle period of the first century BC, marked by civil wars and the dictatorship of Julius Caesar, Cicero championed a return to the traditional republican government. Following Caesar's death, Cicero became an enemy of Mark Antony in the ensuing power struggle, attacking him in a series of speeches. He was proscribed as an enemy of the state by the Second Triumvirate and consequently executed by soldiers operating on their behalf in 43 BC, having been intercepted during an attempted flight from the Italian peninsula. His severed hands and head were then, as a final revenge of Mark Antony, displayed on the Rostra.[15] ; Cicero: Petrarch's rediscovery of Cicero's letters is often credited for initiating the 14th-century Renaissance in public affairs, humanism, and classical Roman culture.[16] According to Polish historian Tadeusz Zieliński, "the Renaissance was above all things a revival of Cicero, and only after him and through him of the rest of Classical antiquity."[17] The peak of Cicero's authority and prestige came during the 18th-century Enlightenment,[18] and his impact on leading Enlightenment thinkers and political theorists such as John Locke, David Hume, Montesquieu, and Edmund Burke was substantial.[19] His works rank among the most influential in global culture, and today still constitute one of the most important bodies of primary material for the writing and revision of Roman history, especially the last days of the Roman Republic.[20] ; Cicero: Marcus Tullius Cicero was born on 3 January 106 BC in Arpinum, a hill town 100 kilometers (62 mi) southeast of Rome.[21] He belonged to the tribus Cornelia.[22] His father was a well-to-do member of the equestrian order and possessed good connections in Rome. However, being a semi-invalid, he could not enter public life and studied extensively to compensate. Although little is known about Cicero's mother, Helvia, it was common for the wives of important Roman citizens to be responsible for the management of the household. Cicero's brother Quintus wrote in a letter that she was a thrifty housewife.[23] ; Cicero: Cicero's cognomen, a hereditary nickname, comes from the Latin for chickpea, cicer. Plutarch explains that the name was originally given to one of Cicero's ancestors who had a cleft in the tip of his nose resembling a chickpea.[24] Romans often chose down-to-earth personal surnames. The famous family names of Fabius, Lentulus, and Piso come from the Latin names of beans, lentils, and peas, respectively. Plutarch writes that Cicero was urged to change this deprecatory name when he entered politics, but refused, saying that he would make Cicero more glorious than Scaurus ("Swollen-ankled") and Catulus ("Puppy").[25]
knowledge1: John Craven // John Craven John Raymond Craven, (born 16 August 1940) is an English journalist and television presenter, best known for presenting the BBC programmes "Newsround", "Countryfile" and "Beat the Brain". Craven was born in Leeds, West Yorkshire and educated at Leeds Modern School. Craven's father was held as a prisoner of war in Japan for three years during World War II. He left school at 16 and began an apprenticeship at Yorkshire Copperworks, writing for the company magazine. He started his professional life in print journalism as a junior reporter on a local newspaper, the "Harrogate Advertiser", before working for the; John Craven // retired at some future time rather than give up the work he liked so much. In 1996, he was elected a member of the Royal Television Society, and awarded the RTS Baird Medal in 2002. He was awarded the OBE in the 2000 New Year Honours for services to rural and children's broadcasting. He is a fellow of the Linnean Society of London. In November 2011, Craven attended the British Academy Children's Awards to collect a Special Award for "Newsround" in recognition of its contribution to television. John Craven John Raymond Craven, (born 16 August 1940) is an English journalist [sep] knowledge2: John Craven: John Raymond Craven OBE FLS (born 16 August 1940) is an English journalist and television presenter, best known for presenting the BBC programmes Newsround, Countryfile and Beat the Brain.[2] ; John Craven: In 2015, he presented the BBC Two game show series Beat the Brain, which began airing on 11 May.[8] ; John Craven: Craven is one of nine presidents of the Young People's Trust for the Environment.[10] He is vice-president of the Waterways Trust and Patron of SPANA. On 10 July 2016, he was appointed as President of Radio Horton, the charitable hospital radio station for Banbury's Horton General Hospital.[11] ; John Craven (actor): Craven was born on June 22, 1916, in New York City. He was a third-generation actor, following in the profession of his father, Frank Craven, and his grandfather, John T. Craven.[1] His mother, Mary Blythe, was an actress prior to marriage.[2] ; John Craven (actor): Craven originated the role of George Gibbs in the original stage version of Our Town, in which his father played the stage manager.[1] Craven was overlooked in the movie version, however, with the part going to the then-unknown William Holden. Other Broadway shows in which Craven appeared included They Knew What They Wanted (1949), Spring Again (1941), Village Green (1941), Delicate Story (1940), Two On An Island (1940), Aries Is Rising (1939), and The Happiest Days (1939).[3]
knowledge1: A. K. Ramanujan // A. K. Ramanujan Attipate Krishnaswami Ramanujan (16 March 1929 – 13 July 1993) also known as A. K. Ramanujan was an Indian poet and scholar of Indian literature who wrote in both English and Kannada. Ramanujan was a poet, scholar, a philologist, folklorist, translator, and playwright. His academic research ranged across five languages: English, Kannada, Tamil, Telugu, and Sanskrit. He published works on both classical and modern variants of this literature and argued strongly for giving local, non-standard dialects their due. Though he wrote widely and in a number of genres, Ramanujan's poems are remembered as enigmatic works of startling; A. K. Ramanujan // the essay from its syllabus in Oct 2011. This led to protests by many historians and intellectuals, accusing Delhi University of succumbing to the "diktat" ("views") of non-historians. His works include translations from Old Tamil and Old Kannada, such as: Three Hundred Ramayanas: Five Examples and Three Thoughts on Translation Collected Essays of A. K. Ramanujan A. K. Ramanujan Attipate Krishnaswami Ramanujan (16 March 1929 – 13 July 1993) also known as A. K. Ramanujan was an Indian poet and scholar of Indian literature who wrote in both English and Kannada. Ramanujan was a poet, scholar, a philologist, folklorist, translator,; A. K. Ramanujan // originality, sophistication and moving artistry. He was awarded the Sahitya Akademi Award posthumously in 1999 for his collection of poems, "The Selected Poems". Ramanujan was born in Mysore City on 16 March 1929. His father, Attipat Asuri Krishnaswami, an astronomer and professor of mathematics at Mysore University, was known for his interest in English, Kannada and Sanskrit languages. His mother was a homemaker. Ramanujan also has a brother, A.K. Srinivasan who was a writer and a mathematician. Ramanujan was educated at Marimallappa's High School, Mysore, and at the Maharaja College of Mysore. In college, Ramanujan majored in science in his; A. K. Ramanujan // Colvin Professor in the Departments of South Asian Languages and Civilizations, of Linguistics, and in the Committee on Social Thought at the University of Chicago, and the same year, he received a MacArthur Fellowship. As an Indo-American writer Ramanujan had the experience of the native as well as of the foreign milieu. His poems such as the "Conventions of Despair" reflected his views on the cultures and conventions of the east and the west. He was awarded Sahitya Akademi Award in 1999 for his "Collected Poems". A. K. Ramanujan died in Chicago, on 13 July 1993 as result of adverse; A. K. Ramanujan // with the university throughout his career, teaching in several departments. He taught at other US universities as well, including Harvard University, University of Wisconsin, University of Michigan, University of California at Berkeley, and Carleton College. At the University of Chicago, Ramanujan was instrumental in shaping the South Asian Studies program. He worked in the departments of South Asian Languages and Civilizations, Linguistics, and with the Committee on Social Thought. In 1976, the Government of India awarded him the Padma Shri, and in 1983, he was given the MacArthur Prize Fellowship (Shulman, 1994). In 1983, he was appointed the William E. [sep] knowledge2: A. K. Ramanujan: Attipate Krishnaswami Ramanujan (16 March 1929 – 13 July 1993)[1][2] was an Indian poet and scholar[3] of Indian literature and linguistics. Ramanujan was also a professor of Linguistics at University of Chicago. ; A. K. Ramanujan: Ramanujan was a poet, scholar, linguist, philologist, folklorist, translator, and playwright.[4] His academic research ranged across five languages: English, Tamil, Kannada, Telugu, and Sanskrit. He published works on both classical and modern variants of this literature and argued strongly for giving local, non-standard dialects their due. Though he wrote widely and in a number of genres, Ramanujan's poems are remembered as enigmatic works of startling originality, sophistication and moving artistry. He was awarded the Sahitya Akademi Award posthumously in 1999 for The Collected Poems. ; A. K. Ramanujan: Ramanujan[5] was born in Mysore City on 16 March 1929. His father, Attipat Asuri Krishnaswami, an astrologer and professor of mathematics at Mysore University, was known for his interest in English, Kannada and Sanskrit languages. His mother was a homemaker. ; A. K. Ramanujan: Ramanujan was educated at Marimallappa's High School, Mysore, and at the Maharaja College of Mysore. In college, Ramanujan majored in science in his freshman year, but his father persuaded him to change his major from science to English.  Later, Ramanujan became a Fellow of Deccan College, Pune in 1958–59 and a Fulbright Scholar at Indiana University in 1959–62. He was educated in English at the University of Mysore and received his PhD in Linguistics from Indiana University.[6] ; A. K. Ramanujan: Ramanujan worked as a lecturer of English at Quilon and Belgaum; he later taught at The Maharaja Sayajirao University in Baroda for about eight years. In 1962, he joined the University of Chicago as an assistant professor. He was affiliated with the university throughout his career, teaching in several departments. He taught at other US universities as well, including Harvard University, University of Wisconsin, University of Michigan, University of California at Berkeley, and Carleton College. At the University of Chicago, Ramanujan was instrumental in shaping the South Asian Studies program. He worked in the departments of South Asian Languages and Civilizations, Linguistics, and with the Committee on Social Thought.
knowledge1: Riccardo Tisci // Riccardo Tisci Riccardo Tisci (; born 1974) is an Italian fashion designer. He studied in Italy at the Design Istituto d’Arte Applicata in Cantù until the age of 17, and then graduated from London's Central Saint Martins Academy in 1999. In 2005, Tisci was given the title of creative director for Givenchy Women's haute couture and ready-to-wear lines. In May 2008 he was additionally named as menswear and accessories designer of the Givenchy men's division. In March 2018, it was announced he had been appointed chief creative officer of Burberry, succeeding Christopher Bailey. Tisci's apparent fascination with Gothic touches (dark,; Riccardo Tisci // rappers Jay-Z and Kanye West to create the cover for "Watch the Throne", as well as the covers for singles H•A•M and Otis. He has now recently collaborated again with Kanye West for his label GOOD Music on their album "Cruel Summer". Riccardo Tisci Riccardo Tisci (; born 1974) is an Italian fashion designer. He studied in Italy at the Design Istituto d’Arte Applicata in Cantù until the age of 17, and then graduated from London's Central Saint Martins Academy in 1999. In 2005, Tisci was given the title of creative director for Givenchy Women's haute couture and ready-to-wear lines.; Riccardo Tisci // Tisci worked for companies such as Puma and Coccapani before signing a three-year contract with Ruffo Research, a company that has helped launch the careers of several fashion designers, such as Sophia Kokosalaki. Tisci has mentioned in an interview that he would like to work with an Iranian brand, although it is not known how realistic his wish is. Upon the expiration of his contract in July 2004, Tisci spent time living in India, where he began to work on his own collection. In September 2004, during the Milan Fashion Week, Tisci debuted his first Riccardo Tisci Collection for Fall; Riccardo Tisci // an elegance that is very modern, very contemporary and romantic at the same time". Tisci presented his first Givenchy haute couture collection in July 2005 during the Fashion Week in Paris. In February 2017 Tisci stepped down as creative director of Givenchy, "I now wish to focus on my personal interests and passions." Unlike the designers before him who succeeded Mr. Givenchy himself, Tisci has had particular success in haute couture, where he asserts "When I arrived we had five customers. Now we have 29." Riccardo Tisci's runway presentations are highly stylized in terms of architecture and space. Tisci says; Givenchy // of Alexander McQueen. In 2001, designer Julien Macdonald was appointed Artistic Director for the women's lines, which consist of haute couture and ready-to-wear. The reins for both collections were passed on to Riccardo Tisci in 2005 when he was named artistic director of womenswear. Riccardo Tisci has proposed to the House his own style and influences. By changing the house codes, Riccardo Tisci adds some dark and sensual romanticism touch. Extending the chromatic palette of the house, flashy colors, such as the baby blue and the red blood, metal, wildlife and floral prints, he designs an uncluttered, structured and graphic [sep] knowledge2: Riccardo Tisci: Riccardo Tisci (Italian pronunciation: [rikˈkardo ˈtiʃʃi]; born 1974)[1][2] is an Italian fashion designer. He studied in Italy at the Design Istituto d’Arte Applicata in Cantù until the age of 17, and then graduated from London's Central Saint Martins College of Art and Design in 1999. In 2005, Tisci was creative director for Givenchy Women's haute couture and ready-to-wear lines. In May 2008 he was additionally menswear and accessories designer of the Givenchy men's division. In March 2018, he was appointed chief creative officer of Burberry, succeeding Christopher Bailey.[3] ; Riccardo Tisci: Tisci's use of Gothic touches (dark, languid dresses for fall couture) and space-age minimalism (one ready-to-wear show featured white-clad models drifting around a sterile-white sphere) have brought mixed and inconsistent reviews. ; Riccardo Tisci: Tisci was born in Taranto and raised in Como.[4] He graduated from London's Central Saint Martins College of Art and Design in 1999. ; Riccardo Tisci: Upon graduation, Tisci worked for companies such as Puma, Antonio Berardi and Coccapani[5] before signing a three-year contract with Ruffo Research, a company that has helped launch the careers of several fashion designers, such as Sophia Kokosalaki.[6] ; Riccardo Tisci: Upon the expiration of his contract in July 2004, Tisci spent time living in India, where he began to work on his own collection. In September 2004, during the Milan Fashion Week, Tisci debuted his first Riccardo Tisci Collection for Fall 2005/2006 in an off-calendar show.[6]
knowledge1: Daniel Ek // Daniel Ek Daniel Ek (born 21 February 1983) is a Swedish billionaire entrepreneur and technologist. Ek is best known as the co-founder and CEO of the music streaming service Spotify. Ek grew up in Rågsved, Stockholm, Sweden. Ek graduated from the Royal Institute of Technology in Sundbyberg in 2002, and subsequently studied engineering at the KTH Royal Institute of Technology before dropping out to focus on his IT career. Ek's first foray into the business world began at age 13 when he started a business making websites for clients from his home. He charged the first client $100, but then; Daniel Ek // at $1.6 billion assuming he has not sold any of his stake. Daniel Ek Daniel Ek (born 21 February 1983) is a Swedish billionaire entrepreneur and technologist. Ek is best known as the co-founder and CEO of the music streaming service Spotify. Ek grew up in Rågsved, Stockholm, Sweden. Ek graduated from the Royal Institute of Technology in Sundbyberg in 2002, and subsequently studied engineering at the KTH Royal Institute of Technology before dropping out to focus on his IT career. Ek's first foray into the business world began at age 13 when he started a business making websites for; Daniel Ek // charged the next client who asked $200. Eventually, he started charging $5,000 per website. To help expand the business, Ek recruited students from his class to work on the websites from the school computer lab by bribing them with video games. His earnings eventually reached $50,000 per month and by age 18 he was managing a team of 25. Ek's parents started to notice his earnings once he started bringing home large TVs. Ek later served in a senior role at Nordic auction company Tradera which was acquired by Ebay in 2006. Ek also served as the CTO of browser; Daniel Ek // based game and fashion community Stardoll. Ek later started another company Advertigo, an online advertising company. Advertigo sold to TradeDoubler in 2006. After selling Advertigo, Ek briefly became the CEO of μTorrent, working with μTorrent founder Ludvig Strigeus. This ended when μTorrent was sold to BitTorrent on December 7 of 2006. Strigeus would later join Ek as a Spotify developer. The sale of Advertigo as well as his previous work made Ek wealthy enough that he decided to retire. However, after a few months Ek realized that money was meaningless without a project he was passionate about which led to [sep] knowledge2: Daniel Ek: Daniel Ek (born 21 February 1983) is a Swedish entrepreneur and technologist who currently serves as the co-founder and CEO of music streaming service Spotify.[2] As of December 2023[update], his net worth was estimated at $3.3 billion by Forbes.[3] ; Daniel Ek: Ek grew up in the Rågsved district of Stockholm, Sweden.[4] He graduated from high school in IT-Gymnasiet in Sundbyberg in 2002, and subsequently studied engineering at the KTH Royal Institute of Technology, before dropping out to focus on his IT career.[5][6] ; Daniel Ek: Ek served in a senior role at Nordic auction company Tradera which was acquired by eBay in 2006. He additionally served as the CTO of the browser-based game and fashion community Stardoll and later started another company Advertigo, an online advertising company. Advertigo was sold to TradeDoubler in 2006,[7] after which, Ek briefly became the CEO of μTorrent, working with μTorrent founder Ludvig Strigeus. This ended when μTorrent was sold to BitTorrent on December 7, 2006. Strigeus would later join Ek as a Spotify developer.[8] ; Daniel Ek: The sale of Advertigo as well as his previous work made Ek wealthy enough that he decided to retire. However, after a few months, he realized he wanted a new project, leading to his founding Spotify.[9] Ek first had the idea for Spotify in 2002 when peer-to-peer music service Napster shut down and another illegal site Kazaa took over. Ek said he "realized that you can never legislate away from piracy. Laws can definitely help, but it doesn't take away the problem. The only way to solve the problem was to create a service that was better than piracy and at the same time compensates the music industry – that gave us Spotify."[7] ; Daniel Ek: Ek incorporated Spotify AB with Martin Lorentzon in Stockholm, Sweden in 2006.[10][6] Lorentzon had previously worked at and co-founded TradeDoubler which had acquired Ek's previous company Advertigo.[11] In October 2008, the company launched its legal music streaming service Spotify. Initially, Spotify ran on a peer-to-peer distribution model, similar to μTorrent, but switched to a server-client model in 2014.[12] Ek serves as CEO of Spotify. In October 2015, Spotify co-founder Martin Lorentzon announced he would be stepping down as chairman and Ek would be taking over alongside his current role as CEO.[13][6] As of April 2019, Spotify has 217 million active users[14] and as of June 2017 had raised over $2.5 billion in venture funding.[15]
knowledge1: Jeremy Northam // Jeremy Northam Jeremy Philip Northam (born December 1, 1961) is an English actor. After a number of television roles, he earned attention as Mr. Knightley in the 1996 film adaptation of Jane Austen's "Emma". He has appeared in the films "Gosford Park", "Amistad", "The Winslow Boy", "Enigma", "Martin and Lewis", amongst others. He also played Thomas More in the Showtime series "The Tudors". From 2016 to 2017 he appeared as Anthony Eden in the Netflix series "The Crown". Northam was born in Cambridge, Cambridgeshire, the youngest of four siblings. His mother, Rachel (née Howard), was a potter and professor of; Jeremy Northam // economics, and his father, John Northam, was a professor of literature and theatre, as well as being an Ibsen specialist and lecturer (first at Clare College, Cambridge and later at Bristol). Northam was educated at King’s College School, Cambridge, Bristol Grammar School and Bedford College, London (B.A. English, 1984) now part of Royal Holloway, University of London, and trained at the Bristol Old Vic Theatre School. He married Canadian film/television make-up artist Liz Moro in April 2005, though they later divorced. Northam performed at the Royal National Theatre – he replaced Daniel Day-Lewis in the role of "Hamlet" (1989) and; Jeremy Northam // won the Olivier Award in 1990 for "most promising newcomer" for his performance in "The Voysey Inheritance". He has appeared frequently in British films such as "Carrington" (1995), "Emma" (1996), "The Winslow Boy" (1999), "An Ideal Husband" (1999), "Enigma" (2001) and as Welsh actor and singer Ivor Novello in "Gosford Park" (2001). He made his American film debut in "The Net" (1995). In 2002 he starred in the film "Cypher". That same year, he portrayed singer Dean Martin in the CBS film "Martin and Lewis" and golfer Walter Hagen in "" in 2004. In 2007 and 2008, he portrayed Thomas [sep] knowledge2: Jeremy Northam: Jeremy Philip Northam (born 1 December 1961) is an English actor. ; Jeremy Northam: Northam has featured in notable films including Emma, An Ideal Husband, Gosford Park, The Winslow Boy and Enigma. In television, he also played Thomas More in the Showtime series The Tudors and from 2016 to 2017 he appeared as Anthony Eden in the Netflix series The Crown. ; Jeremy Northam: Northam was born on 1 December 1961, in Cambridge, Cambridgeshire. His father was John Northam, a professor of literature and theatre.[1] Northam studied English at Bedford College, London (B.A. English, 1984) and acting at the Bristol Old Vic Theatre School.[2][3] ; Jeremy Northam: Northam performed at the Royal National Theatre – he replaced both Ian Charleson and Daniel Day-Lewis in the role of Hamlet (1989) when they had to withdraw and won the Olivier Award in 1990 for "most promising newcomer" for his performance in The Voysey Inheritance. ; Jeremy Northam: He has appeared frequently in British films such as Carrington (1995), Emma (1996), The Winslow Boy (1999), An Ideal Husband (1999), Enigma (2001) and as Welsh actor and singer Ivor Novello in Gosford Park (2001). He made his American film debut in The Net (1995).
knowledge1: Charley Boorman // Charley Boorman Charley Boorman (born 23 August 1966) is an English TV presenter, travel writer and actor. He is known for his enthusiasm for motorbikes, as demonstrated in several documentaries of his travels, including two with his friend, actor Ewan McGregor. Born in Wimbledon, London, Boorman spent much of his formative years in County Wicklow, Ireland. Boorman is the son of German costume designer Christel Kruse and film director John Boorman. Boorman attended three schools in Ireland: St Gerard's School (Bray, County Wicklow) and St Oliver Plunkett Primary School (Malahide, County Dublin), both Roman Catholic schools. He also attended the; Charley Boorman // which was in the US. Starting in Hawaii, he moves to Alaska, then to the Eastern seaboard and down to the Southern states, inland to the Gulf of Mexico, up again to the Rockies and finishing on the Pacific Coast at Los Angeles Long Way Back, Autobiography (2017) Charley Boorman Charley Boorman (born 23 August 1966) is an English TV presenter, travel writer and actor. He is known for his enthusiasm for motorbikes, as demonstrated in several documentaries of his travels, including two with his friend, actor Ewan McGregor. Born in Wimbledon, London, Boorman spent much of his formative years; Charley Boorman // and Ireland in 2010. Around this time Boorman revealed he had testicular cancer. Caught early, he had a testicle removed and has since been a supporter of Movember. Boorman was given the all-clear, but continued telling audiences across the country about his ordeal, encouraging more men to be aware and get checked out early if there was any concern. In 2011, the Charley Boorman Live show toured the UK and Ireland again, following a similar format to the first tour but without support acts. Boorman also began promoting African Adventures, which are commercial 17-day BMW motorcycle trips across Africa. Taking; Charley Boorman // "It's ME!". He also supported its school initiative "P4L" (Partnership for Literacy). Boorman recently participated in a live web chat for the charity where he answered questions about his dyslexia and his various adventures. In 2009, Boorman went to Helmand Province, Afghanistan and visited troops. Kandahar and Bastion were the two key camps he visited, just before Christmas. In February 2014 and November 2016 Boorman presented Gold Duke of Edinburgh's Awards at St James's Palace, on behalf of HRH The Duke of Edinburgh. In 2004, Ewan McGregor and Boorman decided to embark on an epic journey taking them from London; Charley Boorman // In 2011, Boorman presented a prime-time adventure series for the UK's Channel 5, "Charley Boorman's Extreme Frontiers". This show was another collaboration between Boorman and producer-director Russ Malkin, who made frequent on-screen appearances. "Extreme Frontiers" claimed to 'take in all four extremities of Canada'. Accompanying the show was book and DVD. In 2012, Boorman continued the series in a South African setting. From 9 June to 22 July 2012, Boorman and his team journeyed around South Africa on two motorbikes and a 4-wheel vehicle. Boorman and Malkin returned on Channel 5 at the end of 2013 for his next trip, [sep] knowledge2: Charley Boorman: Charley Boorman (born 23 August 1966) is a British television presenter, travel writer and actor. A motorbike enthusiast, Boorman has made three long-distance motorcycle rides with his friend Ewan McGregor, documented in Long Way Round (2004), Long Way Down (2007), and Long Way Up (2020). ; Charley Boorman: Born in Wimbledon, London, Boorman spent much of his formative years in County Wicklow, Ireland. Boorman is the son of German costume designer Christel Kruse and film director Sir John Boorman.[1] Lee Marvin, a lifelong friend of his father, was Charley's godfather. ; Charley Boorman: Boorman attended three schools in Ireland: St Gerard's School (Bray, County Wicklow) and St Oliver Plunkett Primary School (Monkstown, County Dublin), both Roman Catholic schools, the latter a school dedicated to teaching children with dyslexia. He also attended the German-language medium school, St Kilian's Deutsche Schule (Dublin). In England, he went on to attend Sibford School, a Quaker school near Banbury, Oxfordshire (from 1980 to 1983).[citation needed] ; Charley Boorman: He and his wife Olivia have two daughters and live in London.[citation needed] ; Charley Boorman: At an early age, Boorman started appearing in films directed by his father. His first role was in Deliverance (1972).
knowledge1: Erich Hartmann // September 1993 aged 71. Erich Hartmann was born on 19 April 1922 in Weissach, Württemberg, to Doctor Alfred Erich Hartmann and his wife, Elisabeth Wilhelmine Machtholf. The economic depression that followed World War I in Germany prompted Doctor Hartmann to find work in Changsha, China, and Erich spent his early childhood there. The family was forced to return to Germany in 1928, when the Chinese Civil War broke out. During World War II, Hartmann's younger brother, Alfred, also joined the Luftwaffe, serving as a gunner on a Junkers Ju 87 in North Africa. Alfred Hartmann was captured by the British; Erich Hartmann // Erich Hartmann Erich Alfred Hartmann (19 April 1922 – 20 September 1993), nicknamed "Bubi" ("The Kid") by his German comrades and the "Black Devil" by his Soviet adversaries, was a German fighter pilot during World War II and the most successful fighter ace in the history of aerial warfare. He flew 1,404 combat missions and participated in aerial combat on 825 separate occasions. He was credited with shooting down 352 Allied aircraft—345 Soviet and 7 American—while serving with the Luftwaffe. During the course of his career, Hartmann was forced to crash-land his fighter 14 times due to damage received from; Erich Hartmann (photographer) // his techniques so as to be able to impose a controlled image of concentrated light on landscapes, then on people. This culminated in a major show in New York and other smaller shows.″ This concern with dehumanization led him undertake in his late years a very personal and intimate project that both honored and transcended memory. Auschwitz, Bełżec, Bergen-Belsen, Birkenau, Buchenwald, Bullenhuser Damm, Chełmno, Dachau, Emsland, Belower Wald, Gross Rosen, Majdanek, Mauthausen, Natzweiler, Neuengamme, Ravensbrück, Sachsenhausen, Sobibor, Theresienstadt, Treblinka, Vught, Westerbork... For more than eight weeks in 1994, Erich and Ruth Hartmann undertook a winter journey to photograph the remains [sep] knowledge2: Erich Hartmann: Erich Alfred Hartmann (19 April 1922 – 20 September 1993) was a German fighter pilot during World War II and the most successful fighter ace in the history of aerial warfare.[1] He flew 1,404 combat missions and participated in aerial combat on 825 separate occasions.[3] He was credited with shooting down a total of 352 Allied aircraft: 345 Soviet and 7 American while serving with the Luftwaffe. During his career, Hartmann was forced to crash-land his fighter 16 times after either mechanical failure or damage received from parts of enemy aircraft he had shot down; he was never shot down by direct enemy action.[3] ; Erich Hartmann: Hartmann, a pre-war glider pilot, joined the Luftwaffe in 1940 and completed his fighter pilot training in 1942. He was posted to the veteran Jagdgeschwader 52 (JG 52—52nd Fighter Wing) on the Eastern Front and placed under the supervision of some of the Luftwaffe's most experienced fighter pilots. Under their guidance, Hartmann steadily developed his tactics. ; Erich Hartmann: On 29 October 1943, Hartmann was awarded the Knight's Cross of the Iron Cross for destroying 148 enemy aircraft and the Oak Leaves to the Knight's Cross for destroying 202 enemy aircraft on 2 March 1944. Exactly four months later, he received the Swords to the Knight's Cross with Oak Leaves for shooting down 268 enemy aircraft. Ultimately, Hartmann earned the coveted Knight's Cross of the Iron Cross with Oak Leaves, Swords and Diamonds on 25 August 1944 for 301 aerial victories. At the time of its presentation to Hartmann, this was Germany's highest military decoration.[Note 1] ; Erich Hartmann: Hartmann achieved his 352nd and last aerial victory at midday on 8 May 1945, hours before the German surrender. Along with the remainder of JG 52, he surrendered to United States Army forces and was turned over to the Red Army. In an attempt to pressure him into service with the Soviet-aligned East German National People's Army, he was tried on war crimes charges and convicted. Hartmann was initially sentenced to 20 years of imprisonment, later increased to 25 years, and spent 10 years in Soviet prison camps and gulags until he was released in 1955. In 1997, the Russian Federation (posthumously) relieved him of all charges. ; Erich Hartmann: In 1956, Hartmann joined the newly established West German Air Force in the Bundeswehr, and became the first Geschwaderkommodore of Jagdgeschwader 71 "Richthofen". He was forced into retirement in 1970 for his opposition to the procurement of the F-104 Starfighter over safety concerns. In his later years, after his military career had ended, he became a civilian flight instructor. Hartmann died on 20 September 1993 at age 71.
knowledge1: Timothy Evans // Timothy Evans Timothy John Evans (20 November 1924 – 9 March 1950) was a Welshman falsely convicted and hanged for the murder of his wife and infant daughter at their residence at 10 Rillington Place in Notting Hill, London. In January 1950, he was tried for and convicted of the murder of his daughter. He was sentenced to death by hanging, a sentence that was later carried out. During his trial, Evans had accused his downstairs neighbour, John Christie, of committing the murders. Three years after Evans's execution, Christie was found to be a serial killer who had murdered six; Timothy Evans // probably did not kill his daughter, it had not declared him innocent. The report also contained the "devastating" conclusion that Evans had probably killed his wife. The request to refer the case was dismissed on 19 November 2004, with the judges saying that the cost and resources of quashing the conviction could not be justified, although they did accept that Evans did not murder either his wife or his child. Timothy Evans Timothy John Evans (20 November 1924 – 9 March 1950) was a Welshman falsely convicted and hanged for the murder of his wife and infant daughter at their [sep] knowledge2: Timothy Evans: Timothy John Evans (20 November 1924 – 9 March 1950) was a Welshman who was wrongfully accused of murdering his wife Beryl and infant daughter Geraldine at their residence in Notting Hill, London. In January 1950, Evans was tried and convicted of the murder of his daughter, and on 9 March he was executed by hanging. ; Timothy Evans: During his trial, Evans accused his downstairs neighbour, John Christie, who was the chief prosecution witness, of committing the murders.  ; Timothy Evans: In 1935, his mother and her second husband moved to London, and Evans worked as a painter and decorator while attending school. He returned to Merthyr Tydfil in 1937 and briefly worked in the coal mines but had to resign because of continuing problems with his foot. In 1939, he returned to London to live again with his mother, and in 1946 they moved to St Mark's Road, Notting Hill. This was just over two minutes' walk from 10 Rillington Place, his future residence after he married. Evans was fined 60 shillings at West London Magistrates court on 25 April 1946 for stealing a car, and driving without insurance or a licence.[7][3] ; Timothy Evans: When Evans was shown the clothing taken from the bodies of his wife and child, he was also informed that both had been strangled. This was, according to Evans's statement, the first occasion in which he was informed that his baby daughter had been killed. He was asked whether he was responsible for their deaths. To this, Evans apparently responded, "Yes."[13] He then apparently confessed to having strangled Beryl during an argument over debts and strangling Geraldine two days later, after which he left for Wales. ; Timothy Evans: The case largely came down to Christie's word against Evans's and the course of the trial turned against Evans. The trial lasted only three days and much key evidence was omitted, or never shown to the jury. Evans was found guilty – the jury taking just 40 minutes to come to its decision. After a failed appeal held before the Lord Chief Justice, Lord Goddard; Mr. Justice Sellers and Mr. Justice Humphreys on 20 February, Evans was hanged on 9 March 1950 by Albert Pierrepoint, assisted by Syd Dernley at Pentonville Prison.[20]
knowledge1: Levi Roots // Levi Roots Keith Valentine Graham (born 24 June 1958), better known as Levi Roots, is a British-Jamaican reggae musician, television personality, celebrity chef and businessman currently residing in Brixton, in south London. Roots was born in Clarendon, Jamaica. He was raised by his grandmother after his parents moved to the UK, until he joined them at age 11. He was raised as a Christian, but converted to the Rastafari faith aged 18. Roots has performed with James Brown and Maxi Priest and was nominated for a Best Reggae Act MOBO award in 1998. He was a friend of Bob Marley; Levi Roots // Levi Roots Keith Valentine Graham (born 24 June 1958), better known as Levi Roots, is a British-Jamaican reggae musician, television personality, celebrity chef and businessman currently residing in Brixton, in south London. Roots was born in Clarendon, Jamaica. He was raised by his grandmother after his parents moved to the UK, until he joined them at age 11. He was raised as a Christian, but converted to the Rastafari faith aged 18. Roots has performed with James Brown and Maxi Priest and was nominated for a Best Reggae Act MOBO award in 1998. He was a friend of Bob Marley; Levi Roots // to be launched, and that Roots had stated that the value of the brand had then increased to £30 million. In December 2015, Levi Roots opened his first restaurant in Westfield Stratford City. "Levi Roots' Reggae Reggae Cookbook" was published in 2008, with a foreword by Roots' investor, Peter Jones. The book has chapters on Roots' story of coming to London and an introduction to Caribbean ingredients. To coincide with the release of his recipe book, Roots appeared on the edition of 3 June 2008 of BBC's "Ready Steady Cook" as a celebrity. He achieved the second place against Lesley; Levi Roots // when he resided in the UK and performed "Happy Birthday Mr. President" for Nelson Mandela in 1996 on his trip to Brixton. He gained widespread fame after appearing on the UK television programme "Dragons' Den", where he gained £50,000 funding for his Reggae Reggae Sauce. Levi Roots' Reggae Reggae Sauce is a jerk barbecue sauce. In 2006 4,000 bottles of the sauce were sold at the Notting Hill Carnival. He later took the sauce to a food trade show, where he was spotted by a BBC producer who approached him to appear on "Dragons' Den". He appeared in the first; Levi Roots // Waters. Roots had a television cooking show, "Caribbean Food Made Easy", on BBC2, with a book of the same name published in August 2009. The show followed Roots as he travelled the UK and Jamaica demonstrating easy ways to cook Caribbean food at home. Roots appeared on "Celebrity Mastermind" in 2010, coming second with 13 points. He also appeared on "Big Brother", where he cooked a Caribbean barbecue for the housemates. On 22 February 2018 he appeared in the 8th episode of the 7th series of the BBC detective programme "Death in Paradise". He played the part of Billy Springer. [sep] knowledge2: Reggae Reggae Sauce: In the first half of 2008, Roots launched "Love Apple Tomato Sauce" and "Fiery Guava Dipping Sauce" in the same style as Reggae Reggae sauce.[citation needed] A cookbook called Reggae Reggae Cookbook was released in June 2008. The "Love Apple Tomato Sauce" was later renamed "Reggae Reggae Tomato Ketchup".[citation needed] ; File:Levi-roots.jpg: Original file ‎(850 × 1,280 pixels, file size: 669 KB, MIME type: image/jpeg) ; File:Levi-roots.jpg: Click on a date/time to view the file as it appeared at that time.
knowledge1: Andriy Yarmolenko // Andriy Yarmolenko Andriy Mykolayovych Yarmolenko (; born 23 October 1989) is a Ukrainian football winger or forward who currently plays for West Ham United in the Premier League and for the Ukraine national team. Yarmolenko has been a full international for Ukraine since 2009, scoring 36 goals in 79 matches and playing at UEFA Euro 2012 and Euro 2016. Yarmolenko's parents, native Ukrainians, were originally from Kulykivka Raion, Chernihiv Oblast. After marrying, his mother was offered a job in Leningrad (now Saint Petersburg), Russian SFSR, and moved there, later joined by her husband. Shortly after the birth of Andriy, the; Andriy Yarmolenko // for Euro 2016 final stages. Yarmolenko was subsequently included in Ukraine's squad for Euro 2016, where he played in all three matches as Ukraine failed to score and finished bottom of the group. Dynamo Kyiv Individual Andriy Yarmolenko Andriy Mykolayovych Yarmolenko (; born 23 October 1989) is a Ukrainian football winger or forward who currently plays for West Ham United in the Premier League and for the Ukraine national team. Yarmolenko has been a full international for Ukraine since 2009, scoring 36 goals in 79 matches and playing at UEFA Euro 2012 and Euro 2016. Yarmolenko's parents, native Ukrainians, were; Andriy Yarmolenko // family moved back to their native land, to the city of Chernihiv. Yarmolenko is a pupil of the Chernihiv youth system. He joined the Dynamo Kyiv Youth Academy at age 13. However, he returned to Chernihiv after a year, unable to endure the physical demands of training. At the start of his professional career, he played at local clubs Polissia and Desna Chernihiv before joining Dynamo again. In December 2006, Yarmolenko signed a five-year contract with Ukrainian giants, Dynamo Kyiv, where he joined its second team, Dynamo-2, which plays in lower leagues, for a couple of seasons. The talented youngster; Andriy Yarmolenko // the 2018-19 season. Yarmolenko suffered an Achilles tear on 20 October 2018 in a 1-0 loss against Tottenham Hotspur, which ruled him out for six months. On 11 August 2007 Yaromolenko represented Ukraine under-19 team in an away exhibition game against Japan, winning 1–0. He also participated in the 2008 UEFA European Under-19 Championship qualification. After the qualification on 10 October 2008, Yarmolenko was invited to the under-21 squad which played against the Netherlands. He later participated in qualification and finals of the 2011 UEFA European Under-21 Football Championship. On 5 September 2009, in the 2010 FIFA World Cup qualification; Andriy Yarmolenko // in October 2015, Yarmolenko committed a dangerous challenge which almost broke Shakhtar Donetsk player Taras Stepanenko's leg. The two reconciled after the game and exchanged jerseys, but afterwards Yarmolenko threw Stepanenko's shirt on the ground while he thanked the Dynamo fans. In the Shakhtar–Dynamo derby in April 2016, after the former won 3–0, Stepanenko stepped in front of the Dynamo fans kissing his Shakhtar badge. In a brawl that escalated, Yarmolenko kicked Stepanenko to the ground. On 28 August 2017, Yarmolenko signed a four-year contract with Borussia Dortmund. On 10 September 2017, Yarmolenko made his debut for Dortmund as a [sep] knowledge2: Andriy Yarmolenko: Andriy Mykolayovych Yarmolenko (Ukrainian: Андрій Миколайович Ярмоленко; born 23 October 1989) is a Ukrainian professional footballer who plays as a winger or forward for Ukrainian Premier League club Dynamo Kyiv and captains the Ukraine national team. ; Andriy Yarmolenko: Yarmolenko has been a full international for Ukraine since 2009, scoring 46 goals in 116 matches and playing at UEFA Euro 2012, Euro 2016, and Euro 2020. ; Andriy Yarmolenko: Yarmolenko's parents, native Ukrainians, were originally from Smolianka village, Kulykivka Raion, Chernihiv Oblast. After their marriage, Valentyna and Mykola Yarmolenko moved to Leningrad (modern-day Saint Petersburg) where Andriy was born in 1989.[5] He has a younger sister. After a period of three years (after the collapse of the Soviet Union), the family moved back to their native country and settled in the city of Chernihiv.[6][7][8] ; Andriy Yarmolenko: His mother recollected that Andriy began to play with the ball from the age of 4–5 years. "In the beginning he did not even have a proper ball, so had to play with a self-made one. We were poor and real football was a luxury in those times".[9][10] Yarmolenko was noticed by Mykola Lypoviy who invited him to football school (Youth Sports School "Yunist" in Chernihiv) and became his first coach. ; Andriy Yarmolenko: Yarmolenko is a graduate of the Chernihiv Youth Sports School "Yunist". He joined the Dynamo Kyiv Youth Academy aged 13. However, he returned to Chernihiv after a year being unable to meet physical requirements in training.[7] Before his move to FC Dynamo Kyiv in 2007, he played for Yunist Chernihiv, Desna Chernihiv, Lokomotyv Kyiv, Vidradnyi Kyiv and again Yunist Chernihiv
knowledge1: Zubaira Tukhugov // Zubaira Tukhugov Zubaira Alikhanovich Tukhugov (; born January 15, 1991) is a Russian mixed martial artist of Chechen descent, who formerly fought in the Featherweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship. A professional MMA competitor since 2010, Tukhugov made a name for himself, fighting in promotions like Cage Warriors, ProFC, Fight Nights (EFN) and others, before joining the UFC in 2014. In 2016 he receive a USADA suspension for illegally using performance enhancing drugs. Then, on October 6, 2018, Dana White announced he would no longer be fighting for the UFC (despite the end of the suspension) due to his; Zubaira Tukhugov // McGregor's cornerman Dillon Danis. Soon after, McGregor and Khabib's cousin Abubakar Nurmagomedov attempted to exit the octagon, but a scuffle broke out between them after McGregor punched Abubakar, who then punched him back. McGregor was then attacked by two of Khabib Nurmagomedov's cornermen, Tukhugov and Asadulla Emiragaev. Zubaira Tukhugov Zubaira Alikhanovich Tukhugov (; born January 15, 1991) is a Russian mixed martial artist of Chechen descent, who formerly fought in the Featherweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship. A professional MMA competitor since 2010, Tukhugov made a name for himself, fighting in promotions like Cage Warriors, ProFC, Fight Nights (EFN); Zubaira Tukhugov // attack on Conor McGregor in the octagon following McGregor's match at UFC 229. Tukhugov made his professional debut in 2010 beating his three opponents by winning Pankration Atrium Cup 2 eight man, one night tournament. After a 10-3 mixed martial arts records, he would be signed by the Russian promotion, Fight Nights, where he won all of his 3 fights, defeating Romano De Los Reyes, Harun Kina and Vaso Bakocevic. During his time on Fight Nights, Tukhugov did a fight for Cage Warriors, defeating Denys Pidnebesnyi at CWFC 58. In December 2013, it was announced that Tukhugov had signed a; Zubaira Tukhugov // contract with UFC and was scheduled to make his promotional debut against Thiago Tavares on February 15 at . However, Tavares was forced to pull out due to an undisclosed injury, and was replaced by UFC newcomer Douglas Silva de Andrade. Tukhugov dominated the fight and got a unanimous decision win. Tukhugov later faced Ernest Chavez on October 4, at . He won the fight via technical knockout due to punches in the first round. Tukhugov was expected to face Thiago Tavares on June 6, 2015 at However, the pairing was scrapped after Tukhugov suffered a rib injury. Tukhugov faced; Zubaira Tukhugov // Phillipe Nover on December 10, 2015 at UFC Fight Night 80. He won the fight by split decision. Tukhugov next faced Renato Moicano on May 14, 2016 at UFC 198. In a controversial series of events, despite Tukhogov suffering a kick to the groin in the first round and again in the second round, referee Eduardo Herdy signaled the competitors to continue. Tukhogov lost the fight via split decision. Tukhugov was expected to face Tiago Trator on December 9, 2016 at UFC Fight Night 102. However, on November 14, Tukhugov was pulled from the card after being notified by USADA [sep] knowledge2: Zubaira Tukhugov: Zubaira Alikhanovich Tukhugov (born January 15, 1991) is a Russian mixed martial artist, who fought in the Lightweight division of the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC). A professional MMA competitor since 2010, Tukhugov made a name for himself, fighting in promotions like Cage Warriors, ProFC, Fight Nights (EFN) and others, before joining the UFC in 2014. ; Zubaira Tukhugov: Tukhugov made his professional debut in 2010 beating his three opponents by winning Pankration Atrium Cup 2 eight man, one night tournament.[2] After a 10-3 mixed martial arts records, he would be signed by the Russian promotion, Fight Nights, where he won all of his 3 fights, defeating Romano De Los Reyes,[3] Harun Kina[4] and Vaso Bakocevic.[5] During his time on Fight Nights, Tukhugov did a fight for Cage Warriors, defeating Denys Pidnebesnyi at CWFC 58.[6] ; Zubaira Tukhugov: In December 2013, it was announced that Tukhugov had signed a contract with UFC and was scheduled to make his promotional debut against Thiago Tavares on February 15 at UFC Fight Night: Machida vs. Mousasi.[7] However, Tavares was forced to pull out due to an undisclosed injury, and was replaced by UFC newcomer Douglas Silva de Andrade.[8] Tukhugov dominated the fight and got a unanimous decision win.[9] ; Zubaira Tukhugov: Tukhugov later faced Ernest Chavez on October 4, at UFC Fight Night: Nelson vs. Story.[10] He won the fight via technical knockout due to punches in the first round.[11] ; Zubaira Tukhugov: Tukhugov was expected to face Thiago Tavares on June 6, 2015 at UFC Fight Night 68[12] However, the pairing was scrapped after Tukhugov suffered a rib injury.
knowledge1: Gretl Braun // Gretl Braun Margarete Berta "Gretl" Braun (31 August 1915 – 10 October 1987) was one of the two sisters of Eva Braun. She was a member of the inner social circle of Adolf Hitler at the Berghof. Braun married SS-Gruppenführer Hermann Fegelein, a liaison officer on Hitler's staff, on 3 June 1944. Fegelein was shot for desertion in the closing days of World War II. Gretl became the sister-in-law of the Nazi dictator following his marriage to Eva, less than 40 hours before the couple killed themselves together. Braun was the youngest of three daughters of school teacher Friedrich "Fritz"; Gretl Braun // Braun and seamstress Franziska "Fanny" Kronberger. After dropping out of secondary school in Medingen at the age of sixteen, she worked as a clerk for the photography company of Heinrich Hoffmann, the official photographer for the Nazi Party, who also employed her sister Eva. Hitler provided the sisters with a three-bedroom apartment in Munich in August 1935, and the next year with a villa in Bogenhausen. Their father was not pleased with this arrangement and wrote to protest about it. The sisters were keen photographers; in 1943 Gretl attended the Bavarian State School of Photography. Braun spent much time with; Gretl Braun // Kurt Berlinghoff on 6 February 1954 in Munich. She died on 10 October 1987 in Steingaden, Bavaria, aged 72. Footnotes Sources Gretl Braun Margarete Berta "Gretl" Braun (31 August 1915 – 10 October 1987) was one of the two sisters of Eva Braun. She was a member of the inner social circle of Adolf Hitler at the Berghof. Braun married SS-Gruppenführer Hermann Fegelein, a liaison officer on Hitler's staff, on 3 June 1944. Fegelein was shot for desertion in the closing days of World War II. Gretl became the sister-in-law of the Nazi dictator following his marriage to Eva, less; Gretl Braun // Eva at Hitler's Berghof in the Obersalzberg of the Bavarian Alps, where she enlivened the formal atmosphere by having fun, smoking, and flirting with the orderlies. According to Hitler's secretary, Traudl Junge, Hitler explained to her at length why he detested smoking, but she would not give up the habit. Gretl fell for Hitler's SS adjutant Fritz Darges, but he was suddenly dismissed by Hitler and posted to command a unit on the Eastern Front following an insubordinate comment at a meeting in 1944. On 3 June 1944 she married SS-Gruppenführer Hermann Fegelein, who served as Reichsführer-SS Heinrich Himmler's liaison [sep] knowledge2: Gretl Braun: Margarete Berta "Gretl" Braun (German: [ˈɡʁeːtl̩ ˈbʁaʊn]; 31 August 1915 – 10 October 1987) was one of the two sisters of Eva Braun. She was a member of the inner social circle of Adolf Hitler at the Berghof. Gretl became the sister-in-law of Hitler following his marriage to Eva, less than 40 hours before the couple killed themselves.  ; Gretl Braun: Braun married SS-Gruppenführer Hermann Fegelein, a liaison officer on Hitler's staff, on 3 June 1944. In the closing days of World War II, Fegelein was shot for desertion. Despite Gretl's ties to the Nazi regime, she managed to survive the war nearly completely unscathed. She changed her name, remarried, and lived a quiet life until her death in 1987. ; Gretl Braun: Braun was the youngest of three daughters of school teacher Friedrich "Fritz" Braun and seamstress Franziska "Fanny" Kronberger.[1] After dropping out of secondary school at the age of 16,[2] she worked as a clerk for the photography company of Heinrich Hoffmann, the official photographer for the Nazi Party, who also employed her sister Eva.[3] Hitler provided the sisters with a three-bedroom apartment in Munich in August 1935, [4] and the next year with a villa in Bogenhausen.[5] Their father was not pleased with this arrangement and wrote to Hitler to protest about it.[6] The sisters were keen photographers; in 1943 Gretl attended the Bavarian State School of Photography.[3] ; Gretl Braun: Gretl spent much time with Eva at Hitler's Berghof retreat in the Obersalzberg of the Bavarian Alps, where she enlivened the formal atmosphere by having fun, smoking, and flirting with the orderlies.[7] According to Hitler's secretary, Traudl Junge, Hitler explained to her at length why he detested smoking, but she would not give up the habit. Gretl fell for Hitler's SS adjutant Fritz Darges,[8] but he was suddenly dismissed by Hitler and posted to command a unit on the Eastern Front following an insubordinate comment at a meeting in 1944.[9] ; Gretl Braun: On 3 June 1944, she married SS-Gruppenführer Hermann Fegelein, who served as Reichsführer-SS Heinrich Himmler's liaison officer on Hitler's staff. Their wedding took place at the Mirabell Palace in Salzburg with Hitler, Himmler, and Martin Bormann as witnesses.[10] Her sister Eva made all the wedding arrangements. A wedding reception at the Berghof and party at the Eagle's Nest at Obersalzberg lasted three days.[11] The marriage provided Hitler with a formal link to Eva and a reason to include her at public functions.[12] Fegelein was a known playboy and had many extramarital affairs.[13]
knowledge1: Will Keane // Will Keane William David Keane (born 11 January 1993) is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Hull City. Keane had been with Manchester United since the age of 11, having spent one month on loan with Wigan Athletic in December 2013, as well as the second half of that season with Queens Park Rangers. Keane has also represented England at youth level. His twin brother, Michael, is a defender who plays for Everton. Born in Stockport, Greater Manchester, Keane and his twin brother Michael grew up in the suburb of Heaton Mersey and attended St Bede's; Will Keane // off the bench to replace midfielder Josh McEachran in the 78th minute. He appeared in the following game four days later against Belgium, this time coming on as a substitute for Marvin Sordell. On 25 May 2012, he scored twice as England under-19s beat Slovenia 5–0 at Deepdale. Keane suffered a knee ligament injury on 30 May 2012 while playing for England Under-19s against Switzerland which resulted in him missing the whole of the 2012–13 season. England U17 Individual Will Keane William David Keane (born 11 January 1993) is an English professional footballer who plays as a forward for Hull; Will Keane // under-17 team that won the 2010 UEFA European Under-17 Football Championship, appearing in the final. He made a total of 15 appearances and scored three goals for the team. He then progressed to the under-19 side where he made six appearances and scored one goal. He received a call up to the under-21 side managed by Stuart Pearce in November 2011, and received praise from Manchester United reserve team manager Warren Joyce, with Joyce saying Keane deserved the call up after his good form for the reserve team. He made his first appearance during a 5–0 win against Iceland, coming [sep] knowledge2: Will Keane: William David Keane (born 11 January 1993) is a professional footballer who plays as a forward or attacking midfielder for EFL Championship club Preston North End and the Republic of Ireland national team. ; Will Keane: He began his career with Manchester United, having joined them at the age of 11, but made just three appearances for the first team and had loan spells with Wigan Athletic, Queens Park Rangers, Sheffield Wednesday and Preston North End before making a permanent move to Hull City in 2016. Following a loan spell at Ipswich Town in 2019, he was released by Hull at the end of the 2018–19 season. Keane joined Ipswich permanently on a one-year deal in August 2019. ; Will Keane: Keane joined Wigan Athletic on a 3-month contract in October 2020 after his release by Ipswich. After scoring 5 goals in 12 appearances by January 2021, he was offered a contract until the end of the season. Keane then signed a new 2-year deal with Latics ahead of the 2021–22 season. ; Will Keane: In September 2021, at the age of 28, Keane was called up to the Republic of Ireland squad for the first time, having declared his interest in playing for Ireland in 2019. He qualifies for Ireland through his father. ; Will Keane: His twin brother, Michael, is also a professional footballer who plays as a defender for Everton and England. Ironically, Michael became a full England international after a youth career with the Republic of Ireland.
knowledge1: Cheyenne Brando // Cheyenne Brando Tarita Cheyenne Brando (20 February 1970 – 16 April 1995) was a French model and the daughter of Marlon Brando by his third wife Tarita Teriipaia, a former French actress from French Polynesia whom he met while filming "Mutiny on the Bounty" in 1962. Born in 1970, Brando was raised by her mother Tarita on the island of Tahiti, south of Papeete. Her parents divorced in 1972. While growing up, Marlon Brando did not allow Cheyenne and her brother Tehotu to visit him in the United States. In 1976 he stated, "I don't think I will let them; Cheyenne Brando // later formally diagnosed with schizophrenia, became isolated from her former friends, and lost custody of her son to her mother (who raised him in Tahiti). On 16 April 1995, Cheyenne hanged herself at her mother's house in Punaauia, Tahiti. Neither her father nor her half-brother Christian were able to attend her funeral in Tahiti. She was buried in the Roman Catholic Uranie Cemetery in Papeete in the family crypt of Dag Drollet's family. Cheyenne Brando Tarita Cheyenne Brando (20 February 1970 – 16 April 1995) was a French model and the daughter of Marlon Brando by his third wife Tarita; Cheyenne Brando // June 1990, she gave birth to a son she named Tuki Brando. Soon after Tuki's birth, Cheyenne attempted suicide twice and was hospitalized for drug detoxification in a psychiatric hospital. On 22 December 1990, Cheyenne was declared "mentally disabled" by a French judge and was deemed unable to testify in her brother's trial. Without Cheyenne's testimony, prosecutors felt they could no longer prove that Drollet's death was premeditated. They presented Christian Brando with a plea deal. Christian took the deal and pleaded guilty to the lesser charge of voluntary manslaughter. He was sentenced to ten years in prison. He served; Cheyenne Brando // want us." Cheyenne eventually dropped out of high school and began taking drugs including LSD, PCP, marijuana, and tranquilizers. During this time, she began a modeling career. In 1989, Cheyenne was seriously injured in a car accident when she crashed a Jeep she was driving after her father refused to allow her to visit him while he was filming "The Freshman" in Toronto. She sustained a broken jaw, a laceration under her eye, and a torn ear. Marlon Brando flew Cheyenne to Los Angeles to undergo extensive reconstructive and cosmetic surgery. The accident effectively ended her modeling career. After the; Cheyenne Brando // a total of five years and was placed on three years probation. In an interview given after his release, Christian stated that he doubted Cheyenne's accusations of physical abuse against Drollet due to her mental instability. "I feel like a complete chump for believing her," he said. In the years following Drollet's death and her half brother Christian's trial, Cheyenne Brando's mental health steadily declined. She repeatedly entered drug rehab and psychiatric hospitals. Cheyenne also publicly accused her father of molesting her and accused him of being an accomplice in Drollet's death (Marlon Brando denied both accusations). Cheyenne Brando was [sep] knowledge2: Cheyenne Brando: Tarita Cheyenne Brando (20 February 1970 – 16 April 1995) was a French fashion model. She was the daughter of actor Marlon Brando by his third wife Tarita Teriipaia, an actress from French Polynesia whom he met while filming Mutiny on the Bounty in 1962.[2] ; Cheyenne Brando: Brando was born in 1970. She was raised by her mother Tarita on the island of Tahiti, south of Papeete. Her parents divorced in 1972.[3] ; Cheyenne Brando: While growing up, Marlon Brando did not allow Cheyenne and her brother Tehotu to visit him in the United States. In 1976 he stated, "I don't think I will let them [Cheyenne and Tehotu] go to the States. As Tahitians, they are too trusting. They would be destroyed in the pace of life in the States." As a child, Cheyenne reportedly adored her father and bragged about him. As she entered her teenage years, her feelings towards her father changed. In a 1990 interview she stated, "I have come to despise my father for the way he ignored me when I was a child. He came to the island maybe once a year but really didn't seem to care whether he saw me or not. He wanted us but he didn't want us."[4] ; Cheyenne Brando: Cheyenne eventually dropped out of high school and began taking drugs including LSD, PCP, marijuana, and tranquilizers.[5] During this time, she began a modeling career. ; Cheyenne Brando: In 1989, Cheyenne was seriously injured in a car crash when she crashed a Jeep she was driving after her father refused to allow her to visit him while he was filming The Freshman in Toronto. She sustained a broken jaw, a laceration under her eye, and a torn ear. Marlon Brando flew Cheyenne to Los Angeles to undergo extensive reconstructive and cosmetic surgery. The crash effectively ended her modeling career. After the crash, she began experiencing bouts of depression and attempted suicide.[4]
knowledge1: Pratibha Patil // Pratibha Patil Pratibha Devisingh Patil (born 19 December 1934) is an Indian politician who served as the 12th President of India from 2007 to 2012. A member of the Indian National Congress, Patil is the only woman to hold the office. She previously served as the Governor of Rajasthan from 2004 to 2007. Pratibha Patil is the daughter of Narayan Rao Patil. She was born on 19 December 1934 in the village Nadgaon of Bodwad taluka in the Jalgaon district of Maharashtra, India. Her mother tongue is Marathi. She received her M.A. degree in Political Science and Economics from University; Pratibha Patil // the Muktainagar (formerly Edlabad) constituency on four consecutive occasions between 1967 and 1985, before becoming a Member of Parliament in the Rajya Sabha between 1985 and 1990. In the 1991 elections for the 10th Lok Sabha, she was elected as a Member of Parliament representing the Amravati constituency. A period of retirement from politics followed later in that decade. Patil had held various Cabinet portfolios during her period in the Maharashtra Legislative Assembly and she had also held official positions while in both the Rajya Sabha and Lok Sabha. In addition, she had been for some years the president of; Pratibha Patil // to her relatives. The INC claimed that Patil had not been involved with the bank since 1994 but "The Indian Express" reported that it had official documents showing her involvement as late as 2002. Pratibha Patil has held various official offices during her career. These are: Pratibha Patil Pratibha Devisingh Patil (born 19 December 1934) is an Indian politician who served as the 12th President of India from 2007 to 2012. A member of the Indian National Congress, Patil is the only woman to hold the office. She previously served as the Governor of Rajasthan from 2004 to 2007. Pratibha; Pratibha Patil // the Maharashtra Pradesh Congress Committee and also held office as Director of the National Federation of Urban Co-operative Banks and Credit Societies and as a Member of the Governing Council of the National Co-operative Union of India. On 8 November 2004 she was appointed as the 24th Governor of Rajasthan, the first woman to hold that office and according to the BBC was "a low-profile" incumbent. Patil was announced as the United Progressive Alliance (UPA) candidate on 14 June 2007. She emerged as a compromise candidate after the left-wing parties of the alliance would not agree to the nomination of [sep] knowledge2: Pratibha Patil: Prathibha Devisingh Patil (born 19 December 1934) is an Indian politician and lawyer who served as the 12th president of India from 2007 to 2012. She was the first woman to become the president of India. A member of the Indian National Congress, she previously served as the Governor of Rajasthan from 2004 to 2007, and was a member of the Lok Sabha from 1991 to 1996. ; Pratibha Patil: Patil was born in a Marathi family[1][2] on 19 December 1934 in the village of Nadgaon in Jalgaon, Maharashtra. She is the daughter of Narayan Rao Patil.[3] She was educated initially at R. R. Vidyalaya town and subsequently was awarded a master's degree in Political Science and Economics by Mooljee Jetha College, Jalgaon (then under Poona University), and then a Bachelor of Law degree by Government Law College, Bombay, affiliated to the University of Bombay (now University of Mumbai). Patil then began to practice law at the Jalgaon District Court, while also taking interest in social issues such as improving the conditions faced by Indian women.[4] ; Pratibha Patil: In 1962, at the age of 27, she was elected to the Maharashtra Legislative Assembly for the Jalgaon constituency.[6] After that she won in the Muktainagar (formerly Edlabad) constituency on four consecutive occasions between 1967 and 1985, before becoming a Member of Parliament in the Rajya Sabha between 1985 and 1990. In the 1991 elections for the 10th Lok Sabha, she was elected as a Member of Parliament representing the Amravati constituency.[4] A period of retirement from politics followed later in the decade.[7] ; Pratibha Patil: Patil had held various Cabinet portfolios during her period in the Maharashtra Legislative Assembly and held official positions in both the Rajya Sabha and Lok Sabha. In addition, she had been the president of the Maharashtra Pradesh Congress Committee for a few years. Also, she held office as Director of the National Federation of Urban Co-operative Banks and Credit Societies and as a Member of the Governing Council of the National Co-operative Union of India.[3] ; Pratibha Patil: On 8 November 2004 she was appointed the 17th Governor of Rajasthan,[8] the first woman to hold that office.[9]
knowledge1: Walter Model // Walter Model Walter Model (; 24 January 1891 – 21 April 1945) was a German field marshal during World War II. Although he was a hard-driving, aggressive panzer commander early in the war, Model became best known as a practitioner of defensive warfare. His relative success as commander of the Ninth Army in the retreats of 1941–42 determined his future career path. He has been called the Third Reich's best defensive tactical commander. Model first came to Hitler's attention before World War II, but their relationship did not become especially close until 1942. His tenacious style of fighting and dedication; Walter Model // known for his ambition, drive, and blunt outspokenness. These were characteristics that would mark his entire career. In World War I, the 52nd Infantry Regiment formed part of the 5th Division which fought on the Western Front. Model served as the adjutant of his regiment's 1st Battalion. In May 1915, he was severely wounded near Arras, and in October he won the Iron Cross, First Class. His deeds brought him to the attention of his divisional commander who, despite misgivings about his "uncomfortable subordinate", recommended Model for a posting on the German General Staff. Among other things, this meant that; Walter Model // was a reference to Model's nickname among his staffers, that he had earned during his time at XLI Panzer Corps, namely 'Frontline Pig' ("Frontschwein"). He was considered a thorough and competent leader but known to "demand too much, and that too quickly", accepting no excuses for failure from either his own men or those who outranked him. His troops were said to have "suffered under his too-frequent absences and erratic, inconsistent demands", for he frequently lost sight of what was or was not practically possible. Yet his dislike of bureaucracy and his crude speech often made him well liked by; Walter Model // to the Nazi cause won him plaudits from Hitler, who considered him one of his best field commanders and repeatedly tasked him with retrieving desperate situations. However, their relationship had broken down by the end of the war after Model was defeated at the Battle of the Bulge. Units under Model's command killed large numbers of Soviet civilians, and the Soviet Government indicted him for war crimes. In April 1945, with the Third Reich's defeat imminent, Model committed suicide rather than be captured and stand trial for war crimes. Model's decision to burn all his personal papers at the end; Walter Model // that year. He ended the war with the 36th Reserve Division. By the end of the war, Model had gained a reputation as a capable officer with great potential. Early on in his military career, Model had written a book on the Prussian general August Neidhardt von Gneisenau. In addition, he was already known to Hans von Seeckt, head of the slimmed-down Reichswehr, from his staff postings during the war, and he was equipped with an excellent reference from Major-General Franz von Rantau, commander of the 36th Reserve Division. It was thus no surprise that he was one of the [sep] knowledge2: Walter Model: Otto Moritz Walter Model (IPA: [ˈmoːdəl]; 24 January 1891 – 21 April 1945) was a German Generalfeldmarschall during World War II. Although he was a hard-driving, aggressive panzer commander early in the war, Model became best known as a practitioner of defensive warfare. His relative success as commander of the Ninth Army in the battles of 1941–1942 determined his future career path. ; Walter Model: Model first came to Hitler's attention before World War II, but their relationship did not become especially close until 1942. His tenacious style of fighting and loyalty to the Nazi regime won him plaudits from Hitler, who considered him one of his best field commanders and repeatedly sent him to salvage apparently desperate situations on the Eastern Front as commander of Army Group North, Army Group North Ukraine and Army Group Centre. ; Walter Model: In August 1944 Model was sent to the Western Front as commander of OB West and Army Group B. His relationship with Hitler broke down by the end of the war after the German defeat at the Battle of the Bulge. In the aftermath of the defeat of Army Group B and its encirclement in the Ruhr Pocket, Model took his own life on 21 April 1945. ; Walter Model: Otto Moritz Walter Model was born in Genthin, Saxony, the son of a Otto Paul Moritz Model, a music teacher at a local girls' school, and his wife Marie Pauline Wlhelmine née Demmer. He had a brother, Otto, who was seven years older. He belonged to a middle-class, non-military family.[1] Model's decision to burn all his personal papers at the end of World War II means relatively little is known about his early years.[2] He attended school at the Bürgerschule (citizen school) in Genthin.[3] The family moved to Erfurt in 1900, and then to Naumburg,[1] where he graduated with his abitur from the Domgymnasium Naumburg [de], a humanities-oriented secondary school, on Easter 1909.[3] ; Walter Model: Through the influence of his uncle Martin Model, a reserve officer in the 52nd Infantry Regiment von Alvensleben, he joined that regiment as an officer cadet (Fahnenjunker).[4] He was promoted to fähnrich in February 1909, and was admitted to the army officer cadet school (Kriegsschule) in Neisse (now Nysa, Poland), where he was an unexceptional student, and was commissioned a Leutnant (lieutenant) in the 52nd Infantry Regiment in August 1910.[1] He made few friends among his fellow officers and soon became known for his ambition, drive, and blunt outspokenness. These were characteristics that marked his entire career.[2] He became the adjutant of his regiment's 1st Battalion in October 1913.[1]
knowledge1: Belisarius // Belisarius Flavius Belisarius (, c. 500 – 565) was a general of the Byzantine Empire. He was instrumental to Emperor Justinian's ambitious project of reconquering much of the Mediterranean territory of the former Western Roman Empire, which had been lost less than a century before. One of the defining features of Belisarius's career was his success despite varying levels of support from Justinian. His name is frequently given as one of the so-called "Last of the Romans". Belisarius is considered a military genius who conquered the Vandal Kingdom of North Africa in the Vandalic War in nine months from July; Belisarius // rejection by the powerful. Belisarius was featured in several works of art before the 20th century. The oldest of them is the historical treatise by his secretary, Procopius. The "Anecdota", commonly referred to as the "Arcana Historia" or "Secret History", is an extended attack on Belisarius and Antonina, and on Justinian and Theodora, indicting Belisarius as a love-blind fool and his wife as unfaithful and duplicitous. Other works include: Belisarius Flavius Belisarius (, c. 500 – 565) was a general of the Byzantine Empire. He was instrumental to Emperor Justinian's ambitious project of reconquering much of the Mediterranean territory of; Belisarius // novel received a public censure by Louis Legrand of the Sorbonne, which contemporary theologians regarded as a model exposition of theological knowledge and clear thinking. Marmontel and the painters and sculptors depicted Belisarius as a kind of secular saint, sharing the suffering of the downtrodden poor, for example the bust of Belisarius by the French sculptor Jean-Baptiste Stouf. The most famous of these paintings, by Jacques-Louis David, combines the themes of charity (the alms giver), injustice (Belisarius), and the radical reversal of power (the soldier who recognises his old commander). Others portray him being helped by the poor after his [sep] knowledge2: Belisarius: Belisarius[2] (Latin pronunciation: [bɛ.lɪˈsaː.ri.ʊs]; Greek: Βελισάριος; c. 500[Note 2] – 565) was a military commander of the Byzantine Empire under the emperor Justinian I. He was instrumental in the reconquest of much of the Mediterranean territory belonging to the former Western Roman Empire, which had been lost less than a century prior. ; Belisarius: One of the defining features of Belisarius' career was his success despite varying levels of available resources. His name is frequently given as one of the so-called "Last of the Romans". He conquered the Vandal Kingdom of North Africa in the Vandalic War in nine months and conquered much of Italy during the Gothic War. He also defeated the Vandal armies in the battle of Ad Decimum and played an important role at Tricamarum, compelling the Vandal king, Gelimer, to surrender. During the Gothic War, despite being significantly outnumbered,  he and his troops recaptured the city of Rome and then held out against great odds during the siege of Rome. ; Belisarius: After a setback at Thannurin, he won a battle against the Persians at Dara but was defeated at Callinicum. He successfully repulsed a Hunnish incursion at Melantias. He was also known for military deception; he repulsed a Persian invasion by deceiving their commander and lifted the siege of Ariminum without a fight. ; Belisarius: Belisarius was probably born in Germania, a fortified town of which some archaeological remains still exist, on the site of present-day Sapareva Banya in south-west Bulgaria, within the borders of Thrace and Paeonia, or in Germen, a town in Thrace near Orestiada, in present-day Greece.[3] Born into an Illyrian,[4][5][6][7] Thracian,[8] or Greek[9][10] family, he became a Roman soldier as a young man, serving in the bodyguard of Emperor Justin I.[11] ; Belisarius: After coming to the attention of Justin and Justinian as an innovative officer, he was given permission by the emperor to form a bodyguard regiment. It consisted of elite heavy cavalry[12] that he later expanded into a personal household regiment, 7,000 strong.[13] Belisarius' guards formed the nucleus of all the armies he would later command. Armed with lances, (possibly Hunnish style) composite bows, and spatha (long sword), they were fully armored to the standard of heavy cavalry of the day. A multi-purpose unit, the Bucellarii (biscuit-eaters) were capable of shooting at a distance with bows, like the Huns, or could act as heavy shock cavalry, charging an enemy with lance and sword. In essence, they combined the best and most dangerous aspects of both of Rome's greatest enemies, the Huns and the Goths.[14]
knowledge1: Bastian Schweinsteiger // Bastian Schweinsteiger Bastian Schweinsteiger (; born 1 August 1984) is a German professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Major League Soccer club Chicago Fire. A right-footed player, he usually plays as central midfielder. Earlier in his career, he primarily played as a wide midfielder. He spent 17 seasons at Bayern Munich, playing in exactly 500 matches across all competitions and scoring 68 goals. His honours at the club include eight Bundesliga titles, seven DFB-Pokal titles, a UEFA Champions League title, a FIFA Club World Cup title and a UEFA Super Cup title. He joined Manchester United in 2015,; Bastian Schweinsteiger // also a superb reader of the game and has scored spectacularly due to his good positioning. He has been called "the brain" of the German national team by coach Joachim Löw. He has been voted as the best German player in 2013. He is also known as the "midfield mastermind". During his time with Chicago, Schweinsteiger has also occasionally been deployed as a central defender or sweeper in a three-man back-line. Schweinsteiger is Roman Catholic. He is known to fans as "Schweini" or "Basti", the latter to distinguish him from his elder brother, Tobias, a professional footballer who also played; Bastian Schweinsteiger // for Bayern Munich, albeit in the reserve team. Schweinsteiger was in a relationship with model Sarah Brandner from 2007 until July 2014. They lived in Munich together. In September 2014, he began a relationship with Serbian tennis player Ana Ivanovic. The couple wed on 12 July 2016 in Venice, Italy. On 23 November 2017, the couple announced that they are expecting their first child. Their first child, Luka, was born on 17 March 2018 in Chicago. Germany score listed first, score column indicates score after each Schweinsteiger goal Bastian Schweinsteiger Bastian Schweinsteiger (; born 1 August 1984) is a German; Bastian Schweinsteiger // was selected to start in the third group game against the United States. He retained his place in the team for Germany's round of 16 match, a 2–1 win against Algeria. He was instrumental in the World Cup finals against Argentina and led the mid-field with sweeping passes for the German attack. Germany won the World Cup final 1–0 through Mario Götze's 113th-minute goal. Prior to the start of qualification, Schweinsteiger was appointed as the new captain for Germany after Philipp Lahm's retirement. On 23 March 2016 he sustained damage on his knee while he was training with the German; Bastian Schweinsteiger // in 120 games, scoring 24 goals. One month later, he participated in his last ever international appearance for Germany, against Finland in a friendly match. He was succeeded as captain by Manuel Neuer. Schweinsteiger largely operates in the centre, but he is versatile enough to provide an option on the wing, either left or right. During his years with Bayern, he was regarded as one of the best midfielders in the world. Schweinsteiger possesses a fearsome shot from range as well as a wicked delivery from set-pieces and his boundless energy serves him well. Dubbed the "Midfield Motor", Schweinsteiger is [sep] knowledge2: Bastian Schweinsteiger: Bastian Schweinsteiger (pronounced [ˈbasti̯a(ː)n ˈʃvaɪnʃtaɪɡɐ] ⓘ; born 1 August 1984) is a German former professional footballer who played as a midfielder. Earlier in his career, he primarily played as a wide midfielder; he later switched to a central midfield role. Former Germany national team manager Joachim Löw has referred to Schweinsteiger as one of the greatest players the country has ever produced.[3] ; Bastian Schweinsteiger: He spent 17 seasons at Bayern Munich, playing in exactly 500 matches across all competitions and scoring 68 goals. His honours at the club include eight Bundesliga titles, seven DFB-Pokal titles, a UEFA Champions League title, a FIFA Club World Cup title and a UEFA Super Cup title.[4] He joined Manchester United in 2015, playing sparingly for 18 months before moving to Chicago Fire. He announced his retirement from playing in October 2019. ; Bastian Schweinsteiger: Schweinsteiger played for the German national team from 2004 to 2016. He is Germany's fourth-most-capped player of all time, having earned 121 caps and scored 24 goals. He was selected in their squads for four European Championships and three World Cups, including their victory at the 2014 FIFA World Cup. Also, in 2014 FIFA World Cup, he was widely regarded as one of the most important contributors in Germany's victorious campaign, playing an especially important role in defending Lionel Messi in the Final.[5] Following Philipp Lahm's international retirement on 2 September 2014, Schweinsteiger was named captain of the national team. He played his last match for Germany against Finland on 31 August 2016, after which he retired from international football. ; Bastian Schweinsteiger: Since his retirement as a player in 2019, Schweinsteiger has worked as an on-air football analyst for German television broadcaster ARD and its weekend programme Sportschau.[6] ; Bastian Schweinsteiger: Schweinsteiger signed with FC Bayern Munich as a youth team player on 1 July 1998[2] and rose through the club's youth sides. A talented youth ski racer, he had to decide between pursuing a professional career in skiing or one in football.[7] Having won the German youth championship in July 2002, Schweinsteiger quickly earned a place in the reserves,[8] producing a string of solid third-division displays. He initially earned a reputation for being a rebel off the pitch, making headlines for the wrong reasons but has since settled down.[9]
knowledge1: Amr Diab // Amr Diab Amr Diab (; born October 11, 1961) is an Egyptian vocalist and writer. A Port Said native, he has established himself as an acclaimed recording artist and author in most Mediterranean countries. According to a research by Michael Frishkopf, he has created his style termed as "Mediterranean Music", a blend of Western and Egyptian rhythms. By 1992, he became the first Egyptian and Middle Eastern artist to start making high-tech music videos. Amr Diab was born on 11 October 1961 in Port Said, Egypt, into an artistic family. His father, Abdul Basset Diab, worked for the Suez Canal; Amr Diab // 6 African Music Awards in his career. Diab won Big Apple Music Awards 2009 as Lifetime Achievements Awards and Best Singer of The Year and also won The Global Icon Award, Most Popular Artist and Best Arabic Male Artist in 2014. On September 28, 2016 Diab announced that he achieved a Guinness World Records title for Most World Music Awards for Best Selling Middle Eastern Artist !Ref Amr Diab Amr Diab (; born October 11, 1961) is an Egyptian vocalist and writer. A Port Said native, he has established himself as an acclaimed recording artist and author in most Mediterranean; Amr Diab // produced a new concept of Mediterranean music, especially with his international hit, "Nour El Ain". Diab is one of the first singers to popularize music videos in the whole MENA region and is the first Egyptian singer to appear in music videos. Diab's fame in the music industry has led him to experiment with other forms of media, such as film. Amr played himself in his first film, "El Afareet", which was released in 1989. It also starred Madiha Kamel. His second film "Ice Cream in Gleam" ("Ays Krim fi Glym"), in which Diab starred in 1992, was chosen as; Amr Diab // was one of the top 10 songs in the world at (1988), "Shawa'na" (1989), "Matkhafesh" (1990), "Habibi" (1991), "Ayyamna" (1992), "Ya Omrena" (1993), "Weylomony" (1994), and Rag'een (1995). In 1996 Diab released his first album with Alam El Phan entitled "Nour El Ain", which proved an international success and gained Diab recognition beyond the Arabic speaking world. Diab recorded four more albums on the Alam El Phan label including Amarain (1999) which Robert Christgau wrote about it "one of the best songs in the world", Diab also collaborated with Khaled (on the song "Alby") and with Angela Dimitriou (on the; Amr Diab // the official site. Diab's fans initiated a massive boycott of the sites with the illegal copies. On 18 October 2009 Amr Diab won four 2009 African Music Awards in the following categories: best artist, best album, best vocalist and best song for "Wayah"; Amr Diab had been nominated by the Big Apple Music Awards. Amr Diab Will Release His New Album Named Kol Hayaty on September 10 2018. Diab is known as the father of Mediterranean Music. David Cooper and Kevin Dawe refer to his music as "the new breed of Mediterranean music". According to author Michael Frishkopf, Diab has [sep] knowledge2: Amr Diab: Amr Abdel Basset Abdel Azeez Diab (Arabic: عمرو عبد الباسط عبد العزيز دياب, IPA: [ˈʕɑmɾe deˈjæːb]; born 11 October 1961) is an Egyptian singer, composer and actor.[1] He has established himself as a globally acclaimed recording artist and author.[2] He is a Guinness World Record holder, the best selling Middle Eastern artist, a seven-times winner of World Music Awards and five-times winner of Platinum Records.[2] ; Amr Diab: Diab was born as Amr Abdel Basset Abdel Azeez Diab (Arabic: عمرو عبد الباسط عبد العزيز دياب) on 11 October 1961 in Port Said[3] to a middle-class Muslim family from the Egyptian countryside of Menia Elamh, in Sharqia Governorate, Egypt. Diab graduated with a bachelor's degree in music from the Cairo Academy of Arts in 1986.[4] ; Amr Diab: Diab released his first album entitled Ya Tareeq in 1983. Diab's second album, Ghanny Men Albak (1984), was the first of a series of records he released with Delta Sound; including Hala Hala (1986), Khalseen (1987), and Mayyal (1988), with the title track becoming one of the top 10 songs in the world at the time[citation needed]. His later releases include Shawa'na (1989), Matkhafesh (1990), Habibi (1991), Ayyamna (1992), Ya Omrena (1993), Weylomony (1994), and Rag'een (1995).  ; Amr Diab: By 1992, he became the first Egyptian and Middle Eastern artist to start making high-tech music videos.[5] ; Amr Diab: In 1996, Diab released his first album with Alam El Phan entitled Nour El Ain, and he won the World Music Award for the first time, which proved an international success and gained Diab recognition beyond the Arabic-speaking world. Diab recorded four more albums with Alam El Phan, including Amarain (1999). Diab also collaborated with Khaled (on the song "Alby") and with Angela Dimitriou (on the song "Bahebak Aktar").
knowledge1: Danny Almonte // Danny Almonte Danny Almonte (born April 7, 1987) is a former baseball player, currently an assistant baseball coach at Cardinal Hayes High School in New York City. Almonte was born in Moca, Dominican Republic. A former Little League pitcher that threw up to , he became the subject of considerable media attention in 2001. Considered a phenomenon as he led his Bronx team to a third-place finish in the 2001 Little League World Series, Almonte was revealed to have actually been two years too old to play Little League baseball. Although there were many allegations during the 2001 Series, the; Danny Almonte // was inspired by Almonte's story. Danny Almonte Danny Almonte (born April 7, 1987) is a former baseball player, currently an assistant baseball coach at Cardinal Hayes High School in New York City. Almonte was born in Moca, Dominican Republic. A former Little League pitcher that threw up to , he became the subject of considerable media attention in 2001. Considered a phenomenon as he led his Bronx team to a third-place finish in the 2001 Little League World Series, Almonte was revealed to have actually been two years too old to play Little League baseball. Although there were many allegations; Danny Almonte // May 2006 as Almonte proclaimed he was married to 30-year-old Rosy Perdomo. While in the National Amateur Baseball Federation (NABF) wood-bat summer league, he played for Youth Service. There had been some reports that he would be selected in the 2006 Major League Baseball Draft, though this did not happen. He attended a Major League tryout in October 2006. After the draft he said he would play baseball for New Mexico Junior College in Hobbs, New Mexico. The team made it to the National Junior College championship game in 2007. In 2007, Almonte joined the Southern Illinois Miners of the; Danny Almonte // at Public School 52 in the Bronx in September. After his father's visa expired, Danny remained in New York under the guardianship of Rolando Paulino. He played, along with four of his former teammates, in the 2004 Public Schools Athletic League championship. In early 2005, Danny moved to the Miami area, where he did not play baseball due to residency requirements. The following year he returned to New York, where he pitched for James Monroe High School in the Bronx. In September 2005, Almonte was rumored to have been married to an older woman. This allegation was later confirmed in; Danny Almonte // in the summer of 2009 as an outfielder. As of 2010, Almonte had returned to the Bronx, where he was serving as a volunteer assistant coach for his high school alma mater's baseball team. At that time, he was reportedly no longer with his wife, though he would not discuss details of the relationship. Almonte indicated an intent to return to semi-pro baseball that summer, after the end of the school year, but said that he no longer held expectations of some day playing in the Major Leagues. The episode "Foul Play" of the legal drama series "Law & Order" [sep] knowledge2: Danny Almonte: Danny Almonte Rojas (born April 7, 1987) is a Dominican-American former baseball player who is currently an assistant baseball coach at Cardinal Hayes High School in New York City. Born in Moca in the Dominican Republic, Almonte was a Little League pitcher who threw up to 79 miles per hour (127 km/h). Considered a phenomenon as he led his Bronx team to a third-place finish in the 2001 Little League World Series, Almonte was revealed to have actually been two years too old to play Little League baseball. Although there were many allegations during the 2001 Series, the truth was not revealed until weeks later. ; Danny Almonte: In 2000, Danny Almonte moved to The Bronx, New York City, where he began playing Little League Baseball. His father, Felipe, who had moved to the U.S. six years earlier, had begun a youth baseball league in Moca that still bears his name. ; Danny Almonte: Almonte threw a no-hitter in the 2001 Mid-Atlantic Regional finals against State College, Pennsylvania, sending his team to the Little League World Series in South Williamsport, Pennsylvania. With his high leg kick and a fastball that reached a top speed of 76 miles per hour (122 km/h)—the equivalent, for that distance, of a 102 mph (164 km/h) major-league fastball)[1]—the 5-foot-8-inch (1.73 m) Danny soon became a sensation. His imposing frame won him the nickname "Little Unit," a nod to Randy Johnson, nicknamed "Big Unit".  ; Danny Almonte: Almonte's imposing appearance and command on the mound, as well as the velocity of his fastball, led to rumors that he was older than 12 years old, the age limit for Little League Baseball. A team from Staten Island hired a private investigator to look into the ages of the entire team. A similar investigation was conducted by a team from Pequannock Township, New Jersey. Neither turned up any evidence that the players were too old. Rolando Paulino, the league president, adamantly insisted that Almonte had been born on April 7, 1989. Paulino was initially backed by Little League and Dominican officials, who said the Baby Bombers had followed all proper procedures regarding age verification. Officials at Little League headquarters even took the unusual step of checking each of the player documents due to the rumors surrounding the team.[5] Little League officials had increased scrutiny of player eligibility after the 1992 Series, in which the champions from Zamboanga City in the Philippines were stripped of their title due to a large number of out-of-district and overage players. ; Danny Almonte: Reporters from Sports Illustrated went to the civil records building in Moca two weeks after the end of the 2001 Series. They discovered a notation in the birth ledger showing that in 1994, Felipe Almonte had registered his son's birth date as April 7, 1987, at Dr. Toribio Bencosme Hospital—which would have made him 14 years old at the time of the 2001 Series. It was common for Dominican parents to wait years before registering the birth of a child.[5] Their report, posted on the magazine's website just before being published, triggered a full investigation by Little League, even as Almonte and his teammates were being feted in the Bronx. Almonte's mother, Sonia Rojas Breton, owned a handwritten birth certificate saying that he had been born at home in Jamao with the help of a midwife in 1989. She had registered Danny's 1989 birth date in 2000.
knowledge1: Camila Luna // Camila Luna Camila Luna (born 1993) is a Puerto Rican Latin alternative-pop singer/songwriter who was nominated for a Latin Grammy for Best Pop/Rock Album in 2015 for her first album "Flamboyán". She was nominated for a Latin Grammy for Best Vocal Pop Contemporary Album in 2017 for her second album "Flora y Fauna." Camila Luna is a Puerto Rico born poet and has been living in Miami, Florida since the age of 3. She is a student and teaching assistant at University of Miami’s Master in Fine Arts program at the Miami College of Arts & Sciences. According to "People [sep] knowledge2: Lunay (singer): Jefnier Osorio Moreno (born October 4, 2000),[1] known professionally as Lunay, is a Puerto Rican singer and rapper. He rose to fame in the Latin and reggaeton scene with the songs "A Solas", "Luz Apaga", "Soltera", and "Soltera (Remix)".  On October 25, 2019, he released his debut album Épico. ; Lunay (singer): In 2017, he started uploading small musical projects to SoundCloud under the name of "Jefnier", entering more seriously in the music industry. In 2017, he launched "Aparentas", reaching thousands of reproductions on this platform, attracting the attention of two of the most recognized producers in Puerto Rico: Chris Jeday and Gaby Music. Both producers contacted the young Puerto Rican offering him a record deal and after signing, in May 2018, he changed his stage name to Lunay. ; Lunay (singer): That same month he released the song "Si Te Vas Conmigo", and a month later "Dejame Saber". The same year they came out with "A Solas" featuring Lyanno and "Como La Primera Vez" with Amarion. One of his first collaborations was "Luz Apaga" with Ozuna, Rauw Alejandro and Lyanno, reaching millions of views on YouTube. At the end of 2018, the remix of "A Solas" was released with Anuel AA, Brytiago and Alex Rose, positioning for several days on the YouTube Trending page. In March 2019, he released his single "Soltera", which achieved more than five million views in five days on YouTube. "Soltera" was also remixed in a version with Puerto Rican rappers Daddy Yankee and Bad Bunny. On August 5, 2020, he also collaborated with fellow American rapper Lil Mosey on the single "Top Gone". The single appeared on the deluxe edition of the latter's second studio album "Certified Hitmaker".[4]
knowledge1: Andry Rajoelina // Andry Rajoelina Andry Nirina Rajoelina (Malagasy: ; born 30 May 1974) is a Malagasy businessman and politician. He started his career in the private sector, first organizing events on the Island ("Live" concerts), and then investing the advertising business (Injet, billboards and print) and the media ("Viva", TV and radio). He was the Mayor of Antananarivo from December 2007 to February 2009, and President of the High Transitional Authority of Madagascar from 21 March 2009 to 25 January 2014, up until the general elections were held in 2013. After stepping down as President of the HAT, he remained head of; Andry Rajoelina // 1,755,855 votes). A televised debate between the two final candidates was aired live on 10 December. Andry Rajoelina Andry Nirina Rajoelina (Malagasy: ; born 30 May 1974) is a Malagasy businessman and politician. He started his career in the private sector, first organizing events on the Island ("Live" concerts), and then investing the advertising business (Injet, billboards and print) and the media ("Viva", TV and radio). He was the Mayor of Antananarivo from December 2007 to February 2009, and President of the High Transitional Authority of Madagascar from 21 March 2009 to 25 January 2014, up until the general elections; Andry Rajoelina // the majority party, the MAPAR. He is running for the 2018 presidential election in Madagascar, and won the first round's polls in 7 November with 39.23% of the votes. Andry Rajoelina was born on 30 May 1974 to a relatively wealthy family in Antsirabe. His father, now-retired Colonel Roger Yves Rajoelina, held dual nationality and fought for the French army in the Algerian War. Although his family could afford a college education for their son, Andry Rajoelina opted to discontinue his studies after completing his baccalauréat to launch a career as an entrepreneur. In 1994, Rajoelina met his future spouse; Andry Rajoelina // Mialy Razakandisa, who was then completing her senior year at a high school in Antananarivo. The couple courted long-distance for six years while Mialy completed her undergraduate and masters studies in finance and accounting in Paris; they were reunited in Madagascar in 2000 and wed the same year. Their marriage produced two boys, Arena (born 2002) and Ilonstoa (born 2005), and a daughter born in 2007 that the couple named Andrialy, a contraction of their own names. In 1993, at the age of 19, Rajoelina established his first enterprise: a small event production company called "Show Business." In the following; Andry Rajoelina // today.» He added that a request for President Ravalomanana to formally resign would shortly be filed with the Parliament of Madagascar. This self-declaration of power discredited Rajoelina's democratic aims, and the number of attendees at subsequent rallies declined, averaging around 3,000 to 5,000 participants. On 3 February, the Ministry of Domestic Affairs dismissed Rajoelina as mayor of Antananarivo and appointed a special delegation headed by Guy Randrianarisoa to manage the affairs of the capital. Andry Rajoelina contested the decision. On 7 February, Andry Rajoelina organized a new rally during which the leaders of the orange movement declared the constitution of [sep] knowledge2: Andry Rajoelina: Andry Nirina Rajoelina (/ˈɑːndriː rɑːdʒoʊiːˈliːnɑː/,[1] Malagasy: [ˈjanɖʐʲ nʲˈrinᵊ ratʐ'welinᵊ]; born 30 May 1974) is a Malagasy politician and businessman who has served as president of Madagascar since 2023. He previously served as president from 2019 to 2023, and was president of a provisional government from 2009 to 2014 following a political crisis and military-backed coup, having held the office of Mayor of Antananarivo for one year prior. Before entering the political arena, Rajoelina was involved in the private sector, including a printing and advertising company called Injet in 1999 and the Viva radio and television networks in 2007.  ; Andry Rajoelina: He formed the political party Young Malagasies Determined and was elected Mayor of Antananarivo in 2007. While in this position, he led an opposition movement against then-President Marc Ravalomanana that culminated in a 2009 political crisis. Rajoelina was appointed as President of the High Transitional Authority of Madagascar (HTA) by a military council, in a move characterised as a coup d'état by the international community.[2] Rajoelina dissolved the Senate and National Assembly, and transferred their powers to a variety of new governance structures responsible for overseeing the transition toward a new constitutional authority. This conflicted with an internationally mediated process to establish a transitional government. Voters approved a new constitution in a controversial national referendum in November 2010, ushering in the Fourth Republic. ; Andry Rajoelina: Andry Rajoelina was born on 30 May 1974 to a relatively wealthy family in Antsirabe.[3] His father, now-retired Colonel Roger Yves Rajoelina, held dual nationality and fought for the French army in the Algerian War.[4][5] Although his family could afford a college education for their son, Andry Rajoelina opted to discontinue his studies after completing his baccalauréat to launch a career as a DJ.[5] ; Andry Rajoelina: In 1994, Rajoelina met his future spouse Mialy Razakandisa, who was then completing her senior year at a high school in Antananarivo. The couple courted long-distance for six years while Mialy completed her undergraduate and masters studies in finance and accounting in Paris; they were reunited in Madagascar in 2000 and wed the same year. Their marriage produced two boys, Arena (born 2002) and Ilonstoa (born 2003), and a daughter born in 2005 whom the couple named Ilona.[6] ; Andry Rajoelina: In 1993, at the age of 19, Rajoelina established his first enterprise: a small event production company called Show Business. In the following year, he organized an annual concert called Live that brought together foreign and Malagasy musical artists. The event gathered 50,000 participants on its tenth anniversary.[7]
knowledge1: Joseph Kony // Joseph Kony Joseph Rao Kony (; born July 24, 1961) is the leader of the Lord's Resistance Army (LRA), a guerrilla group that formerly operated in Uganda. While initially purporting to fight against government oppression, the LRA allegedly turned against Kony's own supporters, supposedly to "purify" the Acoli people and turn Uganda into a theocracy. Kony proclaims himself the spokesperson of God and a spirit medium and claims he is visited by a multinational host of 13 spirits, including a Chinese phantom. Ideologically, the group is a syncretic mix of mysticism, Acoli nationalism, and Christian fundamentalism, and claims to be; Joseph Kony // group, with a Ugandan spokesperson stating that "the LRA no longer poses a threat to us as Uganda". At that time, his force was estimated to have shrunk to around 100 soldiers. Joseph Kony Joseph Rao Kony (; born July 24, 1961) is the leader of the Lord's Resistance Army (LRA), a guerrilla group that formerly operated in Uganda. While initially purporting to fight against government oppression, the LRA allegedly turned against Kony's own supporters, supposedly to "purify" the Acoli people and turn Uganda into a theocracy. Kony proclaims himself the spokesperson of God and a spirit medium and claims; Joseph Kony // posed a significant security risk to Uganda. Kony was born July 24, 1961, in Odek, a village east of Gulu in northern Uganda, to farmers Luizi Obol and Nora Oting. He is a member of the Acholi people. He was either the youngest or second youngest of six children in the family. Kony enjoyed a good relationship with his siblings, but was quick to retaliate in a dispute and when confronted would often resort to physical violence. His father was a lay catechist of the Catholic Church, and his mother was an Anglican. His older sister, Gabriela Lakot, still lives; Joseph Kony // In November 2006, Kony met Jan Egeland, the UN Under-Secretary-General for Humanitarian Affairs and Emergency Relief Coordinator. Journeyman Pictures released a 2006 interview with Kony in which he proclaims: "I am a freedom fighter, not a terrorist." He told Reuters: "We don't have any children. We only have combatants." Kony's followers, as well as some detractors, believe him to have been possessed by spirits. Kony tells his child soldiers that a cross on their chest drawn in oil will protect them from bullets. He is a proponent of polygamy, and is thought to have had 60 wives, and to have; Joseph Kony // fathered 42 children. Kony insists that he and the LRA are fighting for the Ten Commandments, and defended his actions in an interview, saying, "Is it bad? It is not against human rights. And that commandment was not given by Joseph. It was not given by LRA. No, those commandments were given by God." Ugandan political leader Betty Bigombe recalled that Kony and his followers used oil to ward off bullets and evil spirits. Kony believes himself to be a spirit medium. In 2008, responding to a request by Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni to engage in peace talks via telephone, [sep] knowledge2: Joseph Kony: Joseph Rao Kony (born c. 1961) is a Ugandan militant who founded the Lord's Resistance Army (LRA), designated as a terrorist group by the United Nations Peacekeepers, the European Union, and various other governments.  ; Joseph Kony: An Acholi, Kony was born into a middle-class family. His father, Luizi Obol, and his mother, Nora Oting, were both farmers. Kony dropped out of school at a young age. In 1987, he formed the Lord's Resistance Army. Kony declared a military offensive in Uganda, aiming to overthrow Yoweri Museveni's Ugandan government and establish a theocratic state based on the dominion theology. After Kony's terror activities, he was banished from Uganda and shifted to South Sudan. Kony described himself as a freedom fighter, struggling for a Christian Uganda. ; Joseph Kony: Kony has long been one of Africa's most notorious and most wanted militant warlords. He has been accused by government entities of ordering the abduction of children to become child soldiers and sex slaves. Approximately 66,000 children became soldiers, and 2 million people were displaced internally from 1986 to 2009 by his forces. Kony was indicted in 2005 for war crimes and crimes against humanity by the International Criminal Court (ICC) in The Hague, but he has evaded capture. He has been subject to an Interpol Red Notice at the ICC's request since 2006. Since the Juba peace talks in 2006, the Lord's Resistance Army no longer operates in Uganda. Sources claim that they are in the Democratic Republic of the Congo (DRC), the Central African Republic (CAR), or South Sudan. In 2013, Kony was reported to be in poor health, and Michel Djotodia, president of the CAR, claimed he was negotiating with Kony to surrender. ; Joseph Kony: Kony was born in c. 1961 in Odek, a village east of Gulu in northern Uganda.[2][3][4][5][6] His father, Luizi Obol, was a farmer and lay catechist of the Catholic Church.[7] Kony's mother, Nora Oting, was an Anglican and also a farmer. His older sister, Gabriela Lakot, still lives in Odek.[8] He is a member of the Acholi people.[2][7][9] He was either the youngest or second-youngest of six children in the family.[10] Kony enjoyed a good relationship with his siblings, but was quick to retaliate in a dispute and when confronted would often resort to physical violence.[11] ; Joseph Kony: Kony never finished elementary school.[10] He was an altar boy until 1976.[11] He dropped out of school at age 15.[2]
knowledge1: Diego Godín // started in the opening match against France (0–0) in Cape Town, and played in a further four matches for the eventual semi-finalists. In 2011, Godín featured in Uruguay's successful 2011 Copa América campaign, making one appearance as a substitute in a 3–0 defeat of Paraguay in the final. He also participated in the 2013 FIFA Confederations Cup, partnering Diego Lugano in defence in four of the team's five matches as they reached the semi-finals. Godín was selected by coach Óscar Tabárez for the 2014 World Cup and captained the team in three of its four matches due to Lugano's absence [sep] knowledge2: Diego Godín: In April 2022, Godín said that one of the reasons for which he had returned to South American football was to play the Copa Libertadores, his return marking the first time he appeared in the tournament after a 15-year hiatus.[38] On 20 June, after failing to break into the starting team and aiming to play at the upcoming World Cup for Uruguay, he announced his departure in mutual terms.[39]
knowledge1: Ayman al-Zawahiri // Ayman al-Zawahiri Ayman Mohammed Rabie al-Zawahiri (""; born June 19, 1951) is the current leader of al-Qaeda and a current or former member and senior official of Islamist organizations which have orchestrated and carried out attacks in North America, Asia, Africa, and the Middle East. In 2012, he called on Muslims to kidnap Western tourists in Muslim countries. Since the September 11 attacks, the U.S. State Department has offered a US$25 million reward for information or intelligence leading to al-Zawahiri's capture. He is under worldwide sanctions by the Al-Qaida Sanctions Committee as a member of al-Qaeda. Ayman Mohammed Rabie al-Zawahiri; Ayman al-Zawahiri // Action Committee of Islamic Jihad, which organized terrorist operations. However, after the Egyptian popular uprising in the spring of 2011, on March 17, 2011, he was released from prison by the Supreme Council of the Armed Forces, the interim government of Egypt. His lawyer said he had been held to extract information about his brother Ayman. However, on March 20, 2011, he was re-arrested. On August 17, 2013, Egyptian authorities arrested Muhammad al-Zawahiri at his home in Giza. Ayman al-Zawahiri was reportedly a studious youth. Ayman excelled in school, loved poetry, and "hated violent sports" — which he thought were; Ayman al-Zawahiri // he said were that al-Qaeda didn't kill innocents, and that al-Qaeda would move to target Israel "after expelling the occupier from Iraq". Ayman al-Zawahiri Ayman Mohammed Rabie al-Zawahiri (""; born June 19, 1951) is the current leader of al-Qaeda and a current or former member and senior official of Islamist organizations which have orchestrated and carried out attacks in North America, Asia, Africa, and the Middle East. In 2012, he called on Muslims to kidnap Western tourists in Muslim countries. Since the September 11 attacks, the U.S. State Department has offered a US$25 million reward for information or intelligence leading; Ayman al-Zawahiri // "inhumane." Al-Zawahiri studied medicine at Cairo University and graduated in 1974 with "gayyid giddan". Following that, he served three years as a surgeon in the Egyptian Army after which he established a clinic near his parents in Maadi. In 1978, he also earned a master's degree in surgery. Ayman al-Zawahiri has also shown a radical understanding of Islamic theology and Islamic history. He speaks Arabic, English, and French. Al-Zawahiri participated in Youth activism as a student. He became both quite pious and political, under the influence of his uncle Mahfouz Azzam, and lecturer Mostafa Kamel Wasfi. Sayyid Qutb preached that; Videos and audio recordings of Ayman al-Zawahiri // followers to “seek jihad against Jews” and their supporters. He also called for jihad against America and the West, and labeled Egyptian president Hosni Mubarak, King Abdullah II of Jordan and King Abdullah bin Abdulaziz of Saudi Arabia as the “brothers of Satan.” In an audio recording released on May 20, 2010 that the recently slain leaders of the group's offshoot in Iraq Abu Ayyub al-Masri and Abu Omar al-Baghdadi. It was the first message broadcast since December. Al-Zawahiri likened the slain leaders to Abu Musab al-Zarqawi, the Jordanian-born militant who created the group and was killed in a 2006 [sep] knowledge2: Ayman al-Zawahiri: Ayman Muhammad Rabi az-Zawahiri (Arabic: أيمن محمد ربيع الظواهري, romanized: ʾAyman Muḥammad Rabīʿ aẓ-Ẓawāhirī; 19 June 1951 – 31 July 2022), also known as Ayman al-Zawahiri, was an Egyptian-born militant and physician who served as the second general emir of al-Qaeda from June 2011 until his death in July 2022. ; Ayman al-Zawahiri: Al-Zawahiri graduated from Cairo University with a degree in medicine and a master's degree in surgery and was a surgeon by profession. He became a leading figure in the Egyptian Islamic Jihad, an Egyptian Islamist organization, and eventually attained the rank of emir. He was imprisoned from 1981 to 1984 for his role in the assassination of Egyptian President Anwar Sadat. His actions against the Egyptian government, including his planning of the 1995 attack on the Egyptian Embassy in Pakistan, resulted in him being sentenced to death in absentia during the 1999 "Returnees from Albania" trial. ; Ayman al-Zawahiri: A close associate of al-Qaeda leader Osama bin Laden, al-Zawahiri held significant sway over the group's operations. He was wanted by the United States and the United Nations, respectively, for his role in the 1998 U.S. embassy bombings in Kenya and Tanzania and in the 2002 Bali bombings. He merged the Egyptian Islamic Jihad with al-Qaeda in 2001 and formally became bin Laden's deputy in 2004. He succeeded bin Laden as al-Qaeda's leader after bin Laden's death in 2011. In May 2011, the U.S. announced a $25 million bounty for information leading to his capture. ; Ayman al-Zawahiri: On July 31, 2022, al-Zawahiri was killed in a U.S. drone strike in Afghanistan. ; Ayman al-Zawahiri: Ayman al-Zawahiri was born on 19 June 1951 in Giza, Egypt[2][3] to Muhammad Rabi al-Zawahiri and Umayma Azzam.[4]
knowledge1: Abraham Ancer // Abraham Ancer Abraham Ancer (born 27 February 1991) is a Mexican professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour. He won the 2018 Emirates Australian Open. Ancer was born in McAllen, Texas, raised in Reynosa, Mexico, and has dual American and Mexican citizenship. He played college golf at Odessa College and the University of Oklahoma, from which he graduated in 2013. During his one year at Odessa, Ancer was a first-team All-American and finished in a tie for second in the Junior College National Golf Championship. At Oklahoma, he saw his most success during his first year, winning twice while; Abraham Ancer // Open win gave him an entry to the 2019 Open Championship. Source: Web.com Tour playoff record (1–0) "T" = tied Abraham Ancer Abraham Ancer (born 27 February 1991) is a Mexican professional golfer who plays on the PGA Tour. He won the 2018 Emirates Australian Open. Ancer was born in McAllen, Texas, raised in Reynosa, Mexico, and has dual American and Mexican citizenship. He played college golf at Odessa College and the University of Oklahoma, from which he graduated in 2013. During his one year at Odessa, Ancer was a first-team All-American and finished in a tie for second in; Abraham Ancer // having the sixth-lowest scoring average in Oklahoma history of 72.03. During his entire career, he ended up second in all-time scoring average. Ancer turned professional in 2013. In December 2014, he tied for 35th place at the Web.com Tour Qualifying School final stage. He played on the Web.com Tour in 2015, where he finished runner-up at the Brasil Champions in March and won the Nova Scotia Open in July. He finished 11th in the regular season money list, which earned him a PGA Tour card for the 2016 season. In his rookie year, Ancer couldn't maintain his card for the; Abraham Ancer // 2017 season, demoting him back to the Web.com Tour. During the 2017 season at the Web.com Tour, five top-5 finishes, including three runner-up finishes, allowed Ancer to secure his PGA Tour card for the 2018 season by finishing in third place on the regular season money list. During the 2017–18 season, Ancer finished 9th at the OHL Classic at Mayakoba, 8th at the Houston Open, 4th at the Quicken Loans National, 5th at the RBC Canadian Open, and 7th at the Dell Technologies Championship. The Quicken Loans National was part of the Open Qualifying Series and his high finish gave; Abraham Ancer // him an entry to the 2018 Open Championship, his first major championship, where he had rounds of 71 and 78 and missed the cut. In the PGA Tour season Ancer earned US$1.7 million and finished 60th in the FedEx Cup. Ancer had a good start to the 2018–19 season with top-5 finishes in the CIMB Classic and the Shriners Hospitals for Children Open, results that lifted him into the world top-100 for the first time. He followed this up with a 5-stroke victory in the Australian Open, a week before representing Mexico in the World Cup of Golf. His Australian [sep] knowledge2: Abraham Ancer: Abraham Ancer (Spanish pronunciation: [aˈβɾan ˈanseɾ];[check surname stress] born 27 February 1991) is a Mexican-American professional golfer who played on the PGA Tour and is currently playing on the LIV Golf tour. He won the 2018 Emirates Australian Open and the 2021 WGC-FedEx St. Jude Invitational for his first PGA Tour career victory. ; Abraham Ancer: Ancer was born in McAllen, Texas; raised partially in Reynosa, Mexico; and has dual American and Mexican citizenship.[3] He attended Sharyland High School in Mission, Texas. He played college golf at Odessa College and the University of Oklahoma, from which he graduated in 2013 with a degree in General Studies.[3][4] ; Abraham Ancer: During his one year at Odessa, Ancer was a first-team All-American and finished in a tie for second in the Junior College National Golf Championship. At Oklahoma, he saw his most success during his first year, winning twice while having the sixth-lowest scoring average in Oklahoma history of 72.03. During his entire career, he ended up second in all-time scoring average.[4] ; Abraham Ancer: Ancer turned professional in 2013. In December 2014, he tied for 35th place at the Web.com Tour Qualifying School final stage.[5] He played on the Web.com Tour in 2015, where he finished runner-up at the Brasil Champions in March and won the Nova Scotia Open in July.[6] ; Abraham Ancer: He finished 11th in the regular season money list, which earned him a PGA Tour card for the 2016 season.[7] In his rookie year, Ancer did not perform consistently, with a best finish of T-18 at the FedEx St. Jude Classic. He finished 190th in FedEx Cup points and couldn't maintain his card for the 2017 season, which sent him back to the Web.com Tour.[3][8]
knowledge1: Vicente Guerrero // ever live. Guerrero is a Mexican national hero. The state of Guerrero is named in his honour. Several towns in Mexico are named in honor of this famous general, including Vicente Guerrero in Baja California. Vicente Guerrero Vicente Ramón Guerrero Saldaña (; August 10, 1782 – February 14, 1831) was one of the leading revolutionary generals of the Mexican War of Independence. He fought against Spain for independence in the early 19th century, and later served as President of Mexico, coming to power in a coup. He was of Afro-Mestizo descent, championed the cause of Mexico's common people, and abolished; Vicente Guerrero // inland from the port of Acapulco, in the Sierra Madre del Sur; his parents were María de Guadalupe Saldaña, of African descent and Pedro Guerrero, a Mestizo. Guerrero was tall and robust, and dark complected, and he was at times called "El Negro". The region where he grew up had a large concentration of indigenous groups, and as a young man he was more conversant in the local language than Spanish. His father's family included landlords, rich farmers and traders with broad business connections in the south, members of the Spanish militia and gun and cannon makers. In his youth,; Vicente Guerrero // of mixed blood and that the opposition to his presidency came from the great landowners, generals, clerics and Spaniards resident in Mexico...Guerrero's execution was perhaps a warning to men considered as socially and ethnically inferior not to dare to dream of becoming president." Honors were conferred on surviving members of Guerrero's family, and a pension was paid to his widow. In 1842, Vicente Guerrero's remains were exhumed and returned to Mexico City for reinterment. He is known for his political discourse promoting equal civil rights for all Mexican citizens. He has been described as the "greatest man of color" to [sep] knowledge2: Vicente Guerrero: Vicente Ramón Guerrero Saldaña[2] (Spanish: [biˈsente raˈmoŋ ɡeˈreɾo]; baptized 10 August 1782 – 14 February 1831) was a Mexican soldier and statesman who became the nation's second president. He was one of the leading generals who fought against Spain during the Mexican War of Independence. He is the first and so far only Mexican President of African descent and the first black president in North America. ; Vicente Guerrero: During his presidency, he abolished slavery in Mexico.[3] Guerrero was deposed in a rebellion by his Vice-President Anastasio Bustamante.[4] ; Vicente Guerrero: Vicente Guerrero was born in Tixtla, a town 100 kilometers inland from the port of Acapulco, in the Sierra Madre del Sur; his parents were María Guadalupe Rodríguez Saldaña, and Juan Pedro Guerrero. His father's family included landlords, wealthy farmers, and traders with broad business connections in the south, members of the Spanish militia, and gun and cannon makers. In his youth, he worked for his father's freight business that used mules for transport, a prosperous business during this time. His travels took him to different parts of Mexico where he heard of the idea of independence. There is controversy regarding Guerrero's ethnic origin, with some authors describing him as a mixed person with Indigenous, and African. [5][6] However, no portraits of him were made during his lifetime and those made posthumously may not be reliable. Fellow insurgent José María Morelos described him as a "young man with bronzed or tanned skin ("broncineo" in Spanish),  tall and strong (N.B. "forbid", strapping, muscular), aquiline nose, bright and light-colored eyes and big sideburns".[7] ; Vicente Guerrero: In 1810, Guerrero joined in the early revolt against Spain, first fighting in the forces of secular priest José María Morelos. When the Mexican War of Independence began, Guerrero was working as a gunsmith in Tixtla.[citation needed] He joined the rebellion in November 1810 and enlisted in a division that independence leader Morelos had organized to fight in southern Mexico. Guerrero distinguished himself in the Battle of Izúcar, in February 1812, and had achieved the rank of lieutenant colonel when Oaxaca was claimed by rebels in November 1812.[8] Initial victories by Morelos's forces faltered, and Morelos himself was captured and executed in December 1815. Guerrero joined forces with Guadalupe Victoria and Isidoro Montes de Oca, taking the position of "Commander in Chief" of the rebel troops. In 1816, the royal government under Viceroy Apodaca sought to end the insurgency, offering amnesty. Guerrero's father carried an appeal for his son to surrender, but Guerrero refused. He remained the only major rebel leader still at large and kept the rebellion going through an extensive campaign of guerrilla warfare. He won victories at Ajuchitán, Santa Fe, Tetela del Río, Huetamo, Tlalchapa, and Cuautlotitlán, regions of southern Mexico that were very familiar to him. ; Vicente Guerrero: Guerrero was a liberal by conviction, and active in the York Rite Masons, established in Mexico after independence by Joel Roberts Poinsett, the U.S. diplomatic representative to the newly independent Mexico. The Scottish Rite Masons had been established before independence. Following independence the Yorkinos appealed to a broad range of Mexico's populace, as opposed to the Scottish Rite Masons, who were a bulwark of conservatism, and in the absence of established political parties, rival groups of Masons functioned as political organizations. Guerrero had a large following among urban Yorkinos, who were mobilized during the 1828 election campaign and afterwards, in the ouster of the president-elect, Manuel Gómez Pedraza.[15]
knowledge1: Asafa Powell // of Michael, Vaughn Powell suffered a heart attack while playing a game of American football. In April 2007 Corey Reid, an uncle of Powell, was stabbed in Waterloo, Ewarton, St. Catherine. He later died in hospital. Powell is known to be occasionally shy but nonetheless good natured and somewhat of a joker. He is good friends with compatriot, 100 and 200 metre world record holder Usain Bolt. The two are often seen joking around and do meet off the track. Powell is an avid car enthusiast. Asafa Powell Asafa Powell, CD (born 23 November 1982) is a Jamaican sprinter who; Asafa Powell // Asafa Powell Asafa Powell, CD (born 23 November 1982) is a Jamaican sprinter who specialises in the 100 metres. He held the 100 metres world record between June 2005 and May 2008, with times of 9.77 and 9.74 seconds. Powell has consistently broken the 10-second barrier in competition, with his personal best of 9.72 s ranks fourth on the all-time list of male 100 metre athletes. As of 1 September 2016, Powell has broken the ten-second barrier more times than anyone else – 97 times. He currently holds the world record for the 100 yard dash, with a time of; Asafa Powell // suspension was reduced to 6 months. Born in Spanish Town, Jamaica, Asafa Powell is the youngest of six sons of two ministers. Asafa attended Ewarton Primary School and Charlemont High School, both in St. Catherine, Jamaica. Powell planned to be a mechanic before he took up running while studying in Kingston, Jamaica. His eldest brother Donovan, was a 60 m finalist in the 1999 World Indoor Championships. Running runs in the family: His brothers clocked 9.5 seconds for the 100 yd dash, his mother 11.4, and his father 10.2. Powell is a member of the MVP (Maximising Velocity and Power); Asafa Powell // prize money in the male events. In his seven appearances at the competition, he won the 100 m four times and the 200 m once, winning US$173,000 in total. Powell is deeply religious, citing his mother and father and his strict upbringing as the reason for this. In 2002 tragedy struck the Powell family when one of Asafa's brothers, Michael Powell, was shot dead in a taxi in New York. This emotional event happened the week of the Jamaica National Trials. In 2003, Asafa lost another brother during the week of the Jamaica National Championships. One year after the death; Asafa Powell // that he has a new contract with fast upcoming Chinese sports brand, Li-Ning. Asafa next competed in the 200 m of the Jamaican Senior Trials where he won the final in 19.97s, his second fastest ever. There, for the first time, he promoted his new Li Ning outfit. Powell next competed in Gateshead where he got off to a terrific start, but lost to fast finishing Tyson Gay, who took the victory in 9.94 s to Powell's 9.96 s in a strong 1.7 m/s headwind. Powell was not very disappointed as he mentioned that he got too relaxed, thus allowing [sep] knowledge2: Asafa Powell: Asafa Powell, CD (born 23 November 1982) is a retired Jamaican sprinter who specialised in the 100 metres. He set the 100 metres world record twice, between June 2005 and May 2008 with times of 9.77 and 9.74 seconds. Powell has consistently broken the 10-second barrier in competition, with his personal best of 9.72 s ranking fourth on the all-time list of men's 100-metre athletes.[2] As of 1 September 2016, Powell has broken the ten-second barrier more times than anyone else—97 times. He currently holds the world record for the 100-yard dash with a time of 9.09 s, set on 27 May 2010 in Ostrava, Czech Republic. In 2016, he became Olympic champion in the 4 x 100 metres relay. ; Asafa Powell: Powell competed in the 100 m at the 2004, 2008 and 2012 Olympics, finishing fifth in 2004 and 2008 and eighth after injuring his groin during the race in 2012.  At the 2007 Osaka World Championships, he achieved a bronze and a silver medal in the 100 m and 4 × 100 m relay respectively, and he was successful at the Commonwealth Games, winning twice plus achieving a silver medal. At the 2009 World Championships, he achieved the 100 m bronze and became champion in the relay. Powell has won five times at the IAAF World Athletics Final and was the former 100 m world record holder in the event. ; Asafa Powell: In 2013, Powell tested positive for the stimulant oxilofrine along with teammate Sherone Simpson and voluntarily withdrew from the 2013 World Athletics Championships as a result, though both maintained they did not take any banned supplements knowingly or willfully. On 10 April 2014, they received an 18-month suspension from competing, which was set to expire in December that year. However the Court of Arbitration for Sport (CAS) lifted both athletes' suspensions on 14 July 2014, finding that the positive tests were caused by the presence of oxilofrine, undisclosed by the manufacturer, in a supplement taken by the pair. ; Asafa Powell: Born in Spanish Town, Jamaica, Asafa Powell is the youngest of six sons of two ministers. Asafa attended Ewarton Primary School and Charlemont High School, both in St. Catherine, Jamaica. Powell planned to be a mechanic before he took up running while studying in Kingston, Jamaica.[3][4] His eldest brother Donovan,[5] was a 60 m finalist in the 1999 World Indoor Championships.[6] Running runs in the family: His brothers clocked 9.5[dubious  – discuss] seconds for the 100 yd dash, his mother 11.4 s, and his father 10.2 s.[7] Powell is a member of the MVP (Maximising Velocity and Power) Track & Field Club based at the University of Technology, Jamaica[8] and has been coached by Stephen Francis since 2001. ; Asafa Powell: Powell represented his school Charlemont High at the ISSA High School Championships. On 11 April he finished fourth in the Class 1 200 m, in 23.07 with a −1.7 m/s headwind. On 13 April, he finished third in his heat of the Boy's Class 1 100 m, recording 11.45 with a −2.3 m/s headwind. Neither time recorded in the heats was quick enough to advance him to the next round of competition.[9]
knowledge1: Kevin Anderson (tennis) // Kevin Anderson (tennis) Kevin Anderson (born 18 May 1986) is a South African professional tennis player who is currently ranked world No. 6 in men's singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) as of 8 October 2018. He became the top-ranked male South African player on 10 March 2008 after making the final at the 2008 Tennis Channel Open in Las Vegas. He achieved his career-high ranking of world No. 5 on 16 July 2018. He was the first South African to be ranked in the top 5 since Kevin Curren was No. 5 on 23 September 1985. On; Kevin Anderson (tennis) // tennis, as well as courses for improving one's tennis game. Anderson plays the guitar and is a fan of the British rock band Dire Straits and Mark Knopfler. His favourite TV show is "House of Cards". "This table is current through the 2018 ATP Finals." Anderson's match record against those who have been ranked in the top 10, with those who have been No. 1 in boldface Kevin Anderson (tennis) Kevin Anderson (born 18 May 1986) is a South African professional tennis player who is currently ranked world No. 6 in men's singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP); Kevin Anderson (tennis) // eve of their meeting in the finals at the 2017 US Open, it emerged that as a 12-year old, Anderson regularly competed against future world number one Rafael Nadal on the juniors circuit. Anderson played three seasons of college tennis in the United States at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. He was a three-time All-American in singles and two-time All-American in doubles. During his sophomore year (2005–06), he won the national doubles championships with playing partner Ryan Rowe. In 2007, Anderson led Illinois to a runner-up team finish, losing to host Georgia on their home courts. In the championship; Kevin Anderson (tennis) // week to take the singles and doubles titles, beating four top-200 singles players and the top three seeded doubles teams. His Challenger success in New Orleans helped him to career-high rankings at the end of 2007 of No. 221 in singles and No. 398 in doubles. Anderson began 2008 with a bit of success, reaching the quarters of the Challenger in New Caledonia before qualifying in his first Grand Slam attempt in Australia. He lost in the main draw first round to No. 84 Alejandro Falla in 5 sets, but his efforts got his ranking to a career high of; Kevin Anderson (tennis) // his first tournaments. He repeated as a finalist in USA F12, and then won USA F13 before qualifying two weeks later in the Winnetka Challenger and reaching the final to push his ranking to No. 310. He recorded his first win over a top-100 opponent in the qualifying for the ATP tournament in New Haven, beating No. 88 Chris Guccione, before losing in the main draw to No. 41 Arnaud Clément. In September 2007 in the Challenger in New Orleans, he needed to qualify to make the main draw in both singles and doubles, and won all 13 matches that [sep] knowledge2: Kevin Anderson (tennis): Kevin Michael Anderson (born 18 May 1986) is a South African professional tennis player. He achieved his career-high Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) ranking of world No. 5 on 16 July 2018.[2] He was the first South African to be ranked in the top 5 since Kevin Curren was No. 5 on 23 September 1985.On 6 February 2011, Anderson defeated Somdev Devvarman in his hometown of Johannesburg to capture the South African Open title for his first ATP Tour-level title. His second ATP title came at the 2012 Delray Beach Open when he defeated Marinko Matosevic. Anderson won his third championship in 2015 at the Winston-Salem Open with a victory over Pierre-Hugues Herbert. He ended 2017 winning the exhibition World Tennis Championship. His fourth title came in February 2018 at the New York Open. Anderson reached his maiden Grand Slam final at the 2017 US Open, where he lost to Rafael Nadal.[3] In the 2018 Wimbledon semifinals, Anderson reached his second major final by defeating American John Isner in the second-longest match in the history of major tournaments. The match, which lasted 6 hours and 36 minutes, was only beaten in length by the 2010 match between Isner and France's Nicolas Mahut. He then lost to Novak Djokovic in the final in straight sets. On 3 May 2022, Anderson retired at age 35[4] but he announced his comeback in July 2023. ; Kevin Anderson (tennis): Anderson started playing tennis at age 6 and was competitive in 800-metre races at school. On the eve of their meeting in the finals at the 2017 US Open, it emerged that as a 12-year old, Anderson regularly competed against future world number one Rafael Nadal on the juniors circuit.[5] ; Kevin Anderson (tennis): Anderson played three seasons of college tennis in the United States at the University of Illinois Urbana-Champaign. He was a three-time All-American in singles and two-time All-American in doubles. During his sophomore year (2005–06), he won the national doubles championships with playing partner Ryan Rowe.[6][7] ; Kevin Anderson (tennis): In 2007, Anderson led Illinois to a runner-up team finish, losing to host Georgia on their home courts. In the championship dual match, Anderson lost at #1 singles to future ATP top-ten player, John Isner. During the singles tournament, Anderson lost in the semifinals to eventual two-time national champion, Somdev Devvarman of Virginia. In doubles, Anderson and partner, Ryan Rowe, fell short of repeating as champions, losing in the championship match to Marco Born and Andreas Siljeström of Middle Tennessee State in three sets, after having a couple match points.[citation needed] ; Kevin Anderson (tennis): At age 17, Anderson entered his first professional tournament, winning four main-draw matches in the four-week tournament to earn a world ranking of No. 1178 from his only tournament of the year. He also finished the year with a doubles ranking of No. 902. In November, Anderson entered his third pro tournament and won the Botswana F1 to push his ranking to No. 769. He followed that up the next two weeks in South Africa, reaching the final in F1 and the semifinals in F2 to finish the year ranked No. 665 in singles from just 3 tournaments.
knowledge1: Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva // Royal Merit, as well as the First Class of the Order of Prince Yaroslav the Wise (Ukraine, 2003), the Order of Liberty (Ukraine, 2009), the Order of the Elephant (Denmark, 2007) and the Order of the Tower and Sword (Portugal, 2008). He received the Prince of Asturias Award for International Cooperation in 2003 and was the chief guest at India's Republic Day celebration in 2004. He was also given the Jawaharlal Nehru Award in 2006 and the Indira Gandhi Prize for Peace, Disarmament and Development in 2010. He was rated the most popular Brazilian president of all time with an [sep] knowledge2: Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva: Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva (Brazilian Portuguese: [luˈiz iˈnasju ˈlulɐ dɐ ˈsiwvɐ] ⓘ; born Luiz Inácio da Silva; 27 October 1945),[1] also known as Lula da Silva or simply Lula, is a Brazilian politician who is the 39th and current president of Brazil. A member of the Workers' Party, he was also the 35th president of Brazil from 2003 to 2010.[2]
knowledge1: Vicente Carrillo Fuentes // Vicente Carrillo Fuentes Vicente Carrillo Fuentes (born October 16, 1962), commonly referred to by his alias El Viceroy, is a Mexican suspected drug lord and former leader of the Juárez Cartel, a drug trafficking organization. The cartel is based in Chihuahua, one of the primary transportation routes for billions of dollars' worth of illegal drug shipments entering the United States from Mexico annually. He was one of Mexico's most-wanted drug lords. Vicente Carrillo Fuentes was born in Guamuchilito, Navolato, Sinaloa, Mexico on 16 October 1962 to Vicente Carrillo and Aurora Fuentes. He had seven siblings: Angélica, Amado, Cipriano, Guadalupe, Alberto,; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes // shadow of its former self. Carrillo Fuentes was charged in a forty-six count indictment in the Western District of Texas with continuing criminal enterprise, importation and possession with intent to distribute cocaine and marijuana, conspiracy to import and possess with intent to distribute cocaine and marijuana, as well as with money laundering, tampering with a witness, ordering the intentional killing of individuals to prevent communication of information by them to U.S. law enforcement, and murder in furtherance of a continuing criminal enterprise. The U.S. Departments of State offered a reward of up to $5 million USD for information leading to; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes // to Mexico City and transferred to the federal installations of SEIDO, Mexico's anti-organized crime investigatory agency, where he gave a formal declaration. Two days later, he was formally charged with drug trafficking and organized crime offenses. On 14 October 2014, Carrillo Fuentes was transferred to the Federal Social Readaptation Center No. 2, a federal maximum-security prison (commonly referred to as "Puente Grande"), in Jalisco state. That same day, he was formally charged by a federal court in Jalisco for violating Mexico's Federal Law of Firearms and Explosives. Vicente Carrillo Fuentes Vicente Carrillo Fuentes (born October 16, 1962), commonly referred to; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes // the arrest and/or conviction of Vicente Carrillo Fuentes. On 1 June 2000, the United States Department of the Treasury sanctioned Carrillo Fuentes under the Foreign Narcotics Kingpin Designation Act (sometimes referred to simply as the "Kingpin Act"), for his involvement in drug trafficking along with eleven other international criminals. The act prohibited U.S. citizens and companies from doing any kind of business activity with him, and virtually froze all his assets in the U.S. Carrillo Fuentes was arrested in a joint operation by the Mexican Army and Federal Police in Torreón, Coahuila on 9 October 2014. He was then sent; Juan José Esparragoza Moreno // in the Juárez Cartel, Esparragoza Moreno has traditionally held leadership positions as a number-two figure, given his preference to maintain a low-profile status and avoid getting arrested or killed as the top kingpins usually do. In an attempt to change his physical appearance and avoid detection from Mexican and U.S. law enforcement, Carrillo Fuentes decided in 1997 to undergo plastic surgery and relocate outside of Mexico. After the eight-hour-long surgery at the Santa Mónica Hospital in Mexico City, Carrillo Fuentes died of a reported heart attack caused by the overdose of the tranquilizer Dormicum or by a defect in a [sep] knowledge2: Vicente Carrillo Fuentes: Vicente Carrillo Fuentes (born 16 October 1962), commonly referred to by his alias El Viceroy, is a Mexican convicted drug lord and former leader of the Juárez Cartel, a drug trafficking organization. The cartel is based in Chihuahua, one of the primary transportation routes for billions of dollars' worth of illegal drug shipments entering the United States from Mexico annually. He was one of Mexico's most-wanted drug lords until his capture in 2014.[4] ; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes: Vicente Carrillo Fuentes was born in Guamuchilito, Navolato, Sinaloa, Mexico on 16 October 1962 to Vicente Carrillo and Aurora Fuentes. He had seven siblings: Angélica, Amado, Cipriano, Guadalupe, Alberto, Rodolfo and José Cruz Carrillo Fuentes (Vicente being the fourth one).[5] All are nephews of Ernesto Fonseca Carrillo, a former drug lord. ; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes: The Juárez Cartel was founded by his brother Amado Carrillo Fuentes following the death of Pablo Acosta Villarreal. ; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes: In 2004 Rodolfo Carrillo was killed outside of a movie theatre, allegedly at the behest of Guzmán Loera. Vicente Carrillo responded by having Guzmán Loera's brother "El Pollo" assassinated in prison. This sparked off a turf war; however, it seemed that the war between the two was on hold during 2005 and 2006 because the Sinaloa Cartel was engaged in a vicious war with their rival, the Gulf Cartel. During this time, the leadership of the cartel was between Vicente Carrillo and Ricardo García Urquiza, who was arrested in November 2005.[8] The cartel had become factionalized between the groups loyal to the Carrillo family and the groups loyal to Juan José Esparragoza Moreno and Guzmán Loera's Sinaloa Cartel. ; Vicente Carrillo Fuentes: Carrillo Fuentes was charged in a forty-six count indictment in the Western District of Texas with continuing criminal enterprise, importation and possession with intent to distribute cocaine and marijuana, conspiracy to import and possess with intent to distribute cocaine and marijuana, as well as with money laundering, tampering with a witness, ordering the intentional killing of individuals to prevent communication of information by them to U.S. law enforcement, and murder in furtherance of a continuing criminal enterprise. The U.S. Departments of State offered a reward of up to $5 million USD for information leading to the arrest and/or conviction of Vicente Carrillo Fuentes.[9]
knowledge1: Jackson Martínez // part of the squad-of-23 for the 2011 Copa América. On 2 June 2014, Martínez was named in Colombia's 23-man squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. After a substitute appearance in the team's opening match win over Greece, Martínez was selected to start in the final group game against Japan, scoring twice in a 4–1 win. <div id="1"> <div id="2"> "Source": Footballdatabase.eu y Fichajes.com "Scores and results list Colombia's goal tally first." Jackson Martínez Jackson Arley Martínez Valencia (; born 3 October 1986) is a Colombian professional footballer who plays as a striker. He currently plays for Portimonense, on loan [sep] knowledge2: Jackson Martínez: In January 2020, he signed a new contract with the Portuguese club, keeping him until 2022.[102] His last match for the club was on 26 July 2020, where he wore the captain's armband in a 2–0 victory against Desportivo Aves. He made 24 appearances and scored once for the 2019–20 season, where Portimonense finished 17th in the table and were set to be relegated, but avoided the drop due to 16th-placed Vitoria Setubal failing to provide documentation for the following season. Still troubled by his chronic ankle injuries, Martínez left Portimonense in August 2020, stating that he wanted to return to Independiente Medellín.[103]
knowledge1: Sérgio Moraes // took place on September 16, 2017 at UFC Fight Night 116. Moraes lost the fight via knockout in the first round. Moraes was scheduled to face promotional newcomer Abubakar Nurmagomedov on February 3, 2018 at . Within the same day, for undisclosed reasons, Nurmagomedov was replaced by Tim Means. Moraes won the fight via split decision. Moraes faced Ben Saunders on September 22, 2018 at UFC Fight Night 137. He won the fight via a submission in round two. Sérgio Moraes Sérgio Ricardo de Moraes (born July 23, 1982) is a Brazilian mixed martial artist currently signed with the Ultimate [sep] knowledge2: Sérgio Moraes: Moraes was expected to face Max Griffin but Griffin pulled out of the fight[25] and Moraes faced promotional newcomer Davi Ramos on March 11, 2017, at UFC Fight Night 106.[26] He won the fight via unanimous decision.[27] After the fight with Ramos, Moraes signed a new, six-fight deal with UFC.[28]
knowledge1: Adel Emam // range of humour including slapstick, farce, and even the occasional double entendre. His character archetype is an individual down on his luck who rises above powerful outside pressures. In January 2000, the United Nations appointed Emam as a Goodwill Ambassador for UNHCR He is an important figure in Egypt and the Arabic-speaking countries largely because of the political roles he took on in many of his films and plays. These roles, whether he intended it or not, often put him in a critical position vis-à-vis the president or the government. He has been cast several times by the producer Emad; Adel Emam // Adel Emam Adel Imam (sometimes credited as: Adel Emam), (), born May 17, 1940, in Shaha (شها) near El Mansoura (المنصورة), is an Egyptian movie and stage actor. He is primarily a comedian, but he has starred in more serious works and, especially in his earlier films, has combined comedy with romance. Emam earned a bachelor's degree in Agriculture from Cairo University. Since then he has appeared in over 100 movies and 10 plays. He is one of the most famous actors in Egypt, and has received critical and popular praise throughout his career. Emam's roles have displayed a wide; Adel Emam // first Career Achievement Award in El-Gouna Film Festival in 2017. Adel Emam Adel Imam (sometimes credited as: Adel Emam), (), born May 17, 1940, in Shaha (شها) near El Mansoura (المنصورة), is an Egyptian movie and stage actor. He is primarily a comedian, but he has starred in more serious works and, especially in his earlier films, has combined comedy with romance. Emam earned a bachelor's degree in Agriculture from Cairo University. Since then he has appeared in over 100 movies and 10 plays. He is one of the most famous actors in Egypt, and has received critical and popular; Adel Emam // Imam said he would appeal the sentence. On September 12, 2012, Emam won his appeal when a Cairo misdemeanours court cleared him of defaming Islam in his films. Adel Emam received numerous awards through his five decades career. He won Horus Award twice for his leading roles in Omaret Yakobean and Al-irhabi at Cairo International Film Festival. He won the Honorary Award of the Festival at 2014 Marrakech International Film Festival. He won International Jury Award at São Paulo International Film Festival. In 2005 and 2008 Dubai International Film Festival awarded Adel Emam the Lifetime Achievement Award. He received the; Adel Emam // strand of the film's complex narrative. Adel Emam is married and has three children: the young director Rami Imam, Sarah Emam, and Mohamed Imam, who also starred in the movie "The Yacoubian Building" as Taha ElShazli. He is the brother of Esam Imam and Iman Imam. His brother-in-law is the late actor Mustafa Metwalli. Adel Emam stated on a talk show hosted by Hala Sarhan that Amin Shalaby and the late Younes Shalaby as well as Saeed Saleh were his best friends since university. In February 2012, Emam was sentenced (in absentia) to three months in jail for offending Islam. [sep] knowledge2: Adel Emam: Adel Emam (Arabic: عادل إمام; born 17 May 1940) is an Egyptian film, television, and stage actor.[1] He is primarily a comedian, but he has starred in more serious works and, combined comedy with romance especially in his earlier secondary roles in films such as My Wife, the Director General, My Wife's Dignity, My Wife's Goblin and Virgo, all films starring Salah Zulfikar. ; Adel Emam: Emam earned a bachelor's degree in Agriculture from Cairo University. Since then he has appeared in over 103 movies and 10 plays. He is one of the most famous actors in Egypt and in the Arab world. ; Adel Emam: His contributions to the Egyptian film industry and theatre through addressing social and political issues in film and television earned him a cult following and a worldwide reputation that made him one of the most influential Arab public figures in the 1980s and 1990s. Adel Imam is considered by a huge mass of cult followers as a cultural icon in the history of modern Egypt. ; Adel Emam: In January 2000, the United Nations appointed Emam as a Goodwill Ambassador for UNHCR. ; Adel Emam: Emam launched his career in theater in Ana w Howa w Heya (1962) with Fouad El-Mohandes and Shwikar. In cinema he acted in My Wife, the Director General (1966), My Wife's Dignity (1967), and My Wife's Goblin (1968) with leading actor Salah Zulfikar. In early 1970s, he co-starred with Salah Zulfikar in Virgo (1970), and shared the lead in Find a scandal (1973) with Mervat Amin and Samir Sabry. Later, he started to act in starring roles in the 1980s and 1990s including The Suspect (1981), and Love in a Jail Cell (1983), both films alongside leading actress Soad Hosny.
knowledge1: Ian Khama // Ian Khama Serêtsê Khama Ian Khama born 27 February 1953 is a Motswana former military officer and retired politician who served as the fourth President of the Republic of Botswana from 1 April 2008 to 1 April 2018. After serving as Commander of the Botswana Defence Force, he entered politics and served as Vice-President of Botswana from 1998 to 2008, then succeeded Festus Mogae as President on 1 April 2008. He won a full term in the 2009 election and was re-elected in October 2014. Ian Khama is the second child of Sir Seretse Khama (1 July 1921 – 13; Ian Khama // Ian Khama is an alumnus of Waterford Kamhlaba, a United World College in Mbabane, Swaziland. He is a qualified pilot and attended Royal Military Academy Sandhurst, where the British Army trains its officers. In April 1977, Khama was appointed as a brigadier general at age 24 during Sir Seretse Khama's Presidency, hence Deputy Commander to late former Vice President Lt. Gen. Mompati Merafhe, later serving as BDF Commander from 1989 until becoming Vice President in 1998. Khama, serving as Commander of the Botswana Defence Force, announced on 16 December 1997 that he would retire from his command on 31 March; Ian Khama // of the party. Motswaledi bowed out of the BDP brass to form another political party, BMD.Ian Khama preferred long titles such as being called Lieutenant General Dr as his title especially after being given an honorary doctrate by an asian university. Ian Khama Serêtsê Khama Ian Khama born 27 February 1953 is a Motswana former military officer and retired politician who served as the fourth President of the Republic of Botswana from 1 April 2008 to 1 April 2018. After serving as Commander of the Botswana Defence Force, he entered politics and served as Vice-President of Botswana from 1998 to; Ian Khama // recognizing the government unless and until it included members of the Movement for Democratic Change (MDC) headed by Morgan Tsvangarai. Khama also condemned the action of Sudan's President Omar al-Bashir in the region of Dafur and became a vocal critic of despotic governments in Africa along with President Jakaya Kikwete of Tanzania and President Levy Mwanawasa of Zambia. On the economic front, Khama has been a vocal proponent of moving Botswana away from its over-reliance on diamonds and diversifying its economy, especially to the agriculture and tourism sector. Under his watch, the number of site-holders licensed to operate diamond polishing [sep] knowledge2: Ian Khama: Seretse Khama Ian Khama[1](pronunciationⓘ) (born 27 February 1953)[2] is a Motswana politician and former military officer who was the fourth President of the Republic of Botswana from 1 April 2008 to 1 April 2018. After serving as Commander of the Botswana Defence Force, he entered politics and was Vice-President of Botswana from 1998 to 2008, then succeeded Festus Mogae as President on 1 April 2008. He won a full term in the 2009 election and was re-elected in October 2014.[3] ; Ian Khama: Ian Khama is the second child of Sir Seretse Khama (1 July 1921 – 13 July 1980), Botswana's foremost independence leader and its president from 1966 to 1980, and Lady Khama. He was born in Chertsey, Surrey, while his father was living in exile in the United Kingdom, due to the opposition by the colonial government and the emergent apartheid regime in South Africa to his marriage to a white woman.[4] ; Ian Khama: He is also the grandson of Sekgoma II (1869–1925), who was the paramount chief of the Bamangwato people, and the great-grandson of Khama III (1837–1923), their king. His great-great grandfather of Kgosikgolo Sekgoma I was Chief of the Bamangwato people (1815–1885). The name "Seretse" means “the clay that binds together”, and was given to his father to celebrate the recent reconciliation of his father and grandfather; this reconciliation assured Seretse Khama's ascension to the throne when his aged father died in 1925. Ian Seretse Khama is named after his father to continue this historical legacy. He is also known simply as Ian Khama to differentiate between himself and his father. Tshekedi Khama II, Ian Khama's brother, was named after their great uncle, Tshekedi Khama who was the regent and guardian for Seretse Khama, the first president of Botswana.[5] ; Ian Khama: Ian Khama was educated at Waterford Kamhlaba, a United World College in Mbabane,[6] and at the Royal Military Academy Sandhurst.[7] He is a qualified pilot. In April 1977, Khama was appointed as a brigadier general at age 24 during Sir Seretse Khama's Presidency, making him the Deputy Commander to late former Vice President Lt. Gen. Mompati Merafhe. He later served as the Commander of the Botswana Defence Force (BDF) from his appointment in 1989, retiring from the position in 1998. During this time, Khama received military honours, including the Founder Officer Medal for being part of the Botswana Defence Force when it was created in 1977, the Duty Code Order for devotion to duty, and the Distinguished Service Medal in 1997 after 20 years of service. ; Ian Khama: Khama, serving as Commander of the Botswana Defence Force, announced on 16 December 1997 that he would retire from his command on 31 March 1998. Because this was the same date as the planned retirement of President Quett Masire, it fueled political speculation about Khama.[8] On 1 April 1998, when Vice-President Festus Mogae succeeded Masire as President, Khama was appointed as the new Vice-President. However, Khama did not hold a seat in the National Assembly, and so could not immediately take office as Vice-President. In early July 1998 he overwhelmingly won a by-election in Serowe North, receiving 2,986 votes against 86 votes for the candidate of the opposition Botswana National Front.[9] On 13 July, he took his seat in the National Assembly and was sworn in as Vice-President.[10] By these actions, he effectively renounced his  hitherto unclaimed hereditary chieftaincy, as the constitutional monarchs of modern Botswana are legally barred from actively taking part in party politics. Be this as it may, many traditional Bamangwato continued to recognize him as their chief.
knowledge1: Mike Adenuga // to pay the $9.4 million owed to the US oil and gas firm Baker Hughes. In 2012, he was made Grand Commander of the Order of the Niger by the government of Nigeria. He holds a Yoruba tribal chieftaincy as the Otunba Apesin of the Ijebu clan. Mike Adenuga Michael Adeniyi Agbolade Ishola Adenuga Jr, GCON (born 29 April 1953) is a Nigerian billionaire businessman, and the second-richest person in Nigeria. His company Globacom is Nigeria's second-largest telecom operator, and has a presence in Ghana and Benin. He owns stakes in the Equitorial Trust Bank and the oil exploration firm; Mike Adenuga // Mike Adenuga Michael Adeniyi Agbolade Ishola Adenuga Jr, GCON (born 29 April 1953) is a Nigerian billionaire businessman, and the second-richest person in Nigeria. His company Globacom is Nigeria's second-largest telecom operator, and has a presence in Ghana and Benin. He owns stakes in the Equitorial Trust Bank and the oil exploration firm Conoil (formerly "Consolidated Oil Company"). "Forbes" has estimated his net worth at $5.8 billion as of 2017, which makes him the second-wealthiest Nigerian behind Aliko Dangote, with a net worth of $14.1 billion. His father, the Oloye Michael Agbolade Adenuga Sr, was a school teacher while his; Mike Adenuga // mother, Omoba Juliana Oyindamola Adenuga (née Onashile, of Okesopin, Ijebu Igbo), was a businesswoman of royal Ijebu descent. Adenuga received his secondary school education at Ibadan Grammar School, Ibadan, and Comprehensive High School, Aiyetoro, for his Higher School Certificate (HSC). He worked as a taxi driver to help fund his university education. He graduated from Northwestern Oklahoma State University and Pace University, New York, with degrees in Business Administration. In 1990, he received a drilling license and in 1991, his Consolidated Oil struck oil in the shallow waters of Southwestern Ondo State, the first indigenous oil company to do so; Mike Adenuga // Financial Crimes Commission. He subsequently left the country and lived in London until the Umaru Musa Yar'Adua regime granted him a pardon. In May 2015, Adenuga made a takeover bid to purchase Ivorian mobile telecom's operator Comium Côte d'Ivoire for $600 million. In June 2016, it was revealed that Adenuga was being pursued for a combined debt of US$140.5 million, after his company ConOil failed to pay debts owed to, among others, the French oil giant Total. Bellbop, another company owned by Adenuga, had an interim injunction placed on it by the High Court in Lagos, after it too failed [sep] knowledge2: Mike Adenuga: Chief Michael Adeniyi Agbolade Ishola Adenuga Jr CSG GCON[3] (born 29 April 1953) is a Nigerian billionaire businessman, and the third richest person in Africa.[4][5] His company Globacom is Nigeria's second-largest telecom operator and also has a presence in Ghana and Benin. He owns stakes in the Equitorial Trust Bank and the oil exploration firm Conoil (formerly Consolidated Oil Company). ; Mike Adenuga: Forbes estimated his net worth at $6.2 billion as of May 2021.[6] ; Mike Adenuga: His father, Oloye Michael Agbolade Adenuga Sr, was a schoolteacher while his mother, Omoba Juliana Oyindamola Adenuga (née Onashile, of Okesopin, Ijebu Igbo), was a businesswoman of royal Ijebu descent.[7] ; Mike Adenuga: Adenuga received his secondary school education at Ibadan Grammar School, Ibadan, Oyo State, Nigeria[8] and Comprehensive High School, Aiyetoro, for his Higher School Certificate (HSC). He worked as a taxi driver to help fund his university education.[9] He graduated from Northwestern Oklahoma State University and Pace University, New York, with degrees in Business Administration.[10] ; Mike Adenuga: Adenuga made his first million in 1979, at age 26, selling lace and distributing soft drinks.[6] In 1990, he received a drilling license and in 1991, his Consolidated Oil struck oil in the shallow waters of Southwestern Ondo State, making him the first indigenous oil company to do so in commercial quantity.
knowledge1: Carlos Ghosn // Carlos Ghosn Carlos Ghosn, KBE (; born March 9, 1954) is a Brazilian-born businessman who also has French and Lebanese nationality. Ghosn has served as the CEO of Michelin North America, chairman and CEO of Renault, chairman of AvtoVAZ, chairman and former CEO of Nissan, and chairman of Mitsubishi Motors. Ghosn was also chairman and CEO of the Renault–Nissan–Mitsubishi Alliance, a strategic partnership between those automotive manufacturers through a complex cross-shareholding agreement. The venture has held an approximately 10% market share since 2010, and as of 2017 was reckoned to be the third largest automobile group worldwide. In 1996, Renault's; Carlos Ghosn // International Advisory Board of Brazilian bank Banco Itaú (a major party in the privatisation of Renault) until 2015. He is also a member of the Advisory Board of Tsinghua University School of Economics and Management in Beijing. He has received an honorary doctorate from American University of Beirut; and he is a member of the Strategic Council, Saint Joseph University of Beirut. In 2014 and 2015, he was elected president of the European Automobile Manufacturers Association. He serves as governor of the World Economic Forum. On 19 November 2018, Tokyo District Prosecutors arrested Ghosn at 4:30 pm upon his re-entry; Carlos Ghosn // he has also studied Japanese. He also maintains ties to Lebanon, where he lived for 10 years and where he completed his primary and secondary education. He is a partner in Ixsir, a winery in the northern coastal town of Batroun, Lebanon. In 2012 he was named to the Honorary Board of the American Foundation of Saint George Hospital in Beirut. Ghosn has been hailed as a potential presidential candidate in Lebanon. In a June 2011 survey by life-insurance company AXA, Ghosn was ranked No. 7 in a random poll asking Japanese people, "Which celebrity do you want to run; Carlos Ghosn // competitive global car business", splits his time between Paris and Tokyo and as of 2006 logged roughly 150,000 miles in airplanes per year. Japanese media have called him "Seven-Eleven" ("work very hard from early in the morning till late at night"). He holds both Brazilian and French citizenships. He has been noted for his direct, no-nonsense, results-oriented and execution-oriented style in business strategy meetings, but also for his interest in resolving problems from within a company by listening to workers and by cross-functional and cross-cultural team groupings. Ghosn is multilingual, speaking four languages fluently: French, Portuguese, English, and Arabic, and; Carlos Ghosn // David Magee. He also provided strategic business commentary and on-the-job lessons to aspiring managers in a book called "The Ghosn Factor: 24 Inspiring Lessons From Carlos Ghosn, the Most Successful Transnational CEO" by Miguel Rivas-Micoud. As a result of his achievements, Ghosn has had numerous awards and honors bestowed upon him. Some of these include: Carlos Ghosn Carlos Ghosn, KBE (; born March 9, 1954) is a Brazilian-born businessman who also has French and Lebanese nationality. Ghosn has served as the CEO of Michelin North America, chairman and CEO of Renault, chairman of AvtoVAZ, chairman and former CEO of Nissan, [sep] knowledge2: Carlos Ghosn: Carlos Ghosn (/ɡoʊn/;[1] French: [kaʁlɔs ɡon]; Arabic: كارلوس غصن; Lebanese Arabic pronunciation: ['kaːrlos 'ɣosˤn], born 9 March 1954) is a businessman, former automotive executive, and international fugitive.[2][3] Ghosn was the CEO of Michelin North America, chairman and CEO of Renault, chairman of AvtoVAZ, chairman and CEO of Nissan, and chairman of Mitsubishi Motors.[4][5][6] ; Carlos Ghosn: Ghosn's grandfather was Bichara Ghosn, a Maronite Catholic who emigrated from Ajaltoun,[7] French Mandate Lebanon to Brazil at the age of 13, eventually settling in remote Guaporé, Rondônia, near the border between Brazil and Bolivia.[8] Bichara Ghosn was an entrepreneur and eventually headed several companies, in businesses including the rubber trade, the sale and purchase of agricultural products, and aviation.[9] His son Jorge Ghosn married Rose Jazzar, a Nigerian-born Lebanese woman[10] whose family came from Miziara in Lebanon then went to Brazil,[7] where they settled in Porto Velho, the state capital of Rondônia, and had four children.[11] ; Carlos Ghosn: Carlos' father, Jorge Ghosn (died 2006) was a diamond trader and worked in the airline industry. Jorge was convicted of murdering a priest in Sawfar, Lebanon in 1960.[12] Jorge fled to Brazil in 1975 at the outbreak of the Lebanese Civil War.[13][14] ; Carlos Ghosn: Carlos Ghosn was born on 9 March 1954, in Porto Velho.[11][15][16] When he was about two years old he became sick after drinking unsanitary water, and his mother moved with him to Rio de Janeiro.[11] He did not fully recover there, and in 1960, when Ghosn was six years old, he and his mother and sister moved to Beirut, Lebanon, where his grandmother and two other sisters lived.[11] ; Carlos Ghosn: Ghosn completed his secondary school studies in Lebanon, at the Jesuit school Collège Notre-Dame de Jamhour. He then completed his classes préparatoires in Paris, at the Collège Stanislas and the Lycée Saint-Louis.[17] He graduated as an engineer from the École Polytechnique in 1974 and the École des Mines de Paris in 1978.[15][18][19]
knowledge1: Lupe Vélez // She was one of the first successful Latin American actresses in the United States. During the 1930s, her well-known explosive screen persona was exploited in a series of successful films like "Hot Pepper" (1933), "Strictly Dynamite" (1934) and "Hollywood Party" (1934). In the 1940s, Vélez's popularity peaked after appearing in the "Mexican Spitfire" films, a series created to capitalize on Vélez's well-documented fiery personality. Nicknamed "The Mexican Spitfire" by the media, Vélez's personal life was as colorful as her screen persona. She had several highly publicized romances and a stormy marriage. In December 1944, Vélez died of an intentional overdose [sep] knowledge2: Lupe Vélez: Vélez then met and began dating a struggling young Austrian actor named Harald Maresch, whose stage name was Harald Ramond. In September 1944, she discovered she was pregnant with Ramond's child. She announced their engagement in late November 1944.[54] On December 10, four days before her death, Vélez announced she had ended the engagement and kicked Ramond out of her home.[55]
knowledge1: Cédric Bakambu // a fee of €1.8 million and an annual salary of €800,000. He made his debut in the Süper Lig twelve days later, replacing Ozan İpek in the 55th minute of a 2–1 win at Gençlerbirliği S.K.. His first goals for the "Green Crocodiles" came on 19 October, in either half of a 2–2 draw against Eskişehirspor at the Bursa Atatürk Stadium, and six days later he scored a first professional hat-trick in a 5–0 win at Balıkesirspor. He finished his only league season in Bursa with 13 goals in 27 games. In the season's domestic cup, Bakambu was the top [sep] knowledge2: Cédric Bakambu: 1 Muslera  · 3 Angeliño · 5 Aydın · 6 Sánchez · 7 Aktürkoğlu · 8 Demirbay · 9 Icardi · 10 Mertens · 14 Zaha · 19 Güvenç · 20 Tetê · 21 Dervişoğlu · 22 Ziyech · 23 Ayhan · 25 Nelsson · 27 Oliveira · 34 Torreira · 42 Bardakcı · 50 J. Yılmaz · 53 B.A. Yılmaz · 81 Akman · 88 Karataş · 91 Ndombele · 93 Boey · 94 Bakambu · Coach: Buruk
knowledge1: Guillermo Rigondeaux // Guillermo Rigondeaux Guillermo Rigondeaux Ortiz (; born September 30, 1980) is a Cuban professional boxer. He has held multiple world championships at super bantamweight, including the lineal title since 2013, and previously the unified WBA (Super), WBO, and "Ring" magazine titles between 2013 and 2017. As of December 2017, Rigondeaux is ranked as the world's best active super bantamweight by "The Ring" and the Transnational Boxing Rankings Board (TBRB). He is also ranked as the world's ninth best active boxer, pound for pound, by "The Ring". Possessing one of the greatest amateur records of all time, Rigondeaux won consecutive gold; Guillermo Rigondeaux // again for the Cuban team. In February 2009, Rigondeaux defected again via Mexico City to Miami, and signed with Arena Box-Promotion. On February 23, 2009, Rigondeaux was announced to have defected along with 2004 Olympic Silver Medalist Yudel Johnson, Yordanis Despaigne and Yunier Dorticos. He would train in the same gym as Yuriorkis Gamboa, Erislandy Lara and Odlanier Solis and would continue his career as a professional once he completed all the residency requirements. He left behind his wife Farah Colina, a 7-year-old son and a 17-year-old stepson in Cuba. He was also reportedly staying in the home of countryman; Guillermo Rigondeaux // medals in the bantamweight division at the 2000 and 2004 Summer Olympics. He is also a seven-time Cuban national champion at bantamweight (2000–2006), finishing his amateur career with a record of nearly 475 fights with 12 losses; the last of these losses occurring in 2003. After Rigondeaux's defection in 2009, he turned professional and remained undefeated for almost nine years. Rigondeaux has been lauded by boxing trainer Freddie Roach as being "probably the greatest talent I've ever seen." He is known for his exceptionally fast hand speed, punching power, counterpunching abilities, and defensive elusiveness. 2000 2004 On July 22, 2007,; Guillermo Rigondeaux // would make his ring return on either December 22, 2018 or January 13, 2019. It was reported that he would return to super bantamweight, but could see a move up to featherweight. Rigondeaux's co-manager Alex Bornote later confirmed he would fight on a date in January 2019. A documentary on Rigondeaux, "Split Decision", has been in the works by filmmaker Brin-Jonathan Butler. Butler also published a biography of Rigondeaux in 2014, entitled "A Cuban Boxer's Journey: From Castro's Traitor to American Champion", published by Picador USA. <br>Status changed Guillermo Rigondeaux Guillermo Rigondeaux Ortiz (; born September 30, 1980) is a; Guillermo Rigondeaux // the later part of his career, so if he's a free agent, maybe he can go make a fight for himself. We're OK with that and we wish him the best." Roc Nation promoted Rigondeaux in four bouts. On November 20, 2018 it was reported that Rigondeaux started training with Veteran trainer Ronnie Shields. Shield's a well known trainer, who also trained Cuban boxer Erislandy Lara at the time, welcomed Rigondeaux to his training base in Houston, Texas. After signing with powerful advisor Al Haymon, now fighting under the Premier Boxing Champions banner, it was announced on November 29, Rigondeaux [sep] knowledge2: Guillermo Rigondeaux: Guillermo Rigondeaux Ortiz (Spanish pronunciation: [ɡiˈʎeɾmo riɣonˈdo oɾˈtiθ]; born 30 September 1980) is a Cuban professional boxer. He is a former world champion in two weight classes, having held the unified WBA (Super), WBO and Ring magazine super bantamweight titles between 2013 and 2017, and the WBA (Regular) bantamweight title from 2020 to 2021. He has also challenged once for the WBO junior lightweight title in 2017. ; Guillermo Rigondeaux: Possessing one of the greatest amateur records of all time,[2] Rigondeaux won consecutive gold medals in the bantamweight division at the 2000 and 2004 Summer Olympics. He is also a seven-time Cuban national champion at bantamweight (2000–2006), finishing his amateur career with a record of nearly 475 fights with 12 losses; the last of these losses occurring in 2003. After Rigondeaux's defection in 2009, he turned professional[Video 1] and remained undefeated for almost nine years. ; Guillermo Rigondeaux: Rigondeaux has been lauded by boxing trainer Freddie Roach as being "probably the greatest talent I've ever seen."[3] He is known for his exceptionally fast hand speed, punching power,[4][5] counterpunching abilities, athleticism, reflexes, footwork and defensive elusiveness. ; Guillermo Rigondeaux: Rigondeaux finished his amateur career having 386 fights under his belt, with a record of 374 wins, 12 losses. ; Guillermo Rigondeaux: On 22 July 2007, Rigondeaux and teammate Erislandy Lara failed to appear for their scheduled bouts at the Pan American Games in Brazil. It was initially announced that Rigondeaux was to turn professional, joining fellow 2004 Cuban Olympians Odlanier Solis, Yuriorkis Gamboa and Yan Bartelemí, who defected earlier in 2007. As with the other Cuban defectors, Rigondeaux signed a promotional deal with Ahmet Oener and ARENA Box-Promotion. However, on 2 August, Rigondeaux and Lara were taken into police custody in Brazil, stating that they wanted to return home to Cuba. However, Cuban leader Fidel Castro then stated that Rigondeaux and Lara could not box again for the Cuban team. In February 2009, Rigondeaux defected again via Mexico City to Miami, and signed with Arena Box-Promotion.
knowledge1: Pablo Zabaleta // Pablo Zabaleta Pablo Javier Zabaleta Girod (; born 16 January 1985) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a right-back for West Ham United and the Argentina national team. Zabaleta can operate on both sides of the pitch as a full-back and is known for his tenacious style of play, and has captained his club on numerous occasions. With Manchester City, Zabaleta has won all of English football's major honours: the FA Cup (2011), the Premier League (2012 and 2014), and the Football League Cup (2014 and 2016). Before joining Manchester City, Zabaleta played for La Liga club RCD; Pablo Zabaleta // World Cup coverage from Russia. Manchester City Individual Pablo Zabaleta Pablo Javier Zabaleta Girod (; born 16 January 1985) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a right-back for West Ham United and the Argentina national team. Zabaleta can operate on both sides of the pitch as a full-back and is known for his tenacious style of play, and has captained his club on numerous occasions. With Manchester City, Zabaleta has won all of English football's major honours: the FA Cup (2011), the Premier League (2012 and 2014), and the Football League Cup (2014 and 2016). Before joining Manchester; Pablo Zabaleta // 75 caps to national youth sides, and started representing the senior side in 2005. He was also a member of the gold medal-winning team at the 2008 Beijing Olympics, starting at right-back and playing all six matches. After the 2010 FIFA World Cup, for which Zabaleta was not selected by head coach Diego Maradona, under the new Argentina manager he has established himself as first-choice right-back. On 1 June 2011, Zabaleta captained Argentina for the first time in a friendly against Nigeria. In June 2014, Zabaleta was named in Argentina's squad for the 2014 World Cup. He made his World; Pablo Zabaleta // Cup debut in Argentina's 2–1 win over Bosnia and Herzegovina at the Estádio do Maracanã, playing the full match in defence. At the 2015 Copa América in Chile, Zabaleta sent in the cross from which his Manchester City teammate Sergio Agüero headed the only goal of the game as Argentina defeated holders Uruguay in their second group match. Zabaleta was born in Buenos Aires, to a family of Basque descent. Zabaleta has a tattoo on his chest which bears the name of his mother. In June 2018, he worked as a pundit for the BBC's Match of the Day 2018; Pablo Zabaleta // appearances he made. On 26 May 2017, Zabaleta signed for Premier League club West Ham United on a free transfer, agreeing to a two-year contract. He was given number five as his squad number. On 22 May 2018, Manuel Pellegrini was confirmed as manager of West Ham United, reuniting him with his former manager at Manchester City. At the age of 14, Zabaleta was called up by Hugo Tocalli to the Argentina under-15 squad. He took part in many youth tournaments, including the FIFA U-20 World Cup in 2003 and 2005, winning the latter in the Netherlands. He received over [sep] knowledge2: Pablo Zabaleta: Pablo Javier Zabaleta Girod  (Latin American Spanish: [ˈpaβlo saβaˈleta]; born 16 January 1985) is an Argentine former professional footballer who played as a right back. Zabaleta could operate on both sides of the pitch as a full-back and was known for his tenacious style of play, and has captained his club on numerous occasions. ; Pablo Zabaleta: With Manchester City, Zabaleta won all of English football's major honours: the FA Cup (2011), the Premier League (2012 and 2014), the League Cup (2014 and 2016) and the Community Shield (2012). Moreover, Zabaleta is often considered to be a cult hero at Manchester City owing to his determination and passion for the club.[5] Before joining Manchester City, Zabaleta played for La Liga club RCD Espanyol, where he won the 2005–06 Copa del Rey.[6] He made 333 appearances over nine seasons for Manchester City before signing for London-based club West Ham United in the summer of 2017. ; Pablo Zabaleta: A full international since 2005, Zabaleta represented Argentina at the 2011 and 2015 Copa América, and was part of their team which finished as runners-up in the 2014 FIFA World Cup. He was also in their team which won gold at the 2008 Olympics. ; Pablo Zabaleta: Since January 2023, Zabaleta serves as assistant manager of Albania's national football team, under head coach Sylvinho. ; Pablo Zabaleta: Born in Buenos Aires, Zabaleta was raised in Arrecifes. He began his career at Club Atlético San Lorenzo de Almagro in 2002 after progressing through their youth ranks, having been signed at the age of 12 from local club Obras Sanitarias. He started playing as a defensive midfielder but eventually moved to the right side of midfield.
knowledge1: Vadhir Derbez // Vadhir Derbez Vadhir Derbez Alejandro González Torres Prince (born February 18, 1991), better known as Vadhir Derbez, is a Mexican actor that has worked for Televisa, Univision, Warner Brothers, Netflix, TV Azteca and Telemundo. He is also starting his career as a singer internationally. Derbez was born in Mexico City. He is the son of comedian Eugenio Derbez and Silvana Prince. Brother of actress Aislinn Derbez, actor José Eduardo Derbez and Aitana Derbez. He studied at military school Culver Academies for 4 years, where he practiced Equestrianism. He rode in Barack Obama's Inaugural parade in Washington D.C. in 2009. He; Vadhir Derbez // started his career at age six and has been acting since. He has appeared in all kinds of television projects, such as commercials, comedies, and soap operas, Series and Films. He is currently preparing to go into a music career as a singer. In November 21, 2010, he won first place in "Mira Quien Baila: First Season". Vadhir Derbez Vadhir Derbez Alejandro González Torres Prince (born February 18, 1991), better known as Vadhir Derbez, is a Mexican actor that has worked for Televisa, Univision, Warner Brothers, Netflix, TV Azteca and Telemundo. He is also starting his career as a singer [sep] knowledge2: Vadhir Derbez: Vadhir Derbez Alejandro González Torres Prince (born 18 February 1991), better known as Vadhir Derbez, is a Mexican actor and singer who has worked for Televisa, Univision, Warner Brothers, Netflix, TV Azteca and Telemundo. ; Vadhir Derbez: Derbez was born in Mexico City.[2] His father is comic actor Eugenio Derbez.[3] ; Vadhir Derbez: He studied at military school Culver Academies for four years,[2] where he practiced equestrianism. He rode in Barack Obama's Inaugural parade in Washington D.C. in 2009.[2] ; Vadhir Derbez: Vadhir began his acting career in 1997 at age six on the program Derbez en Cuando,[4] where he participated in the sketches Tatiana y En Familia con Chabelo (2000),[5] and Diseñador do ambos sexos (2001). He earned his first featured part in the novela (soap opera) Cómplices Al Rescate (2002). La familia P. Luche (2002) was his next involved work, followed by De pocas, pocas pulgas (2003),[6] Par de ases (2004),[7] Mujer, Casos de la Vida Real (2004). In 2006 he was on the famous program Vecinos as recurring character Marco López Pérez for a total of 36 episodes. ; Vadhir Derbez: Derbez participated in Univision's first reality dance competition, Mira Quien Baila (2010) and was the winner of the shows first season.[8] On November 21, 2010, he won first place in Mira Quien Baila: First Season.[8] He acted in the famous series Gossip Girl: Acapulco (2013) as Maximiliano 'Max' Zaga, one of the protagonists, alongside Alexis Ayala, José María Torre, and Issabela Camil.
knowledge1: John Boye // they lost to Ivory Coast in an 8-9 penalty shoot out. John Boye John Boye (born 23 April 1984) is a Ghanaian international professional footballer who play as a defender for Metz. Born in Accra, Boye began his career with Schwepps' youth academy, where he played alongside Mohammed Iddi, he then later went on to play at Pro Consult Sports Academy and Miracle FC. Boye moved to Stade Rennais (Rennes) on 29 July 2008 after a two-week trial, he first arrived at Rennes on loan on 1 September 2008 from Ghana Premier League club Heart of Lions with an option [sep] knowledge2: Lucas Boyé: His debut in the Argentine Primera División came in a 1–1 tie against Gimnasia y Esgrima on the first day of the 2014 Torneo de Transición.[5]  Four days later, on 31 August, Boyé scored his first goal in the Primera División off an assist from Tomas Martinez, the third in a match which River won 3–1 against San Lorenzo.[6]
knowledge1: Gulshan Kumar // Gulshan Kumar Gulshan Kumar Dua (5 May 1956 – 12 August 1997), known professionally as Gulshan Kumar, was the founder of the T-Series music label (Super Cassettes Industries Ltd.), and a Bollywood movie producer. He founded T-Series in the 1980s and established it as a leading record label in the 1990s. In 1997, he was murdered by the Mumbai underworld syndicate D-Company. After his death, T-Series has since been run by his younger brother Krishan Kumar and son Bhushan Kumar. His daughter Tulsi Kumar and Khushali Kumar are also famous playback singers. Gulshan Kumar Dua was born into a Punjabi; Gulshan Kumar // he runs a successful perfumery business. In 2017, T-Series announced plans to produce a biopic about Kumar titled "Mogul – The Gulshan Kumar Story". Gulshan Kumar Gulshan Kumar Dua (5 May 1956 – 12 August 1997), known professionally as Gulshan Kumar, was the founder of the T-Series music label (Super Cassettes Industries Ltd.), and a Bollywood movie producer. He founded T-Series in the 1980s and established it as a leading record label in the 1990s. In 1997, he was murdered by the Mumbai underworld syndicate D-Company. After his death, T-Series has since been run by his younger brother Krishan Kumar [sep] knowledge2: Gulshan Kumar: Gulshan Kumar Dua (5 May 1951 – 12 August 1997),[2] was an Indian businessman, film and music producer who was the founder of the Super Cassettes Industries Limited (T-Series) music label[3] in the Bollywood industry. After founding T-Series in 1983, Dua established it as a leading record label in the 1990s. ; Gulshan Kumar: Gulshan Kumar started his own audio cassette operation known as "Super Cassettes Industries," which turned in to a profitable business. He began a music production company in Noida. As his business started growing, he moved to Mumbai.[11][12] ; Gulshan Kumar: His first movie in Bollywood was Lal Dupatta Malmal Ka in 1989. Next was the big hit Aashiqui in 1990 which is remembered for its music by Nadeem–Shravan. His other movies included Bahaar Aane Tak, Dil Hai Ke Manta Nahin, Ayee Milan Ki Raat, Meera Ka Mohan, Jeena Marna Tere Sang and Bewafa Sanam.[12] ; Gulshan Kumar: Gulshan Kumar Dua died in a shooting outside the Jiteshwar Mahadev Mandir, a Hindu mandir dedicated to Lord Shiva of which he attended daily in Jeet Nagar, Andheri West suburb of Mumbai,[20] on 12 August 1997. He was shot 16 times.  ; Gulshan Kumar: On the day of the assassination, his bodyguard, provided by the Uttar Pradesh government, was sick. Although he had received two threatening calls, on 5 and 8 August 1997, Kumar refused to pay the extortion money. The hired killers, including Rauf and Abdul Rashid, conducted reconnaissance for a month, but did not proceed because of the armed bodyguard. At 10:40 am, while returning from the temple, he was confronted by one of the assassins who said:  "Bahut puja kar li, ab upar ja ke karna (you have done enough puja (prayer), now do it up there)." Initially, Kumar survived and sought shelter in nearby huts, but residents shut their doors. His driver Suraj was shot in both legs as he tried to shelter Kumar.[21]
knowledge1: Takuma Asano // Takuma Asano Takuma Asano ( "Asano Takuma"; born 10 November 1994) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays for Hannover 96 of the Bundesliga, on loan from club Arsenal, and for the Japan national team. Asano joined Sanfrecce Hiroshima at the age of 18 in January 2013, and went on to win the J1 League in his inaugural season while making just one league appearance. The forward concluded his first year at the club by also lifting the Japanese Super Cup for the first time. He went on to win the cup once again in 2014 and 2015, while starting; Takuma Asano // are not playing, They were the heroes of our qualifying game against Australia. They haven’t been chosen this time, and if things continue the way they are, there is a chance that they won’t be chosen for the World Cup.”" In May 2018 he was named in Japan’s preliminary squad for the 2018 World Cup in Russia. However, he did not make the final 23. Sanfrecce Hiroshima Stuttgart Japan U23 Individual Takuma Asano Takuma Asano ( "Asano Takuma"; born 10 November 1994) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays for Hannover 96 of the Bundesliga, on loan from club Arsenal,; Takuma Asano // to break into the squad for the J1 League. He helped his side lift the J1 League for a second time in 2015, this time adding nine goals in 34 appearances. He was also named as the J-League's 'Rookie of the Year'. On 3 July 2016, Asano was announced as Arsenal's second signing of the season, subject to a medical and international clearance. Manager Arsene Wenger described him as "a talented young striker and very much one for the future". However, Asano was refused a work permit to play in the Premier League. On 26 August 2016, Asano was loaned; Takuma Asano // out to VfB Stuttgart until the end of the season with an option for a further year. On 9 April 2017, Asano scored a brace in VfB Stuttgart's 2-0 derby win over Karlsruher SC to take his team to the top of the 2. Bundesliga table. On 22 June 2017, the loan deal with Stuttgart was extended for another season. On 23 May 2018, Asano was loaned out again to another Bundesliga team for the season, Hannover 96. On 7 May 2015, Japan's coach Vahid Halilhodžić called him for a two-days training camp. On 23 July 2015, he was called [sep] knowledge2: Takuma Asano: Takuma Asano (浅野 拓磨, Asano Takuma, born 10 November 1994) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a forward for Bundesliga club VfL Bochum and the Japan national team. ; Takuma Asano: His younger brother Yuya is also a professional footballer currently playing for J1 League side Hokkaido Consadole Sapporo. ; Takuma Asano: After attending Yokkaichi Chuo Technical High School, Asano joined Sanfrecce Hiroshima at the age of 18 in January 2013. He went on to win the J1 League in his debut season, making one appearance in the process. ; Takuma Asano: Asano went on to win the Japanese Super Cup in 2014, while starting to break into the squad for the J1 League. He helped the side lift the league title for a second time in 2015, this time adding nine goals in 34 appearances. Due to his performances, Asano was named the J1 League Rookie of the Year.[4] ; Takuma Asano: On 3 July 2016, Asano was announced as Arsenal's second signing of the season, subject to a medical and international clearance.[5] Manager Arsène Wenger described him as "a talented young striker and very much one for the future".[6] However, Asano was refused a work permit to play in the Premier League.[7]
knowledge1: Rose (singer) // Rose (singer) Keren Meloul better known as Rose (born in Nice on 24 May 1978) is a French singer, songwriter, author and composer. After studying law, she became a school teacher teaching at the Jewish Merkaz Ohr Joseph in the 19e arrondissement of Paris before launching into music. She gained fame in 2006 with the single "La Liste" followed by a similarly titled album. She got a great boost when French singer Alain Souchon invited her to open for him at l'Olympia de Paris and at Zénith de Paris in 2006. In 2007 she started her own tour and appeared [sep] knowledge2: Gone (Rosé song): "Gone" debuted and peaked at number 29 on the Global 200 with 19.6 million streams and 25,000 sold worldwide, and at number 17 on the Global Excl. U.S. with 17.4 million streams and 19,000 sold outside the U.S.[31] In South Korea, the song debuted at number 49 on the Gaon Digital Chart for the chart issue date 7–13 March 2021,[32] before ascending to its peak of number six the following week.[33] It also debuted at number five on the Billboard K-pop Hot 100.[34] In the United States, the song debuted at number 15 on the Billboard Digital Song Sales chart.[35] It charted in Oceania as well, peaking at number 63 in Australia and 6 in New Zealand.[36][37] "Gone" also debuted at number one in Malaysia and number two in Singapore.[38][39]
knowledge1: Jemima Goldsmith // Jemima Goldsmith Jemima Marcelle Khan (née Goldsmith, born 30 January 1974) is a British TV, film and documentary producer and founder of Instinct Productions, a television production company. She was formerly a journalist, and associate editor of The New Statesman, a British political and cultural magazine, and European editor-at-large for Vanity Fair. Goldsmith married Pakistani cricketer and politician Imran Khan in 1995, and had two sons. The couple divorced in 2004. Born at Westminster Hospital in London, Jemima Marcelle Goldsmith is the eldest child of Lady Annabel Vane-Tempest-Stewart and financier Sir James Goldsmith (1933–1997). Her mother is from an aristocratic; Family of Imran Khan // by the media as "The wedding of the century". Jemima Marcelle Goldsmith is the eldest child of Lady Annabel Vane-Tempest-Stewart and Billionaire financier Sir James Goldsmith, who was one of richest men in UK. Goldsmith enrolled at the University of Bristol in 1993 and studied English, but dropped out when she was married in 1995. She eventually completed her bachelor's degree in March 2002 with upper second-class honours. In 2003, she received her MA in Middle Eastern Studies at the School of Oriental and African Studies, University of London, focusing on Modern Trends in Islam. The marriage, described as "tough"; Jemima Goldsmith // was dating British activist and actor Russell Brand. In September 2014, she and Brand separated. Jemima Goldsmith Jemima Marcelle Khan (née Goldsmith, born 30 January 1974) is a British TV, film and documentary producer and founder of Instinct Productions, a television production company. She was formerly a journalist, and associate editor of The New Statesman, a British political and cultural magazine, and European editor-at-large for Vanity Fair. Goldsmith married Pakistani cricketer and politician Imran Khan in 1995, and had two sons. The couple divorced in 2004. Born at Westminster Hospital in London, Jemima Marcelle Goldsmith is the eldest child of; Jemima Goldsmith // Anglo-Irish family, the daughter of the Marquess of Londonderry. Her father was the son of luxury hotel tycoon and former Conservative Member of Parliament (MP) Major Frank Goldsmith, who was a member of the prominent Goldsmith family, which is of German Jewish ancestry. Her paternal grandmother was French. Her parents had a polyamorous relationship in which they were married to different partners but, in 1978, they married to legitimise their children. Goldsmith has two younger brothers, Zac Goldsmith and Ben Goldsmith, and five paternal and three maternal half-siblings, including Robin Birley and India Jane Birley. Goldsmith grew up at Ormeley; Jemima Goldsmith // Assange seeking to escape the jurisdiction of the British courts by entering the London embassy of Ecuador. In 2011, she also campaigned against the use of drones by the CIA in Pakistan's tribal areas. In 2014, she publicly backed the Hacked Off campaign group which advocates reform of British press regulation. In August 2014, she was one of 200 public figures who were signatories to a letter to "The Guardian" opposing Scottish independence in the run-up to September's referendum on that issue. On 3 November 2018, Jemima Goldsmith, criticized the fact that the Government of Pakistan was considering putting the [sep] knowledge2: Jemima Goldsmith: Jemima Marcelle Goldsmith (born 30 January 1974; known as Jemima Khan for work) is an English screenwriter,[2] television, film and documentary producer and the founder of Instinct Productions, a television production company.[3] She was formerly a journalist and associate editor of The New Statesman, a British political and cultural magazine, and served as the European editor-at-large for the American magazine Vanity Fair.[4][5] ; Jemima Goldsmith: Born at Chelsea and Westminster Hospital in London, Goldsmith is the eldest child of Lady Annabel Vane-Tempest-Stewart and financier Sir James Goldsmith (1933–1997). Her mother, from an aristocratic Anglo−Irish family, is the daughter of the 8th Marquess of Londonderry. Goldsmith's father was the son of a luxury hotel tycoon and former Conservative Member of Parliament (MP), Major Frank Goldsmith, who was a member of the Goldsmith family of German−Jewish descent.[6] Her paternal grandmother was French. ; Jemima Goldsmith: Goldsmith's parents were married to different partners at the time of her birth, but they married each other in 1978 in order to legitimise their children.[7] She has two younger brothers, Zac Goldsmith and Ben Goldsmith, and five paternal and three maternal half-siblings, including Robin Birley and India Jane Birley.[8] ; Jemima Goldsmith: Goldsmith grew up at Ormeley Lodge and attended The Old Vicarage preparatory school, then Francis Holland Girls School. From age 10 to 17, she was an equestrian in London.[7] In 1993, Goldsmith enrolled at the University of Bristol and studied English, but she dropped out when she married Imran Khan in 1995. She eventually completed her bachelor's degree in March 2002 with upper second-class honours.[9][10] She later studied at the School of Oriental and African Studies and was awarded a master of arts degree in Middle Eastern Studies, focusing on Modern Trends in Islam,[11] from the University of London in 2003.[12] ; Jemima Goldsmith: In 2015, Jemima Khan founded Instinct Productions, a London-based content company specializing in television, documentaries and film.[3]
knowledge1: Suthida Vajiralongkorn na Ayudhya // Suthida Vajiralongkorn na Ayudhya Suthida Vajiralongkorn na Ayudhya (; ), née Suthida Tidjai (; ; born 3 June 1976) is a Thai military officer. she is acting commander of the Royal Thai Aide-de-Camp Department, Royal Security Command. Her previous title was Commander of the Special Operations Unit of the King's Guard, holding the rank of full general. Suthida was formerly a flight attendant for Thai Airways. She was appointed commander of Crown Prince Vajiralongkorn's household guard in August 2014. Several reports, following the Crown Prince's divorce of Srirasmi Suwadee, have linked her romantically to the crown prince. In October 2016, [sep] knowledge2: Suthida: Suthida Bajrasudhabimalalakshana (Thai: สุทิดา พัชรสุธาพิมลลักษณ, RTGS: Suthida Phatcharasuthaphimonlak, pronounced [sùʔ.tʰíʔ.dāː pʰát.ɕʰā.ráʔ.sùʔ.tʰāː.pʰíʔ.mōn.lák] ⓘ), born Suthida Tidjai (Thai: สุทิดา ติดใจ; 3 June 1978),[3] is Queen of Thailand as the fourth wife of King Vajiralongkorn. Before their marriage, she was a flight attendant. After joining the Thai military, she was promoted to King's bodyguard.[4] ; Suthida: Suthida was born on 3 June 1978 to the Tidjai family, Kham (father) and Jangheang (mother). She is ethnically Hokkien, coming from a Thai Chinese family. She graduated from Hatyaiwittayalai Somboonkulkanya Middle School and Assumption University with a bachelor's degree in communication arts in 2000.[3] Suthida was formerly a flight attendant for JALways – a Japan Airlines' subsidiary – from 2000 to 2003 and later Thai Airways International in 2003 until 2008.[5][6] ; Suthida: Suthida was appointed commander of Crown Prince Vajiralongkorn's household guard, Royal Thai Armed Forces Headquarters in August 2014. As early as 2010, Suthida was linked romantically to the crown prince, who was then still married to Srirasmi Suwadee.[7][8][9][10][11] In October 2016, international media reports labeled her as the designated king's "consort", despite the palace never officially declaring their relationship.[12][13] ; Suthida: On 13 October 2017, she was named a Dame Grand Cross (First Class) of The Most Illustrious Order of Chula Chom Klao,[17] which bestows the title Than Phu Ying (Thai: ท่านผู้หญิง). She is the first female officer to receive this honour since 2004 and the first in the reign of King Rama X. ; Suthida: On 1 May 2019, Suthida was made Queen of Thailand by King Vajiralongkorn[4][18] whose coronation took place in Bangkok on 4–6 May 2019.[19] The marriage registration took place at the Amphorn Sathan Residential Hall in Bangkok, with her sister-in-law Princess Sirindhorn and President of Privy Council Prem Tinsulanonda as witnesses.[20]
knowledge1: Uee // joined the project group, 4Tomorrow, which consists Han Seung-yeon, Hyuna, and Gain; and released the single "Dugeundugeun Tomorrow" () on October 6, 2009. That same year, she joined the MBC's reality show "We Got Married" and was paired with Park Jae-jung. Uee ranked eighth on Forbes Korea's list of most hardworking idols in 2009–2010. Uee had lead roles in two television dramas in 2011. In "Birdie Buddy", she played a country girl who strives to become a professional golfer. The drama's director, Yun Sang-ho, praised Uee's "flawless acting", saying, "I believe actors from idol groups such as Uee and Luna [sep] knowledge2: Uee: Kim Yu-jin (born April 9, 1988),[1] better known by her stage name Uee (sometimes romanized as U-ie), is a South Korean singer and actress. She is best known for being a former member of South Korean girl group After School from 2009 to 2017, and has acted in various television dramas including Queen Seondeok (2009), Ojakgyo Family (2011), Jeon Woo-chi (2012), Golden Rainbow (2013), High Society (2015), Marriage Contract (2016), and My Only One (2018). On May 31, 2017, Uee graduated and left After School and its agency, Pledis Entertainment. ; Uee: Kim Yu-jin was born April 9, 1988, in Daejeon, South Korea. Her father, Kim Sung-kap, is a retired professional baseball player and former head coach for the South Korean teams, Nexen Heroes[2][3] and SK Wyverns.[4] She has an older sister, Kim Yu-na.[5] Uee attended Guwol Girls' Middle School and Incheon Physical Education High School. While in high school, she was a swimmer and competed in the Korean National Sports Festival.[6] She later graduated from Sungkyunkwan University's School of Art, with a degree in Performing Arts. ; Uee: Uee originally desired to be an actress and went to many auditions, but she debuted as a singer first.[7] In 2007, Uee was a member of the girl group Five Girls (Korean: 오소녀; RR: O Sonyeo) under Good Entertainment, which also included Yubin, Jun Hyoseong, Yang Jiwon, and G.NA. The group starred in a reality show on MTV called Diary of Five Girls, but disbanded before their scheduled debut due to Good Entertainment's financial troubles.[8] ; Uee: In August 2008, after appearing as Yubin's friend in the MBC show Introducing the Star's Friend, she again became popular because of her friendship with the Wonder Girls member and her resemblance to Moon Geun-young.[10] She later joined Pledis Entertainment. ; Uee: In April 2009, Uee joined the girl group After School with their single "Diva".[11][12] She became known for her "honey thighs" and proved popular with the general public, often topping online search rankings on various Korean websites.[13][14]
knowledge1: Mukesh (actor) // 2016 Kerala Election Affidavit - Mukesh Age Sorce. Mukesh (actor) Mukesh (born Mukesh Madhavan on 5 March 2018) is an Indian film actor, producer, television presenter, and politician known for his work in Malayalam cinema. He is best known for his comedic roles in films. He was the chairman of Kerala Sangeetha Nataka Academy. Mukesh is the current Member of the Legislative Assembly (M.L.A.) representing the Kollam constituency of Kerala state. Mukesh was born to actors O. Madhavan and Vijayakumari, in Kollam, Kerala on the 5 March 1957. He has two sisters, Sandhya Rajendran and Jayasree. Sandhya and her husband, [sep] knowledge2: Mukesh (actor): Mukesh Madhavan (born 5 March 1957), known mononymously as Mukesh, is an Indian actor, film producer, television presenter, and politician who predominantly works in Malayalam cinema besides also having sporadically appeared in Tamil-language films.[1] In a film career spanning four decades, he has acted in over 275 Malayalam films.[2] His 1996 film Kaanaakkinaavu premiered at the IFFI and won the Nargis Dutt Award for Best Feature Film on National Integration.[3] He co-produced Kadha Parayumbol (2007), which won the Kerala State Film Award for Best Film with Popular Appeal and Aesthetic Value.[4] He also produced the 2012 film Thattathin Marayathu, which is considered one of the defining films of the Malayalam New Wave.[5] ; Mukesh (actor): He made his onscreen debut in the 1982 film Balloon in a minor role.[6] He continued to do minor roles and rose to secondary lead roles in the following years.[7] He rose to stardom after playing the lead in the comedy thriller film Ramji Rao Speaking (1989).[8] By the early-1990s, he established himself as a bankable leading actor after starring in several successful comedy films in the early 1990s directed by Siddique-Lal.[9] He continued to appear in successful comedy films throughout the 1990s, establishing himself as one of the major stars of the Malayalam film industry.[10] Towards the 2000s he switched back to supporting roles.[10] He was the chairman of the Kerala Sangeetha Nataka Academy. Mukesh is the current MLA representing the Kollam constituency of Kerala state.[10] ; Mukesh (actor): Mukesh was born to actors O. Madhavan and Vijayakumari, in Kollam, Kerala, India on 5 March 1957.[11] He has two sisters, Sandhya Rajendran and Jayasree. Sandhya and her husband, E.A. Rajendran are also actors (stage and film). He attended Infant Jesus School, Tangasseri and pursued a bachelor's degree in science (B.Sc.) from Sree Narayana College, Kollam. He holds a second bachelor's degree in law (LLB) from Kerala Law Academy Law College, Thiruvananthapuram. He was active in stage dramas before he entered the film industry.[12] He married South Indian film actress Saritha in 1988, and they have two sons. After a lengthy separation, they divorced in 2011.[13][14] Their elder son Shravan made his acting debut in the 2018 film Kalyanam. Mukesh married dance scholar Methil Devika on 24 October 2013. The couple filed for divorce in 2021.[7][15] He was elected to the Kerala Legislative Assembly from Kollam constituency in the election of 2016.[10] ; Mukesh (actor): By the mid-1990s Mukesh got stuck in an image trap, usually of a young man behaving, or thought to be behaving fraudulently under pressure, such as a bribe taking policeman, a thief on the run, or someone lying to impress his parents, or to get a job. The mid-1990s also signaled the end of the golden age of comedy. In 1995, most of his films were failures at the box office, sparring a few such as Sipayi Lahala and Mannar Mathai Speaking (the sequel to Ramji Rao Speaking). The consecutive failures of his films forced him move on to supporting roles. He appeared in a supporting role to Mammootty in the 1996 comedy-drama film Hitler, directed by Siddique of the Siddique-Lal duo.[41] Hitler became the highest-grossing Malayalam film at the time, and completed a 300-day theatrical run.[42] It became the most viewed film in the history of Mollywood.[43] He then starred in Sibi Malayil's 1996 film Kanakkinavu, which was screened at the Indian Panorama section of the IFFI and won the Nargis Dutt Award for Best Feature Film on National Integration.[44] The film was also commercially successful.[45] The next year, all of his films except for Kalyana Kacheri, bombed at the box office.[46] The following year, he starred in Mattupetti Machan, which was one of the highest grossers of the year and ran for 100 days in theatres.[47] It was remade in Tamil as Banda Paramasivam, in Hindi as Housefull 2.[47] He then made a cameo appearance as himself in the highly successful Sreekrishnapurathe Nakshathrathilakkam.[48] 1999 was a successful year for Mukesh as he starred in two super-hits namely, Friends, which was the highest grosser of the year (He starred alongside Jayaram for the first time in 7 years and Sreenivasan) and alongside Divya Unni in the Vinayan directorial Aakasha Ganga, which was the fourth highest grossing film of the year.[49] ; Mukesh (actor): In the 2000s and 2010s, he struggled to escape an image trap. Regardless, he came back with interesting supporting roles in Udayananu Tharam, Goal, Vinodayathra, Boyy Friennd, Kaiyoppu, Naalu Pennungal and Katha Parayumbol. He has been a part of many of Mohanlal's comedies, most of them directed by Priyadarshan.
knowledge1: Samir Kochhar // Samir Kochhar Samir Kochhar (born 23 May 1980) is an Indian actor and television presenter known for being the host of the pre-match Indian Premier League show, "Extraaa Innings T20". He currently stars in Netflix India's Sacred Games. Kochhar started his career with Doordarshan's AIDS awareness cum travel show "Haath Se Haath Mila" which he anchored with Sugandha Garg. He made his Bollywood film debut in 2003 with Sumeer Sabharwal's bilingual film "Valentine Days". Kochhar made his television debut with "Dangerous", a talk show on sex, which was broadcast on Zoom. He appeared as Rajat Kapur in the soap opera; Samir Kochhar // "Bade Acche Lagte Hain". In 2005, he appeared in Mohit Suri's "Zeher" (2005) and followed it with the thriller "Jannat" (2008), where he played a police inspector. Kochhar was part of "Island City" directed by Ruchika Oberoi, that received rave reviews at the Venice International Film Festival as well as the JIO MAMI Film Festival 2015 in Mumbai. He will also be seen in "Mango Dreams", a feature film set in India, directed by American director John Unchurch. Kochhar is also part of the CCL (Celebrity Cricket League) team Mumbai Heroes. Kochhar had two commercial releases in 2016 - Sajid; Samir Kochhar // Nadiadwala's "Housefull 3" with Akshay Kumar & Mango Dreams and "Hume Tumse Pyaar Kitna" with Karanvir Bohra directed by Lalit Mohan which is set to release in 2018 Kochhar married his longtime girlfriend Radhika on 9 January 2010. In April 2015, they became parents to a baby boy whom they named Kabir and a baby girl named Sara in October 2017. Samir Kochhar Samir Kochhar (born 23 May 1980) is an Indian actor and television presenter known for being the host of the pre-match Indian Premier League show, "Extraaa Innings T20". He currently stars in Netflix India's Sacred Games. Kochhar [sep] knowledge2: Samir Kochhar: Samir Kochhar (born 23 May 1980) is an Indian actor and television presenter known for being the host of the pre-match Indian Premier League show, Extraaa Innings T20.[1] He currently stars in Netflix India's Sacred Games.[2] ; Samir Kochhar: Kochhar started his career with Doordarshan's AIDS awareness cum travel show Haath Se Haath Mila which he anchored with Sugandha Garg. He made his Bollywood film debut in 2003 with Sumeer Sabharwal's bilingual film Valentine Days.[3] ; Samir Kochhar: Kochhar made his television debut with Dangerous, a talk show on sex, which was broadcast on Zoom. He appeared as Rajat Kapur in the soap opera Bade Acche Lagte Hain.[4][5] In 2005, he appeared in Mohit Suri's Zeher[6] (2005) and followed it with the thriller Jannat (2008), where he played a police inspector.[7] ; Samir Kochhar: Kochhar was part of Island City directed by Ruchika Oberoi, that received rave reviews at the Venice International Film Festival as well as the JIO MAMI Film Festival 2015 in Mumbai. He will also be seen in Mango Dreams, a feature film set in India, directed by American director John Unchurch.[8] ; Samir Kochhar: Kochhar is also part of the CCL (Celebrity Cricket League) team Mumbai Heroes.
knowledge1: Maya Yoshida // Maya Yoshida Born in Nagasaki, Yoshida had been a defensive midfielder when playing for Grampus's youth team, but was converted to a centre back after promotion to its top team in 2007. In the 2008 season, he was in the starting lineup for most of the league matches with his Serbian teammate Miloš Bajalica. He scored Nagoya Grampus's historical first goal in the AFC Champions League in the game against Ulsan Hyundai Horang-i on 10 March 2009. In December 2009, it was announced that Yoshida had transferred to Dutch club VVV-Venlo. He had desired to play for a club in; Maya Yoshida // a 2–1 defeat to Sunderland in the League Cup on 6 November 2013. He scored his first Premier League goal in a 3–1 defeat at West Ham United on 22 February 2014 after a Steven Davis free kick. His next goal came on 20 December 2014, in a 3–0 victory over Everton, with Steven Davis again providing the assist. In January 2015 Southampton announced that Yoshida and the club had agreed terms to an extension of his contract until 2018. On 28 October, he scored his first goal of the 2015–16 season with a 20-yard strike against Aston Villa in; Maya Yoshida // Europe since he was young. Keisuke Honda who was his teammate of Nagoya Grampus introduced his agent, Tetsuro Kiyooka to support his future vision. Indeed, Yoshida followed the footsteps of Keisuke Honda who also played for VVV-Venlo before he joined them. He scored a bicycle kick goal for VVV-Venlo off a corner kick on 11 September 2011 against PSV Eindhoven. The match ended in a 3–3 draw. This goal was awarded as "Goal of the Season 2011–2012" of the Eredivisie. In this season Maya Yoshida scored as a central defender 5 goals in total. On 30 August 2012, he agreed [sep] knowledge2: Maya Yoshida: Maya Yoshida (吉田 麻也, Yoshida Maya, born 24 August 1988) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays as a centre-back for Major League Soccer club LA Galaxy. He represented Japan at the 2014, 2018 and 2022 FIFA World cups and also 2011, 2015 and 2019 AFC Asian cups, in addition to Olympic team at the 2008, 2012 and 2020 ; Maya Yoshida: After spending five years at Nagoya Grampus Youth Academy, he was promoted to the first team in the 2007 season, having signed his first professional contract.[6] Yoshida joined the club's first team training soon after and started out in a defensive midfielder when playing for Grampus's youth team, but was converted to a centre back.[7] After spending months on the substitute bench, Yoshida finally made his debut for the club, coming on as a second-half substitute, in a 2–1 loss against Oita Trinita on 3 May 2007.[8] Since then, he became a first team regular for the side, playing in the centre–back position.[9] It wasn't until on 5 November 2007 when Yoshida scored his first Nagoya Grampus goal, in a 3–1 win against Thespa Kusatsu in the fourth round of the Emperor's Cup.[10] At the end of the 2007 season, he went on to make twenty–four appearances and scoring once in all competitions. ; Maya Yoshida: In the 2008 season, Yoshida began to feature in the starting line-up for most of the league matches with his Serbian teammate Miloš Bajalica.[11] He started the season well when he helped the side go on an unbeaten with seven matches in all competitions.[12] Yoshida continued to feature in the first team until he was called up to the Japan U23 squad in July.[13] After Japan U23's elimination in the Summer Olympics, it wasn't until on 23 August 2008 when Yoshida returned to the starting line-up against Kashima Antlers and scored his first goal of the season, in a 2–1 win.[14] Following this, he lost his first team place and was placed on the substitute bench for the next five matches, leading his playing time to be reduced.[15] Yoshida's second goal then came on 2 November 2008 against FC Gifu in the fourth round of the Emperor's Cup and helped them win 1–0.[16] By mid–October, he regained his first team place for the remaining matches of the season and helped the side finish third place in the league.[17] For his performance, Yoshida was award Rookie of the Year at the 14th Aichi Toyota "Grand Pass Rankle Award".[18] At the end of the 2008 season, he went on to make twenty–nine appearances and scoring two times in all competitions. ; Maya Yoshida: At the start of the 2009 season, Yoshida switched number shirt to four.[19] He scored Nagoya Grampus's historical first goal in the AFC Champions League in the game against Ulsan Hyundai Horang-i on 10 March 2009.[20] Yoshida continued to regain his first team place for the side, playing in the centre–back position.[21] A month later on 26 April 2009, he scored his second goal of the season, in a 2–1 win against Yokohama F. Marinos.[22] However, Yoshida suffered a calf injury that saw him sidelined for two weeks.[23] Yoshida made his first team return on 18 July 2009 and started the whole game, in a 1–1 draw against Kyoto Sanga.[24] He scored his third goal of the season, in a 2–1 win against FC Tokyo eleven days later on 29 July 2009, but the club was eliminated in the J.League Cup following a 6–3 on aggregate.[25] Yoshida later added two more goals throughout September, scoring against Kashiwa Reysol and Kawasaki Frontale.[26][27] Since returning to the first team, Yoshida regained his first team place for the remaining matches of the season.[28] He later added two more goals throughout October.[29] Yoshida scored his eighth goal of the season, in a 3–1 win against Júbilo Iwata in the fourth round of the Emperor's Cup.[30] He later helped the club to reach the Emperor's Cup final after beating Shimizu S-Pulse 5–4 on penalty shoot–out following a 1–1 draw throughout 120 minutes.[31] However, he started in the Emperor's Cup Final against Gamba Osaka, as Nagoya Grampus lost 4–1 in what turned out to be his last appearance for the club.[32] At the end of the 2009 season, Yoshida went on to make forty–eight appearances and scoring eight times in all competitions. ; Maya Yoshida: In December 2009, it was announced that Yoshida had transferred to Dutch club VVV-Venlo, signing a three–year contract.[33] He had desired to play for a club in Europe since he was young. Keisuke Honda, who was his teammate at Nagoya Grampus, introduced his agent, Tetsuro Kiyooka to support his future vision.[34] Indeed, Yoshida followed the footsteps of Keisuke Honda who also played for VVV-Venlo before he joined them.[35] However, Yoshida's start to VVV-Venlo career suffered a setback when he fractured his foot and left him sidelined for the rest of the 2009–10 season.[36]
knowledge1: Gopi Sundar // Sundar is married to Priya and the couple have two children. Gopi Sundar Gopisundar C. S., known professionally as Gopi Sundar, is an Indian music director, programmer, singer, songwriter, and performer. He started his career composing music for television commercials, as he has nearly 5,000 jingles to his credit. As a keyboard programmer, he has collaborated with several music directors including the composer duo Vishal–Shekhar, for whose music he also provided vocals. He made his debut as a film score composer in 2006 and went on to produce several commercially successful songs in Malayalam, Tamil, and Telugu language films. Gopi; Gopi Sundar // Gopi Sundar Gopisundar C. S., known professionally as Gopi Sundar, is an Indian music director, programmer, singer, songwriter, and performer. He started his career composing music for television commercials, as he has nearly 5,000 jingles to his credit. As a keyboard programmer, he has collaborated with several music directors including the composer duo Vishal–Shekhar, for whose music he also provided vocals. He made his debut as a film score composer in 2006 and went on to produce several commercially successful songs in Malayalam, Tamil, and Telugu language films. Gopi Sundar started his own recording label, Gopi Sundar Music Company, in; Gopi Sundar // spent a large part of his childhood in Kochi. His early interest in music started from working in his father's recording studio business and listening to the radio with his mother. During school days, Sundar was keener on playing the tabla and keyboard than studies. Eventually, when he got dropped out of school after failing his SSLC exams, his parents were supportive enough to let him pursue his dreams. Keen to make a career in music, he left for Chennai, where he took up classes at the Government Music College, but discontinued the course, feeling disillusioned. His father, Suresh, helped [sep] knowledge2: Gopi Sundar: Gopi Sundar C.S. (born 30 May 1977) is an Indian music director, programmer, playback singer, songwriter, actor and performer who works in the Malayalam, Telugu and Tamil film industries.[1] ; Gopi Sundar: He began his career composing music for television commercials and is credited with writing nearly 5,000 jingles.[2] As a keyboardist, he has collaborated with many music directors, including the composer duo Vishal–Shekhar. He has won several accolades for his sound track albums and film scores, including a National Film Award, a Kerala State Film Award, and two Filmfare Awards South.[2] ; Gopi Sundar: Sundar started his own recording label, Gopi Sundar Music Company in 2014 with an idea to promote aspiring musicians and to make low-budget productions possible.[3] In 2016, he formed a live performance music band called "Band Big G" in Dubai.[4] In 2017, his work in the film Pulimurugan was included in the contender list for the 90th Academy Awards nominations for Best Original Song and Best Original Score categories, but none were nominated.[5][6] ; Gopi Sundar: Born to Suresh Babu and Livi, Sundar spent a large part of his childhood in Kochi. His early interest in music started from working in his father's recording studio business and listening to the radio with his mother. During school days, Sundar was keener on playing the tabla and keyboard than studying. Eventually, when he got dropped out of school after failing his SSLC exams,[7] his parents were supportive enough to let him pursue his dreams. Keen to make a career in music, he left for Chennai, where he took up classes at the Government Music College, but discontinued the course, feeling disillusioned.[2] ; Gopi Sundar: Sundar got his first break as a film score composer with Notebook after the director Rosshan Andrews happened to notice his programming for the film Udayananu Tharam.[12][13] The eventual success of the film catapulted him into the mainstream, with Sibi Malayil offering him the first contract for soundtrack composition for the Malayalam film Flash, starring Mohanlal. The turning point in his career was the film Big B, which was the debut feature of not only the director Amal Neerad but also a host of technicians including Sameer Thahir, Vivek Harshan, and Unni R. Although the film, which starred Mammooty, opened to mixed reviews, it was lauded for its technical finesse and for providing a film experience that was altogether new to the Malayalam cinema.[14] Sundar's background score, which blended aptly with the tone of the film, escalated his popularity amongst the Malayali film audiences.[15] Big B marked the beginning of Sundar's long-term association with Amal Neerad.[16]
knowledge1: Vance Joy // Vance Joy James Gabriel Keogh (born 1 December 1987), better known by his stage name Vance Joy, is an Australian singer and songwriter. He signed a five-album deal with Atlantic Records in 2013. He released his debut EP "God Loves You When You're Dancing" in March 2013. His song "Riptide" was voted number 1 on the 2013 Triple J Hottest 100. Joy released his debut studio album "Dream Your Life Away" on 5 September 2014 in Australia and on 9 September 2014 elsewhere. At the ARIA Music Awards of 2015 he won Best Male Artist. Joy attended St. Patricks Primary; Vance Joy // by the Lynyrd Skynyrd song "Simple Man" after reading the lyrics on his uncle's Facebook profile. Vance Joy James Gabriel Keogh (born 1 December 1987), better known by his stage name Vance Joy, is an Australian singer and songwriter. He signed a five-album deal with Atlantic Records in 2013. He released his debut EP "God Loves You When You're Dancing" in March 2013. His song "Riptide" was voted number 1 on the 2013 Triple J Hottest 100. Joy released his debut studio album "Dream Your Life Away" on 5 September 2014 in Australia and on 9 September 2014 elsewhere. At; Vance Joy // a hit in the United Kingdom, Canada, Sweden, Switzerland, Italy, Germany, Austria, Belgium, Israel, Poland, and Slovakia. In the US, "Riptide" has reached number 30 on the "Billboard" Hot 100 and number 1 on the Alternative and Rock Airplay charts. In early 2015, it was announced that Vance Joy would perform at the Boston Calling Music Festival in May 2015. On 5 February 2015, it was announced that Vance Joy would perform as the headliner for the University of Nebraska–Lincoln Spring Concert at the Pinnacle Bank Arena on 23 April. On 13 May 2015, he performed "Riptide" in a duet [sep] knowledge2: Vance Joy: James Gabriel Keogh (born 1 December 1987), known professionally as Vance Joy, is an Australian singer songwriter and former Australian rules footballer. He is best known for his 2013 hit song "Riptide".  ; Vance Joy: Joy signed a five-album deal with Atlantic Records in 2013.[2] He released his debut EP God Loves You When You're Dancing in March 2013. His song "Riptide" was voted number 1 on the 2013 Triple J Hottest 100. Joy released his debut studio album Dream Your Life Away on 5 September 2014 in Australia and on 9 September 2014 elsewhere.[3][4] At the ARIA Music Awards of 2015, he won Best Male Artist. His second studio album, Nation of Two, was released in 2018, and his third studio album, In Our Own Sweet Time, was released in June 2022. ; Vance Joy: James Gabriel Keogh was born on 1 December 1987.[5][6] His father worked in the computer trade, while his mother was a high-school English teacher.[7] His paternal grandparents immigrated to Australia from Ireland.[8] He attended St. Patricks Primary School, Murrumbeena, in Melbourne. He was school captain at and graduated from St Kevin's College, Toorak, in 2005, and later graduated from Monash University with a Bachelor of Arts and Bachelor of Laws.[9] ; Vance Joy: Prior to his music career, Joy was a promising Australian rules football player. In 2008 and 2009, he played for the Coburg Football Club as a key defender in the Victorian Football League, winning best first year player award in 2008.[10][11][9] ; Vance Joy: Joy explains his choice for a music career over a football one by saying that he "[...] wasn't ever really in the mix (for the AFL)", being "good enough to go from local footy to the VFL. Out of three seasons, I had a handful of games. You always think you can do better, but I think I reached my potential as a football player."[12] In another interview, he stated "for a period of time I was super focused on footy, I played a step below professional level. I had opportunities to play for a couple of teams but my heart wasn't completely in it. I guess I was just doing something in the meantime before writing my first songs."[13]
knowledge1: Pallavi Joshi // Pallavi Joshi Pallavi Joshi (born 4 April 1967) is an Indian film and television actress. She is a recipient of Special Jury Award at the National Film Awards. Pallavi started performing on stage at an early age. She acted in films like "Badla" and "Aadmi Sadak Ka" as a child artiste. She played a blind child who reforms a notorious gangster in "Dada" (1979). In the 1980s and early 1990s she acted in art films like "Rukmavati Ki Haveli", "Suraj ka Satvan Ghoda", "Trishagni" (1988), "Vanchit", "Bhujangayyana Dashavathara" (1991) and "Rihaee". She also played supporting character roles as a sister; Pallavi Joshi // position in view of the students' protest against appointment of actor and BJP member Gajendra Chauhan as the chief of the institute's governing council. She is married to Indian film maker Vivek Agnihotri and has two children. She is the sister of child actor Master Alankar (Joshi). Pallavi Joshi Pallavi Joshi (born 4 April 1967) is an Indian film and television actress. She is a recipient of Special Jury Award at the National Film Awards. Pallavi started performing on stage at an early age. She acted in films like "Badla" and "Aadmi Sadak Ka" as a child artiste. She played; Pallavi Joshi // or the heroine's friend in commercial big budget films including "Saudagar", "Panaah", "Tehelka" and "Mujrim". She was nominated for 'Best Supporting Actress' at the Filmfare Awards for her role as a handicapped girl in "Andha Yudh" (1988). She also won a Special Jury Award at the 41st National Film Awards for "Woh Chokri" (1992). She is also the recipient of the Excellence In Cinema Award at the 7th Global Film Festival, Noida. She hosts a televised singing competition "Sa Re Ga Ma Pa Marathi L'il Champs" on Zee Marathi. She appeared as Kasturba Gandhi in Shyam Benegal's "The Making of; Pallavi Joshi // "Anubandh" on Zee Marathi. She has played the role of the central character Shantha in the critically acclaimed Malayalam movie "Ilayum Mullum", directed by K. P. Sasi in 1994 and a pivotal role in the Kannada film "Bhujangayyana Dashavathara" (1991) enacted and directed by Lokesh. She appeared as an anchor for "Zee Antakshari" and "Zee Sa Re Ga Ma Pa Marathi L'il Champs". She also did some episodes of "Rishtey", aired on Zee TV during 1999 and 2001. Pallavi Joshi was nominated as a member of Film and Television Institute of India society, but she refused to take up the [sep] knowledge2: Pallavi Joshi: Pallavi Joshi (born 4 April 1969) is an Indian actress, writer, and film producer who works primarily in Hindi films and television. In a career spanning across films and television, Joshi is the recipient of such accolades as three National Film Awards, and a nomination for the Filmfare Awards. ; Pallavi Joshi: Born in Mumbai to Marathi parents who were stage actors,[citation needed] Joshi made her acting debut at age four with a minor role in the Hindi film Naag Mere Sathi (1973). Following numerous film appearances as a child artist, Joshi garnered recognition and acclaim when she ventured into the parallel cinema movement, with roles in critically acclaimed films like; Bhujangayyana Dashavathara (1988), Rihaee (1988), Rukmavati Ki Haveli (1991), and Woh Chokri (1992), for which she won the National Film Award – Special Jury Award (Feature Film). Joshi also appeared in several commercial films, including Insaaf Ki Awaaz (1986), Andha Yudh (1987), which earned her a nomination for the Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress, Mujrim (1989), Saudagar (1991), Panaah (1992).  ; Pallavi Joshi: Joshi's career further expanded with her venture into television, garnering praise and popularity for revered Doordarshan shows as; Talaash (1992), Aarohan (1996-1997), Alpviram (1998), Justujoo (2002-2004). In recent years, Joshi has mainly collaborated with her husband, director Vivek Agnihotri, most notably for the films; The Tashkent Files (2019), and The Kashmir Files (2022), both of which she co-produced and won her two National Film Awards for Best Supporting Actress. ; Pallavi Joshi: Joshi started performing on stage at an early age. She acted in films like Badla (1976) and Aadmi Sadak Ka (1977) as a child artist. She played a blind child who reforms a notorious gangster in Dada (1979). In the 1980s and early 1990s she acted in art films like Rukmavati Ki Haveli (1991), Suraj Ka Satvan Ghoda (1992), Trishagni (1988), Vanchit, Bhujangayyana Dashavathara (1991) and Rihaee (1988). She also played supporting character roles as a sister or the heroine's friend in commercial big budget films including Saudagar, Panaah, Tehelka and Mujrim. Her performance as a disabled girl in Andha Yudh (1988) earned her a nomination for the Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actress. She won the National Film Award – Special Jury Award (Feature Film) for Woh Chokri (1992).[1][2] She also appeared as Kasturba Gandhi in Shyam Benegal's The Making of the Mahatma, (1995). She acted with Madhavan in a thriller titled Yeh Kahaan Aa Gaye Hum, which was stopped abruptly. ; Pallavi Joshi: Joshi has also worked in regional films, She has played the central character ‘Shantha’ in the critically acclaimed Malayalam movie Ilayum Mullum (1994), directed by K. P. Sasi and a pivotal role in the Kannada film Bhujangayyana Dashavathara (1991) enacted and directed by Lokesh. She has also played a lead role in Rita, a Marathi film directed by Renuka Shahane.
knowledge1: Julie Bishop // Julie Bishop Julie Isabel Bishop (born 17 July 1956) is an Australian politician who served as Minister for Foreign Affairs from 2013 to 2018 and deputy leader of the Liberal Party from 2007 to 2018. She was first elected Member of Parliament (MP) for Curtin in 1998. Bishop was born in Lobethal, South Australia, and studied law at the University of Adelaide. Prior to entering politics she worked as a commercial lawyer in Perth, Western Australia; she was the local managing partner of Clayton Utz. She was a delegate to the 1998 constitutional convention, and also served as a director; Julie Bishop // feels "incredibly lucky that I've had the kind of career that is so consuming that I don't feel I have a void in my life". Julie Bishop Julie Isabel Bishop (born 17 July 1956) is an Australian politician who served as Minister for Foreign Affairs from 2013 to 2018 and deputy leader of the Liberal Party from 2007 to 2018. She was first elected Member of Parliament (MP) for Curtin in 1998. Bishop was born in Lobethal, South Australia, and studied law at the University of Adelaide. Prior to entering politics she worked as a commercial lawyer in Perth, Western; Julie Bishop (actress) // her husband, Clarence A. Shoop. Julie Bishop (actress) Julie Bishop (born Jacqueline Brown, August 30, 1914 – August 30, 2001) was an American film and television actress. She appeared in more than 80 films between 1923 and 1957, billed in some as Jacqueline Wells. Bishop was born Jacqueline Brown in Denver, Colorado, but used the family name Wells professionally through 1941. She also appeared on stage (and in one film) as Diane Duval. She was a child actress, beginning her career in 1923, in either "Children of Jazz" or "Maytime" (sources are contradictory), Early on, she appeared in several Laurel; Julie Bishop // for the leadership of one of Australia's two major parties, after the Labor Party's Julia Gillard. Bishop is regarded as a being a moderate within the Liberal Party, and has described as holding similar views to Malcolm Turnbull. She has stated that she regards herself a "very liberal minded person", an "economic dry and a social liberal", and a "Menzian Liberal". Bishop is in favour of an Australian republic, having served as a delegate at the Constitutional Convention of 1998. When a conscience vote has been allowed by the Liberal Party, Bishop has always voted in a "progressive" manner, voting; Julie Bishop (actress) // by her second marriage, Gen. Clarence A. Shoop, a test pilot who flew for Howard Hughes and later became vice president of Hughes Aircraft; they were married from 1944 until his death in 1968. Her first marriage ended in divorce and her third marriage to William F. Bergin MD ended in 2001 with her death. Bishop was a Republican and campaigned for Dwight Eisenhower in the 1952 presidential election. Julie Bishop died of pneumonia on her 87th birthday, August 30, 2001, in Mendocino, California. She is interred at Forest Lawn Memorial Park in Glendale, California, in the same plot as [sep] knowledge2: Julie Bishop: Julie Isabel Bishop (born 17 July 1956) is an Australian former politician who served as Minister for Foreign Affairs from 2013 to 2018 and deputy leader of the Liberal Party from 2007 to 2018. She was the Member of Parliament (MP) for Curtin from 1998 to 2019. She has been the chancellor of the Australian National University since January 2020. ; Julie Bishop: Bishop was born in Lobethal, South Australia, and studied law at the University of Adelaide. Prior to entering politics she worked as a commercial lawyer in Perth, Western Australia; she was the local managing partner of Clayton Utz. She was a delegate to the 1998 constitutional convention, and also served as a director of the Special Broadcasting Service (SBS) and as a member of the Murdoch University senate. Bishop was elected to parliament at the 1998 federal election, representing the Division of Curtin in Perth's western suburbs. In the Howard government, she served as Minister for Ageing (2003–2006), Minister for Education and Science (2006–2007), and Minister for Women (2006–2007). ; Julie Bishop: After the Coalition lost the 2007 election, Bishop was elected deputy leader of the Liberal Party. She was the first woman to hold the position, and was re-elected to the post at multiple leadership spills following her initial election. During her time as deputy, there were three different Liberal leaders—Brendan Nelson, Malcolm Turnbull, and Tony Abbott. When the Coalition returned to power at the 2013 election, Bishop was appointed Minister for Foreign Affairs in the Abbott government. She was Australia's first female foreign minister. Issues that arose during her tenure included changes to the Australian foreign aid program, the international military intervention against ISIL, the shooting down of Malaysia Airlines Flight 17, and the execution of Australian citizens by Indonesia. ; Julie Bishop: In August 2018, Peter Dutton challenged Turnbull for the leadership of the Liberal Party, due to dissatisfaction from the party's conservative wing. Turnbull defeated Dutton in a leadership ballot, but tensions continued to mount and the party voted in favour of holding a second spill; Bishop chose to be a candidate. In the second vote, Bishop was eliminated in the first round by Peter Dutton and Scott Morrison, with Morrison elected as party leader (and thus prime minister) in the second round.[3] She declined to retain the foreign affairs portfolio in the Morrison Ministry, instead moving to the backbench. Bishop retired from politics on 11 April 2019, before the impending federal election.[4] ; Julie Bishop: Bishop was born on 17 July 1956 in Lobethal, South Australia. She is the third of four children born to Isabel Mary (née Wilson) and Douglas Alan Bishop; she has two older sisters and a younger brother.[6] Bishop has described her parents as "classic Menzies Liberals". Her father was a returned soldier and orchardist, while her mother's family were sheep and wheat farmers.[1] Both her mother and grandfather William Bishop were active in local government, serving terms as mayor of the East Torrens District Council.[6]
knowledge1: Vishal (actor) // Vishal (actor) Vishal Krishna (born 29 August 1977) is an Indian film actor, producer and anti-piracy activist who works in the Tamil film industry. The younger son of film producer G. K. Reddy, Vishal studied Visual Communications at Loyola College, Chennai. He produces films under his production company, Vishal Film Factory. He made an entrance into the film industry as an assistant director for Arjun. He then became an actor and played his first lead role in the romantic thriller "Chellamae" (2004), before going on to star in the commercially successful films "Sandakozhi" (2005), "Thimiru" (2006), "Thaamirabharani"(2007) and "Malaikottai"(2007). Following; Vishal (actor) // Vishal's last release "Thupparivaalan" was a hit and his next film "Irumbu Thirai" is due in January. Elections are nothing new to Vishal, as he contested and won two important Tamil film association elections against stiff opposition. Vishal (actor) Vishal Krishna (born 29 August 1977) is an Indian film actor, producer and anti-piracy activist who works in the Tamil film industry. The younger son of film producer G. K. Reddy, Vishal studied Visual Communications at Loyola College, Chennai. He produces films under his production company, Vishal Film Factory. He made an entrance into the film industry as an assistant director; Vishal (actor) // Devi on 29 August 1977. He was born in Chennai. His father was a film producer for Telugu and Tamil films and his family settled in Chennai. His elder brother Vikram Krishna has produced several of Vishal's films and had previously appeared as an actor in films under the screen name of Ajay. Vishal also has a younger sister Aishwarya. Vishal obtained his secondary education from Don Bosco Matriculation Higher Secondary School before securing a degree in visual communications from Loyola College, Chennai. Vishal assisted actor-director Arjun Sarja in his venture "Vedham" (2001), and a producer spotted Vishal on the [sep] knowledge2: Vishal (actor): Vishal Krishna Reddy (born 29 August 1977),[1] professionally known as Vishal, is an Indian actor and producer who works in Tamil films. Born to film producer G. K. Reddy, Vishal is known for his roles in action films. He also produces films under his production company, Vishal Film Factory.[2] Vishal was conferred with the Kalaimamani award in 2006, for his contributions to Tamil cinema.[3] ; Vishal (actor): Vishal made an entrance into the film industry as an assistant director for Arjun. He then became an actor and played his first lead role in the romantic thriller Chellamae (2004), before acting in the action films Sandakozhi, Thimiru, Thaamirabharani and Malaikottai.[4] Vishal chose to create his own production studio and has since produced and worked on Pandiya Naadu (2013), Naan Sigappu Manithan (2014) and Poojai (2014).[5] ; Vishal (actor): Vishal Krishna Reddy was born on 29 August 1977 into a Telugu-speaking family in Chennai, Tamil Nadu.[6][7][8] His father, G. K. Reddy, is a businessman and a film producer in Telugu and Tamil films.[9] His elder brother, Vikram Krishna, is also an actor and producer who has produced several of Vishal's films.[10] His family hails from Nellore, Andhra Pradesh. ; Vishal (actor): Vishal did his schooling at Don Bosco Matriculation Higher Secondary School, Chennai. He then graduated in visual communications from the Loyola College, Chennai.[11] ; Vishal (actor): His next film, the political action drama Sivappathigaram (2006), directed by Karu Pazhaniappan was a failure financially despite favourable reviews.[21] His next film was released in January 2007, Hari's multi-starring family action drama Thaamirabharani (2007) and the film went on to gain considerable box office success, carrying good reports amidst other big budget releases.[22][23] Later in the year, he appeared in Boopathy Pandian's Malaikottai (2007), a comedy entertainer. In his first full-length comic role, Vishal received mixed feedback for his portrayal from critics, with Rediff stating that he is "a far cry from the rather endearing young man in Sandakozhi", whilst describing his performance as "cringe-able".[24] Behindwoods stated it as an "Average masala-mix entertainer".[25] The film took a large opening and was declared a blockbuster, featuring in the top 10 at behindwoods box office. In the year 2008, for the first time, Vishal portrayed a police officer in Sathyam, which became a commercial failure at the box office. Then both his films Thoranai (2009) and Theeradha Vilaiyattu Pillai (2010) were just average grossers. Additionally, the box-office duds, Sathyam and Thoranai, both of which were bilingual in Tamil and Telugu, failed to establish his popularity in Telugu cinema.[26]
knowledge1: Adnan Sami // to 14 countries. His paternal great-grandfather, General Ahmed Jan, was from Afghanistan and a military advisor to king Abdur Rahman Khan. His paternal grandfather Agha Mehfooz Jan was the governor of four Afghan provinces under King Amanullah Khan's reign and was also the King’s first cousin. He was assassinated by Habibullah Kalakani and therefore his father's family migrated to Peshawar, then in British India. Sami attended Rugby School in Rugby, West Midlands, UK. He went on to graduate with a bachelor's degree in journalism and political science from the University of London. Adnan followed his bachelor's degree with a law; Adnan Sami // has won many international awards including the Nigar Award, Bolan Academy Award and Graduate Award. Adnan is the youngest recipient of the Naushad Music Award for Excellence in Music. Previous recipients of this award include Lata Mangeshkar and Music Maestro Khayam. Sami was invited as a member of the jury of the music festival Voice of Asia competition held annually at Almaty, Kazakhstan. His first single, "Run for his life", was released in 1986. It was in English, and recorded for UNICEF. It went to No. 1 in the music charts in the Middle East. This was followed by three; Adnan Sami // honour of giving 'Royal Command' performances before the King of Sweden and King Hussein of Jordan. In 2007, Sami was honoured with a Special Award from the U.K. Parliament (House of Commons) for his 'Outstanding Contribution to Sub-Continental Music'. In 2008, he was presented the "Naushad Music Award" by Andhra Pradesh Department of Culture, in Hyderabad. In 2008 he also won "Best International Act" at the UK Asian Music Awards. In 2013, Adnan was honoured with the BrandLaureate International Brand Personality award by the President of The BrandLaureate, Dr KK Johan, in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia. Later in 2013, Sami was; Adnan Sami // Adnan Sami Adnan Sami Khan (born 15 August 1971) is a singer, musician, music composer, pianist and actor. He performs Indian and western music, specially for Hindi movies. His most notable instrument is the piano. He is credited for being the first person to play Indian classical music on the piano in a style he created through the Santoor. A review in US-based "Keyboard" magazine described him as the fastest keyboard player in the world and called him the keyboard discovery of the nineties. As a multi-platinum recording artist, he has sold the biggest selling independent albums of all time; Adnan Sami // honoured with a Special Award by the Canadian Parliament for his 'Exceptional Services to Indian Music'. In 2015, on his recent North America Tour, Adnan was the first Asian to become the ‘Honorary Deputy Sheriff of Texas’ at a ceremony held in Houston, where he was presented with a 'Badge', 'Sheriff Hat' and Appointment Certificate. In April 2017, Sami created history by becoming the first South Asian to have sold out London's iconic Wembley Stadium for a record 8 times. The Mayor of London, Mr. Sadiq Khan honoured Adnan & attended the concert. "Badaltay Mausam" (1997) was re-released in India [sep] knowledge2: Adnan Sami: Adnan Sami Khan (born 15 August 1971) is an Indian singer, musician, music composer, actor and pianist.[4][5][6] He performs Indian and Western music, including for Hindi and Telugu. He has been awarded with Padma Shri (India's fourth highest civilian award) for his remarkable contribution in music. His most notable instrument is the piano. He has been credited as "the first musician to have played the santoor and Indian classical music on the piano".[7] A review in the US-based Keyboard magazine described him as the fastest keyboard player in the world[8] and called him the keyboard discovery of the nineties.[9] ; Adnan Sami: He was raised and educated in the United Kingdom and spent his life in Canada.[2] He was born to Arshad Sami Khan, a Pakistani Air Force veteran and diplomat of Pashtun origin, and Naureen, who was originally from the Indian Union territory of Jammu and Kashmir.[8][10] The Times of India has called him the "Sultan of Music".[10][11][12][13] In 2016 he became an Indian citizen.[14][15] He was awarded the Padma Shri on 26 January 2020.[16] ; Adnan Sami: Sami was born in London, England on 15 August 1971.[17][3][1][2][a] He was raised and educated in the United Kingdom. His father, Arshad Sami Khan, was a Pakistani Pashtun[7][18] while his mother Naureen Khan was an Indian from Jammu.[7][2] Adnan's father served as a Pakistan Air Force pilot, before becoming a senior bureaucrat and serving as Pakistan's ambassador to 14 countries.[19][20] His paternal great-great-grandfather, General Ahmed Jan, was from Afghanistan and a military advisor to king Abdur Rahman Khan.[20] His paternal great-grandfather Agha Mehfooz Jan was the governor of four Afghan provinces under King Amanullah Khan's reign and was also the King's first cousin, while his paternal grandfather Abdul Sami Khan served as the Deputy Inspector General of Police. Agha Mehfooz Jan was assassinated by Habibullah Kalakani and therefore Sami's father's family migrated to Peshawar, then in British India.[21] ; Adnan Sami: Sami attended Rugby School in Rugby, West Midlands, UK.[22] Adnan followed his bachelor's degree with a law degree (LLB) from King's College London.[23] He went on to qualify as a barrister from Lincoln's Inn, England.[1] ; Adnan Sami: He had played the piano since the age of five and composed his first piece of music when he was nine years old. Sami began taking lessons in Indian classical music from the santoor maestro Pandit Shivkumar Sharma when visiting India during his school vacations. Indian singer Asha Bhosle saw him at age ten at an R. D. Burman concert in London, and encouraged him to take up music as a career. He is an accomplished concert pianist, music composer and singer with a command of Indian and Western classical/semi-classical music, jazz, rock and pop music. As a teenager, Adnan, when performing on the piano on a TV program in Stockholm, was described by the US-based Keyboard magazine as the fastest man on keyboard in the world[8] and the keyboard discovery of the nineties.[9] Sami went on to learn Indian classical music from Pandit Shivkumar Sharma, the Santoor maestro in India. At the age of sixteen, Sami was approached to write a song for famine-hit Ethiopia, for which he won a special award from UNICEF.[5]
knowledge1: Grant Bowler // Grant Bowler Grant Bowler (born 18 July 1968) is a New Zealand-born Australian actor who has worked in American, Australian, New Zealand, and Canadian film, television, and theatre. He is known for playing the role of Constable Wayne Patterson in "Blue Heelers" and Wolfgang West in "Outrageous Fortune". He also appeared as Wilhelmina Slater's love interest Connor Owens in "Ugly Betty". In 2010, he hosted "The Amazing Race Australia". He starred as Joshua Nolan on the Syfy television series "Defiance". Bowler has been the voiceover for "" for the Seven Network since 2004. He also provided the voiceover for a; Grant Bowler // Dane Cook, "Lucky Dog" with Amy Smart, and the family movie, "Zooey to the Max". Grant Bowler Grant Bowler (born 18 July 1968) is a New Zealand-born Australian actor who has worked in American, Australian, New Zealand, and Canadian film, television, and theatre. He is known for playing the role of Constable Wayne Patterson in "Blue Heelers" and Wolfgang West in "Outrageous Fortune". He also appeared as Wilhelmina Slater's love interest Connor Owens in "Ugly Betty". In 2010, he hosted "The Amazing Race Australia". He starred as Joshua Nolan on the Syfy television series "Defiance". Bowler has been the voiceover [sep] knowledge2: Grant Bowler: Grant Bowler (born 18 July 1968) is a New Zealand-Australian actor and television presenter who has worked in American, Australian, New Zealand, and Canadian film, television, and theatre. ; Grant Bowler: He is known for playing the role of Constable Wayne Patterson in Blue Heelers and Wolfgang West in Outrageous Fortune. He also appeared as Wilhelmina Slater's love interest Connor Owens in Ugly Betty.[1] He starred as Joshua Nolan on the Syfy television series Defiance.[2] ; Grant Bowler: As a presenter, he was best known for hosting reality game shows – including The Mole Australia and The Amazing Race Australia, both of which aired on the Seven Network.[3] ; Grant Bowler: Bowler was born in Auckland, New Zealand, but moved to Australia when he was young, and was raised in Brisbane.[4] ; Grant Bowler: In 2011, he separated from his wife of nine years, Australian actress Roxane Wilson, with whom he has two children.[5]
knowledge1: Shoya Nakajima // Shoya Nakajima Nakajima was first selected to represent the Japanese under-17 national team when he was called up to the Slovakia Cup, a friendly tournament in early May 2011 that served the purpose of preparing the squad for the FIFA U-17 World Cup. A month later, he was in Mexico playing at the 2011 U-17 World Cup, where he appeared in two matches and scored one goal in a 3–2 loss against Brazil in the quarter-finals of the competition. On August 2013, Nakajima was called for the Japanese under-20 national team to participate in the L'Alcúdia International Football Tournament in; Shoya Nakajima // for upcoming matches against Mali and Ukraine. On the following 23 March, he debuted and scored his first goal for Japanese national team against Mali in a 1–1 draw. (score column indicates score after each Nakajima goal, Japan score listed second) Shoya Nakajima Nakajima was first selected to represent the Japanese under-17 national team when he was called up to the Slovakia Cup, a friendly tournament in early May 2011 that served the purpose of preparing the squad for the FIFA U-17 World Cup. A month later, he was in Mexico playing at the 2011 U-17 World Cup, where he; Shoya Nakajima // the 2014 Asian Games, scoring against Iraq and Nepal, while helping his squad qualify in second place on the group stage. He then played the round 16 match against Palestine and advanced with his team to the quarter-finals, where they were defeated by rivals South Korea in a late 1–0 loss. In March 2015, he played two matches in the AFC U-23 Championship qualification and scored a double against Vietnam. The team reached the first place of the group and was granted the qualification for the 2016 AFC U-23 Championship. In January 2016, he participated in the championship, scoring a [sep] knowledge2: Shoya Nakajima: Shōya Nakajima (中島 翔哉, Nakajima Shōya, born 23 August 1994) is a Japanese professional footballer who plays for J1 League club Urawa Red Diamonds and the Japan national team. Primarily a left winger, he has also played on the right flank and as a central second striker. ; Shoya Nakajima: After starting his career with Tokyo Verdy of the J2 League and FC Tokyo of the J1 League, he spent several years in Portugal's Primeira Liga with Portimonense and Porto. He also had brief spells in Qatar, the United Arab Emirates and Turkey. ; Shoya Nakajima: He was part of the Japanese under-23 team at the 2016 Olympics. First capped at senior level in 2018, he was part of the Japan team at the 2019 Copa América. ; Shoya Nakajima: On 27 August 2017, Nakajima moved abroad for the first time, signing a season-long loan with Portimonense of Portugal's Primeira Liga.[3] After scoring 10 goals and as many assists in 32 total matches for the team from the Algarve, he signed a permanent deal in May 2018.[4] ; Shoya Nakajima: In February 2019, Nakajima joined Qatar Stars League side Al Duhail[5] for a reported transfer fee of €35 million.[6] He played seven games for the eventual runners-up, and scored once in a 6–0 home win over Al Ahli on 28 February.[7]
knowledge1: Ziaur Rahman // of the then-opposition party Awami League including current prime minister Sheikh Hasina. Zia has been the namesake of many public institutions, such as formerly the Zia International Airport in Dhaka, which is the busiest airport in the nation. Turkey has named an important road in Ankara as Ziaur Rahman Caddesi after his death to honour him. In 2004, Ziaur Rahman was ranked number 20 in BBC's poll of the Greatest Bengali of all time. Zia was also honoured by the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation for his statesmanship and vision. Other honours include: Ziaur Rahman Ziaur Rahman ( "Ji-yaur; Ziaur Rahman Zia // Ziaur Rahman Zia Ziaur Rahman Zia, ("Jiẏā'ura Rahamāna Jiẏā") (January 7, 1975) is a Bangladeshi musician, composer, bassist, songwriter, and architect popularly known as the founder and leader of the Bangladeshi independent music group Shironamhin. In addition, he plays Bass guitar, Cello, Sarod and many other instruments for the compositions and do the production for shironamhin band. Best known as "Zia" to young music enthusiasts, is one of today's crop of rock musicians. Zia has been a fan of music from his early childhood. He became a hardcore fan of metal music during his college life and used to collect; Ziaur Rahman // Ziaur Rahman Ziaur Rahman ( "Ji-yaur Rôhman"; 19 January 1936 – 30 May 1981), Bir Uttom was the President of Bangladesh. He was an army general turned politician who, as a major in the army declared the Independence of Bangladesh on 27 March, 1971 on behalf of Sheikh Mujibur Rahman, the father of the nation. He became President of Bangladesh on 21 April 1977. He was assassinated on 30 May 1981 in Chittagong by some Bangladeshi army personnel in an unsuccessful military coup. Rahman was in charge as a sector commander of BDF Sector 1 initially, and from June as; Ziaur Rahman (Bangladeshi cricketer) // 2018–19 Bangladesh Premier League. Ziaur Rahman (Bangladeshi cricketer) Mohammad Ziaur Rahman (; born 2 December 1986 in Khulna) is a first-class and List A cricketer from Bangladesh. He is a right-handed batsman and right arm fast medium bowler. Sometimes referred to on scoresheets by his nickname Joni, he made his debut for Khulna Division in 2004/05 and played through the 2006/07 season. He also appeared for Bangladesh Under-19s in 2003/04 and the Bangladesh Cricket Board President's XI and Bangladesh Cricket Board Academy in 2006/07. He is known as the "Hit man" of Bangladesh cricket team. In Bangladesh Cricket League 2012,; Zillur Rahman // its people," according to her Press Secretary Abul Kalam Azad. In 2013, Prime Minister Sheikh Hasina declared that the Mirpur-Airport Road Flyover will be named after him. Zillur Rahman Mohammed Zillur Rahman (; 9 March 1929 – 20 March 2013) was the President of Bangladesh from 2008 to 2013. He was also a senior presidium member of the Awami League. He is the third president of Bangladesh, after Sheikh Mujibur Rahman and Ziaur Rahman, to die in office, while being the first to die of natural causes. Rahman was born on 9 March 1929 in Bhairab Upazila, Kishoreganj District, his [sep] knowledge2: Ziaur Rahman: Ziaur Rahman[a] (19 January 1936 – 30 May 1981) was a Bangladeshi military officer and politician who served as the President of Bangladesh from 1977 until his assassination. He was the founder of the Bangladesh Nationalist Party (BNP) and served as its chairman until his assassination. He previously served as the second chief of army staff from 1975 to 1978 with a minor break. ; Ziaur Rahman: Ziaur, sometimes known as Zia, was born in Gabtali and trained at the Pakistan Military Academy in Abbottabad. He served as a commander of the Pakistan Army in the Second Kashmir War against the Indian Army, for which he was awarded the Hilal-e-Jurrat from the Pakistani government. Ziaur was a prominent Bangladesh Forces commander during the country's Independence war from Pakistan in 1971. He originally broadcast the Bangladesh declaration of independence on 27 March from Kalurghat radio station in Chittagong. After the war of Independence, Ziaur became a brigade commander in Bangladesh Army, and later the deputy chief of staff and chief of staff of Bangladesh Army.[3] His ascent to leadership of the country resulted from a conspiracy that had begun with the killing of Sheikh Mujibur Rahman, the founding president of Bangladesh, in a military coup d'état followed by a coup and counter-revolt within the military to gain control at the helm. Ziaur Rahman gained de facto power as head of the government already under martial law imposed by the Mushtaq government. He took over the presidency in 1977. ; Ziaur Rahman: As president in 1978, Ziaur Rahman founded the Bangladesh Nationalist Party (popularly known by its abbreviation BNP). He reinstated multi-party politics, freedom of the press, free speech and free markets and accountability. He initiated mass irrigation and food production programmes, including social programmes to uplift the lives of the people. His government initiated efforts to create a regional group in South Asia, which later became SAARC in 1985. He improved Bangladesh's relations with the West and China, and departed from Sheikh Mujibur Rahman's close alignment with India. Domestically, Ziaur Rahman faced as many as twenty-one coup attempts for which military tribunals were set up, resulting in thousands of Army and Air Force officers being executed, earning him a reputation of being 'strict' and 'ruthless' amongst international observers. Throughout his military career, Ziaur Rahman was awarded two gallantry awards for two campaigns he participated in; he was awarded the Hilal-i-Jurat for the Indo-Pak War in 1965, and Bir Uttom in 1972 for the Bangladesh Liberation War. He retired from the Bangladesh Army with the rank of Lt. General in 1978.[4][5] ; Ziaur Rahman: Ziaur Rahman's death created a divided opinion on his legacy in Bangladeshi politics. Awami League supporters vilify him for alleged connections to Mujib's assassination and controversial actions during his presidency.[6][7][8][9] Critics argue that the current authoritarian regime politically motivated the negative portrayal of Ziaur's legacy.[10][11][12][13] Nevertheless, Rahman is generally credited for his role in the Liberation War, stabilizing Bangladesh, industrializing agriculture, and fostering regional cooperation.[14][15][16] His political party, the BNP, remains a major force alongside its rival, the Awami League, with his wife, Khaleda Zia, leading the party and serving two terms as prime minister.[17] ; Ziaur Rahman: Ziaur Rahman was born on 19 January 1936 to a Bengali Muslim family of Mandals in the village of Bagbari in Gabtali, Bogra District. His father, Mansur Rahman, was a chemist who specialised in paper and ink chemistry and worked for a government department at Writers' Building in Kolkata. His grandfather, Moulvi Kamaluddin Mandal, migrated from Mahishaban to Nashipur-Bagbari after marrying his grandmother Meherunnisa. His mother's name was Jahanara Khatun. Ziaur Rahman was raised in his home village of Bagbari and studied in Bogra Zilla School.[18] He had two younger brothers, Ahmed Kamal (d. 2017)[19] and Khalilur Rahman (d. 2014).[20]
knowledge1: Carlos P. Romulo // Carlos P. Romulo Carlos Peña Romulo, (14 January 1898 – 15 December 1985) was a Filipino diplomat, statesman, soldier, journalist and author. He was a reporter at 16, a newspaper editor by the age of 20, and a publisher at 32. He was a co-founder of the Boy Scouts of the Philippines, a general in the US Army and the Philippine Army, university president, President of the UN General Assembly, was eventually named one of the Philippines' National Artists in Literature, and was the recipient of many other honors and honorary degrees. His hometown is Camiling, Tarlac and he studied; Carlos P. Romulo // founded in 1945. He was the Philippines' Secretary (Minister from 1973 to 1984) of Foreign Affairs under President Elpidio Quirino from 1950 to 1952, under President Diosdado Macapagal from 1963 to 1964 and under President Ferdinand Marcos from 1968 to 1984. In April 1955 he led the Philippines' delegation to the Asian-African Conference at Bandung. Romulo supported President Ferdinand Marcos through most of his presidency. But he resigned soon after the assassination of Benigno Aquino, citing poor health. Gregorio Brillantes interviewed him in 1984, and he said he resigned "heartsick" because of the assassination of Aquino, whom he considered a; Carlos P. Romulo // was in water waist deep, Romulo must have drowned!" In later years, Romulo told another story himself about a meeting with MacArthur and other tall American generals who disparaged his physical stature. "Gentlemen," he declared, "When you say something like that, you make me feel like a dime among nickels." Resident Commissioner of the Philippines to the United States Congress Carlos P. Romulo Carlos Peña Romulo, (14 January 1898 – 15 December 1985) was a Filipino diplomat, statesman, soldier, journalist and author. He was a reporter at 16, a newspaper editor by the age of 20, and a publisher at; Carlos P. Romulo // from 1944 to 1946. This was the title of the non-voting Delegate to the US House of Representatives for lands taken in the Spanish–American War, and as such, he is the only member of the US Congress to end his tenure via a legal secession from the Union. In his career in the United Nations, Romulo was a strong advocate of human rights, freedom and decolonization. In 1948 in Paris, France, at the third UN General Assembly, he strongly disagreed with a proposal made by the Soviet delegation headed by Andrei Vishinsky, who challenged his credentials by insulting him with; Carlos P. Romulo // at the Camiling Central Elementary School during his basic education. Romulo served eight Philippine presidents, from Manuel L. Quezon to Ferdinand Marcos, as the Secretary of Foreign Affairs of the Philippines and as the country's representative to the United States and to the United Nations. He also served as the Resident Commissioner to the U.S. House of Representatives during the Commonwealth era. In addition, he served also as the Secretary of Education in President Diosdado P. Macapagal's and President Ferdinand E. Marcos's Cabinet through 1962 to 1968. Romulo served as Resident Commissioner of the Philippines to the United States Congress [sep] knowledge2: Carlos P. Romulo: Carlos Peña Romulo Sr. QSC GCS CLH NA GCrM GCrGH KGCR (January 14, 1899 – December 15, 1985) was a Filipino diplomat, statesman, soldier, journalist and author. He was a reporter at the age of 16, a newspaper editor by 20, and a publisher at 32. He was a co-founder of the Boy Scouts of the Philippines, a general in the US Army and the Philippine Army, university president, and president of the United Nations General Assembly. ; Carlos P. Romulo: He has been named as one of the Philippines's national artists in literature, and was the recipient of many other honors and honorary degrees. ; Carlos P. Romulo: Romulo believed in anti-colonialism and internationalism, as well as held Pro-American, anti-communist, anti-fascist, and economically and politically liberal beliefs.[1] ; Carlos P. Romulo: Carlos Romulo was born in Tayabas City on January 14, 1899.[1] His parents were Pangasinense. His father fought against the US in the Philippine-American War.[1] His father transitioned to working for the US government in the Philippines after the war, rising through the ranks as town councilor, mayor, and eventually the governor of Tarlac province.[1] ; Carlos P. Romulo: He studied at the Camiling Central Elementary School during his basic education.
knowledge1: Arif Mohammad Khan // Arif Mohammad Khan Arif Mohammad Khan (born 1951 in Bulandshahr, Uttar Pradesh) is a former cabinet minister in the union of India. He has had several portfolios ranging from energy to civil aviation. He is actively involved in reforming religious ideas according to the present world. Arif Mohammad Khan was born in 1951 in Bulandshahr. Barabasti or Barah Basti is a group of 12 villages lying in Bulandshahr district in the Indian state of Uttar Pradesh. He was educated at Jamia Millia School, Delhi, Aligarh Muslim University, Aligarh and Shia College, Lucknow University. Arif Mohammad Khan started his political career; Arif Mohammad Khan // Khan has been deeply involved in writing since his student days. He is the author of the best selling book of the year 2010 "Text and Context: Quran and Contemporary Challenges", published by Rupa & Co. Now Arif Mohammad Khan is actively involved in writing articles and columns related to Islam and Sufism. Arif Mohammad Khan has advocated abolishing of All India Muslim Personal Law Board. Arif Mohammad Khan also supported the Supreme Court of India's judgement in Shah Bano case to make the right to maintenance of a divorced Muslim wife absolute. 1985 Arif Mohammad Khan Arif Mohammad Khan [sep] knowledge2: Arif Mohammad Khan: Arif Mohammad Khan (born 18 November 1951) is an Indian politician belonging to the Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP). [1][2] He is currently the Governor of Kerala.[3] He is a former Union Minister. He has held several portfolios ranging from energy to civil aviation.[4] ; Arif Mohammad Khan: Arif Mohammad Khan was born on 18 November 1951 in Bulandshahr. He was educated at Jamia Millia School, Delhi, Aligarh Muslim University, Aligarh and at Shia College, University of Lucknow.[5] ; Arif Mohammad Khan: Khan started his political career as a student leader. He was the President of Aligarh Muslim University Students' Union in the year 1972-73 and also its honorary Secretary a year earlier (1971–72).[5] He contested the first legislative assembly election from Siyana constituency of Bulandshahar on Bharatiya Kranti Dal party's banner but was defeated. He became a member of the legislative assembly of UP in 1977 at the age of 26.[6] ; Arif Mohammad Khan: Arif Mohammad Khan has always supported reformation within Muslims.[8] He resigned from position of Minister of state protesting against Rajiv Gandhi Congress Government stand on Shah Bano case in 1986.[9] He defended Supreme Court judgment on Shah Bano case in Parliament.[10][11] Khan opposed triple talaq in India and said that it should be punishable with 3 years in jail.[12] Khan has asserted that Muslim men are still allowed to be polygamous and can also give a divorce easily by paying paltry sums.[13] ; Arif Mohammad Khan: On being asked for a reaction about the murder of Kanhaiya Lal in Udaipur by reporters, Khan responded that madrasas teach that blasphemy should be punished by beheading and demanded that what is taught there should be examined.[16]
knowledge1: Fahadh Faasil // Fahadh Faasil Fahadh Faasil is an Indian film actor and producer, who works in the Malayalam film industry. Fahadh began his film career at the age of 19 by starring in the leading role in his father Fazil's 2002 romantic film "Kaiyethum Doorath", which was a critical and commercial failure. After a gap of six years, Fahadh made his comeback with the anthology film "Kerala Cafe" (2009), in the short film "Mrityunjayam". He attained public attention for his role as Arjun in the thriller film "Chaappa Kurishu" (2011). Fahad won his first Kerala State Film Award, the Best Supporting Actor; Fahadh Faasil // big budget movie, Iyobinte Pusthakam which was produced by him. He also played a major role in the blockbuster movie Bangalore days. 2015 was a dull year for him as he was unable pull off a successful project. In 2016, his first release, Monsoon Mangoes failed at the box office, even though his performance was highly praised and the movie gathered good critic responses. His next release was on 5 February 2016 Maheshinte Prathikaaram which went on to become a blockbuster. It was highly applauded by both audience and critics. After the release of "Annayum Rasoolum" (2013), Fahadh Faasil openly; Fahadh Faasil // Prasad in "Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum" (2017), with "Maheshinte Prathikaaram" and "Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum" winning the Best Feature Film in Malayalam Award at the 64th and 65th National Film Awards. He won the National Film Award for Best Supporting Actor for his performance in "Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum" (2017). Fahadh is the son of film director Fazil and his wife Rozina. He has two sisters, Ahameda and Fatima, and a brother, Farhaan Faasil. He completed his schooling from SDV Central School Alleppey, Lawrence School Ooty and Choice School in Thripunithura. He went on to pursue his degree from Sanatana Dharma College, Alleppey and M.A. in; Fahadh Faasil // declared to the media that he was in love with actress Andrea Jeremiah. Andrea rejected reports that the pair were seeing each other. On 20 January 2014, he got engaged to Malayalam and Tamil film actress Nazriya Nazim whom he married on 21 August 2014. The pair had gotten to know each other more on the sets of Anjali Menon's "Bangalore Days" (2014), in which they were playing husband and wife. Fahadh revealed that their parents had been pivotal in arranging the marriage. He has appeared in several advertisements like Titan, Milma, Adithi aata etc. Fahadh Faasil Fahadh Faasil is; Fahadh Faasil // myself," said Fahadh. The film premiered at the Dubai International Film Festival. "22 Female Kottayam", a revenge film had him playing a negative character. In his next film, Lal Jose's "Diamond Necklace", he played the role of an oncologist working in Dubai and the film centred on the doctor's relationship with three different women. In June 2012, a case was registered against Fahadh by the Kochi Town Central Police for violation of the rule against public display of images of smoking. A poster of "Diamond Necklace" that showed him smoking a cigarette had been on display before the Kavitha Theatre [sep] knowledge2: Fahadh Faasil: Abdul Hameed Mohammed Fahadh Fazil (8 August 1982) is an Indian actor and producer who predominantly works in Malayalam and Tamil films.[4] He has acted in more than 50 films and has received several awards, including a National Film Award, four Kerala State Film Awards, and three Filmfare Awards South. ; Fahadh Faasil: Fahadh is the son of filmmaker Fazil. Fahadh began his film career at the age of 20 by starring in the leading role in his father Fazil's 2002 romantic film Kaiyethum Doorath, which was a critical and commercial failure. After a gap of 7 years, Fahadh made his comeback with the anthology film Kerala Cafe (2009), in the short film Mrityunjayam. He attained public attention for his role as Arjun in the thriller film Chaappa Kurishu (2011). Fahadh won his first Kerala State Film Award, the Best Supporting Actor Award for his performance in Chaappa Kurishu along with his performance in Akam. He achieved critical acclaim and recognition for his roles as Cyril in 22 Female Kottayam (2012) and Dr. Arun Kumar in Diamond Necklace (2012). He won his first Filmfare Award for Best Actor for his role in 22 Female Kottayam.[5] ; Fahadh Faasil: Fahadh achieved further critical and commercial success for his films in 2013, including his performances in the romantic-drama film Annayum Rasoolum, the black-comedy satire film  Amen, the road movie North 24 Kaatham, the drama film Artist, and the romantic-comedy Oru Indian Pranayakadha. He won the Kerala State Film Award for Best Actor for his performances as Michael in Artist and Harikrishnan in North 24 Kaatham. He also won his second Filmfare Award for Best Actor for his role in North 24 Kaatham.[6] He followed it up by starring as Shivadas in the coming-of-age drama film Bangalore Days (2014), which ranks among the highest-grossing Malayalam films. He produced and starred as Aloshy in the 2014 period film Iyobinte Pusthakam under his production company, Fahadh Faasil and Friends Pvt Ltd. Fahadh also has a Digital Entertainment Company/Movie Production House named Bhavana Studios partnered with Dileesh Pothan and Syam Pushkaran. ; Fahadh Faasil: Fahadh had roles as Mahesh Bhavana in Maheshinte Prathikaaram (2016), Indian diplomat Manoj Abraham in Take Off (2017), and Prasad in Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum (2017), with Maheshinte Prathikaaram and Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum winning the Best Feature Film in Malayalam Award at the 64th and 65th National Film Awards.[7] He won the National Film Award for Best Supporting Actor for his performance in Thondimuthalum Driksakshiyum (2017) and his third Filmfare Award for Best Actor – Malayalam. In 2018, he acted as Prakashan in the film Njan Prakashan which ranks among highest-grossing Malayalam films and as Aby in the film Varathan. In 2021, Fahadh portrayed the titular anti-hero in the crime drama Joji which received acclaim and later received nationwide acclaim from critics for his performance in the political thriller Malik.[8] ; Fahadh Faasil: Fahadh is the son of film director Fazil. He has two sisters, Ahameda and Fatima, and a brother, Farhaan, also an actor. He completed his schooling from SDV Central School Alappuzha, Lawrence School Ooty and Choice School Tripunithura. He went on to pursue his Bachelor's from SD College, Alleppey and Masters in philosophy from University of Miami in the United States.[9][10]
knowledge1: Terrence Romeo // Terrence Romeo Terrence Bill Vitanzos Romeo (born March 16, 1992) is a Filipino professional basketball player for the San Miguel Beermen of the Philippine Basketball Association (PBA). He plays both the point guard and shooting guard positions. He played as a point guard for the Far Eastern University before being selected fifth overall in the 2013 PBA draft by GlobalPort. He won the 2011 UAAP Rookie of the Year, was a member of the UAAP Mythical Team during his junior and senior years, and was the 2014 UAAP men's basketball Most Valuable Player. Romeo first played for the Letran Squires; Terrence Romeo // competed in the 2015 FIBA Asia Championship, and had his best game against powerhouse Iran and India. "Correct as of September 14, 2016" Terrence Romeo Terrence Bill Vitanzos Romeo (born March 16, 1992) is a Filipino professional basketball player for the San Miguel Beermen of the Philippine Basketball Association (PBA). He plays both the point guard and shooting guard positions. He played as a point guard for the Far Eastern University before being selected fifth overall in the 2013 PBA draft by GlobalPort. He won the 2011 UAAP Rookie of the Year, was a member of the UAAP Mythical Team; Terrence Romeo // his team a slot in the All-Star exhibition. He is ranked number one in the Philippines. As the face of 2015 FIBA 3x3 World Tour Manila Masters, Terrence Romeo's spectacular one-on-one skills were once again on full display, as he shone for the Manila West team in the tournament. He was not able to lead Manila West back to the championship though, as he and Manila West lost to Manila North (composed of Calvin Abueva, Vic Manuel,Troy Rosario and Karl Dehesa) in the semi-finals, but Romeo still brought home some hardware. He won the three-point shootout and was later named; Terrence Romeo // was listed as among the season’s top point producers going back to the qualifying legs of the 2014 FIBA 3x3 World Tour. Romeo got an aggregate of 49 points in the 8 matches that he had played in, both in the Manila Masters leg and the Final in Sendai, Japan. This placed him at 11th overall in terms of scoring output out of the 290 players that participated in that year’s edition of the 3×3 World Tour. The international basketball body named the GlobalPort scorer as the number one 3x3 player outside of Europe, Americas, and Qatar, and therefore earned; Terrence Romeo // before he was scouted by Far Eastern University - Diliman. He played only one season as a Baby Tamaraw before graduating to the seniors division. He was famously known for scoring the UAAP Juniors basketball record of 83 points, eclipsing the previous record of 69 points held by former Junior Maroons player Paolo Mendoza. What's more impressive, is that he did it in 31 minutes of playing time, scoring 33 points in the 3rd quarter alone. He won the UAAP Juniors' Most Valuable Player (2009) that same year, with averages of 37.1ppg 4.1apg 4.0spg. It was a bit of a [sep] knowledge2: Terrence Romeo: Terrence Bill Vitanzos Romeo (born March 16, 1992) is a Filipino professional basketball player for the San Miguel Beermen of the Philippine Basketball Association (PBA). He plays both the point guard and shooting guard positions.[1] ; Terrence Romeo: He played as a point guard for the Far Eastern University before being selected fifth overall in the 2013 PBA draft by Barako Bull.[2] He won the 2010 UAAP Rookie of the Year, was a member of the UAAP Mythical Team during his junior and senior years, and was the 2013 UAAP men's basketball Most Valuable Player.[3] ; Terrence Romeo: Romeo first played for the Letran Squires before he was scouted by Far Eastern University - Diliman. He played only one season as a Baby Tamaraw before graduating to the seniors division. He was famously known for scoring the UAAP Juniors basketball record of 83 points, eclipsing the previous record of 69 points held by former Junior Maroons player Paolo Mendoza. What's more impressive, is that he did it in 31 minutes of playing time, scoring 33 points in the 3rd quarter alone. He won the UAAP Juniors' Most Valuable Player (2009) that same year, with averages of 37.1 ppg, 4.1 apg and 4.0 spg.[4] ; Terrence Romeo: It was a bit of a rocky transition from the juniors to the seniors division for Romeo. Although he was named the top rookie, sharing the court with then UAAP MVP RR Garcia proved challenging for the younger guard, especially since he was relegated to the second option (something he wasn't used to). Romeo's shooting percentage was somewhat below par at 32 percent, scoring a mere (for his standards) 9.9 points in his rookie season. ; Terrence Romeo: In UAAP Season 75 Romeo became (arguably) the first option of the team. He improved as a more potent scorer after last year's heartbreaking loss, averaging a team best 18.5 ppg, and 5.5 rpg. His impressive performance landed him a spot in the mythical five.
knowledge1: Jo Koy // Jo Koy Joseph Glenn Herbert (born June 2, 1971), known professionally as Jo Koy, is a Filipino-American stand-up comic. Koy is currently touring as a headliner in clubs and theaters across the country on his new tour called "Break The Mold." He was a frequent panelist on E!'s late night show "Chelsea Lately". Jo has gained a large following of fans lately from his semi-regular appearances on "The Adam Carolla Show", where he does numerous impressions from P.F. Chang's greeter to Bung Lu Su. Jo Koy is of Filipino and European-American descent. His American father was in the Air Force; Jo Koy // Jo Koy Joseph Glenn Herbert (born June 2, 1971), known professionally as Jo Koy, is a Filipino-American stand-up comic. Koy is currently touring as a headliner in clubs and theaters across the country on his new tour called "Break The Mold." He was a frequent panelist on E!'s late night show "Chelsea Lately". Jo has gained a large following of fans lately from his semi-regular appearances on "The Adam Carolla Show", where he does numerous impressions from P.F. Chang's greeter to Bung Lu Su. Jo Koy is of Filipino and European-American descent. His American father was in the Air Force; Jo Koy // For Laughs", the series for which he was awarded Canada’s prestigious Gemini Award. Jo Koy is also a regular guest at Chelsea Handler’s roundtable discussion on E!'s "Chelsea Lately". Jo Koy has also appeared on Carlos Mencia’s Punisher Tour performing stand-up comedy in front of fans filling 10,000-seat arenas across the country. In 2005, Jo Koy performed on "The Tonight Show with Jay Leno". He became one of a select few comics to receive a standing ovation on the show. He started a podcast together with comedian and TV host Michael Yo on July 23, 2012 called "The Michael Yo; Jo Koy // when he married Koy's Filipina mother. Koy's Filipino-American family moved from Spanaway, Washington to Tacoma, Washington and then to Las Vegas soon after he finished high school in Tacoma, Washington. He attended Spanaway Lake High School originally and then moved to Foss High School in Tacoma. He moved to Las Vegas to be near his ailing grandmother. Koy enrolled in the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, but dropped out to pursue stand-up comedy. Jo Koy's stage name comes from a nickname his family gave him growing up. Jo Koy credits his mother for his comedic and acting talents. She encouraged; Jo Koy // comedy shows. A talent coordinator from Los Angeles spotted Jo Koy and landed him his first television appearance on BET's "ComicView". Jo Koy has appeared on two seasons of "Comic View". Jo Koy has gone on to star in other TV stand-up specials like "Jamie Foxx Presents: Laffapalooza!". Jo Koy has won the "Showtime at the Apollo", performed in front of troops in the USO Tour, can be seen on various VH1 "I Love the 70’s", "80’s", "90’s", Tru TV's "" and "New Millennium" episodes, Amp'd Mobile phone commercials and received a second invite to the Montreal comedy festival "Just [sep] knowledge2: Jo Koy: Joseph Glenn Herbert Sr. (born June 2, 1971[1][3]), known professionally as Jo Koy, is an American stand-up comedian and actor. He was a frequent panelist on E!'s late night show Chelsea Lately. He has since had a number of Comedy Central and Netflix specials. ; Jo Koy: Jo Koy was born to a white American father who was in the United States Air Force stationed in the Philippines when he married Koy's Filipina mother.[4] His family moved from Spanaway, Washington, to Tacoma, Washington, and then to Las Vegas soon after he finished high school in Tacoma. He originally attended Spanaway Lake High School and then moved to Foss High School in Tacoma. They moved to Las Vegas to be near his ailing grandmother. Jo Koy enrolled in the University of Nevada, Las Vegas but dropped out to pursue stand-up comedy.[1] ; Jo Koy: Jo Koy's stage name comes from a nickname his family gave him growing up.[5] It was revealed during his stand-up routine in Phoenix, Arizona, on September 22, 2019, that back in 1989, he was talking to his cousin about making a stage name when his aunt called him to come to dinner, shouting "Jo Ko, eat!" (Ko means "my" in Tagalog, so Jo Ko means "my Jo").  He misheard it and thought she said "Koy," decided it was a good name, and has used it ever since. ; Jo Koy: Jo Koy credits his mother for his comedic and acting talents. He frequently tells stories about her in his comedy shows. She encouraged him to participate in school talent shows and to hold impromptu performances for his family and friends. This led to performances at a Las Vegas coffee house and inspired a move to Los Angeles. ; Jo Koy: The young comic began his stand-up career in 1994 at a comedy club in Las Vegas. Soon he moved from open mic night to a regular spot on the show Catch a Rising Star at the MGM Grand Hotel and Casino.[1] After performing at the MGM Grand Las Vegas, he rented the Huntridge Theater and went door to door to sell tickets to his comedy shows.[1]
knowledge1: Rii Sen // Rii Sen Rii Sen () (born as Rituparna Sen; ) is an Indian actress who works in Bengali cinema. She started her career as a freelance model and a television actress. Her debut film was "Tepantorer Mathe", but it was not released in theatres because of obscene scenes. She has acted in movies like "Bishh", "Gandu", and "Cosmic Sex". Sen is considered as a notable actress of alternative Bengali cinema. She won a best actress award at Osian's Cinefan Festival of Asian and Arab Cinema for her movie "Cosmic Sex". She has acted in few television series and short films.; Rii Sen // the character of a housewife. In 2014 it was announced that Rii would appear in Q (Quashiq Mukherjee) and Nikon’s upcoming movie ‘LUDO’, playing a role not previously seen on Indian screens. Sen is regarded as a prominent actress of alternative Bengali cinema. In an article of "Mint", the performances of Sen was described as– "the common link between a set of films that has been challenging the norms of acceptability and decorum in the past few years." According to Sen, sexuality is a cult for her. She also told— she wants to push her sexuality in cinema "to the; Rii Sen // be seen as gimmick of any sort." Pink indicates "unreleased films"; light green indicates "documentary film" In 2012, Sen won a best actress award at Osian's Cinefan Festival of Asian and Arab Cinema for her movie "Cosmic Sex". Rii Sen Rii Sen () (born as Rituparna Sen; ) is an Indian actress who works in Bengali cinema. She started her career as a freelance model and a television actress. Her debut film was "Tepantorer Mathe", but it was not released in theatres because of obscene scenes. She has acted in movies like "Bishh", "Gandu", and "Cosmic Sex". Sen is considered; Rii Sen // Sen acted in "Tepantorer Mathe" which was her debut feature film, but it was not released. In 2009 Sen worked in a documentary, "Love in India", directed by Qaushiq Mukherjee. The subject of the documentary was "dehotatwa" (worshiping through one's body). In the same year she acted in another documentary, "Many Stories of Love and Hate", directed by Shyamal Karmakar. The documentary was screened at the Mumbai International Film Festival in 2010. In 2009 she acted in "Bissh", directed by Qaushiq Mukherjee. In this film Rii played the character Anushka, a college student. According to Rii, this was a very [sep] knowledge2: Rii Sen: Rii Sen (born Rituparna Sen) is an Indian actress who works in Bengali cinema.[1] She started her career as a freelance model and television actress. Her debut film was Tepantorer Mathe, but it was not released in theatres because of obscene scenes. Sen had participated as contestant in Bigg Boss bangla season 2 and she was the 2nd runner up in the show. She has acted in movies like Bishh, Gandu, and Cosmic Sex. ; Rii Sen: Sen is considered a notable actress of alternative Bengali cinema.[2] She won a best actress award at Osian's Cinefan Festival of Asian and Arab Cinema for her movie Cosmic Sex.[3] ; Rii Sen: She has acted in a few television series (Tithir Otithi, Ekhane Akash Neel) and short films. The actress was also a contestant of Bigg Boss Bangla Season 2,[4] ; Rii Sen: Sen acted in Tepantorer Mathe, which was her debut feature film, but it was not released.[4] In 2009 Sen worked in a documentary, Love in India, directed by Qaushiq Mukherjee. The subject of the documentary was dehotatwa (worshiping through one's body).[3] In the same year she acted in another documentary, Many Stories of Love and Hate, directed by Shyamal Karmakar. The documentary was screened at the Mumbai International Film Festival in 2010.[5] ; Rii Sen: In the 2010 film Gandu, Sen played a lead role. For the character, Sen was required to portray frontal nudity. Qaushiq Mukherjee, the director of the film, said in an interview that he cast Rii because she was the only heroine (of the Bengali film industry) who could have played this role.[7] IBNLive appreciated the work of Rii and wrote in their review— "All the characters have put in their best efforts. Both Komolika and Rii have exuberated confidence in all the sex scenes, showing their maturity as actresses."[8] In the 2010 film Autograph, directed by Srijit Mukherji, Sen played a minor role.
knowledge1: Raghav Juyal // from his days in Doon International School. Later, he joined DAV (PG) College to pursue his B.Com. Raghav Juyal Raghav Juyal (born 10 July 1991) is an Indian dancer, choreographer and actor. He is renowned as the "King of Slow Motion" for his surreal dance moves in slow motion style and for his reinvention of the "Slow Motion Walk". His stage name Crockroaxz describes his dancing style which is an amalgamation of being "powerful like a crocodile" and "creepy like a cockroach". He is an anchor and is popular with inspiring dancers, who imitate his trademark moves and dance style,; Raghav Juyal // in a Bollywood movie Sonali Cable produced by Ramesh Sippy Entertainment which was released on 17 October 2014 on demand. The critics singled out Raghav's vivacious performance and praised his screen presence. He also worked in the film ABCD 2 which was released on 19 June 2015, directed by Remo D'Souza co-starring Varun Dhawan and Shraddha Kapoor. He also hosted the show Dance Plus on Star Plus. He also Hosted Prem Ki Diwali along with Karishma Tanna telecasted on Life Ok. He was seen in season 7 as a contestant.He hosted the season 2 of the show Dance Plus which; Raghav Juyal // aired on Star Plus. He hosted Rising Star along with Meiyang Chang in early 2017 which aired on Colors TV. He has also hosted Dance Plus (season 3) which was aired on Star Plus. In October 2017, he began co-hosting the dance contest TV show Dance Champions with Ridhima Pandit.He is also going to host Dance Plus(season 4) Raghav accredited learning dance from Internet and Television. He created a fusion mainly inspired from the slow yet powerful movements of a Crocodile and the swiftness of a Cockroach. His signature step is his Slow Motion Walk. Choreographers like Remo D'Souza and; Raghav Juyal // Raghav Juyal Raghav Juyal (born 10 July 1991) is an Indian dancer, choreographer and actor. He is renowned as the "King of Slow Motion" for his surreal dance moves in slow motion style and for his reinvention of the "Slow Motion Walk". His stage name Crockroaxz describes his dancing style which is an amalgamation of being "powerful like a crocodile" and "creepy like a cockroach". He is an anchor and is popular with inspiring dancers, who imitate his trademark moves and dance style, popularly known as Crock-style which means the mixing of Crocodile and Cockroach. He rose to fame after; Raghav Juyal // the show. Raghav showcased a new dance style but wasn't selected in the Top 18 by the Grand Master in Mega Audition. Later, on public demand, Grand Master Mithun Chakraborty made an exception in the format by reintroducing him on the show as his Trump Card in the Wild Card round. Through which, he entered the competition again. Master Terence Lewis (choreographer) said, Thereafter, Raghav proved his versatility and individuality by creating unique fusions with different dance-forms and went all the way up to the finale. He was the most popular contestant of the season having garnered the most No. [sep] knowledge2: Raghav Juyal: Raghav Juyal (born 10 July 1991[2]) is an Indian dancer, choreographer, actor and television presenter. He is known as the "King of Slow Motion" for his surreal dance moves in slow motion style and for his reinvention of the Slow Motion Walk in India.[3] He rose to fame after being a contestant and finalist in Zee TV's dance reality show Dance India Dance 3 and a skipper for the team Raghav Ke Rockstars in Dance India Dance Li'l Masters 2 and Dance Ke Superkids where his team was declared the winner under his captainship.[4] He was a contestant on Fear Factor: Khatron Ke Khiladi 7 (2016). ; Raghav Juyal: Juyal became known when his audition video went viral on YouTube. He was a contestant on  Dance India Dance 3 (2012), which aired on Zee TV. He was not professionally trained by anyone prior to coming on the show. Juyal showcased a new dance style but wasn't selected in the Top 18 by the Grand Master in Mega Audition. Later, on public demand, Grand Master Mithun Chakraborty made an exception in the format by reintroducing him on the show as his "trump card" in the wild-card round, through which he entered the competition again.[5] ; Raghav Juyal: Thereafter, Juyal created different dance-forms and reached the finale. He was the most popular contestant of the season having garnered the most No. 1 positions in weekly voting. At the Grand finale, he was voted with 3,481,685 votes in the 2nd runner up position.[citation needed] ; Raghav Juyal: After DID, Raghav became the skipper of team Raghav Ke Rockstars in DID Li'l masters (season 2) where he choreographed for Saumya Rai and Rohan Parkdale.[6] He was the only skipper to lead both of his students to the Grand finale, in which Rohan and Saumya attained 2nd and 3rd runner up positions respectively. ; Raghav Juyal: Raghav then choreographed for Zee TV's show Dance Ke Superkids as the Captain of DID Li'l Masters (season 2) team Yahoo and competed against DID Li'l Masters (season 1) team Wakao – with Dharmesh Yelande as the Captain.[7] In the Grand Finale, his team was declared the winner.
knowledge1: John Forbes Nash Jr. // John Forbes Nash Jr. John Forbes Nash Jr. (June 13, 1928 – May 23, 2015) was an American mathematician who made fundamental contributions to game theory, differential geometry, and the study of partial differential equations. Nash's work has provided insight into the factors that govern chance and decision-making inside complex systems found in everyday life. His theories are widely used in economics. Serving as a Senior Research Mathematician at Princeton University during the later part of his life, he shared the 1994 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Sciences with game theorists Reinhard Selten and John Harsanyi. In 2015, he also; John Forbes Nash Jr. // "The Phantom of Fine Hall" (Princeton's mathematics center), a shadowy figure who would scribble arcane equations on blackboards in the middle of the night. He is referred to in a novel set at Princeton, "The Mind-Body Problem", 1983, by Rebecca Goldstein. Sylvia Nasar's biography of Nash, "A Beautiful Mind", was published in 1998. A film by the same name was released in 2001, directed by Ron Howard with Russell Crowe playing Nash; it won four Academy Awards, including Best Picture. John Forbes Nash Jr. John Forbes Nash Jr. (June 13, 1928 – May 23, 2015) was an American mathematician who; John Forbes Nash Jr. // name starring Russell Crowe as Nash. On May 23, 2015, Nash and his wife Alicia were killed in a car crash while riding in a taxi on the New Jersey Turnpike. Nash was born on June 13, 1928, in Bluefield, West Virginia. His father, John Forbes Nash, was an electrical engineer for the Appalachian Electric Power Company. His mother, Margaret Virginia (née Martin) Nash, had been a schoolteacher before she was married. He was baptized in the Episcopal Church. He had a younger sister, Martha (born November 16, 1930). Nash attended kindergarten and public school, and he learned from books; John Forbes Nash Jr. // from the car upon impact. State police revealed that it appeared neither passenger was wearing a seatbelt at the time of the crash. At the time of his death, the 86-year-old Nash was a longtime resident of West Windsor Township, New Jersey. Following his death, obituaries appeared in scientific and popular media throughout the world. In addition to their obituary for Nash, "The New York Times" published an article containing quotes from Nash that had been assembled from media and other published sources. The quotes consisted of Nash's reflections on his life and achievements. At Princeton, Nash became known as; John Forbes Nash Jr. // the authorities. Nash received an honorary degree, Doctor of Science and Technology, from Carnegie Mellon University in 1999, an honorary degree in economics from the University of Naples Federico II on March 19, 2003, an honorary doctorate in economics from the University of Antwerp in April 2007, an honorary doctorate of science from the City University of Hong Kong on November 8, 2011, and was keynote speaker at a conference on game theory. He has also been a prolific guest speaker at a number of world-class events, such as the Warwick Economics Summit in 2005 held at the University of [sep] knowledge2: John Forbes Nash Jr.: John Forbes Nash, Jr. (June 13, 1928 – May 23, 2015), known and published as John Nash, was an American mathematician who made fundamental contributions to game theory, real algebraic geometry, differential geometry, and partial differential equations.[2][3] Nash and fellow game theorists John Harsanyi and Reinhard Selten were awarded the 1994 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economics. In 2015, he and Louis Nirenberg were awarded the Abel Prize for their contributions to the field of partial differential equations. ; John Forbes Nash Jr.: John Forbes Nash Jr. was born on June 13, 1928, in Bluefield, West Virginia. His father and namesake, John Forbes Nash Sr., was an electrical engineer for the Appalachian Electric Power Company. His mother, Margaret Virginia (née Martin) Nash, had been a schoolteacher before she was married. He was baptized in the Episcopal Church.[8] He had a younger sister, Martha (born November 16, 1930).[9] ; John Forbes Nash Jr.: Nash attended kindergarten and public school, and he learned from books provided by his parents and grandparents.[9] Nash's parents pursued opportunities to supplement their son's education, and arranged for him to take advanced mathematics courses at a local community college (Bluefield College) during his final year of high school. He attended Carnegie Institute of Technology (which later became Carnegie Mellon University) through a full benefit of the George Westinghouse Scholarship, initially majoring in chemical engineering. He switched to a chemistry major and eventually, at the advice of his teacher John Lighton Synge, to mathematics.  After graduating in 1948, with both a B.S. and M.S. in mathematics, Nash accepted a fellowship to Princeton University, where he pursued further graduate studies in mathematics and sciences.[9] ; John Forbes Nash Jr.: Nash's adviser and former Carnegie professor Richard Duffin wrote a letter of recommendation for Nash's entrance to Princeton stating, "He is a mathematical genius."[10][11] Nash was also accepted at Harvard University. However, the chairman of the mathematics department at Princeton, Solomon Lefschetz, offered him the John S. Kennedy fellowship, convincing Nash that Princeton valued him more.[12] Further, he considered Princeton more favorably because of its proximity to his family in Bluefield.[9] At Princeton, he began work on his equilibrium theory, later known as the Nash equilibrium.[13] ; John Forbes Nash Jr.: Nash did not publish extensively, although many of his papers are considered landmarks in their fields.[14] As a graduate student at Princeton, he made foundational contributions to game theory and real algebraic geometry. As a postdoctoral fellow at MIT, Nash turned to differential geometry. Although the results of Nash's work on differential geometry are phrased in a geometrical language, the work is almost entirely to do with the mathematical analysis of partial differential equations.[15] After proving his two isometric embedding theorems, Nash turned to research dealing directly with partial differential equations, where he discovered and proved the De Giorgi–Nash theorem, thereby resolving one form of Hilbert's nineteenth problem.
knowledge1: Ezekiel Elliott // Ezekiel Elliott Ezekiel Elijah Elliott (born July 22, 1995) is an American football running back for the Dallas Cowboys of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Ohio State, where he earned second-team All-America honors in 2015. He was drafted by the Cowboys fourth overall in the 2016 NFL Draft. In his first NFL season, he led the league in rushing yards and was invited to the Pro Bowl. Elliott was born in Alton, Illinois, to a mother and father who both played collegiate athletics. His mother, the former Dawn Huff, was a high school state champion; Ezekiel Elliott // a walk-on defensive end. Karageorge received national attention when he committed suicide by a self-inflicted gunshot wound to the head. Elliott was very surprised by the death of his friend. "Our hearts dropped," he told ESPN. "It was just a hard moment for all of us. For me, personally, that was my first time losing someone that I was very close with." Ezekiel Elliott Ezekiel Elijah Elliott (born July 22, 1995) is an American football running back for the Dallas Cowboys of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football at Ohio State, where he earned second-team All-America honors; Ezekiel Elliott // in three sports before attending the University of Missouri and running track there. His father, Stacy, was a linebacker for the Missouri football team. Elliott's maternal grandfather played basketball for Drake University. Despite his athletic pedigree, Elliott attended more academically driven John Burroughs School in Ladue, Missouri, where he was a three-sport star in football, basketball, and track, and also played baseball. He played as a running back for the John Burroughs Bombers football team. As a junior in 2012, he was named the "St. Louis Post-Dispatch" offensive player of the year after rushing for 1,802 yards and 34 touchdowns; Ezekiel Elliott // the 100-meter dash, 22.05 seconds in the 200-meter dash, 13.77 seconds in the 110m hurdles and 37.52 seconds in the 300m hurdles. He was named the Gatorade Track Athlete of the Year in the state of Missouri. Considered a four-star recruit by Scout.com, Elliott was listed as the No. 9 running back in the nation in 2013. He played in the 2013 U.S. Army All-American Bowl. Despite overwhelming support and pressure for Elliott to sign with his parents' alma mater, the University of Missouri, he decided to sign with Ohio State University. As a true freshman at Ohio State University; Ezekiel Elliott // of size, athleticism, pass-catching and blocking skills", and that he "should still come out of the gates as one of the most productive young running backs in the league". Elliott was selected in the first round with the fourth overall pick by the Dallas Cowboys in the 2016 NFL Draft on April 28, 2016. He was the first running back selected in the draft that year. He was widely regarded as an early favorite for the 2016 Offensive Rookie of the Year while playing behind what many agreed upon as the NFL's most dominant offensive line leading up to the [sep] knowledge2: Ezekiel Elliott: Ezekiel Elijah Elliott (born July 22, 1995), nicknamed "Zeke", is an American football running back for the New England Patriots of the National Football League (NFL). He played college football for the Ohio State Buckeyes, earning second-team All-American honors in 2015. Elliott was selected by the Dallas Cowboys fourth overall in the 2016 NFL Draft. In seven seasons with the Cowboys, he was a three-time Pro Bowl and two-time All-Pro selection, and led the league in rushing yards in 2016 and 2018. ; Ezekiel Elliott: Elliott was born in Alton, Illinois, to a mother and father who were both athletes in college.[1] His mother, the former Dawn Huff, was a high school state champion in three sports before attending the University of Missouri and running track there.[2][3] His father, Stacy, was a linebacker for the Missouri football team and CEO of Fifth Down Enterprises.[4] Elliott's maternal grandfather played basketball for Drake University.[2] His uncle is Finnish professional basketball player Shawn Huff.[5] ; Ezekiel Elliott: Despite his athletic pedigree, Elliott attended more academically driven John Burroughs School in Ladue, Missouri,[6][7] where he was a three-sport star in football, basketball, and track and field. He also played baseball.[7] He played as a running back for the John Burroughs Bombers football team. As a junior in 2012, he was named the St. Louis Post-Dispatch offensive player of the year after rushing for 1,802 yards and 34 touchdowns and receiving 23 passes for 401 yards and six scores. In his senior year, he had 3,061 all-purpose yards and 50 total touchdowns, including 2,155 rushing yards and 40 rushing touchdowns.[8] He led the football team to three straight championship games, but lost all three.[7] ; Ezekiel Elliott: As a true freshman at Ohio State University in 2013, Elliott rushed for 262 yards on 30 carries with two touchdowns as a backup to starter Carlos Hyde, mostly playing as a gunner on special teams.[7][12][13] ; Ezekiel Elliott: In 2014, with the departure of Hyde to the NFL, Elliott took over as the starter for the Buckeyes.[14][15] During the season, Elliott was named to the Academic All-Big Ten Conference team.[16] Elliott rushed over 100 yards six times during the scheduled season.[17] In the 2014 Big Ten Championship Game against the Wisconsin Badgers, Elliott ran for 220 yards on 20 carries for two touchdowns. This win qualified Ohio State for the first-ever College Football Playoff. In the 2015 Sugar Bowl against #1 Alabama, Elliott ran for 230 yards on 20 carries in a hard-fought 42–35 win where he was named the Offensive Player of the Game, including an  85 yard touchdown run to seal the win.[18] He then capped the Buckeyes' championship season by rushing for 246 yards on 36 carries and scoring four touchdowns against the Oregon Ducks.[19][20] He was named the Offensive MVP of that game as well; it was the third most rushing yards ever by an Ohio State player.[21]
knowledge1: Rachel Bilson // Rachel Bilson Rachel Sarah Bilson (born August 25, 1981) is an American actress. Born to a California show business family, Bilson made her television debut in 2003, and then landed the role of Summer Roberts on the prime-time drama series "The O.C." Bilson made her movie debut in "The Last Kiss" (2006) and starred in the science-fiction-action film "Jumper" (2008). From 2011 to 2015, she starred as Dr. Zoe Hart on The CW series "Hart of Dixie". Bilson was born in Los Angeles, the daughter of Janice Stango, a sex therapist, and Danny Bilson, a writer, director, and producer. She; Rachel Bilson // parental consent. Bilson and Christensen separated in September 2017. Rachel Bilson Rachel Sarah Bilson (born August 25, 1981) is an American actress. Born to a California show business family, Bilson made her television debut in 2003, and then landed the role of Summer Roberts on the prime-time drama series "The O.C." Bilson made her movie debut in "The Last Kiss" (2006) and starred in the science-fiction-action film "Jumper" (2008). From 2011 to 2015, she starred as Dr. Zoe Hart on The CW series "Hart of Dixie". Bilson was born in Los Angeles, the daughter of Janice Stango, a sex therapist,; Rachel Bilson // College, a community college in a suburb of San Diego, but dropped out after one year, taking her father's advice to pursue a professional acting career. She then made several appearances in commercials, including advertisements for Subway restaurants, Raisin Bran and Pepto-Bismol. She made her screen acting debut in early 2003, appearing in one episode of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" and "8 Simple Rules for Dating My Teenage Daughter". Bilson was subsequently cast in "The O.C.", which debuted in August 2003. Her character, Summer Roberts, was initially intended to appear in only a few episodes, but became a series regular; Rachel Bilson // has an older brother and two younger half-sisters, Rosemary and Hattie. Her father is Jewish; her mother is Italian-American. Bilson's father comes from a show business family: her paternal grandfather is producer-director Bruce Bilson. Her great-grandfather George Bilson, born in Leeds, West Riding of Yorkshire, UK, worked for RKO Pictures, where he headed the movie trailer department, and her great-grandmother Hattie Bilson was a screenwriter whose credits include "Pal, Canine Detective" (1950). Bilson's classmates at Notre Dame High School in Sherman Oaks, California included actress Kirsten Dunst, actor Rami Malek, and "American Idol" runner-up singer Katharine McPhee. Bilson attended Grossmont; Rachel Bilson // when her home was burglarized in May 2009. Bilson's fashions and sense of style made her the unwitting target of the Bling Ring, who burglarized her home on several occasions. In 2011, Bilson collaborated with her personal stylist Nicole Chavez, and shoe industry leader Steve Madden, to launch the footwear destination, ShoeMint, an "online customized shoe shopping experience". In 2013, Bilson designed a shirt for Invisible Children. Bilson and Adam Brody, her co-star on "The O.C.", dated for three years. After she and Brody broke up, Bilson began a relationship with actor Hayden Christensen, with whom she co-starred on the [sep] knowledge2: Rachel Bilson: Rachel Sarah Bilson (born August 25, 1981)[2] is an American actress. Born to a Californian show-business family, Bilson made her television debut in 2003, and then landed the role of Summer Roberts on the prime-time drama series The O.C. Bilson made her movie debut in The Last Kiss (2006) and starred in the science-fiction-action film Jumper (2008) with her then-boyfriend Hayden Christensen. From 2011 to 2015, she starred as Zoe Hart on The CW series Hart of Dixie. ; Rachel Bilson: Bilson was born in Los Angeles,[2] the daughter of Janice Stango, a therapist,[3][4] and Danny Bilson, a writer, director, and producer.[2] She has an older brother[citation needed] and two younger[5] half-sisters, Rosemary and Hattie.[6] Her mother is an Italian-American who was raised Catholic, and her father is Jewish; she has said that she grew up in a "Chrismukkah household".[7][8] ; Rachel Bilson: Bilson's father comes from a show business family; he is the son of Mona (Weichman) (1933-2023) and producer-director Bruce Bilson (b. 1928).[9] Her British great-grandfather, George Bilson (1902–1981), who was born into an Ashkenazi Jewish immigrant family in Leeds, England, worked for RKO Pictures after immigrating to the United States,[3] heading the movie trailer department,[6] and her great-grandmother, Hattie Bilson (1907–2004), was a screenwriter[6] whose credits included Pal, Canine Detective (1950). ; Rachel Bilson: Bilson attended Grossmont College, a community college in a suburb of San Diego, taking her father's advice to pursue a professional acting career.[9] She then made several appearances in commercials, including advertisements for Subway restaurants, Raisin Bran, and Pepto-Bismol.[9] ; Rachel Bilson: She made her screen acting debut in early 2003, appearing in one episode of Buffy the Vampire Slayer and 8 Simple Rules for Dating My Teenage Daughter. Bilson was subsequently cast in The O.C., which debuted in August 2003. Her character, Summer Roberts, was initially intended to appear in only a few episodes but became a series regular after a successful run, as Bilson's on-screen romance with Seth Cohen (Adam Brody) became a noted aspect of the series.[10]
knowledge1: Susan Sarandon // Susan Sarandon Susan Abigail Tomalin, better known as Susan Sarandon (born October 4, 1946) is an American actress and activist. She has received an Academy Award, a British Academy Film Award, and a Screen Actors Guild Award, and has been nominated for six Primetime Emmy Awards and nine Golden Globe Awards. She is known for her social and political activism for a variety of causes. She was appointed a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador in 1999 and received the Action Against Hunger Humanitarian Award in 2006. Sarandon began her career in the 1970 film "Joe", before appearing in the soap opera "A; Susan Sarandon // a pre-emptive strike. Prior to a 2003 protest sponsored by the United for Peace and Justice coalition, she said that many Americans "do not want to risk their children or the children of Iraq". Sarandon was one of the first to appear in a series of political ads sponsored by TrueMajority, an organization established by Ben & Jerry's Ice Cream founder Ben Cohen. Along with anti-war activist Cindy Sheehan, Sarandon took part in a 2006 Mother's Day protest, which was sponsored by Code Pink. In January 2007, she appeared with Robbins and Jane Fonda at an anti-war rally in Washington,; Susan Sarandon // received the Lifetime Achievement Award at the 2009 Stockholm International Film Festival, was inducted into the New Jersey Hall of Fame in 2010, and received the Outstanding Artistic Life Award for her Outstanding Contribution to World Cinema at the 2011 Shanghai International Film Festival. In 2013, she was invited to inaugurate the 44th International Film Festival of India (IFFI) in Goa. In 2015, Sarandon received the Goldene Kamera international lifetime achievement award. Susan Sarandon Susan Abigail Tomalin, better known as Susan Sarandon (born October 4, 1946) is an American actress and activist. She has received an Academy Award, a British; Susan Sarandon // 1999, she was appointed UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador. In that capacity, she has actively supported the organization's global advocacy, as well as the work of the Canadian UNICEF Committee. In 2006, she was one of eight women selected to carry in the Olympic flag at the Opening Ceremony of the 2006 Olympic Winter Games, in Turin, Italy. The same year, Sarandon received the Action Against Hunger Humanitarian Award. Sarandon was appointed an FAO Goodwill Ambassador in 2010. Sarandon and Robbins both took an early stance against the 2003 invasion of Iraq, with Sarandon stating that she was firmly against war as; Susan Sarandon // Globe Awards and participated in a rally against gun violence in June 2018. On June 28, 2018, Sarandon was arrested during the Women Disobey protests, along with 575 other people, for protesting at the Hart Senate Office Building where a sit-in was being held against Donald Trump's migrant separation policy. While in college, Susan Tomalin met fellow student Chris Sarandon and the couple married on September 16, 1967. They divorced in 1979, but she retained the surname Sarandon as her stage name. She was then involved romantically with director Louis Malle, musician David Bowie and, briefly, actor Sean Penn. In [sep] knowledge2: Susan Sarandon: Susan Abigail Sarandon (/səˈrændən/; née Tomalin; born October 4, 1946)[1] is an American actor.[2] She is the recipient of various accolades, including an Academy Award, a British Academy Film Award, and a Screen Actors Guild Award, in addition to nominations for a Daytime Emmy Award, six Primetime Emmy Awards, and nine Golden Globe Awards. In 2002, she was honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. ; Susan Sarandon: Sarandon began her acting career in the drama film Joe (1970), the soap opera A World Apart (1970–1971), and the television film F. Scott Fitzgerald and 'The Last of the Belles' (1974). She gained prominence for her role as Janet Weiss in the cult classic musical comedy horror film The Rocky Horror Picture Show (1975). Sarandon went on to receive the Academy Award for Best Actress for Dead Man Walking (1995). Her other Oscar-nominated roles were in Atlantic City (1980), Thelma & Louise (1991), Lorenzo's Oil (1992), and The Client (1994). Her other notable films include Pretty Baby (1978), The Hunger (1983), The Witches of Eastwick (1987), Bull Durham (1988), Little Women (1994), James and the Giant Peach (1996), Stepmom (1998), Enchanted (2007), Speed Racer (2008), The Lovely Bones (2009), Cloud Atlas (2012), The Meddler (2015), and Blue Beetle (2023). ; Susan Sarandon: Sarandon made her Broadway debut in the play An Evening with Richard Nixon (1972) and went on to receive Drama Desk Award nominations for the off-Broadway plays A Coupla White Chicks Sitting Around Talking (1979) and Extremities (1982). She returned to Broadway in the 2009 revival of Exit the King, and to off-Broadway in the 2019 play Happy Talk. On television, she is a six-time Primetime Emmy Award nominee, including for her guest roles on the sitcoms Friends (2001) and Malcolm in the Middle (2002) as well as her portrayals of Janet Good in the HBO film You Don't Know Jack (2010), Doris Duke in the HBO film Bernard and Doris (2008), and Bette Davis in the FX miniseries Feud (2017). ; Susan Sarandon: Also known for her social and political activism, Sarandon was appointed a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador in 1999 and received the Action Against Hunger Humanitarian Award in 2006. ; Susan Sarandon: Sarandon was born in Jackson Heights, Queens in New York City.[3] She is the eldest of nine children of Lenora Marie (née Criscione 1923–2020)[4][5] and Phillip Leslie Tomalin, an advertising executive, television producer, and one-time nightclub singer. She has four brothers: Phillip Leslie Jr., Terry (an outdoorsman, journalist, and community leader), Timothy, and O'Brian (owner of Building 8 Brewery in Northampton, Mass.); and four sisters: Meredith (or "Merry"), Bonnie Priscilla, Amanda, and Melissa (or "Missy").[6][7] Her father was of English, Irish, and Welsh ancestry.[8] His English ancestors came from Hackney in London and his Welsh ancestors from Bridgend. On her mother's side, she is of Italian descent, with ancestors from the regions of Tuscany and Sicily.[6][9][10] Her father worked for WOR-TV in New York City.[11]
knowledge1: Liam Neeson // Liam Neeson Liam John Neeson, (born 7 June 1952) is an actor from Northern Ireland with dual British and American citizenship. In 1976, he joined the Lyric Players' Theatre in Belfast for two years. He then acted in the Arthurian film, "Excalibur" (1981). Between 1982 and 1987, Neeson starred in five films, most notably alongside Mel Gibson and Anthony Hopkins in "The Bounty" (1984), and Robert De Niro and Jeremy Irons in "The Mission" (1986). He landed a leading role alongside Patrick Swayze in "Next of Kin" (1989). Neeson rose to prominence when he starred in the title role in; Liam Neeson // by Queen's University, Belfast. On 9 April 2016, he was honoured with the Outstanding Contribution to Cinema Award by the Irish Film and Television Academy (IFTA) at the Mansion House, Dublin, with Irish President Michael D. Higgins presenting the award. In 2017, Neeson was listed by UK-based company Richtopia at number 74 in the list of 200 Most Influential Philanthropists and Social Entrepreneurs Worldwide. Liam Neeson Liam John Neeson, (born 7 June 1952) is an actor from Northern Ireland with dual British and American citizenship. In 1976, he joined the Lyric Players' Theatre in Belfast for two years. He then; Liam Neeson // number of awards, including an Academy Award for Best Actor, a BAFTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role, and three Golden Globe Awards for Best Actor in a Motion Picture Drama. "Empire" magazine ranked Neeson among both the "100 Sexiest Stars in Film History" and "The Top 100 Movie Stars of All Time". Neeson was born in Ballymena, County Antrim, Northern Ireland, the son of Katherine "Kitty" Neeson (née Brown), a cook, and Bernard "Barney" Neeson, a caretaker at the Ballymena Boys All Saints Primary School. Raised as a Roman Catholic, he was named Liam after the local; Liam Neeson // Polenin. He was also on the cast of Martin Scorsese's "Gangs of New York" with Leonardo DiCaprio, Brendan Gleeson, Cameron Diaz and Daniel Day-Lewis, and played a recently widowed writer in Richard Curtis' ensemble comedy "Love Actually" (2003). His role as Alfred Kinsey in "Kinsey" again put the actor up for nomination for a Golden Globe Award, but he lost to Leonardo DiCaprio for "The Aviator". In 2004, Neeson hosted an episode of the NBC sketch show "Saturday Night Live". He starred as a redneck trucker, Marlon Weaver, in an "Appalachian Emergency Room" sketch and a hippie in a one-off; Liam Neeson // 2009, Neeson said that he had been naturalised as a United States citizen. In March 2011, he was appointed a Goodwill Ambassador for UNICEF. Neeson is a patron of Belfast-based charity and film festival CineMagic, which encourages and helps young people to get involved in the movie industry. In 2009, nearly four decades after he was an undergraduate in Physics and Computer Science at Queen's University, Belfast, Neeson was awarded an honorary doctorate. He was a student at the university in 1971, before leaving to work for Guinness. His honorary doctorate was presented to him, in New York, by Vice-Chancellor [sep] knowledge2: Liam Neeson: William John Neeson OBE (born 7 June 1952) is an actor from Northern Ireland.[3] He has received several accolades, including nominations for an Academy Award, a BAFTA Award, three Golden Globe Awards, and two Tony Awards. In 2020, he was placed seventh on The Irish Times list of Ireland's 50 Greatest Film Actors.[4] Neeson was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in 2000.[5] ; Liam Neeson: In 1976, Neeson joined the Lyric Players' Theatre in Belfast for two years. His early film roles include Excalibur (1981), The Bounty (1984), The Mission (1986), The Dead Pool (1988), and Husbands and Wives (1992). He rose to prominence portraying Oskar Schindler in Steven Spielberg's holocaust drama Schindler's List (1993) for which he earned an Academy Award for Best Actor nomination. He followed by starring in Nell (1994), Rob Roy (1995), Michael Collins (1996), and Les Misérables (1998). He took blockbuster roles portraying Qui-Gon Jinn in George Lucas' space opera Star Wars: Episode I – The Phantom Menace (1999), Ra's al Ghul in Batman Begins (2005) and Aslan in  The Chronicles of Narnia trilogy (2005–2010). He also starred in Martin Scorsese's Gangs of New York (2002), the romantic comedy Love Actually (2003), and the drama Kinsey (2004). ; Liam Neeson: Beginning in 2009, Neeson cemented himself as an action star with the action thriller series Taken (2008–2014), The A-Team (2010), The Grey (2011), Wrath of the Titans (2012), and A Walk Among the Tombstones (2014). He is known for his collaborations in the genre with director Jaume Collet-Serra, and starred in four of his films: Unknown (2011), Non-Stop (2014), Run All Night (2015), and The Commuter (2018). He also starred in Martin Scorsese's religious epic Silence (2016), the fantasy drama A Monster Calls (2016), Steve McQueen's heist drama Widows (2018), the Coen brothers' western The Ballad of Buster Scruggs (2018), and the romantic drama Ordinary Love (2019). ; Liam Neeson: Neeson is also known for his work on stage. He made his Broadway debut in 1993 with his performance as Matt Burke in the revival of Eugene O'Neill's Anna Christie earning a Tony Award for Best Actor in a Play nomination. He then starred as Oscar Wilde in David Hare's The Judas Kiss in 1998. He received his second Tony Award nomination for his performance in the 2002 Broadway revival of Arthur Miller's The Crucible. ; Liam Neeson: Neeson[6] was born in Ballymena, County Antrim,[6] the son of primary school caretaker Bernard "Barney" Neeson and cook Katherine "Kitty" Neeson (née Brown).[7] His mother was born and raised in Waterford in the south-east of Ireland.[8] Brought up Catholic,[9] he was named Liam after a local priest.[10] He has three sisters, Elizabeth, Bernadette, and Rosaleen.[11] He attended St Patrick's College, Ballymena, from 1963 to 1967, and later recalled that his love of drama began there.[12]
knowledge1: Rachel Weisz // Rachel Weisz Rachel Hannah Weisz ( , ; born 7 March 1970) is a British-American actress. She began her acting career in the early 1990s, appearing in "Inspector Morse", "Scarlet and Black", and "Advocates II". She made her film debut in "Death Machine" (1994). Her first Hollywood appearance was in "Chain Reaction" (1996), opposite Keanu Reeves and Morgan Freeman. She has also worked in theatre. Her stage breakthrough was the 1994 revival of Noël Coward's play "Design for Living", which earned her the London Critics' Circle Award for the most promising newcomer. Weisz's performances also include the 1999 Donmar Warehouse; Rachel Weisz // fiction film "The Lobster". The film won Cannes Jury Prize. In 2016, she appeared in the drama film "The Light Between Oceans", with Michael Fassbender and Alicia Vikander, and portrayed Holocaust historian Deborah Lipstadt in "Denial", a film based on Lipstadt's book, and directed by Mick Jackson. In 2017, Weisz starred in the drama "My Cousin Rachel", based on Daphne du Maurier's novel, and in 2018 co-starred in a British biographical film about sailor Donald Crowhurst, "The Mercy", directed by James Marsh. Weisz's production company, LC6 Productions, released its first feature film, "Disobedience", in 2017, starring Weisz and Rachel McAdams.; Rachel Weisz // along with Alec Baldwin and Kevin Bacon. In 2009, Weisz expressed her views on Botox to "Harper's Bazaar" – "It should be banned for actors, as steroids are for sportsmen. Acting is all about expression; why would you want to iron out a frown?" During her career, she has been featured on the covers of magazines such as "insideKENT", "Vogue" and "Esquire". She serves as a muse to fashion designer Narciso Rodriguez, and was named L'Oréal's global ambassador in 2010. Weisz, a British citizen by birth, became a naturalised U.S. citizen in 2011. Rachel Weisz Rachel Hannah Weisz ( ,; Rachel Weisz // (Paul Reynolds), at the end of Glastonbury Festival. The opening scenes were filmed at the festival. Also starring as an older fellow traveller and sage was Larry (Bernard Hill). Weisz started her film career with a minor role in the 1994 film "Death Machine", but her first major role came in the 1996 film "Chain Reaction", which also starred Keanu Reeves and Morgan Freeman. While the film received mostly negative reviews–it holds a 16% rating on Rotten Tomatoes-it was a minor financial success. She next appeared as Miranda Fox in "Stealing Beauty", directed by Bernardo Bertolucci, where she was first; Rachel Weisz // Weisz grew up three subway stops away from where the film is set in London. Raised Jewish, she never fully connected to the faith. She claims she was "really disobedient" herself, and has never felt she fit in anywhere. On stage, Weisz's breakthrough role was that of Gilda in Sean Mathias's 1994 revival of Noël Coward's "Design for Living" at the Gielgud Theatre, for which she received the London Critics' Circle Award for the most promising newcomer. Her portrayal was described as "wonderful" by a contemporary review. In 1999, she played the role of Catherine in the Donmar Warehouse production [sep] knowledge2: Rachel Weisz: Rachel Hannah Weisz (/vaɪs/;[3] born 7 March 1970[note 1]) is a British actress. She has received several awards, including an Academy Award, a BAFTA Award, a Golden Globe Award, and a Laurence Olivier Award. ; Rachel Weisz: Weisz began acting in stage and television productions in the early 1990s, and made her film debut in Death Machine (1994). She won a Critics' Circle Theatre Award for her role in the 1994 revival of Noël Coward's play Design for Living, and went on to appear in the 1999 Donmar Warehouse production of Tennessee Williams' drama Suddenly, Last Summer. Her film breakthrough came with her starring role as Evelyn Carnahan in the Hollywood action films The Mummy (1999) and The Mummy Returns (2001).[6] Weisz went on to star in several films of the 2000s, including Enemy at the Gates (2001), About a Boy (2002), Runaway Jury (2003), Constantine (2005), The Fountain (2006),  The Lovely Bones (2009) and  The Whistleblower (2010). ; Rachel Weisz: For her performance as an activist in the 2005 thriller The Constant Gardener, she won the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress, and for playing Blanche DuBois in a 2009 revival of A Streetcar Named Desire, she won the Laurence Olivier Award for Best Actress. In the 2010s, Weisz continued to star in big-budget films such as the action film The Bourne Legacy (2012) and the fantasy film Oz the Great and Powerful (2013) and achieved critical acclaim for her performances in the independent films The Deep Blue Sea (2011), Denial (2016), and The Favourite (2018). For her portrayal of Sarah Churchill in The Favourite, she won the BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role and received a second Academy Award nomination.[7] Weisz has since played Melina Vostokoff in the Marvel Cinematic Universe film Black Widow (2021) and starred as twin obstetricians in the thriller miniseries Dead Ringers (2023).  ; Rachel Weisz: Weisz was engaged to filmmaker Darren Aronofsky from 2005 to 2010, with whom she has a son. In 2011, she married Daniel Craig, with whom she has a daughter. She also became a US citizen.[8] ; Rachel Weisz: Weisz[1] was born on 7 March 1970 in Westminster, London, and grew up in Hampstead Garden Suburb.[9] Her father, George Weisz, was a Hungarian Jewish mechanical engineer.[10][11] Her mother, Edith Ruth (née Teich),[12] was a teacher-turned-psychotherapist originally from Vienna, Austria.[13][14] Her parents emigrated to the United Kingdom as children around 1938, prior to the outbreak of World War II, in order to escape the Nazis.[15][16][17][18] Her maternal grandfather's ancestry was Austrian Jewish; her maternal grandmother was Catholic and of Italian ancestry.[19][20][21][22][23] The scholar and social activist James Parkes helped her mother's family to leave Austria for England.[24] Weisz's mother was raised in the Catholic church and formally converted to Judaism upon marrying Weisz's father.[25][26] Weisz's maternal grandfather was Alexander Teich, a Jewish activist who had been a secretary of the World Union of Jewish Students.[27][28][29] Her younger sister Minnie Weisz is a visual artist.[30]
knowledge1: Sage Stallone // Sage Stallone Sage Moonblood Stallone (born May 5, 1976; body found July 13, 2012) was an American actor, film director, film producer, and film distributor. He was the eldest son of Sylvester Stallone. Sage Stallone was born in Los Angeles, California, the elder son of Sasha Czack and actor Sylvester Stallone. He was the brother of Seargeoh Stallone, and half-brother of Sistine, Sophia, and Scarlet Stallone. He was a nephew of actor and singer Frank Stallone, and grandson of Jackie Stallone. His stepmother was model and entrepreneur Jennifer Flavin. Stallone attended Montclair College Preparatory School in Van Nuys, California, where; Sage Stallone // the scene, but after an autopsy and toxicology tests, the Los Angeles coroner determined that Sage died of coronary artery disease caused by atherosclerosis, with no drugs detected other than an over the counter pain remedy. At the time of his death, Stallone was reportedly engaged. Stallone's funeral was held on July 21 at St. Martin of Tours Catholic Church in Los Angeles. He is interred at Westwood Village Memorial Park Cemetery. Sage Stallone Sage Moonblood Stallone (born May 5, 1976; body found July 13, 2012) was an American actor, film director, film producer, and film distributor. He was the; Sage Stallone // also appeared with his father in "Daylight" (1996). After that, he acted in lesser profile films. From 1994–1995, he attended the University of North Carolina School of the Arts to study Filmmaking. In 1996, Stallone and film editor Bob Murawski co-founded Grindhouse Releasing, a Los Angeles-based company dedicated to the restoration and preservation of exploitation films and B-movies. Stallone directed his first short film (outside of film school) "Vic", which won the 2006 Boston Film Festival "Best New Filmmaker" award. His last projects were appearances in Vincent Gallo's last two films, "Promises Written in Water" and "The Agent". Both films; Sage Stallone // were shown in main competition at the 2010 Venice Film Festival and in the Toronto International Film Festival. A photograph of Stallone as a young child beside his father appears in the 2015 "Creed", where it is stated that his character, Robert Balboa Jr., has since moved away to Vancouver. Stallone was found dead on July 13, 2012 at his home in Studio City, Los Angeles. According to reports, he had not been heard from for four days prior to his death and died between three and seven days prior to being found. Empty prescription drug bottles were found at; Sage Stallone // he graduated in 1993. He later studied filmmaking at North Carolina School of the Arts for one year. As a child, Stallone made a guest appearance on "Gorgeous Ladies of Wrestling", brought by his grandmother Jackie Stallone, who promoted the series. Stallone made his acting debut alongside his father in "Rocky V" (1990), the fifth installment of the "Rocky" franchise, playing Robert Balboa Jr., the onscreen son of his father's title character. He did not, however, reprise the same role in "Rocky Balboa", the sixth installment of the "Rocky" films as he was working on his own film "Vic". He [sep] knowledge2: Sage Stallone: Sage Moonblood Stallone (May 5, 1976 – July 13, 2012) was an American actor. He was the eldest child of actor Sylvester Stallone.[1][2][3] ; Sage Stallone: Sage Stallone was born in Los Angeles, California, the elder son and first child of Sasha Czack and actor Sylvester Stallone. He was the brother of Seargeoh "Seth" Stallone, and half-brother of Sophia, Sistine, and Scarlet Stallone. He was the nephew of actor and singer Frank Stallone, and grandson of Jackie Stallone. His stepmother was the model and entrepreneur Jennifer Flavin. ; Sage Stallone: Stallone graduated from Montclair College Preparatory School in Van Nuys, California, in 1993, and then studied filmmaking for a year at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts.[4] ; Sage Stallone: As a child, Stallone made a guest appearance on Gorgeous Ladies of Wrestling, a series that was promoted by his grandmother, Jackie Stallone.[5] ; Sage Stallone: Stallone made his acting debut alongside his father Sylvester Stallone in Rocky V (1990), the fifth installment of the Rocky franchise, playing Robert Balboa Jr., the onscreen son of his father's title character. He also appeared with his father in Daylight (1996).[6]
knowledge1: Alfred Hitchcock // Alfred Hitchcock Sir Alfred Joseph Hitchcock (13 August 1899 – 29 April 1980) was an English film director and producer, widely regarded as one of the most influential filmmakers in the history of cinema. Known as "the Master of Suspense", he directed over 50 feature films in a career spanning six decades, becoming as well known as any of his actors thanks to his many interviews, his cameo roles in most of his films, and his hosting and producing of the television anthology "Alfred Hitchcock Presents" (1955–1965). Born in Leytonstone, Essex, Hitchcock entered the film industry in 1919 as a; Alfred Hitchcock // preservation by the United States National Film Registry: "Shadow of a Doubt" (1943), "Notorious" (1946), "Rear Window" (1954), "Vertigo" (1958), "North by Northwest" (1959), "Psycho" (1960), and "The Birds" (1963). In 2012 Hitchcock was selected by artist Sir Peter Blake, author of the Beatles' "Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band" album cover, to appear in a new version of the cover, along with other British cultural figures, and he was featured that year in a BBC Radio 4 series, "The New Elizabethans", as someone "whose actions during the reign of Elizabeth II have had a significant impact on lives in; Alfred Hitchcock // AFI Life Achievement Award in 1979 and was knighted in December that year, four months before he died. Hitchcock was born in the flat above his parents' leased grocer's shop at 517 High Road, Leytonstone, on the outskirts of east London (then part of Essex), the youngest of three children: William (born 1890), Ellen Kathleen ("Nellie") (1892), and Alfred Joseph (1899). His parents, Emma Jane Hitchcock, née Whelan (1863–1942), and William Hitchcock (1862–1914), were both Roman Catholics, with partial roots in Ireland; William was a greengrocer as his father had been. There was a large extended family, including Uncle John [sep] knowledge2: Alfred Hitchcock: Sir Alfred Joseph Hitchcock KBE (13 August 1899 – 29 April 1980) was an English film director, screenwriter, producer and editor. He is widely regarded as one of the most influential figures in the history of cinema.[1] In a career spanning six decades, he directed over 50 feature films,[a] many of which are still widely watched and studied today. Known as the "Master of Suspense", he became as well known as any of his actors thanks to his many interviews, his cameo roles in most of his films, and his hosting and producing the television anthology Alfred Hitchcock Presents (1955–65). His films garnered 46 Academy Award nominations, including six wins, although he never won the award for Best Director, despite five nominations. ; Alfred Hitchcock: Hitchcock initially trained as a technical clerk and copywriter before entering the film industry in 1919 as a title card designer. His directorial debut was the British-German silent film The Pleasure Garden (1925). His first successful film, The Lodger: A Story of the London Fog (1927), helped to shape the thriller genre, and Blackmail (1929) was the first British "talkie".[4] His thrillers The 39 Steps (1935) and The Lady Vanishes (1938) are ranked among the greatest British films of the 20th century. By 1939, he had international recognition and producer David O. Selznick persuaded him to move to Hollywood. A string of successful films followed, including Rebecca (1940), Foreign Correspondent (1940), Suspicion (1941), Shadow of a Doubt (1943) and Notorious (1946). Rebecca won the Academy Award for Best Picture, with Hitchcock nominated as Best Director.[5] He also received Oscar nominations for Lifeboat (1944), Spellbound (1945), Rear Window (1954) and Psycho (1960).[6] ; Alfred Hitchcock: Hitchcock's other notable films include Rope (1948), Strangers on a Train (1951), Dial M for Murder (1954), To Catch a Thief (1955), The Trouble with Harry (1955),  Vertigo (1958), North by Northwest (1959), The Birds (1963) and  Marnie (1964), all of which were also financially successful and are highly regarded by film historians. Hitchcock made multiple films with some of the biggest stars in Hollywood, including four with Cary Grant, four with James Stewart, three with Ingrid Bergman and three consecutively with Grace Kelly. Hitchcock became an American citizen in 1955. ; Alfred Hitchcock: In 2012, Hitchcock's psychological thriller Vertigo, starring Stewart, displaced Orson Welles' Citizen Kane (1941) as the British Film Institute's greatest film ever made based on its world-wide poll of hundreds of film critics.[7] As of 2021[update], nine of his films had been selected for preservation in the United States National Film Registry,[b] including his personal favourite, Shadow of a Doubt (1943).[c] He received the BAFTA Fellowship in 1971, the AFI Life Achievement Award in 1979, and was knighted in December of that year, four months before his death on 29 April 1980.[10] ; Alfred Hitchcock: Alfred Joseph Hitchcock was born on 13 August 1899 in the flat above his parents' leased greengrocer's shop at 517 High Road in Leytonstone, which was then part of Essex (now on the outskirts of East London). He was the son of Emma Jane (née Whelan; 1863–1942) and William Edgar Hitchcock (1862–1914), and had an older brother named William Daniel (1890–1943) and an older sister named Ellen Kathleen (1892–1979) who used the nickname "Nellie". His parents were both Roman Catholics with partial Irish ancestry.[11][12] His father was a greengrocer, as his grandfather had been.[13] There was a large extended family, including uncle John Hitchcock with his five-bedroom Victorian house on Campion Road in Putney, complete with a maid, cook, chauffeur, and gardener. Every summer, his uncle rented a seaside house for the family in Cliftonville. Hitchcock said that he first became class-conscious there, noticing the differences between tourists and locals.[14]
knowledge1: Bobby Fischer // allowing him to live in Iceland until his death in 2008. Fischer made numerous lasting contributions to chess. In the 1990s, he patented a modified chess timing system that added a time increment after each move, now a standard practice in top tournament and match play. He also invented Fischerandom, a new variant of chess known today as "Chess960". Bobby Fischer was born at Michael Reese Hospital in Chicago, Illinois, on March 9, 1943. His birth certificate listed his father as Hans-Gerhardt Fischer, also known as Gerardo Liebscher, a German biophysicist. His mother, Regina Wender Fischer, was a US citizen,; Bobby Fischer // Fischer released his first book of collected games: "Bobby Fischer's Games of Chess", published by Simon & Schuster. Fischer's interest in chess became more important than schoolwork, to the point that "by the time he reached the fourth grade, he'd been in and out of six schools." In 1952, Regina got Bobby a scholarship (based on his chess talent and "astronomically high IQ") to Brooklyn Community Woodward. Fischer later attended Erasmus Hall High School at the same time as Barbra Streisand and Neil Diamond. In 1959, its student council awarded him a gold medal for his chess achievements. The same [sep] knowledge2: Bobby Fischer: Fischer made numerous antisemitic statements, including Holocaust denial. His antisemitism was a major theme in his public and private remarks, and there has been widespread comment and speculation concerning his psychological condition based on his extreme views and eccentric behavior. ; Bobby Fischer: Bobby Fischer was born at Michael Reese Hospital in Chicago, Illinois, on March 9, 1943.[2] His mother, Regina Wender Fischer, was a US citizen,[3][4] born in Switzerland; her parents were Polish Jews.[5][6] Raised in St. Louis, Missouri,[2] Regina became a teacher, a registered nurse, and later a physician.[7] ; Bobby Fischer: In 2002, Peter Nicholas and Clea Benson of The Philadelphia Inquirer published an investigative report which stated that Bobby Fischer's biological father was actually Paul Neményi.[15][16][13] ; Bobby Fischer: In March 1949, six-year-old Bobby and his sister Joan learned how to play chess using the instructions from a set bought at a candy store.[21] When Joan lost interest in chess and Regina did not have time to play, Fischer was left to play many of his first games against himself.[22] When the family vacationed at Patchogue, Long Island, New York, that summer, Bobby found a book of old chess games and studied it intensely.[23] ; Bobby Fischer: In June 1956, Fischer began attending the Hawthorne Chess Club, based in master John "Jack" W. Collins's home.[39] Collins taught chess to children, and has been described as Fischer's teacher,[40][41] but Collins himself suggested that he did not actually teach Fischer,[42] and the relationship might be more accurately described as one of mentorship.[43]
knowledge1: Joey Jordison // Joey Jordison Nathan Jonas "Joey" Jordison (born April 26, 1975), is an American musician, songwriter, record producer and multi-instrumentalist, best known for his work as the former drummer and co-songwriter for the American heavy metal band Slipknot as well as guitarist in the American horror punk band Murderdolls. Jordison played in Slipknot since their formation in 1995 until his departure from the band in December 2013. He was the drummer and founder of the American heavy metal band Scar the Martyr which formed in 2013 and disbanded in 2016. He grew up in Waukee, Iowa with his parents and two; Joey Jordison // Hammer Golden Gods Awards. With Sinsaenum Joey Jordison Nathan Jonas "Joey" Jordison (born April 26, 1975), is an American musician, songwriter, record producer and multi-instrumentalist, best known for his work as the former drummer and co-songwriter for the American heavy metal band Slipknot as well as guitarist in the American horror punk band Murderdolls. Jordison played in Slipknot since their formation in 1995 until his departure from the band in December 2013. He was the drummer and founder of the American heavy metal band Scar the Martyr which formed in 2013 and disbanded in 2016. He grew up in Waukee,; Joey Jordison // includes performances on many albums for many different artists. Jordison uses several drum brands including Pearl and ddrum. He currently plays with the bands Vimic and Sinsaenum. Jordison was born at Mercy Hospital in Des Moines, Iowa on April 26, 1975, to Steve and Jackie Jordison. He has two younger sisters. He grew up in a rural area outside of Waukee where he used to play basketball on the street in front of his house. He embraced music at an early age, which he attributes to his parents' influence: "They always sat me down in front of the radio, rather; Joey Jordison // than the TV." He played guitar until receiving his first drum kit as a gift from his parents at age eight, and started his first band while in elementary school. Jordison's parents divorced when he was young. The children stayed with their mother. His mother remarried and set up a funeral parlor where Jordison would occasionally help. Jordison has stated that he felt a sudden responsibility to be the man of the house. During this time, he formed the band Modifidious, in which he played drums. He later described them as "total speed-metal thrash". The band helped Jordison break new; Joey Jordison // with symptoms starting in 2010, but not being diagnosed for a long time. This progressed to the loss of use of his left leg. He has recovered fully with the aid of medical help and intensive work in the gym. In 2001, Jordison worked on a remix of "The Fight Song" by Marilyn Manson. Jordison also appeared in the music video for Manson's cover of "Tainted Love." Later in the year, Manson revealed that Jordison had been working with him on his album "The Golden Age of Grotesque". Jordison had in fact worked on guitars but the track did not [sep] knowledge2: Joey Jordison: Nathan Jonas Jordison (April 26, 1975 – July 26, 2021) was an American musician. He was the original drummer and co-founder of the heavy metal band Slipknot, in which he was designated #1, and the guitarist of the horror punk supergroup Murderdolls.[1][2] ; Joey Jordison: Jordison grew up in Des Moines, Iowa, with his parents and two sisters, and was given his first drum kit at the age of 8. He performed with many bands early in his career; then in 1995, he joined a band called the Pale Ones, which would later change their name and become Slipknot. Jordison played in Slipknot since its inception, helping form the band until his departure in December of 2013. Of Slipknot's nine-member lineup, Joey was the third to join the band. He was also the drummer and founder of Scar the Martyr, which formed in 2013 and disbanded in 2016.  ; Joey Jordison: With Slipknot, Jordison performed on the band's first four studio albums, and produced the 2005 live album 9.0: Live. Outside his major projects, Jordison performed with various other acts such as Rob Zombie, Metallica, KoЯn, Ministry, Otep, and Satyricon. Jordison was also known for his session work, which included performances on various recordings for many artists. Jordison used several drum brands including Pearl, and ddrum. At the time of his death, Jordison was playing in the blackened death metal supergroup Sinsaenum. ; Joey Jordison: Jordison was born in Des Moines, Iowa, on April 26, 1975, to Steve and Jackie Jordison. He had two younger sisters.[3] He grew up in a rural area outside of Waukee where he used to play basketball on the street in front of his house. He embraced music at an early age, which he attributes to his parents' influence: "They always sat me down in front of the radio, rather than the TV."[3] He played guitar until receiving his first drum kit as a gift from his parents at age eight, and started his first band while in elementary school.[4] ; Joey Jordison: Jordison's parents divorced when he was young. The children stayed with their mother.[5] His mother remarried and set up a funeral parlor where Jordison would occasionally help. Jordison stated that he felt a sudden responsibility to be the man of the house. During this time, he formed the band Modifidious, in which he played drums. He later described them as "total speed-metal thrash".[6] The band helped Jordison break new ground, playing live as support to local bands including Atomic Opera, featuring Jim Root, and Heads on the Wall, featuring Shawn Crahan.[7] He also played at a bowling center his family owned call Bowlerama, on a night called "Rock 'n' Roll Bowl".[8] After a multitude of lineup changes—including Craig Jones and Josh Brainard, who would reappear in Slipknot—the band released two demos in 1993: Visceral and Mud Fuchia.[7][9]
knowledge1: Hayden Panettiere // Hayden Panettiere Hayden Lesley Panettiere (; born August 21, 1989) is an American actress, model, singer and activist. She is known for playing cheerleader Claire Bennet on the NBC sci-fi series "Heroes" (2006–2010) and Juliette Barnes in the ABC/CMT musical-drama series "Nashville" (2012–2018). A native of New York, she first appeared in a commercial at the age of 11 months. She started a full-time acting career began by playing Sarah Roberts on "One Life to Live" (1994–1997) and Lizzie Spaulding on "Guiding Light" (1996–2000), and then played Sheryl Yoast in the Disney feature film "Remember the Titans" at 10 years; Hayden Panettiere // whose mission is to prevent teen pregnancy. On May 6, 2009, she participated in a town hall meeting in New York City alongside Bristol Palin and Major League Baseball pitcher Matt Garza on the issue of teen pregnancy. On December 6, 2013, Panettiere and her then-fiancé Wladimir Klitschko visited the Euromaidan-protests in Kiev, Ukraine. Wladimir's brother Vitali was one of the leading figures of these protests. She and her then-fiancé addressed the crowds. Hayden Panettiere Hayden Lesley Panettiere (; born August 21, 1989) is an American actress, model, singer and activist. She is known for playing cheerleader Claire Bennet on; Hayden Panettiere // Friends of RMHC. On October 31, 2007, Panettiere joined with The Whaleman Foundation to try to disrupt the annual dolphin hunt in Taiji, Wakayama, Japan. She was involved in a confrontation between Japanese fishermen and five other surfers of the group from Australia and the United States (including former "Home and Away" star Isabel Lucas). The confrontation lasted more than 10 minutes before the surfers were forced to return to the beach, after which they left the country. Parts of the confrontation can be seen on the award-winning Sundance Film Festival documentary film "The Cove". The fishermen consider the condemnation; Hayden Panettiere // 2008, Panettiere launched her own line of calfskin leather bags for the company Dooney & Bourke. In October, she delved into the presidential election, releasing a satirical public service announcement through the website Funny or Die. In this video, Panettiere mocked Republican candidate John McCain for his age and temper. She subsequently made clear her intention to vote for Barack Obama and urged other young people to vote. Panettiere also appeared in a public service announcement with DC Shadow Senator Paul Strauss endorsing voting rights for the District of Columbia. She is also a teen ambassador for the Candie's Foundation,; Hayden Panettiere // designed limited edition hand bags for Dooney & Bourke and modeled their bags in magazine ads In 2009, Panettiere was one of the celebrities featured in the coffee table book "Room 23", produced by Diana Jenkins and photographed by Deborah Anderson. Panettiere dated her "Heroes" co-star Milo Ventimiglia from December 2007 to February 2009. She met then-world heavyweight boxing champion Wladimir Klitschko in 2009 at the book launch party for mutual acquaintance Diana Jenkins' "Room 23" (both appeared in the book), and they soon began dating. Panettiere was ringside for Klitschko's knockout victory over Samuel Peter on September 11, 2010. [sep] knowledge2: Hayden Panettiere: Hayden Lesley Panettiere (/ˌpænətiˈɛər/;[3] born August 21, 1989[4]) is an American actress and singer. She is best known for her lead roles as Claire Bennet on the NBC superhero series Heroes (2006–2010) and Juliette Barnes in the ABC/CMT musical drama series Nashville (2012–2018), the latter of which earned her two nominations for the Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actress – Series, Miniseries or Television Film.[5] She also appears in the slasher horror franchise Scream, portraying Kirby Reed. ; Hayden Panettiere: A native of Palisades, New York, she first appeared on-screen in a commercial in 1990 at only 11 months old. Her full-time acting career began in 1994 when playing Sarah Roberts on the long-running ABC soap opera series One Life to Live until 1997. She then went on to play Lizzie Spaulding on one of CBS's own soaps, Guiding Light from 1996 until 2000. For her work on Pixar film A Bug's Life (1998), she was nominated for a Young Artist Award and a Grammy Award, making her the 5th youngest artist ever to be nominated for a Grammy. Panettiere has also starred in the Disney football drama film Remember the Titans (2000), the final season of the Fox legal comedy-drama series Ally McBeal  (2002), the comedy-drama film Raising Helen (2004), the Disney Channel original patriotic film Tiger Cruise (2004), the horse racing comedy film Racing Stripes (2005), the figure skating drama film Ice Princess (2005), the teen cheerleading film Bring It On: All or Nothing (2006), the romantic comedy film I Love You, Beth Cooper (2009), the true crime drama film Amanda Knox: Murder on Trial in Italy (2011), and the drama film Custody (2016). She voiced Kairi and Xion in the video game series Kingdom Hearts (2002–2017), and Samantha "Sam" Giddings in the video game Until Dawn (2015). ; Hayden Panettiere: Panettiere was born and partly raised in Palisades, New York. She is the daughter of Lesley R. Vogel, a former soap opera actress, and Alan Lee "Skip" Panettiere, a captain in the Fire Department of New York City. She is of Italian descent. She had one younger brother, fellow actor Jansen Panettiere, whose life was taken by complications from Enlarged Heart Syndrome in 2023. (He was 28 years old.)[6][7][8][9] Her mother's family lives in Indiana.[10][11] ; Hayden Panettiere: After Panettiere attended South Orangetown Middle School in New York, she was homeschooled[12] and had private tutors from grade nine to the completion of high school to accommodate her acting schedule. ; Hayden Panettiere: Panettiere first appeared in commercials at the age of eleven months, beginning with an advertisement for a Playskool toy train.[13] She landed a role as Sarah Roberts on the ABC soap opera One Life to Live from 1994 to 1997, which was followed by Lizzie Spaulding on the CBS soap opera Guiding Light in 1996, and again from 1997 to 2000. While on Guiding Light, Panettiere's character Lizzie battled leukemia. The Leukemia & Lymphoma Society gave her its Special Recognition Award for drawing the attention of daytime viewers to the disease, and for improving national awareness.
knowledge1: Matthew Perry // Matthew Perry Matthew Langford Perry (born August 19, 1969) is a Canadian-American actor, comedian and playwright who gained worldwide recognition for his role as Chandler Bing on the NBC television sitcom "Friends". Along with starring in the short-lived television series "Studio 60 on the Sunset Strip", Perry has appeared in a number of films, including "Fools Rush In" (1997), "The Whole Nine Yards" (2000), and "17 Again" (2009). In 2010, he expanded his résumé to include both video games and voiceover work when he voiced Benny in the video game "". Perry was the co-creator, co-writer, executive producer, and star; Matthew Perry // spent 3 months recovering in hospital, suggesting the surgery took place in June 2018. Matthew Perry Matthew Langford Perry (born August 19, 1969) is a Canadian-American actor, comedian and playwright who gained worldwide recognition for his role as Chandler Bing on the NBC television sitcom "Friends". Along with starring in the short-lived television series "Studio 60 on the Sunset Strip", Perry has appeared in a number of films, including "Fools Rush In" (1997), "The Whole Nine Yards" (2000), and "17 Again" (2009). In 2010, he expanded his résumé to include both video games and voiceover work when he voiced Benny [sep] knowledge2: Matthew Perry: Matthew Langford Perry (August 19, 1969 – October 28, 2023) was an American and Canadian  actor. He gained fame for starring as Chandler Bing on the NBC television sitcom Friends (1994–2004). Perry also appeared on Ally McBeal (2002) and received Primetime Emmy Award nominations for his performances in The West Wing (2003) and The Ron Clark Story (2006). He played a leading role in the NBC series Studio 60 on the Sunset Strip (2006–2007). He also became known for his leading film roles in Fools Rush In (1997), Almost Heroes (1998), Three to Tango (1999), The Whole Nine Yards (2000), Serving Sara (2002), The Whole Ten Yards (2004), and 17 Again (2009). ; Matthew Perry: Perry was co-creator, co-writer, executive producer, and star of the ABC sitcom Mr. Sunshine, which ran from February to April 2011. In August 2012, he starred as sportscaster Ryan King on the NBC sitcom Go On. He co-developed and starred in a revival of the CBS sitcom The Odd Couple portraying Oscar Madison from 2015 to 2017. He had recurring roles in the legal dramas The Good Wife (2012–2013), and The Good Fight (2017). Perry portrayed Ted Kennedy in The Kennedys: After Camelot (2017) and appeared as himself in his final television role, Friends: The Reunion (2021). He voiced Benny in the video game Fallout: New Vegas (2010). ; Matthew Perry: Perry's parents separated when he was one year old, and his mother married Canadian broadcast journalist Keith Morrison. He was raised by his mother mostly in Ottawa, Ontario, but he also lived briefly in Toronto and Montreal.[5] Perry attended Rockcliffe Park Public School and Ashbury College, a boarding school in Ottawa.[6][7] He had four younger maternal half-siblings—Caitlin, Emily, Will, and Madeline—as well as a younger paternal half-sister named Maria. His siblings "would stand and applaud" him for early performances.[8] ; Matthew Perry: By the time he was ten, Perry started misbehaving. He stole money, smoked, let his grades slip, and beat up fellow student and future Canadian prime minister Justin Trudeau.[7][9] Perry later attributed this to feeling like a family outsider who did not belong when his mother began having children with Morrison, writing "I was so often on the outside looking in, still that kid up in the clouds on a flight to somewhere else, unaccompanied".[8] At the age of 14, he began drinking alcohol and was drinking every day by the time he was 18.[10] Perry practiced tennis, often for 10 hours per day,[3] and became a top-ranked junior player in Canada with the possibility of a tennis career. However, at age 15, he moved from Ottawa to live with his father in Los Angeles, where competition was tougher.[3][9][11] ; Matthew Perry: At 15 years old, Perry studied acting at Buckley School, a college-preparatory school in Sherman Oaks, Los Angeles, and graduated in 1987.[12] While in high school, he took improvisational comedy classes at L.A. Connection in Sherman Oaks.[13]
knowledge1: Chris Cuomo // Chris Cuomo Christopher Charles Cuomo (; born August 9, 1970) is an American television journalist who currently works at CNN, where he presents "Cuomo Prime Time", a regular weeknight CNN show. Cuomo has previously been the ABC News chief law and justice correspondent and the co-anchor for ABC's "20/20"., and before his current show"," he was one of two co-anchors of the weekday edition of "New Day", a three-hour morning news show, until May 24, 2018. Cuomo was born in the New York City borough of Queens. He is the son of Matilda (Raffa) and Mario Cuomo, the former Governor; Chris Cuomo // about this, you're learning from us." Some legal experts contested his assertions. In 2001, Cuomo married "Gotham" magazine editor Cristina Greeven in a Roman Catholic ceremony in Southampton, New York. They reside in Manhattan with their three children. Cuomo also owns a home in Southampton, New York. Chris Cuomo Christopher Charles Cuomo (; born August 9, 1970) is an American television journalist who currently works at CNN, where he presents "Cuomo Prime Time", a regular weeknight CNN show. Cuomo has previously been the ABC News chief law and justice correspondent and the co-anchor for ABC's "20/20"., and before his current; Chris Cuomo // issues. He also served as a political policy analyst for Fox News. At ABC and as co-anchor of "20/20", his coverage included a look at heroin addiction. His year-long coverage revealed the heroin addiction affecting suburban families. His other work has included coverage of the Haiti earthquake, child custody, bullying, and homeless teens. Policy change has come after his undercover look at for-profit school recruiters, leading to an industry cleanup; and Cuomo's tip from a BMW owner led to a recall of over 150,000 affected models. From September 2006 to December 2009, he was the news anchor for "Good Morning [sep] knowledge2: Chris Cuomo: Christopher Charles Cuomo (/ˈkwoʊmoʊ/ KWOH-moh; born August 9, 1970)[1][2] is an American television journalist anchor at NewsNation, based in New York City. He has previously been the ABC News chief law and justice correspondent and the co-anchor for ABC's 20/20, news anchor for Good Morning America from 2006 to 2009,[3] and an anchor at CNN, where he co-hosted its morning show New Day from 2013 through May 2018, before moving to Cuomo Prime Time in June 2018. ; Chris Cuomo: Cuomo is the brother of Andrew Cuomo, who was the 56th governor of New York from 2011 to 2021, and the son of Mario Cuomo, who was the 52nd governor of New York from 1983 until 1994. In November 2021, Cuomo was suspended indefinitely by CNN after reports that he assisted in the defense against the sexual harassment allegations that led to his brother's resignation. He was fired by CNN the following month.[4] He subsequently joined Nexstar Media Group, hosting Cuomo for NewsNation. ; Chris Cuomo: Cuomo was born in the New York City borough of Queens. He is the youngest child of Mario Cuomo, the former governor of New York, and Matilda Cuomo (née Raffa), and the brother of Andrew Cuomo, a former governor of New York.[3] His parents were both of Italian descent; his paternal grandparents were from Nocera Inferiore and Tramonti in the Campania region of southern Italy, while his maternal grandparents were from Sicily (his grandfather from Messina).[5][6] ; Chris Cuomo: Cuomo was educated at Immaculate Conception School in Jamaica, Queens;[7] at The Albany Academy, a private university preparatory day school in Albany, New York, followed by Yale University, where he earned an undergraduate degree, and the Fordham University School of Law, where he earned his Juris Doctor in 1995. He is a licensed attorney.[8][9] ; Chris Cuomo: Cuomo's early career in journalism included appearances related to social and political issues on CNBC, MSNBC, and CNN. He was a correspondent and political policy analyst for Fox News and Fox Broadcast Network's Fox Files, where he covered a wide range of stories focusing on controversial social issues.[10] When asked if he should be considered a journalist on his show, Cuomo said, "I don't know how that's relevant. I don't care what they classify me as. I'm not forwarding my agenda. That's not my thing. My opinion is irrelevant." When hired for Fox Files Roger Ailes, the Fox News chairman, called Cuomo "fearless."[11]
knowledge1: Amelia Earhart // Amelia Earhart Amelia Mary Earhart (, born July 24, 1897; disappeared July 2, 1937) was an American aviation pioneer and author. Earhart was the first female aviator to fly solo across the Atlantic Ocean. She received the United States Distinguished Flying Cross for this accomplishment. She set many other records, wrote best-selling books about her flying experiences and was instrumental in the formation of The Ninety-Nines, an organization for female pilots. In 1935, Earhart became a visiting faculty member at Purdue University as an advisor to aeronautical engineering and a career counselor to women students. She was also a member; Amelia Earhart // of the National Woman's Party and an early supporter of the Equal Rights Amendment. During an attempt to make a circumnavigational flight of the globe in 1937 in a Purdue-funded Lockheed Model 10-E Electra, Earhart and navigator Fred Noonan disappeared over the central Pacific Ocean near Howland Island. Fascination with her life, career, and disappearance continues to this day. Earhart was the daughter of Samuel "Edwin" Stanton Earhart (1867–1930) and Amelia "Amy" (; 1869–1962). She was born in Atchison, Kansas, in the home of her maternal grandfather, Alfred Gideon Otis (1827–1912), who was a former federal judge, the president of; Amelia Earhart // the Atchison Savings Bank and a leading citizen in the town. Amelia was the second child of the marriage, after an infant was stillborn in August 1896. She was of part German descent. Alfred Otis had not initially favored the marriage and was not satisfied with Edwin's progress as a lawyer. According to family custom, Earhart was named after her two grandmothers, Amelia Josephine Harres and Mary Wells Patton. From an early age, Amelia was the ringleader while her sister Grace Muriel Earhart (1899–1998), two years her junior, acted as the dutiful follower. Amelia was nicknamed "Meeley" (sometimes "Millie") and; Amelia Earhart // tributes and honors. Earhart's life has spurred the imaginations of many writers and others; the following examples are given although many other mentions have also occurred in contemporary or current media: Earhart was a successful and heavily promoted writer who served as aviation editor for "Cosmopolitan" magazine from 1928 to 1930. She wrote magazine articles, newspaper columns, essays and published two books based upon her experiences as a flyer during her lifetime: Amelia Earhart Amelia Mary Earhart (, born July 24, 1897; disappeared July 2, 1937) was an American aviation pioneer and author. Earhart was the first female aviator to; Amelia (film) // July 2, 1937, Amelia Earhart (Hilary Swank) and her navigator, Fred Noonan (Christopher Eccleston), are on the last leg of an around-the-world flight. Moving in vignettes from her early years when Earhart was captivated by the sight of an aircraft flying overhead on the Kansas prairie where she grew up, her life over the preceding decade gradually unfolds. As a young woman, she is recruited by publishing tycoon and eventual husband, George Putnam (Richard Gere) to become the first woman to cross the Atlantic Ocean, albeit as a passenger. Taking command of the flight results in a success and she [sep] knowledge2: Amelia Earhart: Amelia Mary Earhart (/ˈɛərhɑːrt/ AIR-hart; July 24, 1897; disappeared July 2, 1937; declared dead January 5, 1939) was an American aviation pioneer and writer.[2][Note 1] Earhart was the first female aviator to fly solo across the Atlantic Ocean.[4] She set many other records,[3][Note 2] was one of the first aviators to promote commercial air travel, wrote best-selling books about her flying experiences, and was instrumental in the formation of The Ninety-Nines, an organization for female pilots.[6] ; Amelia Earhart: Born and raised in Atchison, Kansas, and later in Des Moines, Iowa, Earhart developed a passion for adventure at a young age, steadily gaining flying experience from her twenties. In 1928, Earhart became the first female passenger to cross the Atlantic by airplane (accompanying pilot Wilmer Stultz), for which she achieved celebrity status. In 1932, piloting a Lockheed Vega 5B, Earhart made a nonstop solo transatlantic flight, becoming the first woman to achieve such a feat. She received the United States Distinguished Flying Cross for this accomplishment.[7] In 1935, Earhart became a visiting faculty member at Purdue University as an advisor to aeronautical engineering and a career counselor to female students. She was also a member of the National Woman's Party and an early supporter of the Equal Rights Amendment.[8][9] Known as one of the most inspirational American figures in aviation from the late 1920s throughout the 1930s, Earhart's legacy is often compared to the early aeronautical career of pioneer aviator Charles Lindbergh, as well as to figures like First Lady Eleanor Roosevelt for their close friendship and lasting impact on the issue of women's causes from that period. ; Amelia Earhart: During an attempt at becoming the first woman to complete a circumnavigational flight of the globe in 1937 in a Purdue-funded Lockheed Model 10-E Electra, Earhart and navigator Fred Noonan disappeared over the central Pacific Ocean near Howland Island. The two were last seen in Lae, New Guinea, on July 2, 1937, on the last land stop before Howland Island and one of their final legs of the flight. It is generally presumed that she and Noonan died somewhere in the Pacific during the circumnavigation, just three weeks prior to her fortieth birthday.[10] Nearly one year and six months after she and Noonan disappeared, Earhart was officially declared dead. Investigations and significant public interest in their disappearance still continue over 80 years later.[Note 3] ; Amelia Earhart: Decades after her presumed death, Earhart was inducted into the National Aviation Hall of Fame in 1968 and the National Women's Hall of Fame in 1973. She now has several commemorative memorials named in her honor around the United States, including a commemorative US airmail stamp, an urban park, an airport, a residence hall, a museum, a research foundation, a bridge, a cargo ship, an earth-fill dam, four schools, a hotel, a playhouse, a library, multiple roads, and more. She also has a minor planet, planetary corona, and newly-discovered lunar crater named after her. She is ranked ninth on Flying's list of the 51 Heroes of Aviation.[12] ; Amelia Earhart: Earhart was born on July 24, 1897, in Atchison, Kansas, the daughter of Samuel "Edwin" Stanton Earhart (1867–1930) and Amelia "Amy" (née Otis; 1869–1962).[13] She was born in the home of her maternal grandfather, Alfred Gideon Otis (1827–1912), who was a former federal judge, the president of the Atchison Savings Bank and a leading citizen in the town. Earhart was the second child of the marriage after an infant was stillborn in August 1896.[14] She was of part German descent. Alfred Otis had not initially favored the marriage and was not satisfied with Edwin's progress as a lawyer.[15]
knowledge1: Dr. Dre // Dr. Dre Andre Romelle Young (born February 18, 1965), known professionally as Dr. Dre, is an American rapper, record producer, and entrepreneur. He is the founder and CEO of Aftermath Entertainment and Beats Electronics, and was previously co-owner of Death Row Records. He has produced albums for and overseen the careers of many rappers, including 2Pac, The D.O.C., Snoop Dogg, Eminem, Xzibit, Knoc-turn'al, 50 Cent, The Game, and Kendrick Lamar. He is credited as a key figure in the crafting and popularization of West Coast G-funk, a rap style characterized as synthesizer-based with slow, heavy beats. , he is the; Dr. Dre // 2001. Dr. Dre was the executive producer of Eminem's 2002 release, "The Eminem Show". He produced three songs on the album, one of which was released as a single, and he appeared in the award-winning video for "Without Me". He also produced The D.O.C.'s 2003 album "Deuce", where he made a guest appearance on the tracks "Psychic Pymp Hotline", "Gorilla Pympin'" and "Judgment Day". Another copyright-related lawsuit hit Dr. Dre in the fall of 2002, when Sa Re Ga Ma, a film and music company based in Calcutta, India, sued Aftermath Entertainment over an uncredited sample of the Lata Mangeshkar [sep] knowledge2: Dr. Dre: Andre Romell  Young (born February 18, 1965), known professionally as Dr. Dre, is an American record producer and rapper. He is the founder and CEO of Aftermath Entertainment and Beats Electronics, and co-founded and was the president of Death Row Records. Young began his career as a member of the World Class Wreckin' Cru in 1985, and later found fame with the gangsta rap group N.W.A. The group popularized explicit lyrics in hip hop to detail the violence of street life. During the early 1990s, Young was credited as a key figure in the crafting and popularization of West Coast G-funk, a subgenre of hip hop characterized by a synthesizer foundation and slow, heavy production. ; Dr. Dre: Accusations of Young's violence against women have been widely publicized. Following his assault of television host Dee Barnes, he was fined US$2,500, given two years' probation, ordered to perform 240 hours of community service, and given a spot on an anti-violence public service announcement. A civil suit was settled out of court. In 2015, Michel'le, the mother of one of his children, accused him of domestic violence during their time together as a couple. Their abusive relationship is portrayed in her 2016 biopic Surviving Compton: Dre, Suge & Michel'le. Lisa Johnson, the mother of three of Young's children, stated that he beat her many times, including while she was pregnant. She was granted a restraining order against him. Former labelmate Tairrie B claimed that Young assaulted her at a party in 1990, in response to her track "Ruthless Bitch". Two weeks following the release of his third album, Compton in August 2015, he issued an apology to the women "I've hurt".[2] ; Dr. Dre: Andre Romell Young[3][4][5] was born in Compton, California, on February 18, 1965,[6] the son of Theodore and Verna Young. His middle name is derived from the Romells, his father's amateur R&B group. His parents married in 1964, separated in 1968, and divorced in 1972. His mother later remarried to Curtis Crayon and had three children: sons Jerome and Tyree (both deceased) and daughter Shameka.[7] ; Dr. Dre: In 1976, Dre began attending Vanguard Junior High School in Compton, but due to gang violence, he transferred to the safer suburban Roosevelt Junior High School.[8] The family moved often and lived in apartments and houses in Compton, Carson, Long Beach, and the Watts and South Central neighborhoods of Los Angeles.[9] Dre has said that he was mostly raised by his grandmother in the New Wilmington Arms housing project in Compton.[10] His mother later married Warren Griffin,[11] which added three step-sisters and one step-brother to the family; the latter would eventually begin rapping under the name Warren G.[12] Dre is also the cousin of producer Sir Jinx. Dre attended Centennial High School in Compton during his freshman year in 1979, but transferred to Fremont High School in South Central Los Angeles due to poor grades. He attempted to enroll in an apprenticeship program at Northrop Aviation Company, but poor grades at school made him ineligible. Thereafter, he focused on his social life and entertainment for the remainder of his high school years.[13] ; Dr. Dre: Dre's frequent absences from school jeopardized his position as a diver on his school's swim team. After high school, he attended Chester Adult School in Compton following his mother's demands for him to get a job or continue his education. After brief attendance at a radio broadcasting school, he relocated to the residence of his father and residence of his grandparents before returning to his mother's house.[14]
knowledge1: Quincy Jones // Quincy Jones Quincy Delight Jones Jr. (born March 14, 1933), also known as "Q", is an American record producer, musician, composer, and film producer. His career spans six decades in the entertainment industry, a record 79 Grammy Award nominations, 27 Grammys, and a Grammy Legend Award in 1992. Raised in Chicago, Jones attended the Berklee College of Music. He came to prominence in the 1950s as a jazz arranger and conductor before moving on to work in pop music and film scores. In 1969, Jones and his songwriting partner Bob Russell became the first African Americans to be nominated for; Quincy Jones // daughter Rashida to pen a scathing open letter in response, published in "The Source". Rashida's sister Kidada developed a romantic relationship with Shakur and had been living with the rapper for four months at the time of his death. Quincy Jones Quincy Delight Jones Jr. (born March 14, 1933), also known as "Q", is an American record producer, musician, composer, and film producer. His career spans six decades in the entertainment industry, a record 79 Grammy Award nominations, 27 Grammys, and a Grammy Legend Award in 1992. Raised in Chicago, Jones attended the Berklee College of Music. He came to [sep] knowledge2: Quincy Jones: Quincy Delight Jones Jr. (born March 14, 1933) is an American record producer, songwriter, composer, arranger, and film and television producer.[1] His career spans 72 years, with 28 Grammy Awards won out of 80 nominations,[2] and a Grammy Legend Award in 1992. ; Quincy Jones: In 1971, Jones became the first African American to be the musical director and conductor of the Academy Awards. In 1995, he was the first African American to receive the academy's Jean Hersholt Humanitarian Award. He is tied with sound designer Willie D. Burton as the second most Oscar-nominated African American, with seven nominations each. In 2013, Jones was inducted into the Rock & Roll Hall of Fame as the winner, alongside Lou Adler, of the Ahmet Ertegun Award.[4] He was named one of the most influential jazz musicians of the 20th century by Time.[1] ; Quincy Jones: Quincy Delight Jones Jr. was born in the South Side of Chicago, Illinois on March 14, 1933, the elder of two sons to Sarah Frances (née Wells; died 1999), a bank officer and apartment complex manager,[5] and Quincy Delight Jones, a semi-professional baseball player and carpenter from Kentucky. Jones's paternal grandmother was an ex-slave from Louisville,[5] and Jones later discovered that his paternal grandfather was Welsh.[6][7] With the help of the author Alex Haley in 1972 and Latter-day Saint researchers in Salt Lake City, Jones discovered that one of his mother's ancestors was James Lanier, a relative of poet Sidney Lanier. Jones said, "He had a baby with my great-grandmother [a slave], and my grandmother was born there [on a plantation in Kentucky]. We traced this all the way back to the Laniers, the same family as Tennessee Williams."[5] Learning that the Lanier immigrant ancestors were French Huguenots who had court musicians among their ancestors, Jones attributed some of his musicianship to them.[5] ; Quincy Jones: For the 2006 PBS television program African American Lives, Jones had his DNA tested, and genealogists researched his family history again. His DNA revealed he is mostly African, but also has 34% European ancestry on both sides of his family. Research showed that he has English, French, Italian, and Welsh ancestry through his father. His mother's side is of West and Central African descent, specifically the Tikar people of Cameroon.[8] His mother also had European ancestry, including Lanier male ancestors who fought for the Confederacy, making him eligible for membership in the Sons of Confederate Veterans. Among his ancestors is Betty Washington Lewis, a sister of president George Washington.[9] ; Quincy Jones: Jones's family moved to Chicago during the Great Migration. Jones had a younger brother, Lloyd, who was an engineer for the Seattle television station KOMO-TV until his death in 1998. Jones was introduced to music by his mother, who always sang religious songs, and next-door neighbor Lucy Jackson. When Jones was five or six, Jackson played stride piano next door, and he would listen through the walls. Jackson recalled that after he heard her one-day, she could not get him off her piano.[10]
knowledge1: Eric Winter // Eric Winter Eric Barrett Winter (born July 17, 1976) is an American actor, producer, author and former fashion model, best known as "TV's Eric Winter". Also known for his television roles as FBI Special Agent Craig O'Laughlin on CBS drama series "The Mentalist" (2010–2012), and Dash Gardiner on the Lifetime fantasy-drama series "Witches of East End" (2013–2014). He is known for his film roles in "Harold & Kumar Escape from Guantanamo Bay" (2008) and "The Ugly Truth" (2009). Winter was born on July 17, 1976 in La Mirada, California. Winter graduated from UCLA with a degree in Psychology. To pay; Eric Winter // Vieques (an island just east of mainland Puerto Rico). The couple wed on November 29, 2008 at a historic San Juan fort in Puerto Rico. In August 2011, Sánchez announced she and Winter were expecting their first child together. Their daughter, Sebella Rose Winter, was born on January 4, 2012. The couple welcomed their second child, son Dylan Gabriel Winter, on November 3, 2017. Eric Winter Eric Barrett Winter (born July 17, 1976) is an American actor, producer, author and former fashion model, best known as "TV's Eric Winter". Also known for his television roles as FBI Special Agent Craig; Eric Winter (illustrator) // – "Woman's Own", "Woman", "The Girl". He was commissioned by Reverend Chad Varah to draw religious illustrations for his children's Bible stories in "Swift" and by Reverend Marcus Morris to do religious illustrations for the "Eagle" comic. Eric Winter had an older brother and a younger sister. His brother Francis became Head of the Teacher Training course at Hornsey Art School and became one of the foremost wood engravers in the country. Eric Winter died in 1981 and is survived by his wife, daughter and son. Eric Winter (illustrator) Eric Winter (15 May 1905 – 1981) was a children's illustrator, [sep] knowledge2: Eric Winter: Eric Barrett Winter (born July 17, 1976) is an American actor and former fashion model. He has appeared in the television roles of Rex Brady on the NBC soap opera Days of Our Lives, FBI Special Agent Craig O'Laughlin on the CBS drama series The Mentalist (2010–2012), Dash Gardiner on the Lifetime fantasy-drama series Witches of East End (2013–2014), and Sergeant Tim Bradford on the ABC drama The Rookie. His film appearances include Harold & Kumar Escape from Guantanamo Bay (2008) and The Ugly Truth (2009). ; Eric Winter: Winter was born on July 17, 1976, in La Mirada, California. He graduated from UCLA with a degree in psychology. To pay for college, he began modeling, and his career goal, which was to become a doctor, changed as he decided to pursue acting.[citation needed] ; Eric Winter: Winter played the role of Rex Brady on the daytime soap opera Days of Our Lives[1] from July 8, 2002, until July 26, 2005. After leaving Days of Our Lives, he had many small roles in television shows, such as CSI; Love, Inc.; Charmed; and Just Legal. He guest-starred on ABC Family's Wildfire for five episodes. His character, R.J. Blake, a bull-rider who dated the character of Dani Davis (played by Nicole Tubiola), was killed in the episode "Heartless", which aired originally on February 28, 2007. Winter also appeared on The Parkers in the episode "The Boomerang Effect". He appeared in an episode of the CBS series The Ex-List, and in the recurring role of Jason McCallister, the brother of Senator Robert McCallister (Rob Lowe) and love interest of Kevin Walker (Matthew Rhys) on the ABC drama Brothers & Sisters.[2] Winter was a regular on the short-lived CBS series Viva Laughlin and Moonlight. He appears in the feature films Harold & Kumar Escape from Guantanamo Bay (2008) and The Ugly Truth (2009). ; Eric Winter: In 2010, Winter starred as the character Michael Friend, the imaginary friend of Jane (Alyssa Milano) in the Lifetime television movie Sundays at Tiffany's. ; Eric Winter: From 2010 to 2012, Winter appeared in the CBS crime drama The Mentalist as FBI agent Craig O'Laughlin, the boyfriend and later fiancé of Amanda Righetti's character Grace Van Pelt. In 2012, he had a recurring role as Luke Lourd on the ABC comedy-drama series GCB.[3] Winter appeared in the video game Beyond: Two Souls.[4]
knowledge1: George Washington // George Washington George Washington (February 22, 1732 – , 1799) was one of the Founding Fathers and the first President of the United States (1789–1797). He commanded Patriot forces in the new nation's American Revolutionary War and led them to victory over the British. Washington also presided at the Constitutional Convention of 1787, which established the new federal government. For his leadership he has been called the "Father of His Country". Washington was born to a successful family of planters and slaveholders in colonial Virginia. He had educational opportunities and at age seventeen launched a successful career as a land; George Washington // in war, first in peace, and first in the hearts of his countrymen". Washington has been memorialized by monuments, art, places, stamps, and currency, and he has been ranked by scholars among the four greatest American presidents. George Washington was born February 22, 1732 in Wakefield in the Colony of Virginia, as the first child of Augustine and second wife Mary Ball Washington. The family was descended primarily from the gentry of Sulgrave, England. His great-grandfather John Washington emigrated to Virginia in 1656, where he became a tobacco planter and accumulated land and slaves, as did his son Lawrence and; George Washington // and Benjamin Franklin appeared on the nation's first postage stamps in 1847. Since that time, Washington has appeared on many postage issues, more than any other person. Print sources <br>Primary sources <br>Online sources George Washington George Washington (February 22, 1732 – , 1799) was one of the Founding Fathers and the first President of the United States (1789–1797). He commanded Patriot forces in the new nation's American Revolutionary War and led them to victory over the British. Washington also presided at the Constitutional Convention of 1787, which established the new federal government. For his leadership he has been called the [sep] knowledge2: George Washington: George Washington (February 22, 1732 – December 14, 1799) was an American Founding Father, military officer, politician and statesman who served as the first president of the United States from 1789 to 1797. Appointed by the Second Continental Congress as commander of the Continental Army in June 1775, Washington led Patriot forces to victory in the American Revolutionary War and then served as president of the Constitutional Convention in 1787, which drafted and ratified the Constitution of the United States and established the American federal government. Washington has thus been called the "Father of the Nation". ; George Washington: George Washington was born on February 22, 1732,[a] at Popes Creek in Westmoreland County, Virginia.[3] He was the first of six children of Augustine and Mary Ball Washington.[4] His father was a justice of the peace and a prominent public figure who had four additional children from his first marriage to Jane Butler.[5] The family moved to Little Hunting Creek in 1734 before eventually settling in Ferry Farm near Fredericksburg, Virginia. When Augustine died in 1743, Washington inherited Ferry Farm and ten slaves; his older half-brother Lawrence inherited Little Hunting Creek and renamed it Mount Vernon.[6][7] ; George Washington: On January 6, 1759, Washington, at age 26, married Martha Dandridge Custis, the 27-year-old widow of wealthy plantation owner Daniel Parke Custis. The marriage took place at Martha's estate; she was intelligent, gracious, and experienced in managing a planter's estate, and the couple had a happy marriage.[45] They moved to Mount Vernon, near Alexandria, where he lived as a planter of tobacco and wheat and emerged as a political figure.[46] ; George Washington: Congress chose his primary staff officers, including Major General Artemas Ward, Adjutant General Horatio Gates, Major General Charles Lee, Major General Philip Schuyler, and Major General Nathanael Greene. [86] Henry Knox, a young bookkeeper, impressed Adams and Washington with ordnance knowledge and was subsequently promoted to colonel and chief of artillery. Similarly, Washington was impressed by Alexander Hamilton's intelligence and bravery. He would later promote him to colonel and appoint him his aide-de-camp.[87] ; George Washington: Early in 1775, in response to the growing rebellious movement, London sent British troops to occupy Boston, led by General Thomas Gage, commander of British forces in America.[92] They set up fortifications, making the city impervious to attack. Local militias surrounded the city and effectively trapped the British troops, resulting in a standoff.[93]
knowledge1: Valerie Harper // Valerie Harper Valerie Kathryn Harper (born August 22, 1939) is an American actress. She played Rhoda Morgenstern in the 1970s television series "The Mary Tyler Moore Show" and in its spin-off, "Rhoda". She later played Valerie Hogan in "Valerie". She is a four-time Primetime Emmy Award winner. Her notable film roles include "Freebie and the Bean" (1974), and "Chapter Two" (1979), both of which garnered her Golden Globe Award nominations. Harper is also known for her stage work, having appeared in several Broadway productions. She started her career as a dancer on Broadway, making her debut in the musical "Take; Valerie Harper // Tony nominee, eight-time Emmy nominee (four wins) and a six-time Golden Globe nominee (one win). Valerie Harper Valerie Kathryn Harper (born August 22, 1939) is an American actress. She played Rhoda Morgenstern in the 1970s television series "The Mary Tyler Moore Show" and in its spin-off, "Rhoda". She later played Valerie Hogan in "Valerie". She is a four-time Primetime Emmy Award winner. Her notable film roles include "Freebie and the Bean" (1974), and "Chapter Two" (1979), both of which garnered her Golden Globe Award nominations. Harper is also known for her stage work, having appeared in several Broadway productions. She; Valerie Harper // Me Along" in 1959. In 2010, she was nominated for the Tony Award for Best Actress in a Play for her performance as Talullah Bankhead in the play "Looped". Harper was born in Suffern, New York, the daughter of Iva Mildred (née McConnell; February 8, 1910—Oct 7, 1988) and Howard Donald Harper (January 10, 1907- September , 1981). Her father was a lighting salesman, and her mother was born in Canada and trained as a nurse. She is the middle child of three siblings. She has an older sister, Leah; a younger brother, Merrill (who later took the name "Don"); Valerie Harper // 17th season of "Dancing with the Stars". She was partnered with professional dancer Tristan MacManus. Harper and MacManus were voted-off the show on October 7, 2013. In the 1970s/80s, Harper was involved in the Women's Liberation Movement and was an advocate of the Equal Rights Amendment. With Dennis Weaver she co-founded L.I.F.E. in 1983, a charity that fed thousands of needy in Los Angeles. Harper married actor Richard Schaal in 1964. They divorced in 1978. Harper later married Tony Cacciotti in 1987; the couple adopted a daughter. In 2009, Harper was diagnosed with lung cancer. She announced on March 6,; Valerie Harper // further treatment. She was later discharged. In 2016, Harper continued battling cancer with treatment at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center but was well enough to appear in a short film, "My Mom and the Girl," based on the experiences of director/writer Susie Singer Carter, whose mother has Alzheimer’s disease. In September 2017, she made this comment: "People are saying, 'She’s on her way to death and quickly'. Now it’s five years instead of three months ... I’m going to fight this. I’m going to see a way." At the time, Harper was developing a TV series with Carter. Harper is a one-time [sep] knowledge2: Valerie Harper: Valerie Kathryn Harper (August 22, 1939 – August 30, 2019) was an American actress. She began her career as a dancer on Broadway, making her debut as a replacement in the musical Li'l Abner.[2] She is best remembered for her role as Rhoda Morgenstern on The Mary Tyler Moore Show (1970–1977) and its spinoff Rhoda (1974–1978). For her work on Mary Tyler Moore, she thrice received the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actress in a Comedy Series, and later received the award for Outstanding Lead Actress in a Comedy Series for Rhoda. ; Valerie Harper: From 1986 to 1987, Harper appeared as Valerie Hogan on the sitcom Valerie, which she subsequently left for salary reasons. Her character was killed off, and the show was retitled Valerie's Family and eventually The Hogan Family. Actress Sandy Duncan was cast in a new role that served as a replacement for Harper's character. Her film appearances include roles in Freebie and the Bean (1974) and Chapter Two (1979), both of which garnered her Golden Globe Award nominations. She returned to stage work in her later career, appearing in several Broadway productions. In 2010, she was nominated for the Tony Award for Best Actress in a Play for her performance as Tallulah Bankhead in the play Looped. ; Valerie Harper: Harper was born on August 22, 1939, in Suffern, New York,[3][4] the daughter of Iva Mildred (née McConnell)[5] and Howard Donald Harper. Her father was a lighting salesman; her mother was born (and raised) in Dalmeny, Saskatchewan, before becoming a teacher and later training as a nurse. Her parents married in Alberta before her mother immigrated to the United States.[6] Valerie was the middle child of three, between her sister Leanne and her brother Merrill, who later took the name "Don". After her parents' divorce in 1957, she also had a half-sister, Virginia,[citation needed] from her father's second marriage to Angela Posillico (1933–1996). ; Valerie Harper: She stated that her parents were expecting a boy.  But after her arrival her first and middle names were derived from tennis players Valerie Scott and Kay Stammers who were victorious doubles partners at a tournament Harper’s father was attending the day she was born.[7][8][9] She was of French, English, Irish, Scottish, and Welsh ancestry.[10] Harper based her character Rhoda Morgenstern on her Italian stepmother and Penny Ann Green (née Joanna Greenberg), with whom she danced in the Broadway musical Wildcat.[11][4] She was raised Catholic,[12] although at an early age she "quit" the church.[13] ; Valerie Harper: Her family moved every two years due to her father's work. Harper attended schools in South Orange, New Jersey; Pasadena, California; Monroe, Michigan; Ashland, Oregon; and Jersey City, New Jersey. When her family returned to Oregon, she stayed in the New York City area to study ballet. She attended Lincoln High School in Jersey City, New Jersey[14] before graduating from the private Young Professionals School on West 56th Street, where classmates included Sal Mineo, Tuesday Weld, and Carol Lynley.[4]
knowledge1: James Franco // James Franco James Edward Franco (born April 19, 1978) is an American actor, filmmaker, and college instructor. For his role in "127 Hours" (2010), he was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor. Franco is known for his roles in live-action films, such as Sam Raimi's "Spider-Man" trilogy (2002–2007); "Milk" (2008); "Pineapple Express" (2008); "Eat, Pray, Love" (2010); "Rise of the Planet of the Apes" (2011); "Spring Breakers" (2012); "Oz the Great and Powerful" (2013); "This Is the End" (2013); and "The" "Disaster" "Artist" (2017), for which he won a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor. He is known; James Franco // him in recognition of his unwavering support of the LGBT community. In April 2014, Franco presented at Broadway Cares/Equity Fights AIDS Easter Bonnet Competition with Leighton Meester and Chris O'Dowd, after raising donations at his Broadway show "Of Mice and Men". In June 2014, Franco performed in the BC/EFA benefit Broadway Bares James Franco James Edward Franco (born April 19, 1978) is an American actor, filmmaker, and college instructor. For his role in "127 Hours" (2010), he was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor. Franco is known for his roles in live-action films, such as Sam Raimi's "Spider-Man"; James Franco // is one of the greatest ways to break that is to stop thinking about yourself for a second". When Franco was at a point in his life where he wanted to give back but was unsure how, he asked his "Spider-Man" co-star Kirsten Dunst for advice. At her suggestion, he started volunteering at the charity Art of Elysium, where she also volunteers, which helps children with serious medical conditions. He said the experience helped save his life. In January 2011, at the Art of Elysium Heaven Gala in Los Angeles, Franco was honored for his work at the hospital, receiving; James Franco // for his collaborations with fellow actor Seth Rogen, having appeared in eight films and one television series with him. Franco is also known for his work on television; his first prominent acting role was the character Daniel Desario on the short-lived ensemble comedy-drama "Freaks and Geeks" (1999–2000), which developed a cult following. He portrayed the title character in the television biographical film "James Dean" (2001), for which he won a Golden Globe Award. Franco had a recurring role on the daytime soap opera "General Hospital" (2009–2012) and starred in the limited series "11.22.63" (2016). He currently stars in the David; James Franco // story about the rise of gay pornographic actor Brent Corrigan and the murder of Bryan Kocis. Franco played Joseph Kerekes who (along with his partner) was convicted of the murder. In the comedy "Why Him?", released in December 2016, Franco played an immature tech-billionaire whose girlfriend's conservative father tries to intervene in the couple's relationship, with Zoey Deutch playing the girlfriend and Bryan Cranston as her father. He briefly appeared in the "Alien" prequel, "", alongside friend and frequent collaborator Danny McBride, and Michael Fassbender and Noomi Rapace. He played Branson, the captain of the Covenant ship and husband to [sep] knowledge2: James Franco: James Edward Franco (born April 19, 1978) is an American actor and filmmaker. He has starred in numerous films, including Sam Raimi's Spider-Man trilogy (2002–2007), Milk (2008), Eat Pray Love (2010), Rise of the Planet of the Apes (2011), Spring Breakers (2012), and Oz the Great and Powerful (2013). He is known for his collaborations with fellow actor Seth Rogen, having appeared in eight films and one television series with him, examples being Pineapple Express (2008), This Is the End (2013), Sausage Party (2016), and The Disaster Artist (2017), for which he won a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor. For his role in 127 Hours (2010), he was nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor. ; James Franco: Franco is also known for his work on television where his first prominent acting role was the character Daniel Desario on the short-lived ensemble comedy-drama Freaks and Geeks (1999–2000), which developed a cult following. He portrayed the title character in the television biographical film James Dean (2001), for which he won a Golden Globe Award, and received nominations for Screen Actors Guild Award and Primetime Emmy Award. Franco had a recurring role on the daytime soap opera General Hospital (2009–2012) and starred in the limited series 11.22.63 (2016). He starred in the David Simon-created HBO drama The Deuce (2017–2019). ; James Franco: James Edward Franco was born in Palo Alto, California[3] on April 19, 1978.[4] His mother, Betsy Lou (née Verne), is a children's book author and occasional actress, and his father, Douglas Eugene Franco, ran a Silicon Valley business.[5][6] His father was of Portuguese and Swedish ancestry, while his mother was from a family of Russian Jews.[7][8][9] His paternal grandmother, Marjorie (née Peterson), is a published author of young adult books.[6][10] His maternal grandfather, Daniel, changed his surname from "Verovitz" to "Verne" some time after 1940,[9][11][12] and his maternal grandmother, Mitzie (née Levine), owned the prominent Verne Art Gallery in Cleveland, Ohio and was an active member in the National Council of Jewish Women.[13][14][15] ; James Franco: Franco's family upbringing was "academic, liberal, and largely secular".[16] He grew up in California with his two younger brothers, actors Tom and Dave.[17] A "math whiz", Franco interned at Lockheed Martin.[18] He was often encouraged by his father to get good grades and did well on the SAT.[16] He graduated from Palo Alto High School in 1996, where he acted in plays. This led to him attending CSSSA in 1998 for theater studies.[18][19] In his high school years, Franco was arrested for underage drinking, graffiti, and being a part of a group that stole designer fragrances from department stores and sold them to classmates.[20] These arrests led to Franco briefly becoming a ward of the state. Facing the possibility of juvenile hall, he was given a second chance by the judge.[9] He recalled of his troubles with the law, "It was teen angst. I was uncomfortable in my own skin. I was shy. I changed my ways just in time to get good grades."[16] ; James Franco: After 15 months of training, Franco began auditioning in Los Angeles. His first paid role was a television commercial for Pizza Hut, featuring a dancing Elvis Presley.[24] He found guest roles on television shows but his first break came in 1999, after he was cast in a leading role on the short-lived but well-reviewed NBC television series Freaks and Geeks,[25] which ran for 18 episodes and was canceled due to low viewership. Later, the show became a cult hit among audiences.[26] He has since described the series as "one of the most fun" work experiences that he has had.[27] In another interview, Franco said: "When we were doing Freaks and Geeks, I didn't quite understand how movies and TV worked, and I would improvise even if the camera wasn't on me ... So I was improvising a little bit back then, but not in a productive way."[17] After his film debut Never Been Kissed, he played a popular jock Chris in Whatever It Takes (2000), a modern-day remake of the 1897 play Cyrano de Bergerac.[28][29]
knowledge1: Katherine Ryan // Katherine Ryan Katherine Ryan (born 30 June 1983) is a Canadian comedian, writer, presenter and actress, based in the United Kingdom. She has appeared on British panel shows including "Mock the Week", "Never Mind the Buzzcocks", "A League of Their Own", "8 Out of 10 Cats", "Would I Lie to You?", "QI", "Just a Minute, Safeword", and "Have I Got News for You". In 2015, she replaced Steve Jones as the presenter of "Hair" on BBC Two. As an actress, she has appeared in the Channel 4 sitcom "Campus", BBC Two sitcom "Episodes" and "Don't Sit in the Front Row"; Katherine Ryan // announced that she was dating one of the contestants, fellow comedian Alex Edelman. Later, in UK tabloid "The Sun" she said "I don't see him but he's allegedly my boyfriend. We've been on-and-off for three years, so he's in some of my stories and then he's not. But he's definitely the best one I've ever dated." Ryan can speak fluent French. Katherine Ryan Katherine Ryan (born 30 June 1983) is a Canadian comedian, writer, presenter and actress, based in the United Kingdom. She has appeared on British panel shows including "Mock the Week", "Never Mind the Buzzcocks", "A League of; Katherine Ryan // with Jack Dee. As a stand-up comedian, Ryan has appeared on the BBC's "Live at the Apollo", both as a featured act and as a lead act. For her work, Ryan won the Nivea Funny Women Award, and was also runner-up in the Amused Moose Laugh-Off competition in 2008. In February 2017, Netflix released "Katherine Ryan: In Trouble" which features one of her live stand-up performances on a recent UK tour. Ryan's father, Finbar, is a draftsman and owner of an engineering company, who originally emigrated from Ireland to Canada. Her mother is Canadian and owns an IT Consulting company.; Katherine Ryan // Ryan and her two younger sisters were born and raised in Sarnia, Ontario. The three siblings spent time in Cork, Ireland visiting their paternal grandparents. Her parents split up when she was 15. When she was 18 years old, she decided to leave home and chose to study city planning at the University of Toronto. While attending university, she worked at Hooters and then began training other waitresses. She was fired from Hooters for writing on a board "club sandwiches not seals". In her spare time she undertook open mic nights as an alternative form of personal entertainment and by; Katherine Ryan // Ryan appeared on series 2 of "Taskmaster". She beat Doc Brown, Joe Wilkinson, Richard Osman and Jon Richardson, to win the entire series. She also went on a comedy tour in 2016, called Kathbum. In February 2017, Netflix released "Katherine Ryan: In Trouble", featuring one of her stand-up comedy live performances on a recent UK tour. She joined Jimmy Carr in 2017, to host two series of the reboot of "Your Face or Mine?" In 2018, Ryan joined American comedy panel show, "The Fix" as a team captain. Ryan wrote a weekly column in the British entertainment magazine "NME". On [sep] knowledge2: Katherine Ryan: Katherine Louisa Ryan (born 30 June 1983)[2] is a Canadian comedian, writer, presenter, actress and singer based in the United Kingdom.[3][4] ; Katherine Ryan: She has appeared on many British TV and radio panel shows, including 8 Out of 10 Cats (as a regular team captain), Never Mind the Buzzcocks, A League of Their Own, Mock the Week, Would I Lie to You?, QI, Just a Minute, Safeword, and Have I Got News for You. In 2015 she replaced Steve Jones as the presenter of Hair on BBC Two. As an actress, Ryan has appeared on several television sitcoms in the UK, including Campus, Episodes, and her Netflix show The Duchess. ; Katherine Ryan: Ryan's father, Finbar,[5] is a draughtsman and owner of an engineering company who originally emigrated from Ireland to Canada.[6] Her mother, Julie McCarthy, owns an IT consulting company.[7][8] Ryan and her two younger sisters were born and raised in Sarnia, Ontario.[9] ; Katherine Ryan: Ryan's parents separated when she was a teenager.[10] When she was 18, she decided to leave home and chose to study city planning at Toronto Metropolitan University (formerly Ryerson University) in Toronto.[11][12] While attending university, she worked at restaurant chain Hooters, and she then began training other waitresses.[13] In her spare time she performed at open mic nights for her own entertainment, and by graduation she had developed a basic comedy routine.[8] She was one of the many dancers in MuchMusic's Electric Circus program.[14] ; Katherine Ryan: After graduation, Ryan continued working for Hooters as a corporate trainer, travelling around Canada to train other waitresses, and helping to open the then-only UK branch in Nottingham. Her partner at the time wanted to explore London, so she agreed to do so for an initial month from summer 2007, moving there permanently from January 2008.[8][4]
knowledge1: Ralph Macchio // Ralph Macchio Ralph George Macchio Jr. (; born November 4, 1961) is an American actor, known for his roles as Daniel LaRusso in "The Karate Kid" and "Cobra Kai", Eugene Martone in "Crossroads", Bill Gambini in "My Cousin Vinny", and Johnny Cade in "The Outsiders". Additionally, he competed on the twelfth season of "Dancing with the Stars". Macchio was born in Huntington, New York. He is the son of Rosalie (née DeSantis) and Ralph Macchio, Sr., who owned a ranch. His father is of half Greek and half Italian descent, and his mother is of Italian ancestry. In a 1980; Ralph Macchio // with April Ludgate. Ralph Macchio Ralph George Macchio Jr. (; born November 4, 1961) is an American actor, known for his roles as Daniel LaRusso in "The Karate Kid" and "Cobra Kai", Eugene Martone in "Crossroads", Bill Gambini in "My Cousin Vinny", and Johnny Cade in "The Outsiders". Additionally, he competed on the twelfth season of "Dancing with the Stars". Macchio was born in Huntington, New York. He is the son of Rosalie (née DeSantis) and Ralph Macchio, Sr., who owned a ranch. His father is of half Greek and half Italian descent, and his mother is of Italian ancestry.; Ralph Macchio // was depicted as Edwards' "spiritual advisor" and dressed in his "Karate Kid" clothes. Since October 2008, he has appeared in several episodes of the ABC Network television series "Ugly Betty" as Archie Rodriguez, a local politician, with a semi-regular role as Hilda's love interest on the show. As of November 2008, Macchio was ranked No. 80 among VH1's "100 Greatest Teen Stars". In June 2010, Macchio appeared in Funny or Die's online short, "Wax On, F*ck Off", in which his loved ones stage an intervention to turn the former child star from a well-adjusted family man into an addict besieged; Ralph Macchio // a celebration of the 30th anniversary of Karate Kid at the Japanese American National Museum in 2014, Macchio said that the 1947 yellow Ford convertible his character Daniel receives from Miyagi in the first film is sitting in the garage at his home in southern California. DJ Q-Ball of the Bloodhound Gang released a song on his MySpace called "The Ralph Macchio Memoirs". Poetry slam artist Big Poppa E references Ralph Macchio in his performance poem "The Wussy Boy Manifesto". Nerdcore artist MC Frontalot mentions him in his song, "Braggadocio". Macchio was featured in a brief cameo at the end; Ralph Macchio // known as the 'Dancing Kid,' not that I was all that great. But I had been dancing since the age of three, taking lessons at the June Claire School of Dance in Babylon, Long Island." Since the mid-1990s, Macchio's film appearances have been occasional cameo or supporting roles, notably and recently "A Good Night to Die" and "Beer League". In 2005, Macchio played himself in the HBO series, "Entourage". On May 1, 2007, Macchio played himself in an episode of the Starz series, "Head Case". In 2008, he appeared in a VitaminWater commercial that featured NASCAR driver Carl Edwards. Macchio [sep] knowledge2: Ralph Macchio: Ralph George Macchio Jr. (/ˈmɑːtʃioʊ/ MAH-chee-oh, Italian: [ˈmakkjo]; born November 4, 1961) is an American actor. He is best known for playing Daniel LaRusso in three Karate Kid films and in Cobra Kai, a sequel television series on Netflix. He also played Johnny Cade in The Outsiders, Jeremy Andretti in Eight Is Enough, Bill Gambini in My Cousin Vinny, Eugene Martone in Crossroads, and Archie Rodriguez in Ugly Betty, and had a recurring role as Officer Haddix in The Deuce. ; Ralph Macchio: Macchio was born in Huntington, New York.[1] He is the son of Rosalie (née DeSantis) and Ralph George Macchio Sr., who owned a few laundromats and a wastewater disposal company. Ralph has a younger brother Steven.[2] His father is of half Italian and half Greek[3] descent, and his mother is of Italian ancestry.[4] In a 1980 screen test, Macchio said his family was from Naples.[5] In 1979, Macchio graduated from Half Hollow Hills High School West in Dix Hills, New York.[6] ; Ralph Macchio: Macchio began tap dancing lessons at the age of three and was discovered by a talent agent when he was 16 years old.[1] ; Ralph Macchio: Macchio was cast as Jeremy Andretti for a season in the television series Eight Is Enough.[1] He next won the role of Johnny Cade in the 1983 film The Outsiders.[1] ; Ralph Macchio: His work on The Outsiders helped him to win the role of Daniel LaRusso in the blockbuster 1984 film The Karate Kid. He continued to portray the character in two of its sequels, The Karate Kid Part II (1986) and The Karate Kid Part III (1989).[1][7] In The Karate Kid, Macchio portrayed a "high school weakling turned bullybuster"[8] who learns karate from his friend and mentor, Mr. Miyagi (portrayed by Pat Morita).[9] Macchio's work in the Karate Kid series made him "stratospherically famous".[7]
knowledge1: Rebecca Romijn // a former Secret Service agent who works as a private investigator. In addition to her film ventures, Romijn has also recorded music, performing a cover of Prince's "Darling Nikki" for the 2005 album "Electro Goth Tribute to Prince". She was also featured on the song "Color Me Love" for RuPaul's eighth studio album "Realness" in 2015. She most recently starred as Eve Baird, the guardian of the eponymous group in "The Librarians", a direct spin-off of "The Librarian" film series. She is also currently the host of GSN's original series and reality show "Skin Wars". Romijn has also been confirmed; Rebecca Romijn // Rebecca Romijn Rebecca Alie Romijn ( ; ; born November 6, 1972) is an American actress and former model. She is known for her role as Mystique in the tetralogy of the X-Men film series, and as Joan from "The Punisher" (2004), both of which are based on Marvel Comics. She also had a recurring role as Alexis Meade on the television series "Ugly Betty". Her most recent major role was as Eve Baird on the TNT TV Series "The Librarians", which ran for four seasons. She most recently starred as Herself in "Skin Wars". Romijn was born on November; Rebecca Romijn // 6, 1972, in Berkeley, California. Her mother, Elizabeth Romijn (née Kuizenga), is a community college instructor of English as a Second Language (ESL) and textbook author. Rebecca's father, Jaap Romijn, is a custom furniture maker. Her father is a native of Barneveld, the Netherlands, while her mother is an American of Dutch and English ancestry. Her mother met Rebecca's father as a teenager while living in the Netherlands on a student exchange program. Romijn's maternal grandfather, Henry Bernard Kuizenga, was a Presbyterian minister and seminary professor. On "The Ellen DeGeneres Show", when questioned about always being glamorous and beautiful, Romijn; Rebecca Romijn // revealed that in her early teens, she was in fact an insecure "drama geek" and that, as a result of her growth spurt, she suffered from scoliosis and was constantly in pain. Many sources say that she was once nicknamed the "Jolly Blonde Giant" because of her height, but she has admitted to making that up "for a laugh". While studying Music (Voice) at the University of California, Santa Cruz, she became involved with fashion modeling and eventually moved to Paris, where she lived for more than three years. Among other jobs, Romijn started her modeling career in 1991. She; Rebecca Romijn // has appeared on the covers of American, French, Spanish, Russian and Swedish editions of "Elle", "Marie Claire", American, Italian, Spanish, German, Portuguese, Russian, Greek, and Mexican editions of "Cosmopolitan", Allure", Glamour", "GQ", "Esquire", and "Sports Illustrated". She has appeared in advertising campaigns for Escada, Christian Dior, La Perla, Tommy Hilfiger, Furla, Liz Claiborne, J. Crew, Victoria's Secret, bebe, La Senza, Dillard's, Pantene, Got Milk?, Miller Lite, and Maybelline. She has also walked for Giorgio Armani, Sonia Rykiel, and Anna Molinari along with the likes of Claudia Schiffer, Stephanie Seymour, Karen Mulder, Kate Moss, Naomi Campbell, Linda Evangelista, Cindy Crawford, Helena [sep] knowledge2: Rebecca Romijn: Rebecca Alie O'Connell[2][3] (née Romijn; /roʊˈmeɪn/ roh-MAYN; Dutch: [roːˈmɛin], born November 6, 1972) is an American actress and former model. She is known for her role as Mystique in the original trilogy (2000–2006) of the X-Men film series, as Joan from The Punisher (2004) (both based on Marvel Comics), the dual roles of Laure Ash and Lily Watts in Femme Fatale (2002),[4][5][6] and Una Chin-Riley on Star Trek: Discovery (2019) and Star Trek: Strange New Worlds (2022–present). She has also had a recurring role as Alexis Meade on the ABC television series Ugly Betty. Her other major roles include Eve Baird on the TNT series The Librarians, voicing Lois Lane in the DC Animated Movie Universe, and as the host of the reality competition show Skin Wars. ; Rebecca Romijn: Romijn was born in Berkeley, California.[7] Her mother, Elizabeth Romijn (née Kuizenga), is a community college instructor of English as a Second Language (ESL) and textbook author. Rebecca's father, Jaap Romijn, is a custom furniture maker.[8] Her father is a native of Barneveld, the Netherlands, while her mother is an American of Dutch and English ancestry. Her mother met Rebecca's father as a teenager while living in the Netherlands on a student exchange program.[9][10] Romijn's maternal grandfather, Henry Bernard Kuizenga, was a Presbyterian minister and seminary professor.[11][12] ; Rebecca Romijn: On The Ellen DeGeneres Show, when questioned about always being glamorous and beautiful, Romijn revealed that in her early teens she was an insecure "drama geek" and that, as a result of her growth spurt, she suffered from scoliosis and was in constant pain. Many sources say that she was once nicknamed the "Jolly Blonde Giant" because of her 5 ft 11 in (180 cm) height, but she has admitted to making that up "for a laugh".[13] While studying music (voice) at the University of California, Santa Cruz,[14] she became involved with fashion modeling and eventually moved to Paris, where she lived for more than three years. ; Rebecca Romijn: Among other jobs, Romijn started her modeling career in 1991. She has appeared on the covers of American, French, Spanish, Russian and Swedish editions of Elle, Marie Claire, American, Italian, Spanish, German, Portuguese, Russian, Greek, and Mexican editions of Cosmopolitan, Allure, Glamour, GQ, Esquire, and Sports Illustrated. ; Rebecca Romijn: She has appeared in advertising campaigns for Escada, Christian Dior, La Perla, Tommy Hilfiger, Furla, Liz Claiborne, J. Crew, Victoria's Secret, bebe, La Senza, Dillard's, Pantene, Got Milk?, Miller Lite, and Maybelline. She has walked for Giorgio Armani, Sonia Rykiel, and Anna Molinari along with the likes of Claudia Schiffer, Stephanie Seymour, Karen Mulder, Kate Moss, Naomi Campbell, Linda Evangelista, Cindy Crawford, Helena Christensen and Christy Turlington. She was also the host of MTV's House of Style from 1998 to 2000. Romijn has been featured numerous times in annual lists of the world's most beautiful women by publications such as Maxim (2003–2007), AskMen.com (2001–2003, 2005–2006), and FHM (2000–2005).[15] She appeared as a guest in the animated talk show Space Ghost Coast to Coast episode "Chinatown".
knowledge1: Richard Kuklinski // that he was a serial killer who killed at least several dozen people both at the behest of organized crime bosses and on his own initiative. Three documentaries, two biographies, a feature film starring Michael Shannon, and a play have been produced about Kuklinski, based on his interviews and the results of the task force that brought him to justice. Richard Kuklinski was born in his family's apartment on 4th Street in Jersey City, New Jersey, to Stanisław "Stanley" Kukliński (1906–77), a Polish immigrant from Karwacz, Masovian Voivodeship who worked as a brakeman on the Delaware, Lackawanna and Western Railroad,; Richard Kuklinski // Richard Kuklinski Richard Leonard Kuklinski (; April 11, 1935 – March 5, 2006) was an American hitman and serial killer. He was convicted of murdering six people, but confessed to and is suspected of far more murders. He was associated with members of the American Mafia, namely the DeCavalcante crime family of Newark, New Jersey, and the Five Families of New York City. Kuklinski was given the nickname "The Iceman" for his method of freezing a victim to mask the time of death. During his criminal career, fellow mobsters called him "the one-man army" or "the devil himself" due to; Richard Kuklinski // have murdered him anyway had he known. In October 2005, after nearly 18 years in prison, Kuklinski was diagnosed with Kawasaki disease (an inflammation of the blood vessels). He was transferred to a secure wing at St. Francis Medical Center in Trenton, New Jersey. Although he had asked doctors to make sure they revived him if he developed cardiopulmonary arrest (or risk of heart attack), his then-former wife Barbara had signed a "do not resuscitate" order. A week before his death, the hospital called Barbara to ask if she wished to rescind the instruction, but she declined. Kuklinski died at [sep] knowledge2: Richard Kuklinski: Richard Leonard Kuklinski (/kʊˈklɪnski/; April 11, 1935 – March 5, 2006), also known as "The Iceman", was an American criminal and convicted murderer. Kuklinski was engaged in criminal activities for most of his adult life; he ran a burglary ring and distributed pirated pornography. He committed at least five murders between 1980 and 1984. Prosecutors described him as killing for profit.[2] Kuklinski lived with his wife and children in the New Jersey suburb of Dumont. They knew him as a loving father and husband, although one who also had a violent temper. They stated that they were unaware of his crimes. He was given the moniker Iceman by authorities after they discovered that he had frozen the body of one of his victims in an attempt to disguise the time of death.[1][3] ; Richard Kuklinski: After his murder convictions, Kuklinski gave interviews to writers, prosecutors, criminologists, and psychiatrists. He claimed to have murdered anywhere from 100 to 200 men, often in gruesome fashion.[5] None of these additional murders have been corroborated.[8] Kuklinski also claimed to have worked as a hitman for the Mafia.[5] He said he participated in several famous Mafia killings, including the disappearance and presumed murder of Teamsters' president Jimmy Hoffa. Law enforcement and organized crime experts have expressed skepticism about Kuklinski's claimed Mafia ties.[9][8][5] He was the subject of three HBO documentaries aired in 1992, 2001 and 2003;[5] several biographies, and a 2012 feature film The Iceman.[10] ; Richard Kuklinski: Richard Kuklinski was born on April 11, 1935, in his family's apartment on 4th Street in Jersey City, New Jersey, to Stanley Kuklinski (né Stanisław Kukliński; December 22, 1906 – January 6, 1977), a Polish immigrant from Karwacz, Masovian Voivodeship.[11] His father worked as a brakeman on the Delaware, Lackawanna and Western Railroad. His mother was Anna Cecilia McNally (January 31, 1911 – March 21, 1972) from Harsimus,[12] a devoutly Catholic first-generation Irish American who worked in a meat-packing plant.[13] He was the second of four children. Kuklinski's younger brother, Joseph Michael Kuklinski (May 5, 1944 – September 22, 2003), was convicted in 1970 of raping 12-year-old Pamela Dial and murdering her by throwing her and her dog off the top of a five-story building.[14][15] When asked about his brother's crimes, Kuklinski replied: "We come from the same father."[13] ; Richard Kuklinski: According to the testimony of Barbara Deppner, Kuklinski, Daniel Deppner, and House (who was in jail at the time) decided that Smith had to be killed. Kuklinski fed Smith a hamburger laced with cyanide, but when this was slow to work, Daniel Deppner also strangled Smith with a lamp cord.[26] According to forensic pathologist Michael Baden, Smith's death would probably have been attributed to something non-homicidal in nature, such as a drug overdose, if Kuklinski relied solely on the poison. However, the ligature mark around Smith's neck, and the fact that the body had been deliberately hidden, proved to investigators that he was murdered.[6] ; Richard Kuklinski: Deppner's corpse was discovered May 14, 1983, after a bicyclist riding Clinton Road in a wooded area of West Milford, New Jersey, spotted the corpse surrounded by vultures. Kuklinski wrapped the corpse inside green garbage bags before dumping it.[1] Medical examiners listed Deppner's cause of death as "undetermined," although they noted pinkish spots on his skin, a possible sign of cyanide poisoning. Deppner was also strangled. Investigators guessed that Deppner had already been incapacitated, such as by poison, because the partially-eaten corpse had no defensive wounds and healthy adult men are rarely killed by strangulation.[34]
knowledge1: Aaron Burr // Aaron Burr Aaron Burr Jr. (February 6, 1756 – September 14, 1836) was an American politician. He was the third Vice President of the United States (1801–1805), serving during Thomas Jefferson's first term. Burr served as a Continental Army officer in the American Revolutionary War, after which he became a successful lawyer and politician. He was elected twice to the New York State Assembly (1784–1785, 1798–1799), was appointed New York State Attorney General (1789–1791), was chosen as a U.S. senator (1791–1797) from the State of New York, and reached the apex of his career as vice president. In the waning; Aaron Burr // was the daughter of noted theologian Jonathan Edwards and his wife Sarah. Burr had an older sister Sarah ("Sally") who was named for her maternal grandmother. She married Tapping Reeve, founder of the Litchfield Law School in Litchfield, Connecticut. Burr's father died in 1757, and his mother died the following year, leaving him and his sister orphans when he was two years old. He and his sister first lived with their maternal grandparents, but his grandmother also died in 1757, and his grandfather Jonathan Edwards died in 1758. Young Aaron and Sally were placed with the William Shippen family in; Aaron Burr Sr. // young man, and died there in 1692). Aaron Burr attended Yale College (now Yale University), where he obtained a B.A. in 1735. After graduation, he studied theology in New Haven and witnessed the First Great Awakening, a significant religious and spiritual movement of the 1730s and 1740s. He was personally acquainted with Jonathan Edwards and his wife Sarah, daughter of James Pierpont, who is credited with founding Yale. Edwards, a leader of the Great Awakening, was Burr's mentor. On December 21, 1736, Burr a became minister of the Presbyterian Church of Newark, Newark, New Jersey. He also taught Greek and [sep] knowledge2: Aaron Burr: Aaron Burr Jr. (February 6, 1756 – September 14, 1836) was an American politician, businessman, lawyer, and Founding Father who served as the third vice president of the United States from 1801 to 1805 during Thomas Jefferson's first presidential term. He was a co-founder of the Bank of New York, which he founded in June 1784 along with Alexander Hamilton. He founded the Manhattan Company on September 1, 1799. His legacy is defined by his famous personal and political conflict with Hamilton, which culminated in the Burr–Hamilton duel in Weehawken, New Jersey on July 11, 1804, during which Burr mortally wounded Hamilton, who died from his wounds the following day. ; Aaron Burr: Burr was born to a prominent family in what was then the Province of New Jersey. After studying theology at Princeton University, he began his career as a lawyer before joining the Continental Army as an officer in the American Revolutionary War in 1775. After leaving military service in 1779, Burr practiced law in New York City, where he became a leading politician and helped form the new Jeffersonian Democratic-Republican Party. As a New York assemblyman in 1785, he supported a bill to end slavery, despite having owned slaves himself.[1][2] ; Aaron Burr: During his last year as vice president, Burr engaged in the duel in which he fatally shot Hamilton, the former Secretary of the Treasury and his political rival, near where Hamilton's son Philip Hamilton had died three years prior. Although dueling was illegal, Burr was never tried and all charges against him were eventually dropped. Nevertheless, Hamilton's death ended Burr's political career. ; Aaron Burr: Burr traveled west to the American frontier, seeking new economic and political opportunities. His secretive activities led to his 1807 arrest in Alabama on charges of treason. He was brought to trial more than once for what became known as the Burr conspiracy, an alleged plot to create an independent country led by Burr, but was acquitted each time. For a short period of time Burr left the United States to live as an expatriate in Europe. He returned in 1812 and resumed practicing law in New York City. Burr died on September 14, 1836, at the age of eighty. ; Aaron Burr: Aaron Burr Jr. was born on February 6, 1756, in Newark, located in what was then the Province of New Jersey. He was the second child of the Reverend Aaron Burr Sr., a Presbyterian minister and second president of the College of New Jersey, which became Princeton University. His mother, Esther Edwards Burr, was the daughter of noted theologian Jonathan Edwards and his wife Sarah.[3][4]
knowledge1: Rory Burns // Rory Burns Rory Joseph Burns (born 26 August 1990) is an English cricketer who plays for Surrey. He made his international debut for the England cricket team in November 2018. He is a left-handed batsman who opens in first-class cricket and occasionally fields as a wicket-keeper. He was born in Epsom, Surrey and educated at City of London Freemen's School and Cardiff Metropolitan University (UWIC). In 2018 he was appointed captain of Surrey in both first-class and List A formats. Having played Second XI cricket for both Surrey and Hampshire, Burns made his first-class debut for Surrey against Cambridge MCCU; Rory Burns // Surrey to their first County Championship title since 2002. In the process, he scored over 1000 Specsavers County Championship runs for the fifth consecutive season, finishing the season overall as Division One's top run-scorer, with 1359 runs at an average of 64.71. In September 2018, he was named in England's Test squad for the series against Sri Lanka. He made his Test debut for England against Sri Lanka on 6 November 2018. Rory Burns Rory Joseph Burns (born 26 August 1990) is an English cricketer who plays for Surrey. He made his international debut for the England cricket team in [sep] knowledge2: Rory Burns: Rory Joseph Burns (born 26 August 1990) is an English cricketer who has played internationally for the England Test cricket team. In domestic cricket, he captains Surrey in first-class and List A cricket. ; Rory Burns: Burns made his Test debut in 2018. He led Surrey to the 2018, 2022 and 2023 County Championship titles. He plays as a left-handed opening batsman. ; Rory Burns: Burns was born in Epsom, Surrey and educated at City of London Freemen's School in Ashtead, Surrey,[1] Whitgift School[2] and Cardiff Metropolitan University (UWIC).[3] Whilst at Whitgift school, Rory Burns played with fellow England international Jason Roy, who is the same age.[2] ; Rory Burns: Having played Second XI cricket for both Surrey and Hampshire,[4] Burns made his first-class debut for Surrey against Cambridge MCCU in May 2011.[5]  He made scores of 23 and 16, and keeping wicket ahead of regular keepers Steven Davies and Gary Wilson he took two catches.[6]  This was his only first team appearance for Surrey in the 2011 season. ; Rory Burns: In the 2012 season, he scored a century against Leeds Bradford MCCU[7] and filled in as wicket-keeper in one game before being called upon to open the batting in early July against Lancashire. He remained on the team for the rest of the season finishing with 741 runs at an average of 49.4.
knowledge1: Feroze Gandhi // that he helped found was named after him in Rae Bareli. Feroze Gandhi Feroze Gandhi (born Feroze Jehangir Ghandy; 12 September 1912 – 8 September 1960) was an Indian politician and journalist. He served as the publisher of "The National Herald" and "The Navjivan" newspapers from Lucknow. In 1942 he married Indira Nehru and they had two sons, Rajiv and Sanjay. His elder son, Rajiv, later also went on to become the Prime Minister of India. Feroze Gandhi became a member of the provincial parliament (1950–1952), and later a member of the Lok Sabha, the Lower House of India's parliament.; Feroze Gandhi // Feroze Gandhi Feroze Gandhi (born Feroze Jehangir Ghandy; 12 September 1912 – 8 September 1960) was an Indian politician and journalist. He served as the publisher of "The National Herald" and "The Navjivan" newspapers from Lucknow. In 1942 he married Indira Nehru and they had two sons, Rajiv and Sanjay. His elder son, Rajiv, later also went on to become the Prime Minister of India. Feroze Gandhi became a member of the provincial parliament (1950–1952), and later a member of the Lok Sabha, the Lower House of India's parliament. Born as Feroze Jehangir Ghandy to a Parsi family at the; Feroze Gandhi // The next day, he abandoned his studies in 1930 to join the Indian independence movement. Being inspired by Mahatma Gandhi, Feroze changed the spelling of his surname from "Ghandy" to "Gandhi" after joining the Independence movement. He was imprisoned in 1930, along with Lal Bahadur Shastri (the 2nd Prime Minister of India), head of Allahabad District Congress Committee, and lodged in Faizabad Jail for nineteen months. Soon after his release, he was involved with the agrarian no-rent campaign in the United Province (now Uttar Pradesh) and was imprisoned twice, in 1932 and 1933, while working closely with Nehru. Feroze first; Feroze Gandhi // his father, Feroze and his mother moved to Allahabad to live with his unmarried maternal aunt, Shirin Commissariat, a surgeon at the city's Lady Dufferin Hospital (biographer Katherine Frank has speculated that Feroze was in fact the biological son of Shirin Commissariat.) He attended the Vidya Mandir High School and then graduated from the British-staffed Ewing Christian College. In 1930, the wing of Congress Freedom fighters, the "Vanar Sena" was formed. Feroze met Kamala Nehru and Indira among the women demonstrators picketing outside Ewing Christian College. Kamala fainted with the heat of the sun and Feroze went to comfort her.; Feroze Gandhi // Tehmulji Nariman Hospital situated in Fort, Bombay, his parents, Faredoon Jehangir Ghandy and Ratimai (formerly Ratimai Commissariat), lived in Nauroji Natakwala Bhawan in Khetwadi Mohalla in Bombay. His father Jehangir was a marine engineer in Killick Nixon and was later promoted as a warrant engineer. Feroze was the youngest of the five children with two brothers Dorab and Faridun Jehangir, and two sisters, Tehmina Kershashp and Aloo Dastur. The family had migrated to Bombay from Bharuch in South Gujarat where their ancestral home, which belonged to his grandfather, still exists in Kotpariwad. In the early 1920s, after the death of [sep] knowledge2: Feroze Gandhi: Feroze Gandhi (born Feroze Gandhy; 12 September 1912– 8 September 1960)[4] was an Indian freedom fighter, politician and journalist. ; Feroze Gandhi: Gandhi published the newspapers The National Herald and The Navjivan. He served as a member of the provincial parliament between 1950 and 1952, and later a member of the Lok Sabha, the Lower House of India's parliament. ; Feroze Gandhi: Gandhi's wife, Indira Nehru (daughter of Jawaharlal Nehru, the first Prime Minister of India), and their elder son Rajiv Gandhi were both prime ministers of India.[5] ; Feroze Gandhi: Feroze Gandhy was born on 12 September 1912 to a Parsi family at the Tehmulji Nariman Hospital in the Fort district of Bombay; his parents, Jehangir Faredoon Gandhy and Ratimai (née Commissariat), lived in Nauroji Natakwala Bhawan in Khetwadi Mohalla in Bombay. His father Jahangir was a marine engineer working for Killick Nixon and was later promoted as a warrant engineer.[6][7] Feroze was the youngest of the five children with two brothers Dorab and Faridun Jehangir,[8][9] and two sisters, Tehmina Kershasp and Aloo Dastur. The family had migrated to Bombay from Bharuch (now in South Gujarat) where their ancestral home, which belonged to his grandfather, still exists in Kotpariwad.[10] ; Feroze Gandhi: In the early 1920s, after the death of his father, Feroze and his mother moved to Allahabad to live with his unmarried maternal aunt, Shirin Commissariat, a surgeon at the city's Lady Dufferin Hospital. He attended the Vidya Mandir High School and then graduated from the British-staffed Ewing Christian College.[11]
knowledge1: Jean-Claude Van Damme // of this until Van Damme publicly admitted it in 2012. After leaving LaPier, Van Damme remarried bodybuilder Portugues in 1999. Van Damme is a Roman Catholic. Jean-Claude Van Damme Jean-Claude Camille François Van Varenberg (born 18 October 1960), professionally known as Jean-Claude Van Damme () and abbreviated as JCVD, is a Belgian actor, martial artist, screenwriter, film producer, and director best known for his martial arts action films. The most successful of these projects include "Bloodsport" (1988), "Kickboxer" franchise (1989-2018), "Lionheart" (1990), "Double Impact" (1991), "Universal Soldier" franchise (1992-2012), "Hard Target" (1993), "Street Fighter" (1994), "Timecop" (1994), "Sudden Death" (1995),; Jean-Claude Van Damme // Jean-Claude Van Damme Jean-Claude Camille François Van Varenberg (born 18 October 1960), professionally known as Jean-Claude Van Damme () and abbreviated as JCVD, is a Belgian actor, martial artist, screenwriter, film producer, and director best known for his martial arts action films. The most successful of these projects include "Bloodsport" (1988), "Kickboxer" franchise (1989-2018), "Lionheart" (1990), "Double Impact" (1991), "Universal Soldier" franchise (1992-2012), "Hard Target" (1993), "Street Fighter" (1994), "Timecop" (1994), "Sudden Death" (1995), "JCVD" (2008), "The Expendables 2" (2012), "Kung Fu Panda 2," and "Kung Fu Panda 3" (2011-2016). Van Damme was born Jean-Claude Camille François Van Varenberg, on; Jean-Claude Van Damme // film about an alien invasion where he had a supporting role. It was written and directed by independent British filmmaker Dominic Burns, and co-stars stars Bianca Bree, Sean Brosnan and Simon Phillips. On 21 October 2012, Van Damme was honored with a life-size statue of himself in his hometown of Brussels. He told reporters during the unveiling, "Belgium is paying me back something, but really it's to pay back to the dream. So when people come by here, it is not Jean-Claude Van Damme but it's a guy from the street who believed in something. I want the statue to; Jean-Claude Van Damme // 18 October 1960, in Berchem-Sainte-Agathe, Brussels, Belgium, the son of Eliana and Eugène Van Varenberg, who was an accountant and florist. His father is Walloon (French-speaking) from Brussels, and his mother is Flemish (Dutch-speaking). Van Damme's paternal grandmother was Jewish. He began martial arts at the age of ten, enrolled by his father in a Shōtōkan karate school. His styles consist of Shōtōkan Karate and Kickboxing. He eventually earned his black belt in karate at 18. He started lifting weights to improve his physique, which eventually led to a Mr. Belgium bodybuilding title. At the age of 16, he took; Jean-Claude Van Damme // ability! He's the one who does those splits on chairs. He doesn't have a stuntman to do that." In October 2011, Van Damme, along with other celebrities including Hilary Swank, Vanessa-Mae and Seal attracted criticism from human rights groups for attending an event in Russian federal subject Chechnya's capital Grozny on the 35th birthday of Chechen president Ramzan Kadyrov on 5 October. Human rights groups, who had urged the celebrities to cancel their appearances because of abuses carried out under Kadyrov, criticised the celebrities for attending the event. Human Rights Watch released a statement which said, "Ramzan Kadyrov is linked [sep] knowledge2: Jean-Claude Van Damme: Jean-Claude Camille François Van Varenberg (French: [ʒɑ̃ klod kamij fʁɑ̃swa vɑ̃ vaʁɑ̃bɛʁɡ]; Dutch: [vɑn ˈvarə(n)ˈbɛrx]; born 18 October 1960), known professionally as Jean-Claude Van Damme (French: [vɑ̃ dam]; Dutch: [vɑn ˈdɑmə]), is a Belgian martial artist, actor, and conservationist.[1] Born and raised in Brussels, his father enrolled him in martial arts classes at the age of ten, which led Van Damme to compete in several karate and kickboxing competitions. With the desire of becoming an actor, he moved to the United States in 1982, where he did odd jobs and worked on several films, until he got his break as the lead in the martial arts film Bloodsport (1988). ; Jean-Claude Van Damme: Van Damme became a popular action film star and followed up with commercially successful films such as Cyborg (1989), Kickboxer (1989), Lionheart (1990), Death Warrant (1990), Double Impact (1991), Universal Soldier (1992), Nowhere to Run (1993), Hard Target (1993), Timecop (1994), Street Fighter (1994), Sudden Death (1995), The Quest (1996), which marked his directorial debut, and Maximum Risk (1996). After a decline, Van Damme returned to prominence with the critically acclaimed crime drama JCVD (2008). His big return to the action genre was in The Expendables 2 (2012), in which he starred as the villain, opposite Sylvester Stallone. From thereon, Van Damme continued starring in action films and doing extensive voice work. ; Jean-Claude Van Damme: Van Damme's films have grossed over $1 billion worldwide, making him one of the most successful action stars of all time.[2] Outside acting, Van Damme has publicly supported various conservationist causes and animal rights organisations. In 2017, he became an international ambassador for GAIA (Global Action in the Interest of Animals), and in 2022, was appointed as DRC Ambassador on Environment.[3][4][5] ; Jean-Claude Van Damme: Van Damme was born Jean-Claude Camille François Van Varenberg, on 18 October 1960, in Berchem-Sainte-Agathe, Brussels, Belgium, the son of Eliana and Eugène Van Varenberg, who was an accountant and florist.[6][7][8][9] His father is from Brussels and bilingual, and his mother is Flemish (Dutch-speaking).[10] Van Damme was brought up Roman Catholic. His paternal grandmother was Jewish.[11] ; Jean-Claude Van Damme: He began martial arts at the age of ten, enrolled by his father in a Shōtōkan karate school.[12] His styles consist of Shōtōkan Karate and Kickboxing.[13] He eventually earned his black belt in karate at 18.[14] He started lifting weights to improve his physique, which eventually led to a Mr. Belgium bodybuilding title.[15] At the age of 16, he took up ballet, which he studied for five years. According to Van Damme, ballet "is an art, but it's also one of the most difficult sports. If you can survive a ballet workout, you can survive a workout in any other sport."[16] Later he took up both Taekwondo and Muay Thai.[17]
knowledge1: Danila Medvedev // Danila Medvedev Danila Andreyevich Medvedev () (born March 21, 1980 in Leningrad (now Saint Petersburg)) is a Russian futurologist and politician. Specialising in the science and future of Russia, Medvedev serves as a member of the coordination council of the Russian Transhumanistic Movement. In May 2005 he helped found KrioRus, the first cryonics company outside of the United States. Since August 2008, he has worked as Chief Planning Officer and Vice-President of the Science for Life Extension Foundation, based in Moscow. Medvedev graduated from the International Management Institute of St. Petersburg (IMISP) in 2000. The title of his master's thesis; Danila Medvedev // was "Methods of the account of conditions of financing at an estimation of investment projects". On 21 March 2007, he was one of a group of transhumanists who gave a presentation in the Duma titled "Influence of science on political situation in Russia. A view into the future", after an invitation by the Liberal Democratic Party of Russia. Danila Medvedev Danila Andreyevich Medvedev () (born March 21, 1980 in Leningrad (now Saint Petersburg)) is a Russian futurologist and politician. Specialising in the science and future of Russia, Medvedev serves as a member of the coordination council of the Russian Transhumanistic; Daniil Medvedev // Daniil Medvedev Daniil Sergeyevich Medvedev (, ; born 11 February 1996) is a Russian tennis player. He has won 3 ATP singles titles. Medvedev has a career high ATP singles ranking of 16 first achieved on 5 November 2018. He also has a career high ATP doubles ranking of 265 achieved on 18 September 2017. Medvedev made his ATP main draw debut at the 2015 Kremlin Cup, partnering Aslan Karatsev in the doubles event. As a qualifier, Medvedev made his ATP singles main draw debut at the 2016 Nice Open, lost to Guido Pella in three sets. Three weeks later; Daniil Medvedev // 6–2, 6–4 in the final match. This triumph brought him to a new career high ranking of No. 22 and made him become the No. 1 player in Russia In October, he continued his good form, reaching the 2018 Kremlin Cup semifinal, losing to his countryman and eventual champion Karen Khachanov. One week later, he made the ATP500 2018 Swiss Indoors semifinal, which he lost to Roger Federer. He reached his highest ranking yet, at No.17. !Result !No. !Date !Tournament !Tier !Surface !Opponent !class="unsortable"|Score Daniil Medvedev Daniil Sergeyevich Medvedev (, ; born 11 February 1996) is a Russian tennis player. [sep] knowledge2: Daniil Medvedev: Daniil Sergeyevich Medvedev (Russian: Даниил Сергеевич Медведев, IPA: [dənʲɪˈiɫ sʲɪrˈɡʲe(j)ɪvʲɪtɕ mʲɪdˈvʲedʲɪf]; born 11 February 1996) is a Russian professional tennis player. He has been ranked as high as world No. 1 in men's singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals, holding the ranking for a total of 16 weeks. As of December 19, 2023, ranked world No. 3 in singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP), Medvedev has won 20 ATP Tour singles titles, including the 2021 US Open and 2020 ATP Finals. In the former, Medvedev defeated then-world No. 1 Novak Djokovic in the final to deny him the Grand Slam.[5] In the latter, he became the first and only player to defeat the top three ranked players in the world en route to the year-end championship title. He has also won six Masters titles, and contested five major finals. His six Masters titles all came in different venues, making him only the sixth player to win Masters titles at six different venues.Medvedev made his ATP Tour main draw debut at the singles event of the 2015 Kremlin Cup. In 2017, he participated in a major for the first time at Wimbledon, where he defeated world No. 3 Stan Wawrinka. In 2018, Medvedev won his first ATP Tour singles titles at Sydney and Winston-Salem, and his first ATP 500 title in Tokyo. He achieved a breakthrough in 2019, making his top 10 debut after Wimbledon and reaching six consecutive tournament finals, including at the US Open.[6][7] In February 2022, Medvedev became the first man outside of the Big Three to hold the world No. 1 ranking since Andy Murray, the third Russian man following Yevgeny Kafelnikov in 1999 and Marat Safin in 2000, and the 27th man overall.[8] ; Daniil Medvedev: Daniil Medvedev was born in Moscow to Sergey Medvedev and Olga Medvedeva. Daniil's father, a computer engineer, developed his own business of building materials sales, from the mid-1980s to the early 2010s.[9] Medvedev has two older sisters named Julia and Elena, 12 and 8 years his senior, respectively. When he was 6 years old, his mother noticed an advertisement for group tennis lessons at the pool where he was taking swimming lessons. His father encouraged him to enroll. Medvedev's first tennis teacher was Ekaterina Kryuchkova, a former coach of professional tennis player Vera Zvonareva among others.[10] Daniil's other childhood activities besides sport included harpsichord and guitar lessons.[11][12][13] ; Daniil Medvedev: Medvedev studied physics and maths at a specialized school before graduating early and enrolling in economics and commerce at the Moscow State Institute of International Relations. He later dropped out to focus on tennis.[13] He then switched to the Russian State University of Physical Education, Sport, Youth, and Tourism, where he received his diploma as coach.[14] With his family he moved to Antibes, France where he trained at the tennis academy.[15] His parents have been living in France since then, as retirees.[12] As a result of living mostly overseas after turning 18, Medvedev can speak French and English fluently, besides his native Russian.[11] ; Daniil Medvedev: Medvedev married his girlfriend Daria Chernyshkova, a Moscow State University graduate and former juniors tennis player, in Moscow on 12 September 2018.[16][17] On October 14, 2022, they announced the birth of their daughter.[18] In September 2019, he credited his marriage for the improvement of his tennis results: "Before I made a proposal, I had been on the 65th place in the ranking, and then in ten months I've won two major tournaments and entered the top 10. We have significantly rebuilt our life, we work for each other. I earn [money], and Daria helps me to earn more".[19] Daria also works as his assistant, e.g., she helps to procure travel visas, which is not easy with a Russian passport.[20] When he won the US Open on 12 September 2021, his first Grand Slam singles title, Medvedev joked, referring to the final being on the same day as his wedding anniversary, "If I lose, I have no time to find a present. So I have to win this match."[21] ; Daniil Medvedev: Medvedev has been listed as an "unsuitable" subject for compulsory military service in the Russian Armed Forces because of minor health issues due to his preterm birth at 8 months.[12] Like many other Russian tennis players, Medvedev considered switching to the flag of Kazakhstan in the beginning of his professional career for a lack of support from the Russian Tennis Federation.[22][23] Sports psychologist Francisca Dauzet has been a part of his French-speaking entourage since 2018.[24] Medvedev is a supporter of FC Bayern Munich.[25]
knowledge1: Coco Chanel // Coco Chanel Gabrielle Bonheur "Coco" Chanel (19 August 1883 – 10 January 1971) was a French fashion designer and business woman. The founder and namesake of the Chanel brand, she was credited in the post-World War I era with liberating women from the constraints of the "corseted silhouette" and popularizing a sporty, casual chic as the feminine standard of style. A prolific fashion creator, Chanel extended her influence beyond couture clothing, realizing her design aesthetic in jewellery, handbags, and fragrance. Her signature scent, Chanel No. 5, has become an iconic product. She is the only fashion designer listed on "Time"; Coco Chanel (film) // Coco Chanel (film) Coco Chanel is a 2008 made-for-television biographical film directed by Christian Duguay and written by Ron Hutchinson, Enrico Medioli and Lea Tafuri. It stars Shirley MacLaine as (the older) Coco Chanel, the pioneering French fashion designer. MacLaine was nominated for a Golden Globe award, an Emmy and a Screen Actors Guild award for her work in the film. Although an Italian-French-British production backed by Rai Uno and France 2, "Coco Chanel" was primarily intended for the US market and was first broadcast in the United States on 13 September 2008 by cable channel Lifetime Television. It premiered; Coco Chanel // Vera Bate Lombardi, (born Sarah Gertrude Arkwright), reputedly the illegitimate daughter of the Marquess of Cambridge, afforded Chanel entry into the highest levels of British aristocracy. It was an elite group of associations revolving around such figures as politician Winston Churchill, aristocrats such as the Duke of Westminster, and royals such as Edward, Prince of Wales. In Monte Carlo in 1923, at age forty, Chanel was introduced by Lombardi to the vastly wealthy Duke of Westminster, Hugh Richard Arthur Grosvenor, known to his intimates as "Bendor". The duke lavished Chanel with extravagant jewels, costly art, and a home in London's; Coco Chanel // evolved into a commercial enterprise. She became a licensed milliner in 1910 and opened a boutique at 21 rue Cambon, Paris, named "Chanel Modes". As this location already housed an established clothing business, Chanel sold only her millinery creations at this address. Chanel's millinery career bloomed once theatre actress Gabrielle Dorziat wore her hats in Fernand Nozière's play "Bel Ami" in 1912. Subsequently, Dorziat modelled Chanel's hats again in photographs published in "Les Modes". In 1913, Chanel opened a boutique in Deauville, financed by Arthur Capel, where she introduced deluxe casual clothing suitable for leisure and sport. The fashions were; Coco Chanel // to the sun had been the mark of laborers doomed to a life of unremitting, unsheltered toil. "A milky skin seemed a sure sign of aristocracy." By the mid-1920s, women could be seen lounging on the beach without a hat to shield them from the sun's rays. The Chanel influence made sun bathing fashionable. Coco Chanel Gabrielle Bonheur "Coco" Chanel (19 August 1883 – 10 January 1971) was a French fashion designer and business woman. The founder and namesake of the Chanel brand, she was credited in the post-World War I era with liberating women from the constraints of the [sep] knowledge2: Coco Chanel: Gabrielle Bonheur "Coco" Chanel (/ʃəˈnɛl/ shə-NEL, French: [ɡabʁijɛl bɔnœʁ kɔko ʃanɛl] ⓘ; 19 August 1883 – 10 January 1971)[2] was a French fashion designer and businesswoman. The founder and namesake of the Chanel brand, she was credited in the post–World War I era with popularizing a sporty, casual chic as the feminine standard of style. This replaced the "corseted silhouette" that had earlier been dominant with a style that was simpler, far less time-consuming to put on and remove, more comfortable, and less expensive, all without sacrificing elegance. She is the only fashion designer listed on Time magazine's list of the 100 most influential people of the 20th century.[3] A prolific fashion creator, Chanel extended her influence beyond couture clothing, realizing her aesthetic design in jewellery, handbags, and fragrance. Her signature scent, Chanel No. 5, has become an iconic product, and Chanel herself designed her famed interlocked-CC monogram, which has been in use since the 1920s.[4] ; Coco Chanel: Her couture house closed in 1939, with the outbreak of World War II. Chanel stayed in France and was criticized during the war for collaborating with the Nazi-German occupiers and the Vichy puppet regime to boost her professional career.  One of Chanel's liaisons was with a German diplomat, Baron (Freiherr) Hans Günther von Dincklage [de].[5][6] After the war, Chanel was interrogated about her relationship with Dincklage, but she was not charged as a collaborator due to intervention by her friend British prime minister Winston Churchill.[7] When the war ended, Chanel moved to Switzerland, returning to Paris in 1954 to revive her fashion house. In 2011, Hal Vaughan published a biography about Chanel based on newly declassified documents, revealing that she had collaborated directly with the Nazi intelligence service, the Sicherheitsdienst. One plan in late 1943 was for her to carry an SS peace overture to Churchill to end the war.[8] ; Coco Chanel: Gabrielle Bonheur Chanel was born in 1883 to Eugénie Jeanne Devolle Chanel, known as Jeanne, a laundrywoman, in the charity hospital run by the Sisters of Providence (a poorhouse) in Saumur, Maine-et-Loire.[9]: 14 [10] She was Jeanne's second child with Albert Chanel; the first, Julia, had been born less than a year earlier.[10] Albert Chanel was an itinerant street vendor who peddled work clothes and undergarments,[11]: 27  living a nomadic life, traveling to and from market towns. The family resided in run-down lodgings. In 1884, he married Jeanne Devolle, persuaded to legitimate his children by her family who had "united, effectively, to pay Albert".[9]: 16  ; Coco Chanel: At birth, Chanel's name was entered into the official registry as "Chasnel". Jeanne was too unwell to attend the registration, and Albert was registered as "traveling".[9]: 16  With both parents absent, the infant's last name was misspelled, probably due to a clerical error.[citation needed] ; Coco Chanel: She went to her grave as Gabrielle Chasnel because to correct, legally, the misspelled name on her birth certificate would reveal that she was born in a poor house hospice.[12] The couple had six[13] children—Julia, Gabrielle, Alphonse (the first boy, born 1885), Antoinette (born 1887), Lucien, and Augustin (who died at six months)[13]—and lived crowded into a one-room lodging in the town of Brive-la-Gaillarde.[10]
knowledge1: Henry VII of England // Henry VII of England Henry VII (; 28 January 1457 – 21 April 1509) was the King of England and Lord of Ireland from his seizure of the crown on 22 August 1485 to his death on 21 April 1509. He was the first monarch of the House of Tudor. Henry attained the throne when his forces defeated King Richard III at the Battle of Bosworth Field, the culmination of the Wars of the Roses. He was the last king of England to win his throne on the field of battle. He cemented his claim by marrying Elizabeth of York,; Henry VII of England // most of his life, prior to his ascending the throne of England. To strengthen his position, however, he subsidised shipbuilding, so strengthening the navy (he commissioned Europe's first ever – and the world's oldest surviving – dry dock at Portsmouth in 1495) and improving trading opportunities. Henry VII was one of the first European monarchs to recognise the importance of the newly united Spanish kingdom and concluded the Treaty of Medina del Campo, by which his son, Arthur Tudor, was married to Catherine of Aragon. He also concluded the Treaty of Perpetual Peace with Scotland (the first treaty between England; Henry VII of England // As king, Henry was styled as His Gracehis full style was: "Henry, by the Grace of God, King of England and France and Lord of Ireland". On his succession, Henry became entitled to bear the Royal Arms of England. After his marriage, he used the red-and-white rose as his emblem which became known as the Tudor rose. His first concern was to secure his hold on the throne. Henry declared himself king "by right of conquest" retroactively from 21 August 1485, the day before Bosworth Field. Thus, anyone who had fought for Richard against him would be guilty of treason, [sep] knowledge2: Henry VII of England: Henry VII (28 January 1457 – 21 April 1509) was King of England and Lord of Ireland from his seizure of the crown on 22 August 1485 until his death in 1509. He was the first monarch of the House of Tudor.[a] ; Henry VII of England: Henry's mother, Margaret Beaufort, was a descendant of John of Gaunt, founder of the House of Lancaster and son of King Edward III. Henry's father, Edmund Tudor, 1st Earl of Richmond, a half-brother of Henry VI of England and a member of the Welsh Tudors of Penmynydd, died three months before his son Henry was born. During Henry's early years, his uncle Henry VI was fighting against Edward IV, a member of the Yorkist branch of the House of Plantagenet. After Edward retook the throne in 1471, Henry Tudor spent 14 years in exile in Brittany. He attained the throne when his forces, supported by France, Scotland, and Wales, defeated Richard III at the Battle of Bosworth Field, the culmination of the Wars of the Roses. He was the last king of England to win his throne on the field of battle. He cemented his claim by marrying Elizabeth of York, daughter of Edward IV. ; Henry VII of England: Henry VII was born on 28 January 1457 at Pembroke Castle, in the English-speaking portion of Pembrokeshire known as Little England beyond Wales. He was the only child of Lady Margaret Beaufort and Edmund Tudor, 1st Earl of Richmond. He was probably baptised at St Mary's Church, Pembroke,[1] though no documentation of the event exists.[2] His father died three months before his birth.[3] Henry's paternal grandfather, Owen Tudor, originally from the Tudors of Penmynydd, Isle of Anglesey in Wales, had been a page in the court of King Henry V. He rose to become one of the "Squires to the Body to the King" after military service at the Battle of Agincourt.[4] Owen is said to have secretly married the widow of Henry V, Catherine of Valois. One of their sons was Edmund, Henry's father. Edmund was created Earl of Richmond in 1452, and "formally declared legitimate by Parliament".[5] ; Henry VII of England: Henry lived in the Herbert household until 1469, when Richard Neville, Earl of Warwick (the "Kingmaker"), went over to the Lancastrians. Herbert was captured fighting for the Yorkists and executed by Warwick.[13] When Warwick restored Henry VI in 1470, Jasper Tudor returned from exile and brought Henry to court.[13] When the Yorkist Edward IV regained the throne in 1471, Henry fled with other Lancastrians to Brittany. He spent most of the next 14 years under the protection of Francis II, Duke of Brittany.[14] In November 1476, Francis fell ill and his principal advisers were more amenable to negotiating with King Edward. Henry was thus handed over to English envoys and escorted to the Breton port of Saint-Malo. While there, he feigned stomach cramps and delayed his departure long enough to miss the tides. An ally of Henry's, Viscount Jean du Quélennec [fr], soon arrived, bringing news that Francis had recovered, and in the confusion Henry was able to flee to a monastery. There he claimed sanctuary until the envoys were forced to depart.[15] ; Henry VII of England: Henry had Parliament repeal Titulus Regius, the statute that declared Edward IV's marriage invalid and his children illegitimate, thus legitimising his wife. Amateur historians Bertram Fields and Sir Clements Markham have claimed that he may have been involved in the murder of the Princes in the Tower, as the repeal of Titulus Regius gave the Princes a stronger claim to the throne than his own. Alison Weir points out that the Rennes ceremony, two years earlier, was plausible only if Henry and his supporters were certain that the Princes were already dead.[29] Henry secured his crown principally by dividing and undermining the power of the nobility, especially through the aggressive use of bonds and recognisances to secure loyalty. He also enacted laws against livery and maintenance, the great lords' practice of having large numbers of "retainers" who wore their lord's badge or uniform and formed a potential private army.[citation needed]
knowledge1: Jamie Dornan // 2012, and married in 2013. They have two daughters. Jamie Dornan James Dornan (born 1 May 1982) is an actor, model, and musician from Northern Ireland. He played Sheriff Graham Humbert in the ABC series "Once Upon a Time" (2011–2013), and serial killer Paul Spector in the BBC Two and RTÉ One crime drama series "The Fall" (2013–2016), the latter of which won him an Irish Film and Television Award for Best Actor in Television and was nominated for a British Academy Television Award for Best Actor . In film, he portrayed Axel von Fersen in Sofia Coppola's "Marie Antoinette"; Jamie Dornan // and Jan Kubiš in "Anthropoid" (2016). Dornan was born in Holywood, County Down, Northern Ireland, and grew up in the suburbs of Belfast. He has two older sisters: Liesa, who works for Disney in London, and Jessica, a fashion designer based in Falmouth, Cornwall, England. His father, Jim Dornan, is an obstetrician and gynaecologist who had also considered becoming an actor. Dornan was 16 when his mother, Lorna, died from pancreatic cancer. Dornan is a first cousin, twice removed, of actress Greer Garson. His grandparents on both sides of his family were Methodist lay preachers. He attended and boarded at; Jamie Dornan // Jamie Dornan James Dornan (born 1 May 1982) is an actor, model, and musician from Northern Ireland. He played Sheriff Graham Humbert in the ABC series "Once Upon a Time" (2011–2013), and serial killer Paul Spector in the BBC Two and RTÉ One crime drama series "The Fall" (2013–2016), the latter of which won him an Irish Film and Television Award for Best Actor in Television and was nominated for a British Academy Television Award for Best Actor . In film, he portrayed Axel von Fersen in Sofia Coppola's "Marie Antoinette" (2006), Christian Grey in the "Fifty Shades" franchise (2015–2018),; Jamie Dornan // works include ad campaigns with Dior Homme and Calvin Klein (with both Kate Moss and Eva Mendes), and he was labelled "The Golden Torso" by "The New York Times". Dornan appeared in commercials for Dolce & Gabanna, Zara, Banana Republic, Dior, Calvin Klein, and Levi's Jeans with Lily Aldridge. In 2006, Dornan was dubbed the "male Kate Moss" by "GQ" and in 2015 was ranked one of the "25 Biggest Male Models of All Time" by "Vogue". In 2018, he became the new face of "Boss The Scent" for Hugo Boss alongside Dutch model Birgit Kos. Dornan's first acting role; Jamie Dornan // in a film was Count Axel Fersen in the Sofia Coppola film "Marie Antoinette" (2006). Dornan also appeared in the drama film "Shadows in the Sun" (2009), which starred three-time Academy Award nominee Jean Simmons. In 2008, he played the lead role of Ed in the Hammer Horror production "Beyond the Rave". In 2011, Dornan appeared in nine episodes of the ABC television series "Once Upon a Time", playing the role of Sheriff Graham. While Graham from Storybrooke was killed by the town's mayor Regina (The Evil Queen) in the episode "The Heart Is a Lonely Hunter", Dornan stated that [sep] knowledge2: Jamie Dornan: James Peter Maxwell Dornan (/ˈdɔːrnən/; born 1 May 1982) is an actor, model, and musician from Northern Ireland.[2][3][4] The recipient of two Irish Film and Television Awards, he has been nominated for a BAFTA Television Award and a Golden Globe Award. In 2020, he was named one of Ireland's greatest film actors by The Irish Times.[5] ; Jamie Dornan: Initially beginning his career as a model in 2001, he appeared in campaigns for Hugo Boss, Dior Homme, and Calvin Klein. Dubbed "the Golden Torso" by The New York Times, he was ranked one of the "25 Biggest Male Models of All Time" by Vogue in 2015. In addition, he performed in the folk band Sons of Jim until 2008. ; Jamie Dornan: He began acting in 2006, and earned international recognition for playing Sheriff Graham Humbert in the series Once Upon a Time (2011–2013) and serial killer Paul Spector in the crime drama series The Fall (2013–2016). For the latter, he won the Irish Film and Television Award for Best Actor in Television and was nominated for a British Academy Television Award for Best Actor. In film, he has portrayed Axel von Fersen in Sofia Coppola's Marie Antoinette (2006), Christian Grey in the Fifty Shades franchise (2015–2018), Jan Kubiš in Anthropoid (2016), Commandant Pat Quinlan in The Siege of Jadotville (2016), Paul Conroy in A Private War (2018), and Pa in Belfast (2021), receiving a nomination for the Golden Globe Award for Best Supporting Actor – Motion Picture for the lattermost. He was listed on the Radio Times's TV 100 power list in 2023, following his performance as Elliot Stanley in the drama series The Tourist (2022–present).[6] ; Jamie Dornan: Dornan was born in Holywood, County Down, Northern Ireland, and grew up in the suburbs of Belfast.[7] His mother, Lorna, died of pancreatic cancer when Dornan was 16. His father Jim Dornan, an obstetrician and gynaecologist who had also considered becoming an actor, died from complications related to COVID-19 on 15 March 2021.[7][8][9][10] He has echoed his father's support throughout his career, stating: "[...] Some people go their whole lives without being told, 'You've made your parents proud'. My dad would tell me every day."[11] ; Jamie Dornan: Dornan has two older sisters: Liesa, who works for Disney in London, and Jessica, a fashion designer based in Falmouth, Cornwall, England.[12] He is a first cousin, twice removed, of actress Greer Garson.[7] His grandparents on both sides of his family were Methodist lay preachers.[8]
knowledge1: Napoleon // Napoleon Napoléon Bonaparte (, ; ; 15 August 1769 – 5 May 1821) was a French statesman and military leader who rose to prominence during the French Revolution and led several successful campaigns during the French Revolutionary Wars. He was Emperor of the French from 1804 until 1814 and again briefly in 1815 during the Hundred Days. Napoleon dominated European and global affairs for more than a decade while leading France against a series of coalitions in the Napoleonic Wars. He won most of these wars and the vast majority of his battles, building a large empire that ruled over; Napoleon (actor) // replacing Karthik. Among the forthcoming Tamil, Malayalam and Hollywood films in which he features are "Seema Raja", "AY-NA" and "Devil's Night: Dawn of the Nain Rouge". In 2000 Napoleon founded Jeevan Technologies in Chennai, and then expanded into the USA and New Zealand. In 2008, the Jeevan IT Academy was started with the mission of training graduates to enter the corporate world with a thorough knowledge of industry standards. Napoleon (actor) Kumaresan Duraisamy (born 2 December 1963), known by his stage name Napoleon, is an Indian film actor, politician and entrepreneur. He was the Minister of State for Social Justice [sep] knowledge2: Napoleon: Napoleon Bonaparte (born Napoleone di Buonaparte;[1][b] 15 August 1769 – 5 May 1821), later known by his regnal name Napoleon I, was a French emperor and military commander who rose to prominence during the French Revolution and led successful campaigns during the Revolutionary Wars. He was the leader of the French Republic as First Consul from 1799 to 1804, then of the French Empire as Emperor of the French from 1804 until 1814, and briefly again in 1815. His political and cultural legacy endures as a celebrated and controversial leader. He initiated many enduring reforms, but has been criticized for his authoritarian rule. He is considered one of the greatest military commanders in history and his wars and campaigns are still studied at military schools worldwide. However, historians still debate whether he was responsible for the Napoleonic Wars in which between three and six million people died.[2][3] ; Napoleon: Napoleon was born on the island of Corsica into a family descended from Italian nobility.[4][5] He was resentful of the French monarchy, and supported the French Revolution in 1789 while serving in the French army, trying to spread its ideals to his native Corsica. He rose rapidly in the ranks after saving the governing French Directory by firing on royalist insurgents. In 1796, he began a military campaign against the Austrians and their Italian allies, scoring decisive victories, and became a national hero. Two years later he led a military expedition to Egypt that served as a springboard to political power. He engineered a coup in November 1799 and became First Consul of the Republic. In 1804, to consolidate and expand his power, he crowned himself Emperor of the French. ; Napoleon: Napoleon's family was of Italian origin. His paternal ancestors, the Buonapartes, descended from a minor Tuscan noble family that emigrated to Corsica in the 16th century and his maternal ancestors, the Ramolinos, descended from a minor Genoese noble family.[18] His parents Carlo Maria Buonaparte and Maria Letizia Ramolino maintained a home in Ajaccio where Napoleon was born on 15 August 1769. He was the family's fourth child and third son.[e] He had an elder brother, Joseph, and younger siblings Lucien, Elisa, Louis, Pauline, Caroline, and Jérôme. Napoleon was baptized as a Catholic, under the name Napoleone.[19] In his youth, his name was also spelled as Nabulione, Nabulio, Napolionne, and Napulione.[20] ; Napoleon: Napoleon was born one year after the Republic of Genoa ceded Corsica to France.[21] The state sold sovereign rights a year before his birth and the island was conquered by France during the year of his birth. It was formally incorporated as a province in 1770, after 500 years under Genoese rule and 14 years of independence.[f] Napoleon's parents joined the Corsican resistance and fought against the French to maintain independence, even when Maria was pregnant with him. His father Carlo was an attorney who had supported and actively collaborated with patriot Pasquale Paoli during the Corsican war of independence against France;[5] after the Corsican defeat at Ponte Novu in 1769 and Paoli's exile in Britain, Carlo began working for the new French government and in 1777 was named representative of the island to the court of Louis XVI.[5][25] ; Napoleon: When he turned 9 years old, Napoleon moved to the French mainland and enrolled at a religious school in Autun in January 1779. In May, he transferred with a scholarship to a military academy at Brienne-le-Château.[28] In his youth, he was an outspoken Corsican nationalist and supported the state's independence from France.[29][30] Like many Corsicans, Napoleon spoke and read Corsican (as his mother tongue) and Italian (as the official language of Corsica).[31][32][33][30] He began learning French in school at the age of around 10.[34] Although he became fluent in French, he spoke with a distinctive Corsican accent and never learned to spell in French.[35] Consequently, Napoleon was routinely bullied by his peers for his accent, birthplace, short stature, mannerisms, and inability to speak French quickly.[32] He became reserved and melancholy, applying himself to reading. An examiner observed that Napoleon "has always been distinguished for his application in mathematics. He is fairly well acquainted with history and geography ... This boy would make an excellent sailor".[g][37]
knowledge1: Jeremy Corbyn // Jeremy Corbyn Jeremy Bernard Corbyn (; born 26 May 1949) is a British politician serving as Leader of the Labour Party and Leader of the Opposition since 2015. Corbyn was first elected Member of Parliament (MP) for Islington North in 1983. Ideologically, Corbyn identifies as a democratic socialist. He advocates reversing austerity cuts to public services and welfare funding made since 2010, and proposes renationalisation of public utilities and the railways. An anti-war and anti-nuclear campaigner since his youth, he broadly supports a foreign policy of military non-interventionism and unilateral nuclear disarmament. Corbyn began his career as a representative for; Jeremy Corbyn // announced the previous September. Jeremy Corbyn Jeremy Bernard Corbyn (; born 26 May 1949) is a British politician serving as Leader of the Labour Party and Leader of the Opposition since 2015. Corbyn was first elected Member of Parliament (MP) for Islington North in 1983. Ideologically, Corbyn identifies as a democratic socialist. He advocates reversing austerity cuts to public services and welfare funding made since 2010, and proposes renationalisation of public utilities and the railways. An anti-war and anti-nuclear campaigner since his youth, he broadly supports a foreign policy of military non-interventionism and unilateral nuclear disarmament. Corbyn began his career; Jeremy Corbyn // was elected Member of Parliament for Islington North, after defeating the incumbent Michael O'Halloran and immediately joined the socialist Campaign Group, later becoming secretary of the group. Shortly after being elected to parliament, he began writing a weekly column for the left-wing "Morning Star" newspaper. In May 2015, he said that "the "Star" is the most precious and only voice we have in the daily media". In February 2017, "Morning Star" said about Corbyn: "He has been bullied, betrayed and ridiculed, and yet he carries on with the same grace and care he always shows to others – however objectionable; Jeremy Corbyn // various trade unions. His political career began when he was elected to Haringey Council in 1974; he later became Secretary of Hornsey Constituency Labour Party, and continued in both roles until elected MP for Islington North. As a backbench MP he was known for his activism and rebelliousness, frequently voting against the Labour whip, including when the party was in government under Tony Blair and Gordon Brown. Corbyn was also the national chair of the Stop the War Coalition from 2011 to 2015. Corbyn announced his candidacy for the Labour leadership following Labour's defeat in the 2015 general election and; Jeremy Corbyn // was one of 12 Labour MPs to support Plaid Cymru and the Scottish National Party's call for a parliamentary inquiry into the Iraq War. He was elected chair of the coalition in succession to Andrew Murray in September 2011, but resigned once he became Leader of the Labour Party in September 2015. Corbyn is a member of a number of Parliamentary Trade Union Groups: he is sponsored by several trade unions, including UNISON, Unite and the National Union of Rail, Maritime and Transport Workers. He is a supporter of the Unite Against Fascism pressure group. Corbyn was chair of the [sep] knowledge2: Jeremy Corbyn: Jeremy Bernard Corbyn (/ˈkɔːrbɪn/; born 26 May 1949) is a British politician who served as Leader of the Opposition and Leader of the Labour Party from 2015 to 2020. On the political left of the Labour Party, Corbyn describes himself as a socialist.[1][2] He has been Member of Parliament (MP) for Islington North since 1983.[3] As of October 2020, Corbyn sits in the House of Commons as an independent, following the suspension of the whip. ; Jeremy Corbyn: Born in Chippenham, Wiltshire, and raised in Wiltshire and Shropshire, Corbyn joined the Labour Party as a teenager. Moving to London, he became a trade union representative. In 1974, he was elected to Haringey Council and became Secretary of Hornsey Constituency Labour Party until being elected as the MP for Islington North in 1983; he has been reelected to the office nine times. His activism has included roles in Anti-Fascist Action, the Anti-Apartheid Movement, the Campaign for Nuclear Disarmament, and advocating for a united Ireland and Palestinian statehood. As a backbench MP, Corbyn routinely voted against the Labour whip, including New Labour governments under Tony Blair and Gordon Brown. A vocal opponent of the Iraq War, he chaired the Stop the War Coalition from 2011 to 2015, a period when he received the Gandhi International Peace Award; he also won the Seán MacBride Peace Prize in 2017. Analyses of domestic media coverage of Corbyn have found it to be critical or antagonistic.[4][5] ; Jeremy Corbyn: Corbyn was born on 26 May 1949[13][14] in Chippenham, Wiltshire, and lived until the age of seven in the nearby village of Kington St Michael.[15] He is the youngest of the four sons of Naomi Loveday (née Josling; 1915–1987), a maths teacher, and David Benjamin Corbyn (1915–1986), an electrical engineer and expert in power rectifiers. His brother Piers Corbyn is a physicist, meteorologist, weather forecaster and climate change denier.[16][17][18] His parents were Labour Party members[19] and peace campaigners who met in the 1930s at a committee meeting in support of the Spanish Republic at Conway Hall during the Spanish Civil War.[20][21][22] ; Jeremy Corbyn: When Corbyn was seven, the family moved to Pave Lane in Shropshire, where his father bought Yew Tree Manor, a 17th-century farmhouse[23] which was once part of the Duke of Sutherland's Lilleshall estate.[24][15][25] Corbyn attended Castle House School, an independent preparatory school near Newport, Shropshire, before, at the age of 11, becoming a day student at the Adams Grammar School in the town.[26][27] ; Jeremy Corbyn: While still at school, Corbyn became active in The Wrekin constituency Young Socialists, his local Labour Party, and the League Against Cruel Sports.[27] He joined the Labour Party at the age of 16[19] and achieved two A-Levels, at grade E, the lowest-possible passing grade, before leaving school at 18.[28][29] Corbyn joined the Campaign for Nuclear Disarmament (CND) in 1966 while at school[30] and later became one of its three vice-chairs and subsequently vice-president.[31] Around this time, he also campaigned against the Vietnam War.[32]
knowledge1: Radja Nainggolan // Nainggolan, an Indonesian of Batak background and member of the Batak Christian Protestant Church. His father abandoned the family when he was just a child. Nainggolan's mother died in 2010, and after her death he tattooed two large wings on his back with her dates of birth and death. He was raised Roman Catholic and spoke Dutch, English and Italian fluently, as well as understanding French. Nainggolan began playing football with Tubantia Borgerhout at the age of 5. Seven years later he moved to the youth team of Germinal Beerschot, where he remained until 2005, when he was noted by; Radja Nainggolan // team both offensively and defensively, Nainggolan is a quick, dynamic, hard-working, physically strong and versatile midfielder, who is capable of playing in several midfield positions; possessing good vision, passing range, and technique, he is often used as a playmaker in front of his team's defensive line. He is also known for his attacking drive, ability to get forward and eye for goal from midfield, courtesy of his powerful and accurate striking ability from distance, as well as his movement and ability to make late attacking runs off the ball; his talent, energy, skill, and wide range of attributes led to; Radja Nainggolan // Radja Nainggolan Radja Nainggolan (born 4 May 1988) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Italian club Inter Milan. Nicknamed "Il Ninja", he spent most of his professional career in Italy, representing Piacenza, Cagliari, Roma and Inter Milan and making over 290 Serie A appearances. A Belgium international for eight years, Nainggolan played 30 times for his country (scoring six goals) and represented it at Euro 2016. Nainggolan was born in Antwerp, the son of Lizy Bogaerts, a Belgian of Flemish ethnicity who raised him with his three half brothers and his twin sister, and Marianus; Radja Nainggolan // goal) Radja Nainggolan Radja Nainggolan (born 4 May 1988) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Italian club Inter Milan. Nicknamed "Il Ninja", he spent most of his professional career in Italy, representing Piacenza, Cagliari, Roma and Inter Milan and making over 290 Serie A appearances. A Belgium international for eight years, Nainggolan played 30 times for his country (scoring six goals) and represented it at Euro 2016. Nainggolan was born in Antwerp, the son of Lizy Bogaerts, a Belgian of Flemish ethnicity who raised him with his three half brothers and his twin sister, and; Radja Nainggolan // made his debut in the tournament on 13 June, playing 62 minutes in a 0–2 loss against Italy. After featuring as a second-half substitute in the second game, a 3–0 defeat of the Republic of Ireland, he returned to the starting XI against Sweden, scoring the game's only goal at the Stade de Nice after a counter-attack to send his country to the knockout stage as second; in the quarter-finals, he netted from 25 metres to put his country ahead against Wales after 12 minutes, but in an eventual 1–3 loss. On 26 August 2017, aged 29, Nainggolan announced that [sep] knowledge2: Radja Nainggolan: Radja Nainggolan (born 4 May 1988) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Liga 1 club Bhayangkara. ; Radja Nainggolan: Nicknamed Il Ninja,[4] he spent almost his entire professional career in Italy, representing Piacenza, Cagliari, Roma and Inter Milan. He made 367 appearances and scored 48 goals in Serie A, being named four consecutive times in its Team of the Year. ; Radja Nainggolan: A Belgium international for eight years, Nainggolan played 30 times for his country (scoring six goals) and represented it at Euro 2016. ; Radja Nainggolan: Nainggolan was born in Antwerp, the son of Lizy Bogaerts, a Belgian of Flemish ethnicity who raised him with his three half brothers and his twin sister,[5][6] and Marianus Nainggolan, an Indonesian of Toba Batak background and member of the Batak Christian Protestant Church.[7] He was raised in Kiel, a working-class and multicultural neighbourhood of the city.[8] His father abandoned the family when Nainggolan was still a child.[9] ; Radja Nainggolan: Nainggolan's mother died in 2010,[10] and after her death he tattooed two large wings on his back with her dates of birth and death.[9][11] He was raised Roman Catholic and speaks Dutch, English, French and Italian fluently.[12][13][14]
knowledge1: Winston Churchill // Winston Churchill Sir Winston Leonard Spencer-Churchill (30 November 187424 January 1965) was a British politician, statesman, army officer, and writer, who was Prime Minister of the United Kingdom from 1940 to 1945 and again from 1951 to 1955. As Prime Minister, Churchill led Britain to victory in the Second World War. Churchill represented five constituencies during his career as Member of Parliament (MP). Ideologically an economic liberal and British imperialist, he began and ended his parliamentary career as a member of the Conservative Party, which he led from 1940 to 1955, but for twenty years from 1904 he was a; Winston Churchill // most significant figures, Churchill remains popular in the UK and Western world, where he is seen as a victorious wartime leader who played an important role in defending liberal democracy from the spread of fascism. Also praised as a social reformer and writer, among his many awards was the Nobel Prize in Literature. However, his imperialist views and comments on race, as well as his sanctioning of human rights abuses in the suppression of anti-imperialist movements seeking independence from the British Empire, have generated considerable controversy. Churchill was born at the family's ancestral home, Blenheim Palace in Oxfordshire, on 30 [sep] knowledge2: Winston Churchill: Sir Winston Leonard Spencer Churchill[a] (30 November 1874 – 24 January 1965) was a British statesman, soldier, and writer who twice served as Prime Minister of the United Kingdom, from 1940 to 1945 during the Second World War, and again from 1951 to 1955. Apart from two years between 1922 and 1924, he was a Member of Parliament (MP) from 1900 to 1964 and represented a total of five constituencies. Ideologically an adherent to economic liberalism and imperialism, he was for most of his career a member of the Conservative Party, which he led from 1940 to 1955. He was a member of the Liberal Party from 1904 to 1924. ; Winston Churchill: Churchill was born on 30 November 1874 at his family's ancestral home, Blenheim Palace in Oxfordshire.[2] On his father's side, he was a member of the British aristocracy as a direct descendant of John Churchill, 1st Duke of Marlborough.[3] His father, Lord Randolph Churchill, representing the Conservative Party, had been elected Member of Parliament (MP) for Woodstock in 1874.[4] His mother, Jennie, was a daughter of Leonard Jerome, a wealthy American businessman.[5] ; Winston Churchill: Churchill began boarding at St George's School in Ascot, Berkshire, at age seven but was not academic and his behaviour was poor.[11] In 1884, he transferred to Brunswick School in Hove, where his academic performance improved.[12] In April 1888, aged 13, he narrowly passed the entrance exam for Harrow School.[13] His father wanted him to prepare for a military career and so his last three years at Harrow were in the army form.[14] After two unsuccessful attempts to gain admittance to the Royal Military College, Sandhurst, he succeeded on his third.[15] He was accepted as a cadet in the cavalry, starting in September 1893.[16] His father died in January 1895, a month after Churchill graduated from Sandhurst.[17] ; Winston Churchill: In February 1895, Churchill was commissioned as a second lieutenant in the 4th Queen's Own Hussars regiment of the British Army, based at Aldershot.[19] Eager to witness military action, he used his mother's influence to get himself posted to a war zone.[20] In the autumn of 1895, he and his friend Reggie Barnes, then a subaltern, went to Cuba to observe the war of independence and became involved in skirmishes after joining Spanish troops attempting to suppress independence fighters.[21] Churchill sent reports about the conflict to the Daily Graphic in London.[22] He proceeded to New York City and, in admiration of the United States, wrote to his mother about "what an extraordinary people the Americans are!".[23] With the Hussars, he went to Bombay in October 1896.[24] Based in Bangalore, he was in India for 19 months, visiting Calcutta three times and joining expeditions to Hyderabad and the North West Frontier.[25] ; Winston Churchill: In India, Churchill began a self-education project,[26] reading a range of authors including Plato, Edward Gibbon, Charles Darwin and Thomas Babington Macaulay.[27] The books were sent to him by his mother, with whom he shared frequent correspondence when abroad. In order to learn about politics, he also asked his mother to send him copies of The Annual Register, the political almanac.[28] In one 1898 letter to her, he referred to his religious beliefs, saying: "I do not accept the Christian or any other form of religious belief".[29] Churchill had been christened in the Church of England[30] but, as he related later, he underwent a virulently anti-Christian phase in his youth,[31] and as an adult was an agnostic.[32] In another letter to one of his cousins, he referred to religion as "a delicious narcotic" and expressed a preference for Protestantism over Roman Catholicism because he felt it "a step nearer Reason".[33]
knowledge1: Ivan Perišić // on loan to Belgian top flight club Roeselare for six months. At the end of the 2008–09 season, there were reports Perišić sought to join Belgian side Anderlecht. On 26 August 2009, Belgian club Club Brugge acquired Perišić from Sochaux for a €250,000 transfer fee and signed him to a three-year contract. Prior his move, Perišić was linked with a move to German side Hertha BSC, having gone on trial. In the opening match of the season, Perišić scored his first goal in a 1–1 draw against Genk, then scored his second in two consecutive games and provided assists in [sep] knowledge2: Ivan Perišić: Borussia Dortmund
knowledge1: Kevin De Bruyne // Kevin De Bruyne Kevin De Bruyne (; born 28 June 1991) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for English club Manchester City and the Belgian national team. His playing style has frequently led to the media, coaches, and colleagues ranking him among the best players in Europe, and has often been described as a "complete" footballer. He was ranked the fourth-best footballer in the world by "The Guardian" in 2017. De Bruyne began his career at Genk, where he was a regular player when they won the 2010–11 Belgian Pro League. In 2012, he joined English; Kevin De Bruyne // his first child. His autobiography, entitled "Keep It Simple", was published by Borgerhoff & Lamberigts in October 2014. De Bruyne was an ambassador for the 2014 Special Olympics, which took place in Antwerp and was involved in a controversial advertisement campaign, via his personal Instagram account. Employing the slogan (in Flemish): "Would you still be my fan if I looked like this?", De Bruyne was depicted resembling a person with Down syndrome. Genk VfL Wolfsburg Manchester City Belgium Awards Performance Kevin De Bruyne Kevin De Bruyne (; born 28 June 1991) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a; Kevin De Bruyne // for Burundi, his mother's birthplace. De Bruyne became a regular member of Belgium's team during the 2014 FIFA World Cup qualification campaign, where he scored four goals as the Red Devils qualified for their first major tournament in 12 years. On 13 May 2014, he was named in Belgium's squad for the 2014 FIFA World Cup. In their first game of the tournament, against Algeria in Belo Horizonte, De Bruyne assisted Marouane Fellaini's equaliser and was named man of the match by FIFA. In the round of 16, De Bruyne scored Belgium's opening goal in the third minute of extra; Kevin De Bruyne // been named Manchester City's Player of the Year, twice, in 2016 and 2018. De Bruyne made his full international debut in 2010, and has since earned over 65 caps and scored 15 goals for Belgium. He was a member of the Belgian squads that reached the quarter-finals both at the 2014 FIFA World Cup and at UEFA Euro 2016. In 2018 he represented Belgium at the FIFA World Cup, winning the third place play-off match against England. De Bruyne began his career with hometown club KVV Drongen in 2003. Two years later, he joined Gent and moved to Genk in; Kevin De Bruyne // opposition's defence, and subsequently create chances and goalscoring opportunities for himself or his teammates, making him a dangerous offensive threat on counter-attacks. In addition to his creative abilities, he is also capable of scoring goals by making late runs off the ball from behind into the penalty area, and is an accurate set-piece taker. De Bruyne's mother is Belgian, born in Burundi and has also lived in the Ivory Coast. His hometown Drongen, a submunicipality of the city of Ghent, is situated in Flanders, the Dutch-speaking part of Belgium. De Bruyne speaks Dutch, French and English fluently. In 2013 the [sep] knowledge2: Kevin De Bruyne: Kevin De Bruyne (born 28 June 1991) is a Belgian professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for and captains both Premier League club Manchester City and the Belgium national team. He is widely regarded as one of the greatest players of his generation as well as one of the best midfielders in the world.[5] Pundits have described him as a complete footballer.[6][7] ; Kevin De Bruyne: De Bruyne began his career at Genk, where he was a regular player when they won the 2010–11 Belgian Pro League. In 2012 he joined English club Chelsea, where he was used sparingly and then loaned to Werder Bremen. He signed with Wolfsburg for £18 million in 2014, where he established himself as one of the best players in the Bundesliga and was integral in the club's 2014–15 DFB-Pokal win. In the summer of 2015 De Bruyne joined Manchester City for a club record £54 million. He has since  won the UEFA Champions League, five Premier League titles, five League Cups and two FA Cups with the club. In 2017–18 he had a significant role in Manchester City's record in becoming the only Premier League team to attain 100 points in a single season. In 2019–20, De Bruyne equalled the record for most assists in a Premier League season and was awarded Player of the Season (which he won again in 2021–22). He was again heavily involved in 2022–23 as City sealed their first continental treble. ; Kevin De Bruyne: De Bruyne made his full international debut in 2010, and he has since earned over 90 caps and scored 26 goals for Belgium. He was a member of the Belgian squads that reached the quarter-finals both at the 2014 FIFA World Cup and at UEFA Euro 2016. He was named in the FIFA World Cup Dream Team of the 2018 FIFA World Cup as Belgium finished in third place, as well as appearing in UEFA Euro 2020 and the 2022 FIFA World Cup. ; Kevin De Bruyne: De Bruyne has been named in the UEFA Champions League Squad of the Season, IFFHS Men's World Team and the ESM Team of the Year five times each, the FIFA FIFPRO World 11  and UEFA Team of the Year three times each, the France Football World XI, and the Bundesliga Team of the Year. He has also won the Premier League Playmaker of the Season three times, the PFA Players' Player of the Year twice, Manchester City's Player of the Year four times, the UEFA Champions League Midfielder of the Season, the Bundesliga Player of the Year, the Footballer of the Year (Germany), the Belgian Sportsman of the Year and the IFFHS World's Best Playmaker twice. ; Kevin De Bruyne: De Bruyne began his career with hometown club KVV Drongen in 1997. Two years later, he joined Gent and moved to Genk in 2005. De Bruyne continued his development in their youth set-up and was rewarded for his progress by being promoted to the first team squad in 2008. From an Interview with his youth club, it was revealed that De Bruyne was a Liverpool fan and admirer of Michael Owen.[8]
knowledge1: Gemma Arterton // French film assistant director whom she met on the set of "The Voices" in 2013 and worked together with in the film "Gemma Bovery". Gemma Arterton Gemma Christina Arterton (born 2 February 1986) is an English actress. Arterton made her film debut in the comedy film "St Trinian's" (2007). Her breakthrough role was in the James Bond film "Quantum of Solace" (2008), playing Bond Girl Strawberry Fields, which won her an Empire Award for Best Newcomer. She was the title star of the film "The Disappearance of Alice Creed" (2009). She is known for her roles in the fantasy films; Gemma Arterton // Gemma Arterton Gemma Christina Arterton (born 2 February 1986) is an English actress. Arterton made her film debut in the comedy film "St Trinian's" (2007). Her breakthrough role was in the James Bond film "Quantum of Solace" (2008), playing Bond Girl Strawberry Fields, which won her an Empire Award for Best Newcomer. She was the title star of the film "The Disappearance of Alice Creed" (2009). She is known for her roles in the fantasy films "Clash of the Titans" (2010), "Prince of Persia: The Sands of Time" (2010), "Byzantium" (2013), and as the character Gretel in "" (2013). She; Gemma Arterton // played Joan in Bernard Shaw's Saint Joan at Donmar Warehouse, December 2016. She plays the lead role in the film "Their Finest" (2017). Arterton was born at North Kent Hospital in Gravesend, Kent, to Sally-Anne ("née" Heap), a cleaner, and Barry Arterton, a welder. Her matrilineal great-grandmother was a German Jewish concert violinist. She was born with polydactyly, and at her birth a doctor tied off the boneless sixth digits to remove them. She attended Gravesend Grammar School for Girls in Kent, and made her stage debut there in an amateur production of Alan Ayckbourn's "The Boy Who Fell into; Gemma Arterton // if she was chatting too much. Arterton is the face of Avon's Bond Girl 007 fragrance, which launched in October 2008. Having already started in a series of advertisements for Avon, Arterton in May 2008 requested a role opposite model Kate Moss for Rimmel, but was blocked on contractual terms under her Avon contract. In 2010, Arterton made her West End debut in the UK premiere of "The Little Dog Laughed". She was originally attached to star in a new adaptation of "Wuthering Heights" as Catherine Earnshaw; however, she later left the project. Arterton appeared in pivotal roles in the; Gemma Arterton // a year after the couple began dating and getting engaged at the Download music festival in 2009. In early 2013, Arterton and her husband separated, and in August 2015 their divorce was finalised "by consent" at the Central Family Court in High Holborn. Arterton stated she "never really believed in exchanging vows", and that she's not sure she would "want to walk down the aisle again." In 2013, Arterton stated that she wants to wait until she has accomplished something in the acting world before having children. From 2013 until 2016, she was in a relationship with Franklin Ohanessian, a [sep] knowledge2: Gemma Arterton: Gemma Christina Arterton[1] (born 2 February 1986)[2] is a British actress and producer.[3] After her stage debut in Shakespeare's Love's Labour's Lost at the Globe Theatre (2007), Arterton made her feature film debut in the comedy St Trinian's (2007). She portrayed Bond Girl Strawberry Fields in the James Bond film Quantum of Solace (2008), a performance which won her an Empire Award for Best Newcomer, and spy Pollyana "Polly" Wilkins / Agent Galahad in the action war film The King's Man (2021). ; Gemma Arterton: Arterton has appeared in a number of other films, including The Disappearance of Alice Creed (2009), Tamara Drewe (2010), Clash of the Titans (2010), Prince of Persia: The Sands of Time (2010), Hansel & Gretel: Witch Hunters (2013), Their Finest (2016), The Escape (2017), and Vita and Virginia (2018). She received the Harper's Bazaar Woman of the Year Award for acting in and producing The Escape. Her theatrical highlights have included starring in The Duchess of Malfi (2014), Made in Dagenham (2014), Nell Gwynn (2016) and Saint Joan (2017). Arterton was nominated for Olivier Awards for her work on both Nell Gwynn and Made in Dagenham, and she won the Evening Standard Theatre Award for the latter. ; Gemma Arterton: Arterton was born at North Kent Hospital in Gravesend[8] with polydactyly, a condition resulting in extra fingers which were removed shortly after her birth.[9] Her mother, Sally-Anne Heap, runs a cleaning business, and her father, Barry J. Arterton, is a welder.[10] They divorced during Arterton's early childhood, and she grew up on a council estate with her mother and younger sister, Hannah Arterton, who is also an actress.[11] Her matrilineal great-grandmother was a German-Jewish concert violinist.[12] ; Gemma Arterton: Arterton attended Gravesend Grammar School for Girls, a state grammar school in Kent (now Mayfield Grammar School) and made her amateur stage debut in a production of Alan Ayckbourn's The Boy Who Fell into a Book. Her performance won her the best actress prize in a competition at a local festival.[13] ; Gemma Arterton: At age 16, Arterton left Gravesend Grammar School to attend acting college at the Miskin Theatre at North Kent College in Dartford. She later studied at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art (RADA), graduating in 2008.[14]
knowledge1: Irina Denezhkina // Prize, awarded to a prominent young talent. Irina Denezhkina Irina Denezhkina (; born October 31, 1981 in Yekaterinburg) is a Russian controversial writer, notable for a vulgar style of her works, which is explained by some as a reflection of the modern reality, as of the Millennial Generation (e.g. her most famous collected stories "Give Me [Songs for Lovers]", Russian: "Дай мне!", published by Limbus Press in 2002). In the beginning of 2004 the book was published in the United States. Her first works, signed by a pseudonym Niger's sister (сестра Нигера), appeared in Internet in 2000. In 2008, she [sep] knowledge2: Irina Shayk: Irina Valeryevna Shaykhlislamova[3] (Russian: Ирина Валерьевна Шайхлисламова; Tatar: İrina Şəyxelislamova; born 6 January 1986), known professionally as Irina Shayk (/ʃeɪk/),[4] is a Russian model and television personality. Shayk received international recognition when she appeared as the first Russian model on the cover of the 2011 Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Issue. In 2022, the website Models.com placed her on their list of the New Supers. ; Irina Shayk: Shayk was born in Yemanzhelinsk (Chelyabinsk Oblast region), Soviet Union, to a Volga Tatar father, Valery Shaykhlislamov (Şəyxelislamov, from Shaykh al-Islām[5]), a coal miner, and ethnic Russian mother, Olga, a kindergarten music teacher.[6] She has stated that she inherited her looks from her father and that people often mistake her for being South American, saying, "My father was dark skinned, because he was Tatar, sometimes Tatars can look Brazilian. I get my light eyes from my mother."[6] She has one sibling, a sister named Tatiana Petenkova. She is also an aunt to Tatiana's three children including a niece named "Irina" after her.[7] ; Irina Shayk: Shayk started playing piano at age six. At age nine, she enrolled in a music school and studied there for seven years, both playing the piano and singing in the choir, since her mother wanted her to study music.[8] Her father died of complications of pneumonia when she was 14, leaving her family with little money and forcing her mother to work two jobs to provide for the family.[6] ; Irina Shayk: After high school, Shayk studied marketing[8] but later instead chose to enter a beauty school with her older sister. While there, she was noticed by a person from a local modeling agency who was struck by her beauty. She was urged to participate in the "Miss Chelyabinsk 2004" beauty contest, which she won; she described this contest as far below the standard of beauty contests one would expect in metropolitan European cities or in the United States.[9] ; Irina Shayk: In 2007, Shayk replaced Ana Beatriz Barros as the face of Intimissimi,[10] and in the same year debuted in the annual Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Issue.[11]
knowledge1: Rafael Nadal // Rafael Nadal Rafael Nadal Parera (, ; born 3 June 1986) is a Spanish professional tennis player, currently world No. 2 in men's singles tennis by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP). Nadal has won 17 Grand Slam singles titles, the second most in history for a male player, as well as a record 33 ATP World Tour Masters 1000 titles, 20 ATP World Tour 500 tournaments, and the 2008 Olympic gold medal in singles. In addition, Nadal has held the number one ranking for a total of 196 weeks. In majors, Nadal has won a record 11 French Open; Rafael Nadal // at age 24. He is the second male player, after Andre Agassi, to complete the singles Career Golden Slam. In 2011, Nadal was named the Laureus World Sportsman of the Year. Rafael Nadal was born in Manacor, a town on the island of Mallorca in the Balearic Islands, Spain to parents Ana María Parera and Sebastián Nadal. His father is a businessman, owner of an insurance company, glass and window company Vidres Mallorca, and the restaurant, Sa Punta. Rafael has a younger sister, María Isabel. His uncle, Miguel Ángel Nadal, is a retired professional footballer, who played for RCD Mallorca,; Rafael Nadal // /> Rafael Nadal Rafael Nadal Parera (, ; born 3 June 1986) is a Spanish professional tennis player, currently world No. 2 in men's singles tennis by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP). Nadal has won 17 Grand Slam singles titles, the second most in history for a male player, as well as a record 33 ATP World Tour Masters 1000 titles, 20 ATP World Tour 500 tournaments, and the 2008 Olympic gold medal in singles. In addition, Nadal has held the number one ranking for a total of 196 weeks. In majors, Nadal has won a record 11 French; Rafael Nadal // at , regardless of which surface or conditions he is playing on. , Nadal is the international ambassador for Quely, a company from his native Mallorca that manufactures biscuits, bakery and chocolate-coated products; he has consumed their products ever since he was a young child. In 2010, luxury watchmaker Richard Mille announced that he had developed an ultra-light wristwatch in collaboration with Nadal called the Richard Mille RM027 Tourbillon watch. The watch is made of titanium and lithium and is valued at US$525,000; Nadal was involved in the design and testing of the watch on the tennis court. During the; Rafael Nadal // FC Barcelona, and the Spanish national team. He idolized Barcelona striker Ronaldo as a child, and via his uncle got access to the Barcelona dressing room to have a photo with the Brazilian. Nadal supports football clubs Real Madrid and RCD Mallorca. Recognizing in Rafael a natural talent, another uncle, Toni Nadal, a former professional tennis player, introduced him to tennis when he was three years old. At age 8, Nadal won an under-12 regional tennis championship at a time when he was also a promising football player. This made Toni Nadal intensify training, and at that time he encouraged [sep] knowledge2: Rafael Nadal: Rafael Nadal Parera[pron 1] (born 3 June 1986) is a Spanish professional tennis player. Nadal has been ranked world No. 1 in singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) for 209 weeks, and has finished as the year-end No. 1 five times. Nadal has won 22 Grand Slam men's singles titles, including a record 14 French Open titles. He has won 92 ATP singles titles, including 36 Masters titles, with 63 of these on clay courts. Nadal is one of only two men to complete the Career Golden Slam in singles.[b] His 81 consecutive wins on clay constitute the longest single-surface win streak in the Open Era. ; Rafael Nadal: For over a decade, Nadal has led men's tennis along with Roger Federer and Novak Djokovic as the Big Three.[c] At the start of his professional career, Nadal became one of the most successful teenagers in ATP Tour history, reaching the world No. 2 ranking and winning 16 titles before turning 20, including his first French Open and six Masters events. Nadal became the world No. 1 for the first time in 2008 after defeating Federer in a historic Wimbledon final, his first major victory off clay. He followed up his win with an Olympic singles gold at the 2008 Beijing Olympics. After defeating Djokovic in the 2010 US Open final, then-24-year-old Nadal became the youngest man in the Open Era to achieve the Career Grand Slam, and the first man to win majors on three different surfaces (hard, grass, and clay) in the same year (Surface Slam). ; Rafael Nadal: After two injury-plagued seasons, Nadal returned to the Tour in 2013, reaching 14 finals, winning two majors and five Masters events including the US Open Series sweep (Summer Slam). He continued his dominance at the French Open, securing six titles, two US Open titles, an Australian Open title, and an Olympic doubles gold at the 2016 Rio Olympics with Marc López. Nadal surpassed his joint-record with Djokovic and Federer for the most Grand Slam men's singles titles at the 2022 Australian Open, and became one of four men in history to complete the double Career Grand Slam in singles. ; Rafael Nadal: As a left-handed player, one of Nadal's main strengths is his forehand, which he hits with a high degree of topspin. He also regularly places among the Tour leaders in percentage of return games, return points, and break points won. Nadal has won the Stefan Edberg Sportsmanship Award five times and was the Laureus World Sportsman of the Year in 2011 and 2021. Time named Nadal one of the 100 most influential people in the world in 2022. He is a recipient of the Grand Cross of Royal Order of Sports Merit, Grand Cross of Order of the Second of May, the Grand Cross of Naval Merit, and the Medal of the City of Paris. Representing Spain, he has won two Olympic gold medals, and led the nation to four Davis Cup titles. Nadal has also opened a tennis academy in Mallorca, and is an active philanthropist. ; Rafael Nadal: Rafael Nadal Parera was born on 3 June 1986 in Manacor, a town on the island of Mallorca in the Balearic Islands, Spain, to parents Ana María Parera Femenías and Sebastián Nadal Homar. His father is a businessman who owns an insurance company, a glass and window company (Vidres Mallorca), and the restaurant Sa Punta. His mother once owned a perfume shop, but gave it up to raise Nadal and his younger sister, María Isabel.[7] One of his uncles, Miguel Ángel Nadal, is a retired professional footballer who played for RCD Mallorca, FC Barcelona and the Spanish national team.[8] As a child, he idolized Barcelona striker Ronaldo, and through his uncle was given access to the Barcelona team dressing room to have a photo taken with the Brazilian.[9] Another of his uncles, tennis coach Toni Nadal, introduced him to that game when he was three years old.[10]
knowledge1: Heinrich Himmler // Heinrich Himmler Heinrich Luitpold Himmler (; 7 October 1900 – 23 May 1945) was "Reichsführer" of the "Schutzstaffel" (Protection Squadron; SS), and a leading member of the Nazi Party (NSDAP) of Germany. Himmler was one of the most powerful men in Nazi Germany and among those most directly responsible for the Holocaust. As a member of a reserve battalion during World War I, Himmler did not see active service. He studied agronomy in university, and joined the Nazi Party in 1923 and the SS in 1925. In 1929, he was appointed "Reichsführer-SS" by Hitler. Over the next 16 years, he; Heinrich Himmler // officers leeway to act on their own initiative to obtain the desired results. In 2008, the German news magazine "Der Spiegel" described Himmler as one of the most brutal mass murderers in history, and the architect of the Holocaust. Informational notes Citations Bibliography Further reading Heinrich Himmler Heinrich Luitpold Himmler (; 7 October 1900 – 23 May 1945) was "Reichsführer" of the "Schutzstaffel" (Protection Squadron; SS), and a leading member of the Nazi Party (NSDAP) of Germany. Himmler was one of the most powerful men in Nazi Germany and among those most directly responsible for the Holocaust. As a member; Heinrich Himmler // on 23 May 1945. Heinrich Luitpold Himmler was born in Munich on 7 October 1900 into a conservative middle-class Roman Catholic family. His father was Joseph Gebhard Himmler (17 May 1865 – 29 October 1936), a teacher, and his mother was Anna Maria Himmler (née Heyder; 16 January 1866 – 10 September 1941), a devout Roman Catholic. Heinrich had two brothers, Gebhard Ludwig (29 July 1898 – 1982) and Ernst Hermann (23 December 1905 – 2 May 1945). Himmler's first name, Heinrich, was that of his godfather, Prince Heinrich of Bavaria, a member of the royal family of Bavaria, who; Heinrich Himmler // unit. Convinced that Himmler was the man for the job, Hitler appointed him Deputy "Reichsführer-SS", with the rank of "SS-Oberführer". Around this time, Himmler joined the Artaman League, a "Völkisch" youth group. There he met Rudolf Höss, who was later commandant of Auschwitz concentration camp, and Walther Darré, whose book, "The Peasantry as the Life Source of the Nordic Race", caught Hitler's attention, leading to his later appointment as Reich Minister of Food and Agriculture. Darré was a firm believer in the superiority of the Nordic race, and his philosophy was a major influence on Himmler. Upon the resignation of; Heinrich Himmler // developed the SS from a mere 290-man battalion into a million-strong paramilitary group, and, following Hitler's orders, set up and controlled the Nazi concentration camps. He was known for good organisational skills and for selecting highly competent subordinates, such as Reinhard Heydrich in 1931. From 1943 onwards, he was both Chief of German Police and Minister of the Interior, overseeing all internal and external police and security forces, including the Gestapo (Secret State Police). Himmler had a lifelong interest in occultism, interpreting Germanic neopagan and "Völkisch" beliefs to promote the racial policy of Nazi Germany, and incorporating esoteric symbolism and [sep] knowledge2: Heinrich Himmler: Heinrich Luitpold Himmler (German: [ˈhaɪnʁɪç ˈluːɪtpɔlt ˈhɪmlɐ] ⓘ; 7 October 1900 – 23 May 1945) was the Reichsführer of the Schutzstaffel (Protection Squadron; SS), a leading member of the Nazi Party of Germany, and one of the most powerful men in Nazi Germany, primarily known for being a main architect of the Holocaust. ; Heinrich Himmler: As a member of a reserve battalion during the First World War, Himmler did not see active service or combat. Having joined the Nazi Party in 1923 and the SS in 1925, he was appointed Reichsführer-SS by Adolf Hitler in 1929. Over the next sixteen years, Himmler developed the SS from a 290-man battalion into a million-strong paramilitary group. He was known for good organisational skills and for selecting highly competent subordinates, such as Reinhard Heydrich in 1931. From 1943 onwards, he was both Chief of the Kriminalpolizei (Criminal Police) and Minister of the Interior, overseeing all internal and external police and security forces, including the Gestapo (Secret State Police). He also controlled the Waffen-SS, the military branch of the SS.  ; Heinrich Himmler: Himmler's interest in occultism and Völkisch topics influenced the development of the racial policy of Nazi Germany; he also incorporated esoteric symbolism and rituals into the SS. He was the principal overseer of Nazi Germany's genocidal programs, forming the Einsatzgruppen and administering extermination camps. In this capacity, Himmler directed the killing of some six million Jews, between 200,000 and 500,000 Romani people, and other victims. A day before the launch of Operation Barbarossa, Himmler commissioned the drafting of Generalplan Ost, which was approved by Hitler in May 1942. Approximately 14 million people, mostly Polish and Soviet citizens, were killed by the Nazi regime during the implementation of Generalplan Ost. ; Heinrich Himmler: Late in the Second World War, Hitler briefly appointed Himmler as military commander and later Commander of the Replacement (Home) Army and General Plenipotentiary for the administration of the entire Third Reich (Generalbevollmächtigter für die Verwaltung). Specifically, he was given command of the Army Group Upper Rhine and the Army Group Vistula. After Himmler failed to achieve his assigned objectives, Hitler replaced him in these posts. Realising the war was lost, Himmler attempted to open peace talks with the western Allies without Hitler's knowledge, shortly before the end of the war. Hearing of this, Hitler dismissed him from all his posts in April 1945 and ordered his arrest. Himmler attempted to go into hiding but was detained and then arrested by British forces once his identity became known. While in British custody, he died by suicide on 23 May 1945. ; Heinrich Himmler: Heinrich Luitpold Himmler was born in Munich on 7 October 1900 into a conservative middle-class Roman Catholic family. His father was Joseph Gebhard Himmler (1865–1936), a teacher, and his mother was Anna Maria Himmler (née Heyder; 1866–1941), a devout Roman Catholic. Heinrich had two brothers: Gebhard Ludwig (1898–1982) and Ernst Hermann (1905–1945).[3]
knowledge1: PewDiePie // PewDiePie Felix Arvid Ulf Kjellberg ( ; ; born 24 October 1989), known online as PewDiePie ( ), is a Swedish YouTuber, comedian and video game commentator, formerly best known for his Let's Play commentaries and now mostly known for his comedic formatted shows. Born in Gothenburg, Sweden, PewDiePie originally pursued a degree in industrial economics and technology management at Chalmers University of Technology in Gothenburg. In 2010, during his time at the university, he registered a YouTube account under the name PewDiePie. The following year, he dropped out of Chalmers after losing interest in his degree field, much to; PewDiePie // in their articles caused him to gain almost 14,000. He also discussed a journalist's use of a completely coincidental occurrence of him unknowingly walking past a player with an anti-Semitic username and avatar in a video game to paint him as normalizing white supremacy and anti-Semitism. Since breaking through on YouTube with his Let's Play-styled videos, PewDiePie has emerged as one of the most noted and influential online personalities. In September 2014, Rob Walker of "Yahoo!" called PewDiePie's popularity "insane", writing, that it "strikes me as considerably more curious – I mean, you know who Rihanna is, but would you; PewDiePie // disorienting and insistently unserious political identity: He became YouTube's very own populist reactionary." Over a year after the controversy, MacInnes opined that PewDiePie "is funny, intelligent, innovative and highly charismatic [...] to call him an alt-right agitator would perhaps be unfair as he has never publicly identified with the proto-fascist movement. But he shares much of their culture and amplifies it across the world. People should pay PewDiePie more attention." PewDiePie has been noted to support video games from indie developers, often playing through them in his videos. His commentaries have had a positive effect on sales of indie games,; PewDiePie // a guy making jokes on the Internet." In September, Justin Charity of "The Ringer" stated, "PewDiePie isn't a comedian in any conventional sense," but described his "hosting style [as] loopy and irreverent in the extreme: He's a little bit stand-up, a little bit shock jock, a little bit 4chan bottom-feeder." PewDiePie originally registered a YouTube account under the name "Pewdie" in 2006; he explained that "pew" represents the sound of lasers and "die" means death. After forgetting the password to this account, he registered the "PewDiePie" YouTube channel on 29 April 2010. After he dropped out of Chalmers, his parents; PewDiePie // YouTube because I was bored, not to become famous." In June 2016, Kjellberg announced he had been evicted from his recording studio after his landlord confronted him for being too loud. Kjellberg has stated on his YouTube channel that he is an agnostic atheist. PewDiePie Felix Arvid Ulf Kjellberg ( ; ; born 24 October 1989), known online as PewDiePie ( ), is a Swedish YouTuber, comedian and video game commentator, formerly best known for his Let's Play commentaries and now mostly known for his comedic formatted shows. Born in Gothenburg, Sweden, PewDiePie originally pursued a degree in industrial economics [sep] knowledge2: PewDiePie: Felix Arvid Ulf Kjellberg (/ˈʃɛlbɜːrɡ/; SHEL-burg, Swedish: [ˈfěːlɪks ˈǎrːvɪd ɵlf ˈɕɛ̂lːbærj] ⓘ;[4] born 24 October 1989), better known as PewDiePie (/ˈpjuːdiːpaɪ/; PEW-dee-py), is a Swedish YouTuber known for his comedic videos. Kjellberg's popularity on YouTube and extensive media coverage have made him one of the most noted online personalities and content creators. He has been portrayed in the media as a figurehead for YouTube, especially in the genre of gaming.  ; PewDiePie: Felix Arvid Ulf Kjellberg was born on 24 October 1989 in Gothenburg, where he was also raised.[8][9] He was born to Lotta Kristine Johanna (née Hellstrand, born 1958) and Ulf Christian Kjellberg (born 1957), and grew up with his older sister, Fanny.[10] His mother, a former chief information officer (CIO), was named the 2010 CIO of the Year in Sweden.[10] His father is a corporate executive.[11] ; PewDiePie: During his childhood, Kjellberg was interested in art and has detailed that he would draw popular video game characters such as Mario and Sonic the Hedgehog, as well as play video games on his Super Nintendo Entertainment System, such as Star Fox and Donkey Kong Country 2: Diddy's Kong Quest.[12][13][14] During high school, he frequently played video games in his bedroom and would skip classes to join at an Internet café with friends.[12][13] During his last year of high school, he bought a computer with the money he made selling artwork through his grandmother's gallery.[12] ; PewDiePie: Kjellberg originally registered a YouTube account under the name "Pewdie" in December 2006; he explained that "pew" represents the sound of lasers and "die" refers to dying.[12][16][17] After initially forgetting the password to this account, he registered the "PewDiePie" YouTube channel on 29 April 2010.[16] Following his exit from Chalmers, his parents refused to financially support him,[16] so he funded his early videos by working as a harbor captain, selling prints of his Photoshop art, and working at a hot dog stand.[‡ 3][18] Kjellberg stated that the ability to make videos was more important to him than a prestigious career.[18] Five years later, Kjellberg recalled, "I knew people were big at other types of videos, but there was no one big in gaming, and I didn't know you could make money out of it. It was never like a career that I could just quit college to pursue. It was just something I loved to do."[18] ; PewDiePie: In his early years as a YouTube creator, Kjellberg focused on video game commentaries, most notably of horror and action video games.[19][20][21] Some of his earliest videos featured commentaries of mainstream video games including Minecraft and Call of Duty, although he was particularly noted for his Let's Plays of Amnesia: The Dark Descent and its related mods.[22][23] On these videos, Kjellberg has stated "I was so shy back then," and added, "It was so weird to me, sitting alone in a room talking into a microphone. That was unheard of back at the time. No one really did it."[13] Kjellberg's oldest video available for viewing is titled "Minecraft Multiplayer Fun".[22] Uploaded on 2 October 2010, the video is noted for containing mainly Swedish commentary from Kjellberg, rather than the English language he would later employ in his videos.[22] The video has amassed over 21 million video views as of August 2022.[‡ 4]
knowledge1: Jacques Cousteau // Jacques Cousteau Jacques-Yves Cousteau (; 11 June 1910 – 25 June 1997) was a French naval officer, explorer, conservationist, filmmaker, innovator, scientist, photographer, author and researcher who studied the sea and all forms of life in water. He co-developed the Aqua-lung, pioneered marine conservation and was a member of the Académie française. Cousteau described his underwater world research in a series of books, perhaps the most successful being his first book, "", published in 1953. Cousteau also directed films, most notably the documentary adaptation of the book, "The Silent World", which won a Palme d'or at the 1956 Cannes Film; Jacques Cousteau // environment. In a Chapter entitled "The Holy Scriptures and The Environment" in the posthumous work "The Human, the Orchid, and the Octopus", he is quoted as stating that "The glory of nature provides evidence that God exists". Jacques Cousteau has been portrayed in films: Jacques Cousteau Jacques-Yves Cousteau (; 11 June 1910 – 25 June 1997) was a French naval officer, explorer, conservationist, filmmaker, innovator, scientist, photographer, author and researcher who studied the sea and all forms of life in water. He co-developed the Aqua-lung, pioneered marine conservation and was a member of the Académie française. Cousteau described his underwater [sep] knowledge2: Jacques Cousteau: Jacques-Yves Cousteau, AC (/kuːˈstoʊ/, also UK: /ˈkuːstoʊ/, French: [ʒak iv kusto]; 11 June 1910 – 25 June 1997)[1] was a French naval officer,  oceanographer, filmmaker and author. He co-invented the first successful  open-circuit self-contained underwater breathing apparatus (SCUBA), called the Aqua-Lung, which assisted him in producing some of the first underwater documentaries. ; Jacques Cousteau: Cousteau wrote many books describing his undersea explorations. In his first book, The Silent World: A Story of Undersea Discovery and Adventure, Cousteau surmised the existence of the echolocation abilities of porpoises. The book was adapted into an underwater documentary called The Silent World. Co-directed by Cousteau and Louis Malle, it was one of the first films to use underwater cinematography to document the ocean depths in color. The film won the 1956 Palme d'Or at the Cannes Film Festival and remained the only documentary to do so until 2004 (when Fahrenheit 9/11 received the award). It was also awarded the Academy Award for Best Documentary in 1957. ; Jacques Cousteau: From 1966 to 1976, he hosted The Undersea World of Jacques Cousteau, a documentary television series, presented on American commercial television stations. A second documentary series, The Cousteau Odyssey, ran from 1977 to 1982 on public television stations. ; Jacques Cousteau: Jacques Cousteau ; Jacques Cousteau: Cousteau was born on 11 June 1910, in Saint-André-de-Cubzac, Gironde, France, to Daniel and Élisabeth Cousteau. He had one brother, Pierre-Antoine. Cousteau completed his preparatory studies at the Collège Stanislas in Paris. In 1930, he entered the École navale and graduated as a gunnery officer. However, an automobile accident, which broke both his arms, cut short his career in naval aviation. The accident forced Cousteau to change his plans to become a naval pilot, so he then indulged his passion for the ocean.[2]
knowledge1: Marcus Aurelius // Marcus Aurelius Marcus Aurelius (; ; 26 April 121 – 17 March 180 AD), called the Philosopher, was Roman emperor from . He ruled the Roman Empire with his adoptive brother, Lucius Verus, until Lucius' death in 169. He was the last of the rulers traditionally known as the Five Good Emperors. Marcus was born to Marcus Annius Verus III, the grandson of a Roman senator, and Domitia Lucilla, a wealthy heiress; both of his parents were patricians. After the death of Marcus' father while praetor in 124, the latter's father Marcus Annius Verus II raised Marcus with the help; Marcus Aurelius // supplement the literary sources. Marcus was born in Rome on 26 April 121. His name at birth was supposedly Marcus Annius Verus, but some sources assign this name to him upon his father's death and adoption by his grandfather, upon his coming of age, or at the time of his marriage. He may have been known as Marcus Annius Catilius Severus, at birth or at some point in his youth, or Marcus Catilius Severus Annius Verus. Upon his adoption by Antoninus as heir to the throne, he was known as Marcus Aelius Aurelius Verus Caesar and, upon his ascension, he; Marcus Aurelius // was Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Augustus until his death; Epiphanius of Salamis, in his chronology of the Roman emperors "On Weights and Measures", calls him "Marcus Aurelius Verus". Marcus' family originated in Ucubi, a small town southeast of Córdoba in Iberian Baetica. The family rose to prominence in the late 1st century AD. Marcus Aurelius' great-grandfather Marcus Annius Verus (I) was a senator and (according to the "Historia Augusta") ex-praetor; in 73–74, his grandfather, Marcus Annius Verus (II), was made a patrician. Verus' elder son—Marcus Aurelius' father—Marcus Annius Verus (III) married Domitia Lucilla. Lucilla was the daughter of the patrician P.; Marcus Aurelius // aristocratic villas. Marcus' grandfather owned a palace beside the Lateran, where he would spend much of his childhood. Marcus Aurelius thanks his grandfather for teaching him "good character and avoidance of bad temper". He was less fond of the mistress his grandfather took and lived with after the death of his wife, Rupilia Faustina. Marcus Aurelius was grateful that he did not have to live with her longer than he did. Marcus was educated at home, in line with contemporary aristocratic trends; He thanks Catilius Severus for encouraging him to avoid public schools. One of his teachers, Diognetus, a painting; Early life of Marcus Aurelius // imperial family. Marcus Aurelius conducted himself well at the job. Through Commodus, Marcus Aurelius met Apollonius of Chalcedon, a Stoic philosopher. Apollonius had taught Commodus, and would be an enormous impact on Marcus Aurelius, who would later study with him regularly. He is one of only three people Marcus Aurelius thanks the gods for having met. At about this time, Marcus Aurelius' younger sister, Annia Cornificia, married Ummidius Quadratus, her first cousin. Domitia Lucilla asked Marcus Aurelius to give part of his father's inheritance to his sister. He agreed to give her all of it, content as he was with [sep] knowledge2: Marcus Aurelius: Marcus Aurelius Antoninus (Latin: [ˈmaːrkʊs au̯ˈreːliʊs antoːˈniːnʊs]; English: /ɔːˈriːliəs/ aw-REE-lee-əs;[2] 26 April 121 – 17 March 180) was Roman emperor from 161 to 180 AD and a Stoic philosopher. He was a member of the Nerva–Antonine dynasty, the last of the rulers later known as the Five Good Emperors and the last emperor of the Pax Romana, an age of relative peace, calm, and stability for the Roman Empire lasting from 27 BC to 180 AD. He served as Roman consul in 140, 145, and 161. ; Marcus Aurelius: Marcus Aurelius was the son of the praetor Marcus Annius Verus and his wife, Domitia Calvilla. He was related through marriage to the emperors Trajan and Hadrian. Marcus's father died when he was three, and he was raised by his mother and paternal grandfather. After Hadrian's adoptive son, Aelius Caesar, died in 138, Hadrian adopted Marcus's uncle Antoninus Pius as his new heir. In turn, Antoninus adopted Marcus and Lucius, the son of Aelius. Hadrian died that year, and Antoninus became emperor. Now heir to the throne, Marcus studied Greek and Latin under tutors such as Herodes Atticus and Marcus Cornelius Fronto. He married Antoninus's daughter Faustina in 145. ; Marcus Aurelius: The major sources depicting the life and rule of Marcus Aurelius are patchy and frequently unreliable. The most important group of sources, the biographies contained in the Historia Augusta, claimed to be written by a group of authors at the turn of the 4th century AD, but it is believed they were in fact written by a single author (referred to here as 'the biographer') from about AD 395.[4] The later biographies and the biographies of subordinate emperors and usurpers are unreliable, but the earlier biographies, derived primarily from now-lost earlier sources (Marius Maximus or Ignotus), are considered to be more accurate.[5] For Marcus's life and rule, the biographies of Hadrian, Antoninus, Marcus, and Lucius are largely reliable, but those of Aelius Verus and Avidius Cassius are not.[6] ; Marcus Aurelius: Marcus was born in Rome on 26 April 121. His birth name is sometimes given as Marcus Annius Verus,[13] but sources assign this name to him upon his father's death and unofficial adoption by his grandfather, upon his coming of age.[14][15][16][17] He may have been known as "Marcus Annius Catilius Severus",[14][15][18] at birth or some point in his youth,[17] or "Marcus Catilius Severus Annius Verus". Upon his adoption by Antoninus as heir to the throne, he was known as "Marcus Aelius Aurelius Verus Caesar" and, upon his ascension, he was "Marcus Aurelius Antoninus Augustus" until his death;[19] Epiphanius of Salamis, in his chronology of the Roman emperors included in his On Weights and Measures, calls him Marcus Aurelius Verus.[20] ; Marcus Aurelius: Marcus's sister, Annia Cornificia Faustina, was probably born in 122 or 123.[36] His father probably died in 124, when Marcus was three years old during his praetorship.[37][note 2] Though he can hardly have known his father, Marcus wrote in his Meditations that he had learned 'modesty and manliness' from his memories of his father and the man's posthumous reputation.[39] His mother Lucilla did not remarry[37] and, following prevailing aristocratic customs, probably did not spend much time with her son. Instead, Marcus was in the care of 'nurses',[40] and was raised after his father's death by his grandfather Marcus Annius Verus (II), who had always retained the legal authority of patria potestas over his son and grandson. Technically this was not an adoption, the creation of a new and different patria potestas. Lucius Catilius Severus, described as Marcus's maternal great-grandfather, also participated in his upbringing; he was probably the elder Domitia Lucilla's stepfather.[17] Marcus was raised in his parents' home on the Caelian Hill, an upscale area with few public buildings but many aristocratic villas. Marcus's grandfather owned a palace beside the Lateran, where he would spend much of his childhood.[41] Marcus thanks his grandfather for teaching him 'good character and avoidance of bad temper'.[42] He was less fond of the mistress his grandfather took and lived with after the death of his wife Rupilia.[43] Marcus was grateful that he did not have to live with her longer than he did.[44]
knowledge1: George VI // George VI George VI (Albert Frederick Arthur George; 14 December 1895 – 6 February 1952) was King of the United Kingdom and the Dominions of the British Commonwealth from 11 December 1936 until his death in 1952. He was the last Emperor of India and the first Head of the Commonwealth. Known publicly as Albert until his accession, and "Bertie" among his family and close friends, George VI was born in the reign of his great-grandmother Queen Victoria, and was named after his great-grandfather Albert, Prince Consort. As the second son of King George V, he was not expected to; George VI // Duke of York, and then later awarded to his grandson Prince Andrew, Duke of York. As king, he bore the royal arms undifferenced. George VI George VI (Albert Frederick Arthur George; 14 December 1895 – 6 February 1952) was King of the United Kingdom and the Dominions of the British Commonwealth from 11 December 1936 until his death in 1952. He was the last Emperor of India and the first Head of the Commonwealth. Known publicly as Albert until his accession, and "Bertie" among his family and close friends, George VI was born in the reign of his great-grandmother Queen; George VI // "The King's Speech", a 2010 film that won the Academy Award for Best Picture. George held a number of titles throughout his life, as successively great-grandson, grandson and son of the monarch. As sovereign, he was referred to most often as simply "The King" or "His Majesty". In his position as sovereign, George automatically held the position of Commander-in-Chief. As Duke of York, George bore the royal arms of the United Kingdom differenced with a label of three points argent, the centre point bearing an anchor azure – a difference earlier awarded to his father, George V, when he was; George VI // again". He became king at a point when public faith in the monarchy was at a low ebb. During his reign his people endured the hardships of war, and imperial power was eroded. However, as a dutiful family man and by showing personal courage, he succeeded in restoring the popularity of the monarchy. The George Cross and the George Medal were founded at the King's suggestion during the Second World War to recognise acts of exceptional civilian bravery. He bestowed the George Cross on the entire "island fortress of Malta" in 1943. He was posthumously awarded the Ordre de la; George VI // the Commonwealth in 1949, and India became a republic within the Commonwealth the following year. George adopted the new title of Head of the Commonwealth. He was beset by smoking-related health problems in the later years of his reign. He was succeeded by his elder daughter, Elizabeth II. George was born at York Cottage, on the Sandringham Estate in Norfolk, during the reign of his great-grandmother Queen Victoria. His father was Prince George, Duke of York (later King George V), the second and eldest-surviving son of the Prince and Princess of Wales (later King Edward VII and Queen Alexandra). His [sep] knowledge2: George VI: George VI (Albert Frederick Arthur George; 14 December 1895 – 6 February 1952) was King of the United Kingdom and the Dominions of the British Commonwealth from 11 December 1936 until his death on 6 February 1952. He was also the last Emperor of India from 1936 until the British Raj was dissolved in August 1947, and the first head of the Commonwealth following the London Declaration of 1949. ; George VI: The future George VI was born during the reign of his great-grandmother Queen Victoria; he was named Albert at birth after his great-grandfather Prince Albert of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha and was known as "Bertie" to his family and close friends. His father ascended the throne as George V in 1910. As the second son of the king, Albert was not expected to inherit the throne. He spent his early life in the shadow of his elder brother, Edward, the heir apparent. Albert attended naval college as a teenager and served in the Royal Navy and Royal Air Force during the First World War. In 1920, he was made Duke of York. He married Lady Elizabeth Bowes-Lyon in 1923, and they had two daughters, Elizabeth and Margaret. In the mid-1920s, he engaged speech therapist Lionel Logue to treat his stutter, which he learned to manage to some degree. His elder brother ascended the throne as Edward VIII after their father died in 1936, but Edward abdicated later that year to marry the twice-divorced American socialite Wallis Simpson. As heir presumptive to Edward VIII, Albert became king, taking the regnal name George VI. ; George VI: In September 1939, the British Empire and most Commonwealth countries—but not Ireland—declared war on Nazi Germany, following the invasion of Poland. War with the Kingdom of Italy and the Empire of Japan followed in 1940 and 1941, respectively. George VI was seen as sharing the hardships of the common people and his popularity soared. Buckingham Palace was bombed during the Blitz while the King and Queen were there, and his younger brother the Duke of Kent was killed on active service. George became known as a symbol of British determination to win the war. Britain and its allies were victorious in 1945, but the British Empire declined. Ireland had largely broken away, followed by the independence of India and Pakistan in 1947. George relinquished the title of Emperor of India in June 1948 and instead adopted the new title of Head of the Commonwealth. He was beset by smoking-related health problems in the later years of his reign and died at Sandringham House, aged 56, of a coronary thrombosis in 1952. He was succeeded by his elder daughter, Elizabeth II. ; George VI: Albert was born at York Cottage, on the Sandringham Estate in Norfolk, during the reign of his great-grandmother Queen Victoria.[1] His father was Prince George, Duke of York (later King George V), the second and only surviving son of the Prince and Princess of Wales (later King Edward VII and Queen Alexandra). His mother, the Duchess of York (later Queen Mary), was the eldest child and only daughter of Francis, Duke of Teck, and Princess Mary Adelaide, Duchess of Teck.[2] His birthday, 14 December 1895, was the 34th anniversary of the death of his great-grandfather Albert, Prince Consort.[3] Uncertain of how the Prince Consort's widow, Queen Victoria, would take the news of the birth, the Prince of Wales wrote to the Duke of York that the Queen had been "rather distressed". Two days later, he wrote again: "I really think it would gratify her if you yourself proposed the name Albert to her."[4] ; George VI: Albert was ill often and was described as "easily frightened and somewhat prone to tears".[9] His parents were generally removed from their children's day-to-day upbringing, as was the norm in aristocratic families of that era. He had a stutter that lasted for many years. Although naturally left-handed, he was forced to write with his right hand, as was common practice at the time.[10] He had chronic stomach problems as well as knock knees, for which he was forced to wear painful corrective splints.[11]
knowledge1: Richard Burton // Richard Burton Richard Burton, CBE (; born Richard Walter Jenkins Jr.; 10 November 19255 August 1984) was a Welsh actor. Noted for his mellifluous baritone voice, Burton established himself as a formidable Shakespearean actor in the 1950s, and he gave a memorable performance of Hamlet in 1964. He was called "the natural successor to Olivier" by critic and dramaturge Kenneth Tynan. An alcoholic, Burton's failure to live up to those expectations disappointed critics and colleagues and fuelled his legend as a great thespian wastrel. Burton was nominated for an Academy Award seven times, but never won an Oscar. He was; Richard Burton // was inducted into the Theater Hall of Fame. Selected works, based on award nominations |- !colspan="3" style="background:#C1D8FF;"| Husband of Elizabeth Taylor Richard Burton Richard Burton, CBE (; born Richard Walter Jenkins Jr.; 10 November 19255 August 1984) was a Welsh actor. Noted for his mellifluous baritone voice, Burton established himself as a formidable Shakespearean actor in the 1950s, and he gave a memorable performance of Hamlet in 1964. He was called "the natural successor to Olivier" by critic and dramaturge Kenneth Tynan. An alcoholic, Burton's failure to live up to those expectations disappointed critics and colleagues and fuelled his legend [sep] knowledge2: Richard Burton: Richard Burton CBE (/ˈbɜːrtən/; born Richard Walter Jenkins Jr.; 10 November 1925 – 5 August 1984) was a Welsh actor.[1] ; Richard Burton: Burton was nominated for an Academy Award seven times, but never won. He was nominated for his performances in My Cousin Rachel (1952), The Robe (1953), Becket (1964), The Spy Who Came In from the Cold (1965), Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf? (1966), Anne of the Thousand Days (1969), and Equus (1977). He received numerous accolades including a BAFTA Award, a Golden Globe Award, and a Grammy Award. He received the Tony Award for Best Actor in a Musical for his portrayal of King Arthur in the Lerner and Loewe musical Camelot (1960). ; Richard Burton: Burton was born Richard Walter Jenkins Jr. on 10 November 1925 in a house at 2 Dan-y-bont in Pontrhydyfen, Glamorgan, Wales.[11][12] He was the twelfth of thirteen children born into the Welsh-speaking family of Richard Walter Jenkins Sr. (1876–1957), and Edith Maude Jenkins (née Thomas; 1883–1927).[13] Jenkins Sr., called Daddy Ni by the family, was a coal miner, while his mother worked as a barmaid at a pub called the Miner's Arms in the village, where she met and married her husband.[14] According to biographer Melvyn Bragg, Richard is quoted saying that Daddy Ni was a "twelve-pints-a-day man" who sometimes went off on drinking and gambling sprees for weeks, and that "he looked very much like me".[15] Jenkins Sr. was badly burned in a mining explosion and his father Thomas had been confined to a wheelchair after a mining accident.[16] ; Richard Burton: One day in 1964 when Richard [Burton] was playing in Hamlet on Broadway, he and I were interviewed jointly in a private corner of an Eighth Avenue bar and restaurant much frequented by theatre people. We had a live audience of one, Richard's wife, Elizabeth Taylor. One of the questions aimed at me was, "How did you come to adopt him?" [...] Richard jumped in with "He didn't adopt me; I adopted him." There was much truth in that. He needed me, and, as I realised later, he set out to get me. ; Richard Burton: In 1943, Burton played Professor Henry Higgins in a school production of another Shaw play directed by Philip, Pygmalion. The role won him favourable reviews and caught the attention of the dramatist, Emlyn Williams, who offered Burton a small role of the lead character's elder brother, Glan, in his play The Druid's Rest.[47] The play debuted at the Royal Court Theatre, Liverpool on 22 November 1943, and later premiered in St Martin's Theatre, London in January 1944. Burton thought the role was "a nothing part" and that he "hardly spoke at all". He was paid ten pounds a week for playing the role (equivalent to £469 in 2021), which was "three times what the miners got".[48] Alpert states that the play garnered mixed critical reviews, but James Redfern of the New Statesman took notice of Burton's performance and wrote: "In a wretched part, Richard Burton showed exceptional ability." Burton noted that single sentence from Redfern changed his life.[49]
knowledge1: Salt Bae // York's new branch of Nusr-Et only as a steakhouse, you'll probably be disappointed ... If, on the other hand, you appraise the place as dinner theater, you will find it satisfying — but only if Salt Bae is in the house". In December 2017, he received criticism for a 2016 photo posing in front of an image of Fidel Castro. In September 2018, Gökçe and the president of Venezuela Nicolás Maduro also received criticism for their actions at Gökçe's Istanbul restaurant which arose due to the crisis and shortages in Venezuela. Salt Bae Nusret Gökçe (, born in 1983), nicknamed [sep] knowledge2: Salt Bae: Nusret Gökçe (Turkish: [nusˈɾet ɟœcˈtʃe]; born 1983), nicknamed Salt Bae, is a Turkish butcher, chef, and restaurateur, whose technique for preparing and seasoning meat became an internet meme in January 2017. He founded Nusr-Et, a chain of luxury steak houses.[1] As of 2021[update], Nusr-Et has branches in Turkey, Greece, United States, United Kingdom, United Arab Emirates, Qatar, and Saudi Arabia. The name of the restaurant chain comes from his own name and "Et", which means "meat" in Turkish. ; Salt Bae: Nusret Gökçe was born in Paşalı [tr],[2] a village in Şenkaya district of Erzurum Province, to a Kurdish family.[3][4] His father, Faik, was a mineworker. The family's finances forced him to leave school in the sixth grade (aged 11–12) to work as a butcher's apprentice in the Kadıköy district of Istanbul.[5] ; Salt Bae: In January 2017 he became more widely known as Salt Bae through a series of viral internet videos and memes that show him "suavely" cutting meat and sprinkling salt,[8] such as "Ottoman Steak", posted on his restaurant's Twitter account.[9] The post was viewed 10 million times on Instagram, after which he was dubbed "Salt Bae" due to his peculiar way of sprinkling salt: dropping it from his fingertips to his forearm, and then onto the dish.[8] Due to the viral exposure gained from this post, Gökçe's profile has expanded enormously and he has served a wide range of celebrities and politicians from around the world.[10][11] ; Salt Bae: Despite the international fame, early professional reviews in 2018 of his New York City steakhouse were generally negative.[12][13] The New York Post's Steve Cuozzo called the restaurant "Public Rip-off No. 1" and Joshua David Stein writing in GQ called the steak mundane and the hamburgers overcooked.[12] Other critics described the dishes as "over-salted as they are overpriced",[14] the "meat was tough with globs of fat and gristle, and severely lacking in flavor",[15] and that "finishing a meal there constitutes some kind of personal victory over your own body and instincts and mouth".[16] Reviewers described the dining experience as "overpriced".[11][17] ; Salt Bae: However, for entertainment, reviewers were more positive.[18] Eater's Robert Sietsema states, "If you are intent on judging New York's new branch of Nusr-Et only as a steakhouse, you'll probably be disappointed ... If, on the other hand, you appraise the place as dinner theater, you will find it satisfying—but only if Salt Bae is in the house".[18]
knowledge1: Thierry Henry // Thierry Henry Thierry Daniel Henry (; born 17 August 1977) is a French professional football coach and former player who is the current manager of French club Monaco. Henry made his professional debut with Monaco in 1994. Good form led to an international call-up in 1998, after which he signed for defending Serie A champions Juventus. Limited playing time at Juve where he was played out of position on the wing allowed him to sign for Premier League club Arsenal for £11 million a year later. It was at Arsenal that Henry made his name as a world-class player, and; Thierry Henry // Ultimate Team in "FIFA 18". He was also a cover star for the Konami "Pro Evolution Soccer" video game series, and was featured on the covers of "Pro Evolution Soccer 4" to "Pro Evolution Soccer 6". Includes one appearance from the match against FIFA XI on 16 August 2000 which FIFA and the French Football Federation count as an official friendly match. Monaco Arsenal Barcelona New York Red Bulls France Individual Thierry Henry Thierry Daniel Henry (; born 17 August 1977) is a French professional football coach and former player who is the current manager of French club Monaco. Henry; Thierry Henry // reunited with his France 1998 World Cup winning teammates to play a charity game against an All-Star team which included Jamaican sprinter Usain Bolt, with proceeds going to the Mecenet Cardiac Charity and the Children of the World fund. In a 3–2 win for France, Henry played a trademark no-look one-two pass with Zinedine Zidane before scoring with a 20 yard curling strike. In 2006, Henry was valued as the ninth-most commercially marketable footballer in the world, and throughout his career he has signed many endorsements and appeared in commercials. At the beginning of his career, Henry signed with sportswear; Thierry Henry // television coverage of the Finals as well as to watch Allen Iverson, whom he named as one of his favourite players. Henry makes a short cameo appearance in the 2015 film "Entourage". Henry's part sees him walking a dog and having exchange with Ari Gold (character played by Jeremy Piven), who is an over-the-top Hollywood agent. Henry is a member of the UNICEF-FIFA squad, where together with other professional footballers he appeared in a series of TV spots seen by hundreds of millions of fans around the world during the 2002 and 2006 FIFA World Cups. In these spots, the; Thierry Henry // players promote football as a game that must be played on behalf of children. Having been subjected to racism in the past, Henry is an active spokesperson against racism in football. The most prominent incident of racism against Henry was during a training session with the Spanish national team in 2004, when a Spanish TV crew caught coach Luis Aragonés referring to Henry as "black shit" to José Antonio Reyes, Henry's teammate at Arsenal. The incident caused an uproar in the British media, and there were calls for Aragonés to be sacked. Henry and Nike started the Stand Up Speak [sep] knowledge2: Thierry Henry: Thierry Daniel Henry (French pronunciation: [tjɛʁi danjɛl ɑ̃ʁi]; born 17 August 1977) is a French professional football coach, pundit, sports broadcaster and former player. He is currently the manager of the France national under-21 team. He is considered one of the greatest strikers of all time,[4][5][6][7][8] and one of the greatest players in Premier League history. He has been named by Arsenal as the club's greatest ever player.[9] Henry was runner-up for both the Ballon d'Or in 2003 and the FIFA World Player of the Year in 2003 and 2004. He was named the FWA Footballer of the Year a record three times, the PFA Players' Player of the Year a joint-record two times, and was named in the PFA Team of the Year six consecutive times. He was also included in the FIFA FIFPro World XI once and the UEFA Team of the Year five times. In 2004, Henry was named by Pelé in the FIFA 100 list of the world's greatest living players.[10] ; Thierry Henry: Henry made his professional debut with Monaco in 1994 before signing for defending Serie A champions Juventus. However, limited playing time, coupled with disagreements with the club's hierarchy, led to him signing for Premier League club Arsenal for £11 million in 1999. Under long-time mentor and coach Arsène Wenger, Henry became a prolific striker and Arsenal's all-time leading scorer with 228 goals in all competitions. He won the Premier League Golden Boot a record four times, won two FA Cups and two Premier League titles with the club, including one during an unbeaten Invincible season. Henry spent his final two seasons with Arsenal as club captain, leading them to the 2006 UEFA Champions League Final. Henry transferred to Barcelona in 2007 and in the 2008–09 season, he was a key part of the club's historic treble when they won La Liga, the Copa del Rey, and the UEFA Champions League. In 2010, he joined Major League Soccer (MLS) club New York Red Bulls and returned to Arsenal on loan for two months in 2012, before retiring in 2014. ; Thierry Henry: Henry had success with France, winning the 1998 FIFA World Cup, UEFA Euro 2000, and 2003 FIFA Confederations Cup. He was named French Player of the Year a record five times, named to the UEFA Euro 2000 Team of the Tournament, awarded both the 2003 FIFA Confederations Cup Golden Ball and Golden Shoe, and named to the 2006 FIFA World Cup All-Star Team. In October 2007, he became his country's record goalscorer, a record he held until December 2022.[11] After amassing 123 appearances and 51 goals, Henry retired from international football after the 2010 FIFA World Cup. ; Thierry Henry: After retiring, Henry transitioned into coaching. He began coaching Arsenal's youth teams in February 2015, in tandem with his work as a pundit for Sky Sports. In 2016, he was appointed as an assistant coach at Belgium, before assuming the role as the head coach at Monaco in 2018. He was relieved of his duties at Monaco in January 2019 and returned to MLS less than a year later to manage Montréal Impact. He led Montréal to the playoffs in the 2020 season before departing in 2021, returning to his role as an assistant coach for Belgium for a year and a half. ; Thierry Henry: Henry is of Antillean heritage:[12] his father, Antoine, is from Guadeloupe (La Désirade island), and his mother, Maryse, is from Martinique. He was born and raised in Les Ulis suburb of Paris which, despite sometimes being seen as a tough neighbourhood, provided good footballing facilities.[13][14] As a seven-year-old, Henry showed great potential, prompting Claude Chezelle to recruit him to the local club CO Les Ulis. His father pressured him to attend training, although the youngster was not particularly drawn to football.[2] He joined US Palaiseau in 1989, but after a year his father fell out with the club, so Henry moved to ES Viry-Châtillon and played there for two years.[12] US Palaiseau coach Jean-Marie Panza, Henry's future mentor, followed him there.[13]
knowledge1: Vladimir Lenin // Vladimir Lenin Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov (22 April 1870 – 21 January 1924), better known by the alias Lenin, was a Russian communist revolutionary, politician, and political theorist. He served as head of government of Soviet Russia from 1917 to 1924 and of the Soviet Union from 1922 to 1924. Under his administration, Russia and then the wider Soviet Union became a one-party communist state governed by the Russian Communist Party. Ideologically a Marxist, he developed political theories known as Leninism. Born to a wealthy middle-class family in Simbirsk, Lenin embraced revolutionary socialist politics following his brother's 1887 execution. Expelled from; Vladimir Lenin // such as Stalinism, Maoism, "Juche", Ho Chi Minh Thought, and Castroism. Conversely, many later Western communists such as Manuel Azcárate and Jean Ellenstein who were involved in the Eurocommunist movement expressed the view that Lenin and his ideas were irrelevant to their own objectives, thereby embracing a Marxist but not Marxist-Leninist perspective. Vladimir Lenin Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov (22 April 1870 – 21 January 1924), better known by the alias Lenin, was a Russian communist revolutionary, politician, and political theorist. He served as head of government of Soviet Russia from 1917 to 1924 and of the Soviet Union from 1922 to; Vladimir Lenin // Public Schools for the province, overseeing the foundation of over 450 schools as a part of the government's plans for modernisation. His dedication to education earned him the Order of St. Vladimir, which bestowed on him the status of hereditary nobleman. Lenin was born in Simbirsk on 22 April 1870 and baptised six days later; as a child, he gained the nickname of "Volodya," a dimunitive of Vladimir. He was one of eight children, having two older siblings, Anna (born 1864) and Alexander (born 1866). They were followed by three more children, Olga (born 1871), Dmitry (born 1874), and Maria; Vladimir Lenin // international communist movement. A controversial and highly divisive individual, Lenin is viewed by supporters as a champion of socialism and the working class, while critics on both the left and right emphasize his role as founder and leader of an authoritarian regime responsible for political repression and mass killings. Lenin's father, Ilya Nikolayevich Ulyanov, was from a family of serfs; his ethnic origins remain unclear, with suggestions being made that he was Russian, Chuvash, Mordvin, or Kalmyk. Despite this lower-class background he had risen to middle-class status, studying physics and mathematics at Kazan Imperial University before teaching at the Penza; Vladimir Lenin // been an ideological split, with revisionists like Eduard Bernstein advocating a peaceful, electoral path to socialism – Lenin remained devoted to violent revolution, attacking revisionist arguments in "A Protest by Russian Social-Democrats". He also finished "The Development of Capitalism in Russia" (1899), his longest book to date, which criticised the agrarian-socialists and promoted a Marxist analysis of Russian economic development. Published under the pseudonym of "Vladimir Ilin", upon publication it received predominantly poor reviews. After his exile, Lenin settled in Pskov in early 1900. There, he began raising funds for a newspaper, "Iskra" (""Spark""), a new organ of the Russian [sep] knowledge2: Vladimir Lenin: Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov[b] (22 April [O.S. 10 April] 1870 – 21 January 1924), better known as Vladimir Lenin,[c] was a Russian revolutionary, politician, and political theorist. He served as the first and founding head of government of Soviet Russia from 1917 to 1924 and of the Soviet Union from 1922 to 1924. Under his administration, Russia, and later the Soviet Union, became a one-party socialist state governed by the Communist Party. Ideologically a Marxist, his developments to the ideology are called Leninism. ; Vladimir Lenin: Born to an upper-middle-class family in Simbirsk, Lenin embraced revolutionary socialist politics following his brother's 1887 execution. Expelled from Kazan Imperial University for participating in protests against the Russian Empire's Tsarist government, he devoted the following years to a law degree. He moved to Saint Petersburg in 1893 and became a senior Marxist activist. In 1897, he was arrested for sedition and exiled to Shushenskoye in Siberia for three years, where he married Nadezhda Krupskaya. After his exile, he moved to Western Europe, where he became a prominent theorist in the Marxist Russian Social Democratic Labour Party (RSDLP). In 1903, he took a key role in the RSDLP ideological split, leading the Bolshevik faction against Julius Martov's Mensheviks. Following Russia's failed Revolution of 1905, he campaigned for the First World War to be transformed into a Europe-wide proletarian revolution, which, as a Marxist, he believed would cause the overthrow of capitalism and the rise of socialism. After the 1917 February Revolution ousted the Tsar and established a Provisional Government, he returned to Russia and played a leading role in the October Revolution, in which the Bolsheviks overthrew the new regime. ; Vladimir Lenin: Lenin's Bolshevik government initially shared power with the Left Socialist Revolutionaries, elected soviets, and a multi-party Constituent Assembly, although by 1918 it had centralised power in the new Communist Party. Lenin's administration redistributed land among the peasantry and nationalised banks and large-scale industry. It withdrew from the First World War by signing a treaty conceding territory to the Central Powers, and promoted world revolution through the Communist International. Opponents were suppressed in the Red Terror, a violent campaign administered by the state security services; tens of thousands were killed or interned in concentration camps. His administration defeated right and left-wing anti-Bolshevik armies in the Russian Civil War from 1917 to 1922 and oversaw the Polish–Soviet War of 1919–1921. Responding to wartime devastation, famine, and popular uprisings, in 1921 Lenin encouraged economic growth through the New Economic Policy. Several non-Russian nations had secured independence from the Russian Republic after 1917, but five were forcibly re-united into the new Soviet Union in 1922, while others repelled Soviet invasions. His health failing, Lenin died in Gorki, with Joseph Stalin succeeding him as the pre-eminent figure in the Soviet government. ; Vladimir Lenin: Lenin was born Vladimir Ilyich Ulyanov in Streletskaya Ulitsa, Simbirsk, now Ulyanovsk, on 22 April 1870, and baptised six days later;[2] as a child, he was known as Volodya the common nickname variant of Vladimir.[3] He was the third of eight children, having two older siblings, Anna (born 1864) and Alexander (born 1866). They were followed by three more children, Olga (born 1871), Dmitry (born 1874), and Maria (born 1878). Two later siblings died in infancy.[4] His father, Ilya Nikolayevich Ulyanov, was a devout member of the Russian Orthodox Church and baptised his children into it, although his mother, Maria Alexandrovna Ulyanova (née Blank), a Lutheran by upbringing, was largely indifferent to Christianity, a view that influenced her children.[5] ; Vladimir Lenin: Both of Lenin's parents were monarchists and liberal conservatives, being committed to the emancipation reform of 1861 introduced by the reformist Tsar Alexander II; they avoided political radicals and there is no evidence that the police ever put them under surveillance for subversive thought.[13] Every summer they holidayed at a rural manor in Kokushkino.[14] Among his siblings, Lenin was closest to his sister Olga, whom he often bossed around; he had an extremely competitive nature and could be destructive, but usually admitted his misbehaviour.[15] A keen sportsman, he spent much of his free time outdoors or playing chess, and excelled at school, the disciplinarian and conservative Simbirsk Classical Gymnasium.[16]
knowledge1: Nelson Mandela // Nelson Mandela Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela (; ; 18 July 1918 – 5 December 2013) was a South African anti-apartheid revolutionary, political leader, and philanthropist who served as President of South Africa from 1994 to 1999. He was the country's first black head of state and the first elected in a fully representative democratic election. His government focused on dismantling the legacy of apartheid by tackling institutionalised racism and fostering racial reconciliation. Ideologically an African nationalist and socialist, he served as President of the African National Congress (ANC) party from 1991 to 1997. A Xhosa, Mandela was born to the Thembu; Nelson Mandela // in "Invictus" and other films, "the America film industry" has played a significant part in "the crafting of Mandela's global image". Nelson Mandela Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela (; ; 18 July 1918 – 5 December 2013) was a South African anti-apartheid revolutionary, political leader, and philanthropist who served as President of South Africa from 1994 to 1999. He was the country's first black head of state and the first elected in a fully representative democratic election. His government focused on dismantling the legacy of apartheid by tackling institutionalised racism and fostering racial reconciliation. Ideologically an African nationalist and socialist, he served; Nelson Mandela // and reconcile with apartheid's supporters, he gained international acclaim for his activism. Widely regarded as an icon of democracy and social justice, he received more than 250 honours—including the Nobel Peace Prize—and became the subject of a cult of personality. He is held in deep respect within South Africa, where he is often referred to by his Xhosa clan name, Madiba, and described as the "Father of the Nation". Mandela was born on 18 July 1918 in the village of Mvezo in Umtata, then part of South Africa's Cape Province. Given the forename Rolihlahla, a Xhosa term colloquially meaning "troublemaker",; Nelson Mandela // Mandela married his third wife, Graça Machel, on his 80th birthday in July 1998. By the time of his death, within South Africa Mandela was widely considered both "the father of the nation" and "the founding father of democracy". Outside of South Africa, he was a "global icon", with the scholar of South African studies Rita Barnard describing him as "one of the most revered figures of our time". One biographer considered him "a modern democratic hero", while his popularity resulted in a cult of personality building up around him. Some have portrayed Mandela in messianic terms, in contrast to; Nelson Mandela // his own statement that "I was not a messiah, but an ordinary man who had become a leader because of extraordinary circumstances." He is often cited alongside Mahatma Gandhi and Martin Luther King, Jr. as one of the 20th century's exemplary anti-racist and anti-colonial leaders. Boehmer described him as "a totem of the totemic values of our age: toleration and liberal democracy" and "a universal symbol of social justice". Mandela's international fame had emerged during his incarceration in the 1980s, when he became the world's most famous prisoner, a symbol of the anti-apartheid cause, and an icon for millions who [sep] knowledge2: Nelson Mandela: Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela (/mænˈdɛlə/ man-DEH-lə;[1] Xhosa: [xolíɬaɬa mandɛ̂ːla]; born Rolihlahla Mandela; 18 July 1918 – 5 December 2013) was a South African anti-apartheid activist and politician who served as the first president of South Africa from 1994 to 1999. He was the country's first black head of state and the first elected in a fully representative democratic election. His government focused on dismantling the legacy of apartheid by fostering racial reconciliation. Ideologically an African nationalist and socialist, he served as the president of the African National Congress (ANC) party from 1991 to 1997. ; Nelson Mandela: Mandela served 27 years in prison, split between Robben Island, Pollsmoor Prison and Victor Verster Prison. Amid growing domestic and international pressure and fears of racial civil war, President F. W. de Klerk released him in 1990. Mandela and de Klerk led efforts to negotiate an end to apartheid, which resulted in the 1994 multiracial general election in which Mandela led the ANC to victory and became president. Leading a broad coalition government which promulgated a new constitution, Mandela emphasised reconciliation between the country's racial groups and created the Truth and Reconciliation Commission to investigate past human rights abuses. Economically, his administration retained its predecessor's liberal framework despite his own socialist beliefs, also introducing measures to encourage land reform, combat poverty and expand healthcare services. Internationally, Mandela acted as mediator in the Pan Am Flight 103 bombing trial and served as secretary-general of the Non-Aligned Movement from 1998 to 1999. He declined a second presidential term and was succeeded by his deputy, Thabo Mbeki. Mandela became an elder statesman and focused on combating poverty and HIV/AIDS through the charitable Nelson Mandela Foundation. ; Nelson Mandela: Mandela was a controversial figure for much of his life. Although critics on the right denounced him as a communist terrorist and those on the far left deemed him too eager to negotiate and reconcile with apartheid's supporters, he gained international acclaim for his activism. Globally regarded as an icon of democracy and social justice, he received more than 250 honours, including the Nobel Peace Prize. He is held in deep respect within South Africa, where he is often referred to by his Thembu clan name, Madiba, and described as the "Father of the Nation". ; Nelson Mandela: Mandela was born on 18 July 1918 in the village of Mvezo in Umtata, then part of South Africa's Cape Province.[2] Given the forename Rolihlahla,[a] a Xhosa term colloquially meaning "troublemaker",[5] in later years he became known by his clan name, Madiba.[6] His patrilineal great-grandfather, Ngubengcuka, was ruler of the Thembu Kingdom in the Transkeian Territories of South Africa's modern Eastern Cape province.[7] One of Ngubengcuka's sons, named Mandela, was Nelson's grandfather and the source of his surname.[8] Because Mandela was the king's child by a wife of the Ixhiba clan, a so-called "Left-Hand House", the descendants of his cadet branch of the royal family were morganatic, ineligible to inherit the throne but recognised as hereditary royal councillors.[9] ; Nelson Mandela: Nelson Mandela's father, Gadla Henry Mphakanyiswa Mandela (1880–1928), was a local chief and councillor to the monarch; he was appointed to the position in 1915, after his predecessor was accused of corruption by a governing white magistrate.[10] In 1926, Gadla was also sacked for corruption, but Nelson was told that his father had lost his job for standing up to the magistrate's unreasonable demands.[11] A devotee of the god Qamata,[12] Gadla was a polygamist with four wives, four sons and nine daughters, who lived in different villages. Nelson's mother was Gadla's third wife, Nosekeni Fanny, daughter of Nkedama of the Right Hand House and a member of the amaMpemvu clan of the Xhosa.[13]
knowledge1: Ricky Martin // Ricky Martin Enrique "Ricky" Martín Morales (born December 24, 1971) is a Puerto Rican singer, actor and author. He is regarded as the King of Latin Pop. He holds dual American and Spanish citizenship. Martin began his career at age 12 with the all-boy pop group Menudo. After five years with the group, he released several Spanish-language solo albums throughout the 1990s. He also acted on stage and on TV in Mexico, where he achieved modest stardom. In 1994, he appeared on the US TV soap opera "General Hospital", playing a Puerto Rican singer. In early 1999, after releasing several; Ricky Martin // world, and Martin wrote about it in his song "Asignatura Pendiente". Martin's view of President Bush changed over the Iraq War, as expressed in his declaration to the Associated Press that he will "always condemn war and those who promulgate it." During his appearance at the "Billboard" Latin Music Awards on April 29, 2010, Martin expressed his disagreement with the Arizona SB 1070 bill, a proposed law that would have required police officers to request documents from individuals who they suspect to be illegal immigrants. Ricky Martin Enrique "Ricky" Martín Morales (born December 24, 1971) is a Puerto Rican singer,; Ricky Martin // His first English-language album (also titled "Ricky Martin"), has sold 22 million copies and is one of the best selling albums of all time. His other studio albums include: "Me Amarás" (1993), "A Medio Vivir" (1995), "Vuelve" (1998), "Sound Loaded" (2000), "Almas del Silencio" (2003), "Life" (2005), "Música + Alma + Sexo" (2011), and "A Quien Quiera Escuchar" (2015). In 2018, he portrayed Antonio D'Amico on "" for which he received a nomination for the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Supporting Actor in a Limited Series or Movie. Martin was born on December 24, 1971, in San Juan, Puerto Rico,; Ricky Martin // delivered a speech at the United Nations Homophobia Conference on November 12, 2012. Beginning April 2016, he started dating Jwan Yosef, a Syrian-Swedish painter of Kurdish and Armenian descent. The two announced their engagement on 16 November 2016, while on the "Ellen DeGeneres Show." In January 2018, Martin announced that he and Yosef are married. Martin is the founder of "Fundación Ricky Martin" ("Ricky Martin Foundation"), a non-profit organization. Among the events promoted by the foundation was a summer camp, which included Martin's personal participation. Martin has been honored with accolades including: Leadership in the Arts Award, "Billboard"'s Spirit of; Ricky Martin // interview with newspaper "ABC", described his origins as Spanish, of Basque and Canarian descent and that the Martín’s left Spain for Puerto Rico in 1779. He also has some Corsican heritage through his paternal grandmother. Martin grew up in a Roman Catholic home and was an altar boy throughout his childhood. He began singing at age 6, using wooden kitchen spoons as pretend microphones; he often interpreted songs by Menudo as well as English-language rock groups such as Led Zeppelin, Journey, and REO Speedwagon. His mother's side of the family was musically inclined, and his maternal grandfather was a poet, [sep] knowledge2: Ricky Martin: Enrique "Ricky" Martín Morales[a] (born December 24, 1971) is a Puerto Rican singer and songwriter. He is known for his musical versatility, with his discography incorporating a wide variety of many elements, such as Latin pop, dance, reggaeton, salsa, and other genres. Born in San Juan, Martin began appearing in television commercials at age nine and began his musical career at twelve, as a member of Puerto Rican boy band Menudo. He began his solo career in 1991 while in Sony Music Mexico, gaining recognition in Latin America with the release of his first two studio albums, Ricky Martin (1991) and Me Amaras (1993), both of which were focused on ballads. ; Ricky Martin: Martin has since released several successful albums, including Almas del Silencio (2003) and MTV Unplugged (2006), as well as Grammy Award winner A Quien Quiera Escuchar (2015). Notable singles in this period include "She Bangs", "Nobody Wants to Be Lonely", "Tal Vez", "Tu Recuerdo", "La Mordidita", "Vente Pa' Ca", and "Canción Bonita". As an actor, Martin took a role in the hit soap opera General Hospital (1994–1996), while his portrayal of Antonio D'Amico in The Assassination of Gianni Versace: American Crime Story (2018) garnered him an Emmy nomination. He also starred as Ché in the Broadway revival of the musical Evita in 2012. ; Ricky Martin: Martin is one of the best-selling Latin music artists of all time, having sold over 70 million records worldwide. He has scored 11 Billboard Hot Latin Songs number-one songs, and won two Grammy Awards, five Latin Grammy Awards, five MTV Video Music Awards, two American Music Awards, three Latin American Music Awards, three Billboard Music Awards, nine Billboard Latin Music Awards, eight World Music Awards, fourteen Lo Nuestro Awards, a Guinness World Record, and a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. His philanthropy and activism focus on LGBT rights and fighting against human trafficking; in 2004, he founded The Ricky Martin Foundation, a non-profit, non-governmental organization that focuses on denouncing human trafficking and educating about the crime's existence. ; Ricky Martin: Enrique Martín Morales was born on December 24, 1971, in San Juan, Puerto Rico.[1][2][3] His mother, Doña Nereida Morales, is a former accountant; his father, Enrique Martín Negroni, is a former psychologist who previously worked as a regional supervisor for a Puerto Rican mental-health agency.[4][5][6] His parents divorced when he was two years old, and although his mother had custody of Martin, he could also move freely between his father's house in the middle-class suburb of University Gardens in San Juan, and his paternal grandmother's house nearby. In an interview with People, he told the magazine that he "never had to make decisions" about who he loved more, and he was "always happy". Martin has two older maternal half-brothers, Fernando and Ángel Fernández, two younger paternal half-brothers, Eric and Daniel Martín, and a younger paternal half-sister, Vanessa Martín.[6][7] Martin has Spanish heritage of Basque and Canarian descent. As he explained to ABC, the Martins traveled from Spain to Puerto Rico in 1779.[8] He also has some Corsican origin through his paternal grandmother.[9] ; Ricky Martin: Martin grew up Catholic. The people closest to him called him "Kiki" (a nickname that comes from Enrique). He began singing at age six, using wooden kitchen spoons as make-believe microphones; he often sang songs by Puerto Rican boy band Menudo, as well as English-language rock groups such as Led Zeppelin, Journey, and REO Speedwagon. His mother's side of the family was musically inclined and his maternal grandfather was a poet. Martin later reflected on his time spent with his family as a child: "Every time I find myself in front of an audience, be it twenty people or one hundred thousand, once again I feel the energy that consumed me back at the family gatherings of my youth." He attended Colegio Sagrado Corazón, a bilingual Catholic grade school in University Gardens since fourth grade and was an "average" student there. When he was nine years old, he began appearing in television commercials for products such as soft drinks, toothpaste, and fast food restaurants, including Orange Crush and Burger King. In a year and a half, he starred in 11 commercials.[6][9][10]
knowledge1: Trevor Noah // Trevor Noah Trevor Noah (born 20 February 1984) is a South African television and radio host, political commentator, and comedian. He is known for hosting "The Daily Show", an American satirical news program on Comedy Central. Born in Johannesburg, Noah began his career as a comedian, presenter, and actor in his native South Africa in 2002. He held several television hosting roles with the South African Broadcasting Corporation (SABC), and was the runner-up in their fourth season of "Strictly Come Dancing" in 2008. From 2010 to 2011, Noah was the creator and host of "Tonight with Trevor Noah" on M-Net; Trevor Noah // himself a "progressive person", but not a "political progressive" and prefers not to be categorized as being either right or left in the context of US partisanship. Noah has been in a relationship with American model and singer Jordyn Taylor since 2015. Trevor Noah Trevor Noah (born 20 February 1984) is a South African television and radio host, political commentator, and comedian. He is known for hosting "The Daily Show", an American satirical news program on Comedy Central. Born in Johannesburg, Noah began his career as a comedian, presenter, and actor in his native South Africa in 2002. He held; Trevor Noah // 100 most influential people in the world. Trevor Noah was born on 20 February 1984 in Johannesburg, South Africa. His father Robert is of Swiss German ancestry, and his mother, Patricia Nombuyiselo Noah, is of Xhosa ancestry. She converted to Judaism when he was 10 or 11 years old, but did not have him convert, although she introduced him to some aspects and practices of Judaism. Under apartheid legislation, Noah's mother was classified as Black, and his father was classified as White, and Trevor was classified as Coloured. His parents' interracial relationship was illegal at the time of his birth; Trevor Noah // "Tonight with Trevor Noah" on MNet (for the second series, it moved to DStv's Mzansi Magic Channel). In 2010, Noah also became a spokesperson and consumer protection agent for Cell C, South Africa's third-largest mobile phone network provider. Noah has performed all over South Africa in "The Blacks Only Comedy Show", the "Heavyweight Comedy Jam", the "Vodacom Campus Comedy Tour", the Cape Town International Comedy Festival, the Jozi Comedy Festival, and "Bafunny Bafunny" (2010). His stand-up comedy specials in South Africa include "The Daywalker" (2009), "Crazy Normal" (2011), "That's Racist" (2012), and "It's My Culture" (2013). In 2011, he relocated; Trevor Noah // his comedy based on a handful of jokes is unfair. Trevor is a talented comedian with a bright future at Comedy Central." Mary Kluk, chairperson of the South African Jewish Board of Deputies (SAJBD), said that the jokes were not signs of anti-Jewish prejudice and that they were part of Noah's style of comedy. Noah's debut received positive reviews. James Poniewozik of "The New York Times" praised Noah and the show's writers saying, "Mr. Noah's debut was largely successful, it was also because of the operating system - the show's writing - running under the surface". Robert Lloyd of the [sep] knowledge2: Trevor Noah: Trevor Noah (born 20 February 1984) is a South African comedian, writer, producer, political commentator, actor, and former television host. He was the host of The Daily Show, an American late-night talk show and satirical news program on Comedy Central, from 2015 to 2022. Noah has won various awards, including a Primetime Emmy Award from 11 nominations.[1] He was named one of "The 35 Most Powerful People in New York Media" by The Hollywood Reporter in 2017 and 2018.[2][3] In 2018, Time magazine named him one of the hundred most influential people in the world.[4] In 2023, he won the Erasmus Prize.[5][6] ; Trevor Noah: Born in Johannesburg, Noah began his career in South Africa in 2002. He had several hosting roles with the South African Broadcasting Corporation (SABC) and was the runner-up in the fourth season of South Africa's iteration of Strictly Come Dancing in 2008.[7] From 2010 to 2011, he hosted the late-night talk show Tonight with Trevor Noah, which he created and aired on M-Net and DStv.[8] ; Trevor Noah: In 2014, Noah became the Senior International Correspondent for The Daily Show, and in 2015 succeeded long-time host Jon Stewart.[9] His autobiographical comedy book Born a Crime was published in 2016.[10][11][12][13] He hosted the 63rd,[14] the 64th,[15] 65th[16] and the 66th Annual Grammy Awards[17] as well as the 2022 White House Correspondents Dinner.[18] ; Trevor Noah: Trevor Noah was born on 20 February 1984, in Johannesburg, Transvaal (now Gauteng), South Africa.[19][20] His father, Robert, is Swiss-German, and his mother, Patricia Nombuyiselo Noah, is Xhosa.[21][22] ; Trevor Noah: Under apartheid legislation, Noah's mother was classified as Black, and his father was classified as White. Noah himself was classified as Coloured. At the time of his birth, his parents' interracial relationship was illegal, which Noah highlights in his autobiography. Interracial sexual relations and marriages were decriminalised a year after his birth, when the Immorality Act was amended in 1985. Patricia and her mother, Nomalizo Frances Noah, raised Trevor in the black township of Soweto.[23] Noah began his schooling at Maryvale College, a private Roman Catholic primary and high school in Maryvale, Gauteng, a suburb of Johannesburg.[24][25][26]
knowledge1: Cris Cyborg // Cris Cyborg Cristiane Justino Venâncio (formerly Cristiane Santos; born July 9, 1985) known professionally by her ring name Cris Cyborg, is a Brazilian-American mixed martial artist currently signed with the UFC. She is the current UFC Women's Featherweight Champion, as well as the former Strikeforce Women's Featherweight Champion and former Invicta FC World Featherweight Champion. Cyborg first rose to prominence when she won the Strikeforce title on August 15, 2009, by defeating Gina Carano via first-round technical knock-out (TKO). She lives in San Diego where she trains and teaches at The Arena. As of November 7, 2018, she is #11; Cris Cyborg // split in December 2011. She is a naturalized U.S. citizen, since late 2016. ! Result ! Rec ! Opponent ! Method ! Event ! Division ! Type ! Date ! Location Cris Cyborg Cristiane Justino Venâncio (formerly Cristiane Santos; born July 9, 1985) known professionally by her ring name Cris Cyborg, is a Brazilian-American mixed martial artist currently signed with the UFC. She is the current UFC Women's Featherweight Champion, as well as the former Strikeforce Women's Featherweight Champion and former Invicta FC World Featherweight Champion. Cyborg first rose to prominence when she won the Strikeforce title on August 15,; Cris Cyborg // in official UFC pound-for-pound rankings. Cyborg was a national-level team handball player in Brazil before being discovered by Rudimar Fedrigo, a Chute Boxe Academy trainer. She made her anticipated United States MMA debut on July 26, 2008, against Shayna Baszler at "". She won the fight by TKO in the second round. She faced Yoko Takahashi on October 4, 2008, at . She won the fight by unanimous decision. She was scheduled to face Dutch submission specialist Marloes Coenen at XMMA 7 on February 27, 2009, but backed out of the fight after signing a new contract with Strikeforce. Cyborg; Cris Cyborg // make her debut on April 5 at Invicta FC 5: Penne vs. Waterson against Ediane Gomes to determine who would move on to face Marloes Coenen. However, Gomes suffered an injury and Cyborg instead faced Fiona Muxlow. Cyborg was successful in her return, winning the bout via TKO in the first round. Cyborg faced Marloes Coenen in a rematch for the inaugural Invicta FC Featherweight Championship at on July 13, 2013. She defeated Coenen by TKO in the fourth round to become the first Invicta FC featherweight champion. She returned to Muay Thai to face Jennifer Colomb at "Lion Fight [sep] knowledge2: Cris Cyborg: Cristiane Justino Venâncio[1] (born July 9, 1985), known professionally by her ring name Cris Cyborg (and formerly by her married name Cristiane Santos), is a Brazilian-American[7] mixed martial artist who as of January 2021 competes in Bellator MMA, where she is the current Bellator Women's Featherweight Champion, having held the title since January 2020.[8] She is also a former UFC, Strikeforce and Invicta FC World Featherweight Champion.[9][10] She is the only MMA fighter in history to become a Grand Slam Champion, holding world championships across four major mixed martial arts promotions. Cyborg is widely regarded as one of the greatest female mixed martial artists of all time.[11] ; Cris Cyborg: Cyborg first rose to prominence when she won the Strikeforce title on August 15, 2009, by defeating Gina Carano via first-round technical knock-out (TKO).[12][13][14] ; Cris Cyborg: I was participating in a friendly handball tournament between men and women and one of the boys, called Jorginho, was a friend of Mestre Rafael and Mestre Rudimar. He saw me training handball and asked me if I liked fighting. I replied that I thought it was cool, but I had never done it. He invited me to take a Muay Thai class and I liked it!; Cris Cyborg: After losing her MMA debut, Cyborg earned her first victory in the sport by defeating Vanessa Porto via unanimous decision. She subsequently won her next three fights in the Brazilian promotion Storm Samurai via first-round TKO finish, improving her record to 4-1. ; Cris Cyborg: She was scheduled to face Dutch submission specialist Marloes Coenen at XMMA 7 on February 27, 2009, but backed out of the fight after signing a new contract with Strikeforce.[23] Cyborg earned a BJJ Purple Belt under her jiu-jitsu instructor Cristiano Marcello in 2009.[24]
knowledge1: Lionel Messi // Lionel Messi Lionel Andrés Messi Cuccittini (; born 24 June 1987) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a forward and captains both Barcelona and the Argentina national team. Often considered the best player in the world and regarded by many as one of the greatest players of all time, Messi has won a record-tying five Ballon d'Or awards, four of which he won consecutively, and a record five European Golden Shoes. He has spent his entire professional career with Barcelona, where he has won 33 trophies, including nine La Liga titles, four UEFA Champions League titles, and six; Lionel Messi // tax fraud and were handed suspended 21-month prison sentences and respectively ordered to pay €1.7 million and €1.4 million in fines. Facing the judge, he said, "I just played football. I signed the contracts because I trusted my dad and the lawyers and we had decided that they would take charge of those things." Barcelona Notes Citations Bibliography Lionel Messi Lionel Andrés Messi Cuccittini (; born 24 June 1987) is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a forward and captains both Barcelona and the Argentina national team. Often considered the best player in the world and regarded by many; Lionel Messi // Adidas boots, the Adidas Messi. As a commercial entity, Messi's marketing brand has been based exclusively on his talents and achievements as a player, in contrast to arguably more glamorous players like Cristiano Ronaldo and David Beckham. At the start of his career, he thus mainly held sponsorship contracts with companies that employ sports-oriented marketing, such as Adidas, Pepsi, and Konami. From 2010 onwards, concurrently with his increased achievements as a player, his marketing appeal widened, leading to long-term endorsement deals with luxury brands Dolce & Gabbana and Audemars Piguet. Messi is also a global brand ambassador for Gillette, Turkish; Lionel Messi // player; with the outside of his left foot, he usually begins dribbling runs, while he uses the inside of his foot to finish and provide passes and assists. A prolific goalscorer, Messi is known for his finishing, positioning, quick reactions, and ability to make attacking runs to beat the defensive line. He also functions in a playmaking role, courtesy of his vision and precise passing, and is an accurate free kick and penalty kick taker, though his ability on penalties has somewhat deteriorated in recent seasons. His pace and technical ability enable him to undertake individual dribbling runs towards goal,; Lionel Messi // from endorsements; "SportsPro" has consequently cited him as one of the world's most marketable athletes every year since their research began in 2010. His main sponsor since 2006 is the sportswear company Adidas. As Barça's leading youth prospect, he had been signed with Nike since age 14, but transferred to Adidas after they successfully challenged their rival's claim to his image rights in court. Over time, Messi established himself as their leading brand endorser; from 2008, he had a long-running signature collection of Adidas F50 boots, and in 2015, he became the first footballer to receive his own sub-brand of [sep] knowledge2: Lionel Messi: Lionel Andrés Messi[note 1] (Spanish pronunciation: [ljoˈnel anˈdɾes ˈmesi] ⓘ; born 24 June 1987), also known as Leo Messi, is an Argentine professional footballer who plays as a forward for and captains both Major League Soccer club Inter Miami and the Argentina national team. Widely regarded as one of the greatest players of all-time, Messi has won a record eight Ballon d'Or awards[note 2] and a record six European Golden Shoes, and in 2020 he was named to the Ballon d'Or Dream Team. Until leaving the club in 2021, he had spent his entire professional career with Barcelona, where he won a club-record 34 trophies, including ten La Liga titles, seven Copa del Rey titles and the UEFA Champions League four times.[note 3] With his country, he won the 2021 Copa América and the 2022 FIFA World Cup. A prolific goalscorer and creative playmaker, Messi holds the records for most goals in La Liga (474), most hat-tricks in La Liga (36) and the UEFA Champions League (eight), and most assists in La Liga (192) and the Copa América (17). He also has the most international goals by a South American male (106). Messi has scored over 800 senior career goals for club and country, and has the most goals by a player for a single club (672). ; Lionel Messi: Messi relocated to Spain from Argentina aged 13 to join Barcelona, for whom he made his competitive debut aged 17 in October 2004. He established himself as an integral player for the club within the next three years, and in his first uninterrupted season in 2008–09 he helped Barcelona achieve the first treble in Spanish football; that year, aged 22, Messi won his first Ballon d'Or. Three successful seasons followed, with Messi winning four consecutive Ballons d'Or, making him the first player to win the award four times. During the 2011–12 season, he set the La Liga and European records for most goals scored in a single season, while establishing himself as Barcelona's all-time top scorer. The following two seasons, Messi finished second for the Ballon d'Or behind Cristiano Ronaldo (his perceived career rival), before regaining his best form during the 2014–15 campaign, becoming the all-time top scorer in La Liga and leading Barcelona to a historic second treble, after which he was awarded a fifth Ballon d'Or in 2015. Messi assumed captaincy of Barcelona in 2018, and won a record sixth Ballon d'Or in 2019. Out of contract, he signed for French club Paris Saint-Germain in August 2021, spending two seasons at the club and winning Ligue 1 twice. Messi joined American club Inter Miami in July 2023, winning the Leagues Cup in August of that year. ; Lionel Messi: An Argentine international, Messi is the country's all-time leading goalscorer and also holds the national record for appearances. At youth level, he won the 2005 FIFA World Youth Championship, finishing the tournament with both the Golden Ball and Golden Shoe, and an Olympic gold medal at the 2008 Summer Olympics. His style of play as a diminutive, left-footed dribbler drew comparisons with his compatriot Diego Maradona, who described Messi as his successor. After his senior debut in August 2005, Messi became the youngest Argentine to play and score in a FIFA World Cup (2006), and reached the final of the 2007 Copa América, where he was named young player of the tournament. As the squad's captain from August 2011, he led Argentina to three consecutive finals: the 2014 FIFA World Cup, for which he won the Golden Ball, the 2015 Copa América, winning the Golden Ball, and the 2016 Copa América. After announcing his international retirement in 2016, he reversed his decision and led his country to qualification for the 2018 FIFA World Cup, a third-place finish at the 2019 Copa América, and victory in the 2021 Copa América, while winning the Golden Ball and Golden Boot for the latter. That same year, Messi received a seventh Ballon d'Or. In 2022, he led Argentina to win the 2022 FIFA World Cup, where he won a record second Golden Ball, scored seven goals including two in the final, and broke the record for most games played at the World Cup (26), later receiving his record-extending eighth Ballon d'Or in 2023. ; Lionel Messi: Messi has endorsed sportswear company Adidas since 2006. According to France Football, he was the world's highest-paid footballer for five years out of six between 2009 and 2014, and was ranked the world's highest-paid athlete by Forbes in 2019 and 2022. Messi was among Time's 100 most influential people in the world in 2011, 2012 and 2023. In 2020 and 2023, he was named the Laureus World Sportsman of the Year, with Messi being the first team-sport athlete to win the award. In 2020, Messi became the second footballer and second team-sport athlete to surpass $1 billion in career earnings. ; Lionel Messi: Messi was born on 24 June 1987 in Rosario, Santa Fe,[10] the third of four children of Jorge Messi, a steel factory manager, and his wife Celia Cuccittini, who worked in a magnet manufacturing workshop. On his father's side, he is of Italian and Spanish descent, the great-grandson of immigrants from the north-central Adriatic Marche region of Italy, and on his mother's side, he has primarily Italian ancestry.[3] Growing up in a tight-knit, football-loving family, "Leo" developed a passion for the sport from an early age, playing constantly with his older brothers, Rodrigo and Matías, and his cousins, Maximiliano and Emanuel Biancucchi, both of whom became professional footballers.[11] At the age of four he joined local club Grandoli, where he was coached by his father, though his earliest influence as a player came from his maternal grandmother, Celia, who accompanied him to training and matches.[12] He was greatly affected by her death, shortly before his eleventh birthday; since then, as a devout Roman Catholic, he has celebrated his goals by looking up and pointing to the sky in tribute to his grandmother.[13][14]
knowledge1: Ilhan Omar // Ilhan Omar Ilhan Omar (born October 4, 1981) is a Somali American politician from Minnesota. In 2016, she was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives as a member of the Democratic–Farmer–Labor Party, making her the first Somali American elected to legislative office in the United States. On November 6, 2018, Omar became the first Somali American elected to the United States Congress, representing Minnesota's 5th congressional district, which spans Minneapolis, Edina, Richfield, Golden Valley and other suburbs. Along with Democrat Rashida Tlaib of Michigan, she was one of the first Muslim women elected to Congress. Omar is also the; Ilhan Omar // film "Time for Ilhan", directed by Norah Shapiro, chronicles Omar's political campaign. It was selected to show at the Tribeca Film Festival and the Mill Valley Film Festival. Omar is Muslim and belongs to the Majeerteen clan from Northeastern Somalia. In 2002 Omar became engaged to marry Ahmed Hirsi (né Ahmed Aden). They applied for a marriage license, but the application was not finalized. The pair had two children together before separating in 2008. In 2009, Omar married Ahmed Nur Said Elmi, a British citizen. In 2011, she and Elmi had a faith-based divorce, and in 2017 the two were; Ilhan Omar // legally divorced. In 2011, she reconciled with Hirsi. They had a third child in 2012, and in 2018 they were legally married. Omar, Hirsi, and their three children live in the Cedar-Riverside neighborhood of Minneapolis. Ilhan Omar Ilhan Omar (born October 4, 1981) is a Somali American politician from Minnesota. In 2016, she was elected to the Minnesota House of Representatives as a member of the Democratic–Farmer–Labor Party, making her the first Somali American elected to legislative office in the United States. On November 6, 2018, Omar became the first Somali American elected to the United States Congress, representing Minnesota's; Ilhan Omar // first Somali American elected to Congress, and the first woman of color to serve as a U.S. Representative from Minnesota. Omar was born in on October 4, 1981, in Mogadishu and was raised in Baydhabo, Somalia. She was the youngest of seven siblings. Ilhan's father, Nur Omar Mohamed, is a Somali, and worked as a teacher trainer. Her mother was a Benadiri, and died when Omar was a child. She was thereafter raised by her father and grandfather. Ilhan's grandfather, Abukar, was the director of Somalia's National Marine Transport, with her uncles and aunts also working as civil servants and; Ilhan Omar // Omar ran on the Democratic–Farmer–Labor (DFL) ticket for the Minnesota House of Representatives. On August 9, Omar defeated Mohamud Noor and incumbent Phyllis Kahn in the DFL primary. Her chief opponent in the general election was Republican nominee Abdimalik Askar, also an activist in the Somali American community. In late August, Askar announced his withdrawal from the campaign. In November 2016, Omar won the general election, becoming the first Somali American legislator in the United States. Her term began on January 3, 2017. Jeff Cirillo of "Roll Call" has called Omar a "progressive rising star." She supports a $15 hourly [sep] knowledge2: Ilhan Omar: Ilhan Abdullahi Omar (born October 4, 1982) is an American politician serving as the U.S. representative for Minnesota's 5th congressional district since 2019. She is a member of the Democratic Party.[6] Before her election to Congress, Omar served in the Minnesota House of Representatives from 2017 to 2019, representing part of Minneapolis. Her congressional district includes all of Minneapolis and some of its first-ring suburbs. ; Ilhan Omar: Omar serves as deputy chair of the Congressional Progressive Caucus and has advocated for a $15 minimum wage, universal healthcare, student loan debt forgiveness, the protection of Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, and abolishing U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE). A frequent critic of Israel, Omar supports the Boycott, Divestment and Sanctions (BDS) movement and has denounced Israel's settlement policies and military campaigns in the occupied Palestinian territories, as well as what she describes as the influence of pro-Israel lobbies in American politics.[7][8][9] In February 2023, the Republican-controlled House voted to remove Omar from her seat on the Foreign Affairs Committee, citing past comments she had made about Israel and concerns over her objectivity.[10] ; Ilhan Omar: Omar is the first Somali American in the United States Congress and the first woman of color to represent Minnesota. She is also one of the first two Muslim women (along with Rashida Tlaib) to serve in Congress.[11][12] She has been the target of several death threats, as well as derogatory comments by political opponents, including Donald Trump, as a result of her background.[13][14] ; Ilhan Omar: Omar was born in Mogadishu, Somalia, on October 4, 1982,[15][16] and spent her early years in Baidoa, Somalia.[17][18] She was the youngest of seven siblings, including sister Sahra Noor. Her father, Nur Omar Mohamed, an ethnic Somali from the Majeerteen clan of Northeastern Somalia,[19] was a colonel in the Somali army under Siad Barre and also worked as a teacher trainer.[20][21] Her mother, Fadhuma Abukar Haji Hussein, a Benadiri, died when Ilhan was two.[22][23][24][25] She was raised by her father and grandfather, who were moderate Sunni Muslims opposed to the rigid Wahhabi interpretation of Islam.[26][27] Her grandfather Abukar was the director of Somalia's National Marine Transport, and some of Omar's uncles and aunts also worked as civil servants and educators.[21] She and her family fled Somalia to escape the Somali Civil War and spent four years in a Dadaab refugee camp in Garissa County, Kenya, near the Somali border.[28][29][30] ; Ilhan Omar: Omar's family secured asylum in the U.S. and arrived in New York in 1995,[31][32] then lived for a time in Arlington, Virginia,[24] before moving to and settling in Minneapolis,[24] where her father worked first as a taxi driver and later for the post office.[24] Her father and grandfather emphasized the importance of democracy during her upbringing, and at age 14 she accompanied her grandfather to caucus meetings, serving as his interpreter.[27][33] She has spoken about school bullying she endured during her time in Virginia, stimulated by her distinctive Somali appearance and wearing of the hijab. She recalls gum being pressed into her hijab, being pushed down stairs, and physical taunts while she was changing for gym class.[24] Omar remembers her father's reaction to these incidents: "They are doing something to you because they feel threatened in some way by your existence."[24] Omar became a U.S. citizen in 2000 when she was 17 years old.[34][24]
knowledge1: Dascha Polanco // Dascha Polanco Dascha Polanco (born December 3, 1982) is a Dominican American actress known for playing the character Dayanara "Daya" Diaz on the Netflix series "Orange Is the New Black". As of January 2018, she has a recurring role on "" as Detective Lori Weider. Polanco was born in Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic and moved to the United States at a young age. She was raised in Sunset Park, Brooklyn, New York and Miami by her father, a mechanic, and mother, a cosmetologist. Polanco is the oldest of three children; she has a brother and sister. Polanco has two children,; Dascha Polanco // had been promoted from a recurring role to a series regular for the show's third season, which was released in June 2015. She appeared in the comedy films "The Cobbler" (2014) and "Joy" (2015), and starred in the film "The Perfect Match" (2016). Dascha Polanco Dascha Polanco (born December 3, 1982) is a Dominican American actress known for playing the character Dayanara "Daya" Diaz on the Netflix series "Orange Is the New Black". As of January 2018, she has a recurring role on "" as Detective Lori Weider. Polanco was born in Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic and moved to the; Dascha Polanco // a daughter and a son. Her daughter portrayed a younger version of Polanco's character in the fifth season of "Orange is the New Black". Polanco aspired to be an actress from an early age but "always doubted auditioning because of [her] weight", so she completed a bachelor's degree in psychology at Hunter College. After college she began working in the healthcare industry with the intention of becoming a nurse. She was working in hospital administration at Montefiore Medical Center in the Bronx while studying nursing when she gained the courage to pursue acting again and registered herself with an acting; Dascha Polanco // studio. She attended BIH Studios in New York, and while there was signed by the talent agency Shirley Grant Management. Her first acting credits were minor parts on the television series "Unforgettable" and "NYC 22". In 2012, Polanco was cast in the Netflix series "Orange Is the New Black" as Dayanara "Daya" Diaz, an inmate in a women's prison; it was her first full-time acting job. Polanco subsequently appeared in the independent film "Gimme Shelter" (2013) before returning to her role on "Orange Is the New Black" for the show's second season. In June 2014, it was announced that she [sep] knowledge2: Dascha Polanco: Dascha Yolaine Polanco (born December 3, 1982)[1] is a Dominican-American actress. She is known for portraying the role of Dayanara "Daya" Diaz on the Netflix series Orange Is the New Black, and for the role of Cuca in the 2021 movie In the Heights.[2] ; Dascha Polanco: Polanco was born in Santo Domingo, Dominican Republic,[3][4] and moved to the United States at a young age.[5] She was raised in Sunset Park, Brooklyn, and Miami by her father, a mechanic, and mother, a cosmetologist.[6][7] Polanco is the oldest of three children; she has a brother and sister.[8] ; Dascha Polanco: Polanco aspired to be an actress from an early age but "always doubted auditioning because of [her] weight", so she completed a bachelor's degree in psychology at Hunter College, as a first generation college student.[7][9] After college she began working in the healthcare industry with the intention of becoming a nurse.[10][11] She was working in hospital administration at Montefiore Medical Center in the Bronx while studying nursing when she gained the courage to pursue acting again and registered herself with an acting studio.[7][11] She attended BIH Studios in New York, and while there was signed by the talent agency Shirley Grant Management.[12] Her first acting credits were minor parts in the television series Unforgettable and NYC 22.[13] ; Dascha Polanco: In 2012, Polanco was cast in the Netflix series Orange Is the New Black as Dayanara "Daya" Diaz.[14] ; Dascha Polanco: In 2013, Polanco appeared in the independent film Gimme Shelter before returning to her role on Orange Is the New Black for the show's second season.[7] In June 2014, it was announced that she had been promoted from a recurring role to a series regular for the show's third season, which was released in June 2015.[15] She appeared in the comedy films The Cobbler and Joy,[5] and starred in the film The Perfect Match.
knowledge1: Kaká (footballer, born 1981) // Kaká (footballer, born 1981) Claudiano Bezerra da Silva (born 16 May 1981), commonly known as Kaká (), is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays for Portuguese club Varzim S.C. as a central defender. Kaká was born in São José do Belmonte, Pernambuco. Until 2006 he was on contract to União Bandeirante Futebol Clube, also being loaned to several modest Brazilian clubs. For 2006–07 he made the move to Europe, joining Portuguese side Académica de Coimbra and being an undisputed starter in his second season in the Primeira Liga (all 30 games played, 2,700 minutes of action), as the "Students" finished [sep] knowledge2: Kaká: Kaka joined future MLS franchise Orlando City as their first Designated Player.[112] He stated that he had "always" wanted to play in the United States, and cited the Brazilian owner Flávio Augusto da Silva as a reason for signing. Until Orlando entered the league in 2015, Kaká was loaned to his first club São Paulo, which he called "really satisfying".[113][114]
knowledge1: Fidel Castro // Fidel Castro Fidel Alejandro Castro Ruz (; 13 August 1926 – 25 November 2016) was a Cuban Communist revolutionary and politician who governed the Republic of Cuba as Prime Minister from 1959 to 1976 and then as President from 1976 to 2008. A Marxist–Leninist and Cuban nationalist, Castro also served as the First Secretary of the Communist Party of Cuba from 1961 until 2011. Under his administration, Cuba became a one-party communist state, while industry and business were nationalized and state socialist reforms were implemented throughout society. Born in Birán, Oriente as the son of a wealthy Spanish farmer, Castro; Fidel Castro // death, Cuba's government announced that it would be passing a law prohibiting the naming of "institutions, streets, parks or other public sites, or erecting busts, statues or other forms of tribute" in honor of the late Cuban leader in keeping with his wishes to prevent a cult of personality from developing around him. Fidel Castro Fidel Alejandro Castro Ruz (; 13 August 1926 – 25 November 2016) was a Cuban Communist revolutionary and politician who governed the Republic of Cuba as Prime Minister from 1959 to 1976 and then as President from 1976 to 2008. A Marxist–Leninist and Cuban nationalist,; Fidel Castro // imperialism. Critics view him as a dictator whose administration oversaw human-rights abuses, the exodus of a large number of Cubans and the impoverishment of the country's economy. Castro was decorated with various international awards and significantly influenced different individuals and groups across the world. Castro was born out of wedlock at his father's farm on 13 August 1926. His father, Ángel Castro y Argiz, a veteran of the Spanish–American War, was a migrant to Cuba from Galicia, Northwest Spain. He had become financially successful by growing sugar cane at Las Manacas farm in Birán, Oriente Province. After the collapse of [sep] knowledge2: Fidel Castro: Fidel Alejandro Castro Ruz (/ˈkæstroʊ/ KASS-troh,[1] Latin American Spanish: [fiˈðel aleˈxandɾo ˈkastɾo ˈrus]; 13 August 1926 – 25 November 2016) was a Cuban revolutionary and politician who was the leader of Cuba from 1959 to 2008, serving as the prime minister of Cuba from 1959 to 1976 and president from 1976 to 2008. Ideologically a Marxist–Leninist and Cuban nationalist, he also served as the first secretary of the Communist Party of Cuba from 1965 until 2011. Under his administration, Cuba became a one-party communist state; industry and business were nationalized, and socialist reforms were implemented throughout society. ; Fidel Castro: Born in Birán, the son of a wealthy Spanish farmer, Castro adopted leftist and anti-imperialist ideas while studying law at the University of Havana. After participating in rebellions against right-wing governments in the Dominican Republic and Colombia, he planned the overthrow of Cuban president Fulgencio Batista, launching a failed attack on the Moncada Barracks in 1953. After a year's imprisonment, Castro travelled to Mexico where he formed a revolutionary group, the 26th of July Movement, with his brother Raúl Castro and Ernesto "Che" Guevara. Returning to Cuba, Castro took a key role in the Cuban Revolution by leading the Movement in a guerrilla war against Batista's forces from the Sierra Maestra. After Batista's overthrow in 1959, Castro assumed military and political power as Cuba's prime minister. The United States came to oppose Castro's government and unsuccessfully attempted to remove him by assassination, economic embargo, and counter-revolution, including the Bay of Pigs Invasion of 1961. Countering these threats, Castro aligned with the Soviet Union and allowed the Soviets to place nuclear weapons in Cuba, resulting in the Cuban Missile Crisis—a defining incident of the Cold War—in 1962. ; Fidel Castro: Fidel Alejandro Castro Ruz was born out of wedlock at his father's farm on 13 August 1926.[2] His father, Ángel Castro y Argiz, a veteran of the Spanish–American War,[3] was a migrant to Cuba from Galicia, in the northwest of Spain.[4] He had become financially successful by growing sugarcane at Las Manacas farm in Birán, then in Oriente Province (now Holguín Province).[5] After the collapse of his first marriage he took his household servant, Lina Ruz González  (1903–1963)—of Canarian ancestry—as his mistress and later second wife; together they had seven children, among them Fidel.[6] At age six, Castro was sent to live with his teacher in Santiago de Cuba,[7] before being baptized into the Roman Catholic Church at the age of eight.[8] Being baptized enabled Castro to attend the La Salle boarding school in Santiago, where he regularly misbehaved; he was next sent to the privately funded, Jesuit-run Dolores School in Santiago.[9] ; Fidel Castro: In 1942, Castro transferred to the Jesuit-run El Colegio de Belén in Havana.[10] Although Castro took an interest in history, geography, and debate at Belén, he did not excel academically, instead devoting much of his time to playing sports.[11] In 1945, Castro began studying law at the University of Havana.[12] Admitting he was "politically illiterate", Castro became embroiled in student activism[13] and the violent gangsterismo culture within the university.[14] After becoming passionate about anti-imperialism and opposing US intervention in the Caribbean,[15] he unsuccessfully campaigned for the presidency of the Federation of University Students on a platform of "honesty, decency and justice".[16] Castro became critical of the corruption and violence of President Ramón Grau's government, delivering a public speech on the subject in November 1946 that received coverage on the front page of several newspapers.[17] ; Fidel Castro: In April 1948, Castro travelled to Bogotá, Colombia, leading a Cuban student group sponsored by President Juan Perón's Argentine government. There, the assassination of popular leftist leader Jorge Eliécer Gaitán Ayala led to widespread rioting and clashes between the governing Conservatives—backed by the army—and leftist Liberals.[28] Castro joined the Liberal cause by stealing guns from a police station, but subsequent police investigations concluded that he had not been involved in any killings.[28] In April 1948, the Organization of American States was founded at a summit in Bogotá, leading to protests, which Castro joined.[29]
knowledge1: Bob Marley // Bob Marley Robert Nesta Marley, OM (6 February 1945 – 11 May 1981) was a Jamaican singer-songwriter who became an international musical and cultural icon, blending mostly reggae, ska, and rocksteady in his compositions. He started in 1963 with the group the Wailers and forged a distinctive songwriting and vocal style that became popular with audiences worldwide. The Wailers released some of the earliest reggae records with producer Lee "Scratch" Perry. The Wailers disbanded in 1974, and Marley pursued a solo career upon his relocation to England which culminated in the release of the album "Exodus" in 1977, which established; Bob Marley // your conscience, show up yourself clear, because herb make you meditate. Is only a natural t'ing and it grow like a tree." Marley saw marijuana usage as a vital factor in religious growth and connection with Jah, and as a way to philosophise and become wiser. Bob Marley Robert Nesta Marley, OM (6 February 1945 – 11 May 1981) was a Jamaican singer-songwriter who became an international musical and cultural icon, blending mostly reggae, ska, and rocksteady in his compositions. He started in 1963 with the group the Wailers and forged a distinctive songwriting and vocal style that became popular; Bob Marley // Miami at age 36 of melanoma. He was a committed Rastafari who infused his music with a sense of spirituality. He is credited with popularising reggae music around the world and served as a symbol of Jamaican culture and identity. He has become a global symbol and has inspired a significant merchandise industry. Bob Marley was born 6 February 1945 on the farm of his maternal grandfather in Nine Mile, Saint Ann Parish, Jamaica, to Norval Sinclair Marley (1885–1955) and Cedella Booker (1926–2008). Norval Marley was a white Jamaican originally from Sussex, England, whose family claimed Syrian Jewish origins. Norval; Bob Marley // at the Edinburgh International Film Festival. In October 2015, Jamaican author Marlon James' novel "A Brief History of Seven Killings", a fictional account of the attempted assassination of Marley, won the 2015 Man Booker Prize at a ceremony in London. Bob Marley was a member for some years of the Rastafari movement, whose culture was a key element in the development of reggae. Bob Marley became an ardent proponent of Rastafari, taking its music out of the socially deprived areas of Jamaica and onto the international music scene. He once gave the following response, which was typical, to a question; Bob Marley (comedian) // continuous standup routine, beating the record held by Lindsay Webb from Australia. He completed 40 hours of standup comedy, the first 17 hours and 14 minutes without any repetition of material. Marley's record was broken by David Scott on April 30, 2013 with a time of 40 hours and 8 minutes. Bob Marley (comedian) Robert Cochrane Marley Jr. (born April 4, 1967) is an American comedian. He has appeared on "The David Letterman Show", "Late Night with Conan O'Brien", and Comedy Central. He can be seen in the film "The Boondock Saints". He also goes by the name "Billy". In [sep] knowledge2: Bob Marley: Robert Nesta Marley OM (6 February 1945 – 11 May 1981), baptised Berhane Selassie, was a Jamaican singer, musician, and songwriter. Considered one of the pioneers of reggae, his music fused elements of reggae, ska, and rocksteady; and Marley was world renowned for his distinctive vocal and songwriting style.[2][3] Bob Marley's contribution to music, irrefutably increased the visibility of Jamaican music worldwide, and made him a global figure in popular culture.[4][5] Over the course of his career, Marley became known as a Rastafarian icon, and he infused his music with a sense of spirituality.[6] He is also considered a global symbol of Jamaican music and culture and identity, and was controversial in his outspoken support for democratic social reforms.[citation needed] In 1976, Marley survived an assassination attempt in his home, which was thought to be politically motivated.[7] He also supported legalisation of marijuana, and advocated for Pan-Africanism.[8] ; Bob Marley: Born in Nine Mile, Jamaica, Marley began his professional musical career in 1963, after forming a group "Teenagers" with Peter Tosh and Bunny Wailer, which after several name changes, would become the Wailers. The group released its debut studio album The Wailing Wailers in 1965, which contained the single "One Love", a reworking of "People Get Ready"; the song was popular worldwide, and established the group as a rising figure in reggae.[9] The Wailers released an additional eleven studio albums, and after signing to Island Records, the band's name became Bob Marley and the Wailers. While initially employing louder instrumentation and singing, the group began engaging in rhythmic-based song construction in the late 1960s and early 1970s, which coincided with Marley's conversion to Rastafari. Around this time, Marley relocated to London, and the group embodied their musical shift with the release of the album The Best of The Wailers (1971).[10] ; Bob Marley: The group started to gain international attention after signing to Island, and touring in support of the albums Catch a Fire and Burnin' (both 1973). Following the disbandment of the Wailers a year later, Marley carried on under the band's name.[11] The album Natty Dread (1974) received positive reception. In 1975, following the global popularity of Eric Clapton's version of Marley's "I Shot the Sheriff",[12] Marley had his international breakthrough with his first hit outside Jamaica, with a live version of "No Woman, No Cry", from the Live! album.[13] This was followed by his breakthrough album in the United States, Rastaman Vibration (1976), which reached the Top 50 of the Billboard Soul Charts.[14] A few months after the album's release, Marley survived an assassination attempt at his home in Jamaica, which prompted him to permanently relocate to London. During his time in London he recorded the album Exodus (1977); it incorporated elements of blues, soul, and British rock and enjoyed widespread commercial and critical success. In 1977, Marley was diagnosed with acral lentiginous melanoma; he died as a result of the illness in 1981, shortly after baptism into the Ethiopian Orthodox Church. His fans around the world expressed their grief, and he received a state funeral in Jamaica. ; Bob Marley: The greatest hits album Legend was released in 1984, and became the best-selling reggae album of all time.[15] Marley also ranks as one of the best-selling music artists of all time, with estimated sales of more than 75 million records worldwide.[16] He was posthumously honoured by Jamaica soon after his death with a designated Order of Merit by his nation. In 1994, he was posthumously inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. Rolling Stone ranked him No. 11 on its list of the 100 Greatest Artists of All Time.[17] and No. 98 on its list of the 200 Greatest Singers of All Time.[18] His other achievements include a Grammy Lifetime Achievement Award, a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, and induction into the Black Music & Entertainment Walk of Fame. ; Bob Marley: Robert Nesta Marley was born on 6 February 1945 at the farm of his maternal grandfather in Nine Mile, Saint Ann Parish, Jamaica, to Norval Sinclair Marley and Cedella Malcolm.[19] Norval Marley was from Crowborough, East Sussex in England,[20] then resident of Clarendon Parish,[21] whose family claimed to have besides English, Syrian-Jewish origins.[22][23][24] Norval claimed to have been a captain in the Royal Marines;[25] at the time of his marriage to Cedella Malcolm, an Afro-Jamaican then 18 years old, he was employed as a plantation overseer.[25][26] Some sources state that Marley's birth name was Nesta Robert Marley, with a story that when Marley was still a boy, a Jamaican passport official reversed his first and middle names because Nesta sounded like a girl's name.[27][28] Norval provided financial support for his wife and child but seldom saw them as he was often away. Bob Marley attended Stepney Primary and Junior High School which serves the catchment area of Saint Ann.[29][30] In 1955, when Bob Marley was 10 years old, his father died of a heart attack at the age of 70.[31] Marley's mother went on later to marry Edward Booker, a civil servant from the United States, giving Marley two half-brothers: Richard and Anthony.[32][33]
knowledge1: Idi Amin // Idi Amin Idi Amin Dada Oumee (; 2816 August 2003) was a Ugandan politician and military officer. He was the President of Uganda from 1971 to 1979, and his rule gained notoriety for its sheer brutality and oppressiveness. Amin was born either in Koboko or Kampala to a Kakwa father and Lugbara mother. In 1946 he joined the King's African Rifles (KAR) of the British Colonial Army. Initially a cook, he rose to the position of lieutenant, taking part in British actions against Somali rebels in the Shifta War and then the Mau Mau rebels in Kenya. Following Uganda's independence; Idi Amin // was the son of Andreas Nyabire (1889–1976). Nyabire, a member of the Kakwa ethnic group, converted from Roman Catholicism to Islam in 1910 and changed his name to Amin Dada. He named his first-born son after himself. Abandoned by his father at a young age, Idi Amin grew up with his mother's family in a rural farming town in north-western Uganda. Guweddeko states that Amin's mother was Assa Aatte (1904–1970), an ethnic Lugbara and a traditional herbalist who treated members of Buganda royalty, among others. Amin joined an Islamic school in Bombo in 1941. After a few years, he left; Idi Amin // in Particular", in addition to his officially stated claim of being the uncrowned King of Scotland. He never received the Distinguished Service Order (DSO) or the Military Cross (MC). He conferred a doctorate of law on himself from Makerere University as well as the Victorious Cross (VC), a medal made to emulate the British Victoria Cross. Amin became the subject of rumours and myths, including a widespread belief that he was a cannibal. Some of the rumours, such as the mutilation of one of his wives, were spread and popularised by the 1980 film "Rise and Fall of Idi Amin"; Idi Amin // and another in which he was a spokesman against venereal disease. In a Benny Hill show transmitted in January 1977, Hill portrayed Amin sitting behind a desk that featured a placard reading "ME TARZAN, U GANDA". The foreign media were often criticised by Ugandan exiles and defectors for emphasizing Amin's self-aggrandizing eccentricities and taste for excess while downplaying or excusing his murderous behavior. Other commentators even suggested that Amin had deliberately cultivated his eccentric reputation in the foreign media as an easily parodied buffoon in order to defuse international concern over his administration of Uganda. Idi Amin Idi Amin Dada; Idi Amin // chief Africa correspondent, together with cameraman Mohamed Amin (no relation) of Visnews in Nairobi, located Amin in 1980, and secured the first interview with him since his deposition. During interviews he gave during his exile in Saudi Arabia, Amin held that Uganda needed him, and never expressed remorse for the brutal nature of his regime. On 19 July 2003, Amin's fourth wife, Nalongo Madina, reported that he was in a coma and near death at the King Faisal Specialist Hospital and Research Centre in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia, from kidney failure. She pleaded with the Ugandan President, Yoweri Museveni, to allow [sep] knowledge2: Idi Amin: Idi Amin Dada Oumee (/ˈiːdi ɑːˈmiːn, ˈɪdi -/ ⓘ, UK also /- æˈmiːn/; c. 1925 – 16 August 2003) was a Ugandan military officer and politician who served as the third president of Uganda from 1971 to 1979. He ruled as a military dictator and is considered one of the most brutal despots in modern world history.[2] ; Idi Amin: Amin was born in Koboko in what is now northwest Uganda to a Kakwa father and Lugbara mother. In 1946, he joined the King's African Rifles (KAR) of the British Colonial Army as a cook. He rose to the rank of lieutenant, taking part in British actions against Somali rebels and then the Mau Mau Uprising in Kenya. Uganda gained independence from the United Kingdom in 1962, and Amin remained in the army, rising to the position of major and being appointed commander of the Uganda Army in 1965. He became aware that Ugandan President Milton Obote was planning to arrest him for misappropriating army funds, so he launched the 1971 Ugandan coup d'état and declared himself president. ; Idi Amin: During his years in power, Amin shifted from being a pro-Western ruler enjoying considerable support from Israel to being backed by Libya's Muammar Gaddafi, Zaire's Mobutu Sese Seko, the Soviet Union, and East Germany.[3][4][5] In 1972, Amin expelled Asians, a majority of whom were Indian-Ugandans, leading India to sever diplomatic relations with his regime.[6] In 1975, Amin became the chairman of the Organisation of African Unity (OAU), a Pan-Africanist group designed to promote solidarity among African states.[7] Uganda was a member of the United Nations Commission on Human Rights from 1977 to 1979.[8] The United Kingdom broke diplomatic relations with Uganda in 1977, and Amin declared that he had defeated the British and added "CBE" to his title for "Conqueror of the British Empire".[9] ; Idi Amin: As Amin's rule progressed into the late 1970s, there was increased unrest against his persecution of certain ethnic groups and political dissidents, along with Uganda's very poor international standing due to Amin's support for PFLP-EO and RZ hijackers in 1976, leading to Israel's Operation Entebbe. He then attempted to annex Tanzania's Kagera Region in 1978. The Tanzanian president Julius Nyerere ordered his troops to invade Uganda in response. Tanzanian Army and rebel forces successfully captured Kampala in 1979 and ousted Amin from power. Amin went into exile, first in Libya, then Iraq, and finally in Saudi Arabia, where he lived until his death in 2003.[10] ; Idi Amin: Amin's rule was characterised by rampant human rights abuses, including political repression, ethnic persecution, extrajudicial killings, as well as nepotism, corruption, and gross economic mismanagement. International observers and human rights groups estimate that between 100,000[11] and 500,000 people were killed under his regime.[9]
knowledge1: Djimon Hounsou // Djimon Hounsou Djimon Gaston Hounsou (; ; born April 24, 1964) is a Beninese and American actor and model. Hounsou began his career appearing in music videos. He made his film debut in the Sandra Bernhard film "Without You I'm Nothing" (1990) and gained widespread recognition for his role as Cinqué in the Steven Spielberg film "Amistad" (1997). He gained further recognition for his roles in "Gladiator" (2000), "In America" (2003), and "Blood Diamond" (2006), receiving Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor nominations for both the latter films. He also had a minor role in "Furious 7" (2015). He has; Djimon Hounsou // been nominated for a Golden Globe Award and three Screen Actors Guild Awards. Djimon Hounsou plays an important role as well in the French movie "" in 2011. In the Marvel Cinematic Universe, he plays the role of Korath the Pursuer in "Guardians of the Galaxy" (2014), and is set to reprise his role in the upcoming "Captain Marvel" coming out March, 2019. Additionally, in the DC Extended Universe, he played the role of the Fisherman King in "Aquaman" (2018), and he is set to play the wizard Shazam in "Shazam!" (2019). Hounsou was born in Cotonou, in what is; Djimon Hounsou // In the début of Kimora Lee Simmons' show, "", he was billed as her husband. Hounsou and Simmons, who were never legally married in the United States, announced their separation in November 2012. Djimon Hounsou Djimon Gaston Hounsou (; ; born April 24, 1964) is a Beninese and American actor and model. Hounsou began his career appearing in music videos. He made his film debut in the Sandra Bernhard film "Without You I'm Nothing" (1990) and gained widespread recognition for his role as Cinqué in the Steven Spielberg film "Amistad" (1997). He gained further recognition for his roles in "Gladiator"; Djimon Hounsou // now Benin, to Albertine and Pierre Hounsou, a cook. He immigrated to Lyon in France at the age of twelve with his brother, Edmond. Soon after arriving in France, Hounsou dropped out of school and became homeless for a time. A chance meeting with a photographer led to Hounsou being introduced to fashion designer Thierry Mugler, who encouraged Hounsou to pursue a modeling career. In 1987, Hounsou became a model and established a career in Paris. He moved to the United States in 1990. Between 1989 and 1991, Hounsou appeared in the music videos for "Straight Up" by Paula Abdul,; Djimon Hounsou // Your Dragon 2" and portrayed Korath the Pursuer in the Marvel Studios film "Guardians of the Galaxy", both in 2014. He played villains in two 2015 films, "Seventh Son" and "Furious 7", the seventh installment of "The Fast and the Furious" film series, the latter where he played the role of Mose Jakande, a Nigerian-French mercenary. On February 17, 2016, it was reported that Hounsou would join the second season of the television series "Wayward Pines". In July 2018, Hounsou joined the DC Extended Universe, playing The Fisherman King in "Aquaman", as well as replacing Ron Cephas Jones as the [sep] knowledge2: Djimon Hounsou: Djimon Gaston Hounsou (/ˈdʒaɪmən ˈuːnsuː/, JY-mən OON-soo;[1] French: [dʒimɔ̃ unsu]; born April 24, 1964)[2] is a Beninese-born actor. He began his career appearing in music videos and made his film debut in Without You I'm Nothing (1990). He then earned widespread recognition for his role as Cinqué in the Steven Spielberg film Amistad (1997), which earned him a Golden Globe nomination. For his performances in In America (2002) and Blood Diamond (2006), Honsou was nominated for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor. ; Djimon Hounsou: In the Marvel Cinematic Universe, he portrays Korath the Pursuer in Guardians of the Galaxy (2014), Captain Marvel (2019) and What If...? (2021). In the DC Extended Universe, he appears as the Fisherman King in Aquaman (2018), and as the wizard Shazam in Shazam! (2019), Black Adam (2022), and Shazam! Fury of the Gods (2023). His other notable films include Stargate (1994), Gladiator (2000), Constantine, The Island (both 2005), Special Forces (2011), How to Train Your Dragon 2 (2014), Furious 7 (2015), The Legend of Tarzan (2016) and A Quiet Place Part II (2021). ; Djimon Hounsou: Hounsou made his directorial debut with the documentary film In Search of Voodoo: Roots to Heaven (2018). ; Djimon Hounsou: Hounsou was born in Cotonou, Benin, to Albertine and Pierre Hounsou.[3] He immigrated to Lyon in France at the age of 12[4] with his brother, Edmond. Soon after arriving there, he dropped out of school and was homeless for a time. A chance meeting with a photographer led to an introduction to fashion designer Thierry Mugler, who encouraged Hounsou to pursue a modelling career.[2] In 1987, he became a model and established a career in Paris. He moved to the United States in 1990.[citation needed][5] ; Djimon Hounsou: Between 1989 and 1991, Hounsou appeared in the music videos for "Straight Up" by Paula Abdul, "Love Will Never Do (Without You)" by Janet Jackson, and Madonna's "Express Yourself".[6][7] He also appears in En Vogue's music video for "Hold On".
knowledge1: Stephanie Beatriz // Stephanie Beatriz Stephanie Beatriz Bischoff Alvizuri (born 10 February 1981) is an Argentine-born American actress best known for playing Detective Rosa Diaz in the Fox/NBC comedy series "Brooklyn Nine-Nine" and Jessica in the independent drama "Short Term 12" (2013). Stephanie Beatriz Bischoff Alvizuri was born in Neuquén, Neuquén Province, Argentina, the daughter of a Colombian father and a Bolivian mother. She also has German ancestry. With her parents and a younger sister, she arrived in the United States at the age of three. She grew up in Webster, Texas and attended Clear Brook High School. She graduated from Stephens College; Stephanie Beatriz // in 2002 and moved to New York City to pursue acting. In 2010, she moved to Los Angeles, where she currently resides. Beatriz had minor roles in the police procedural television series "The Closer" and "Southland", as well a recurring role as Gloria's sister Sonia in the acclaimed ABC comedy series "Modern Family". She has had numerous stage appearances at the Oregon Shakespeare Festival, Theatreworks USA, The Old Globe Theatre, and Yale Repertory Theatre. Beatriz had her first feature film role as Jessica in the 2013 acclaimed independent drama "Short Term 12". Since 2013, she has portrayed Detective Rosa Diaz; Stephanie Beatriz // As of 2018 she voices the character Gina on season 5 of "BoJack Horseman". In July 2016, Beatriz revealed via Twitter that she is bisexual. She has described herself as suffering from disordered eating. In October 2017, Beatriz announced her engagement to Brad Hoss. Beatriz and Hoss married on 6 October 2018. Stephanie Beatriz Stephanie Beatriz Bischoff Alvizuri (born 10 February 1981) is an Argentine-born American actress best known for playing Detective Rosa Diaz in the Fox/NBC comedy series "Brooklyn Nine-Nine" and Jessica in the independent drama "Short Term 12" (2013). Stephanie Beatriz Bischoff Alvizuri was born in Neuquén, Neuquén; Stephanie Beatriz // in the acclaimed Fox series "Brooklyn Nine-Nine", an action comedy series based around the members of a Brooklyn police precinct. Beatriz starred as Bonnie in the independent feature film "The Light of the Moon", written and directed by Jessica M. Thompson. The film premiered at the 2017 South by Southwest Film Festival, where it won the Audience Award for Narrative Feature Competition. She received highly positive reviews for her performance, with "The Hollywood Reporter" stating that "Beatriz offers a powerful... unflinching, authentic performance", while "Variety" noted that the film was "harrowingly effective" and Beatriz's performance was "expertly balanced and judged." [sep] knowledge2: Stephanie Beatriz: Stephanie Beatriz Bischoff Alvizuri (born February 10, 1981)[2] is an American actress. She is known for playing Detective Rosa Diaz in the Fox/NBC comedy series Brooklyn Nine-Nine (2013–2021), Quiet in the Peacock action comedy series Twisted Metal (2023), Carla in the musical film  In the Heights (2021), and voicing Mirabel Madrigal in the Disney film Encanto (2021). ; Stephanie Beatriz: Beatriz was born in Neuquén, Argentina to a Colombian father and a Bolivian mother.[2][3] She arrived in the United States at the age of two[4][5] with her parents and a younger sister. She grew up in Webster, Texas, outside Houston, and attended Clear Brook High School.[6][7] As a child, her mother took her and her sister to arts exhibits and events, something she credits for raising her awareness of potential careers in the arts.[8] She became interested in acting after taking speech and debate as an elective, which allowed her to appear in plays.[9] She became a United States citizen at 18.[4][5] ; Stephanie Beatriz: Beatriz attended all-women's Stephens College in Columbia, Missouri. After graduating in 2002, she moved to New York City to pursue acting.[7] She has lived in Los Angeles since 2010. ; Stephanie Beatriz: Beatriz performed for three seasons at Oregon Shakespeare Festival,[10] including roles such as Catherine in A View From a Bridge in 2008,[11] Maggie in Cat on a Hot Tin Roof in 2010,[12] and Isabella in Measure for Measure in 2011.[13] ; Stephanie Beatriz: Beatriz had minor roles in the police procedural television series The Closer and Southland, and a recurring role as Gloria's sister Sonia in the ABC comedy series Modern Family.
knowledge1: Miguel Ángel Félix Gallardo // Cartel Tijuana Cartel Sinaloa Cartel In the Netflix series "" (2018), Gallardo is portrayed by actor Diego Luna. Miguel Ángel Félix Gallardo Miguel Ángel Félix Gallardo (born January 8, 1946), commonly referred to by his alias El Padrino ("The Godfather"), is a convicted Mexican drug lord who formed the Guadalajara Cartel in the 1980s, and controlled almost all of the drug trafficking in Mexico and the corridors along the Mexico–United States border. Gallardo was arrested for the murder of Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) agent Enrique Camarena, who was tortured to death on one of Gallardo's ranches. He was serving his [sep] knowledge2: Guadalajara Cartel: Camarena was interrogated and tortured to gain information regarding his knowledge of law enforcement operations directed against the cartel; as well as any information that the DEA may have on Mexican politicians involved in drug trafficking. Over the course of the 30 plus hour torture session, Camarena's skull, jaw, nose, cheekbones, windpipe, and ribs were broken; the kidnappers brought in a doctor to administer drugs to the agent to keep him conscious throughout the whole session.[18] The kidnappers made audio recordings of some parts of Camarena's interrogation.[19] The final blow was apparently done when the torturers crushed his skull with a piece of rebar or other similar piece of metal.[20] About a month later, Camarena and Zavala's corpses were taken to the neighboring state of Michoacán and dumped in a roadside ditch to be discovered on 5 March 1985.[21][22] Caro Quintero then left Mexico on March 9, 1985, with his associates and his girlfriend Sara Cristina Cosío Gaona.[23] Former Mexican Judicial Police chief Armando Pavón Reyes, after receiving a $300,000 bribe, reportedly allowed Caro Quintero to flee from the airport in Guadalajara, in a private jet, to seek refuge in Costa Rica. The police chief was fired shortly afterward, and was charged with bribery and complicity in the Camarena murder.[24]
knowledge1: Shakira // Shakira Shakira Isabel Mebarak Ripoll (, ; born 2 February 1977), better known professionally as Shakira, is a Colombian singer, songwriter, dancer, businesswoman, and philanthropist. Born and raised in Barranquilla, she began performing in school, demonstrating Latin American, Arabic, and rock and roll influences and belly dancing abilities. Shakira's first studio albums, "Magia" and "Peligro", failed to attain commercial success in the 1990s; however, she rose to prominence in Latin America with her major-label debut, "Pies Descalzos" (1996), and her fourth album, "Dónde Están los Ladrones?" (1998). As of 2001, she had sold over 10 million albums alone in Latin; Shakira // is the 3rd and 10th most streamed female singer on YouTube and Spotify of all time respectively. She performs charity work, most notably through her Pies Descalzos Foundation. In 2011, she was appointed by U.S. President Barack Obama to the President's Advisory Commission on Educational Excellence for Hispanics – a four-person group that advises the president and Education Secretary. From 2012 to 2015, she was listed among world's top 100 most powerful women in the world by "Forbes". In 2017, she was listed as one of the world's greatest leaders by Fortune, ranked at 27th. She is a goodwill ambassador; Shakira // 2.2 billion views and "Waka Waka" accounting for over 2 billion views, and her channel is currently the 35th most subscribed on YouTube. In 2011, Shakira was honored at the Latin Grammys as 2011's Latin Recording Academy Person of the Year. She also received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame located at 6270 Hollywood Blvd. Originally, she was to be given a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame in 2004, but she turned the offer down. In 2012, she received the honor of Chevalier De L'Ordre des Arts et des Lettres. In 2014, Shakira became the first; Shakira // the opening act of the MTV European Music Awards, the Colombian singer also received the MTV Free Your Mind award for her continuing dedication to improve access to education for all children around the world. In February 2011, the FC Barcelona Foundation and "Pies descalzos" reached an agreement for children's education through sport. Shakira was honored at the Latin Grammys as the Latin Recording Academy Person of the Year on 9 November 2011, for her philanthropy and contributions to Latin Music. In October 2018, Shakira raised up the rainbow flag in her El Dorado World Tour in Porto Alegre, Brazil,; Shakira // for Africa)", the official song of the 2010 FIFA World Cup. Shakira gave birth to the couple's first son, Milan Piqué Mebarak, on 22 January 2013 in Barcelona, Spain, where the family had taken up residence. Shakira gave birth to their second son, Sasha Piqué Mebarak, on 29 January 2015. Shakira Shakira Isabel Mebarak Ripoll (, ; born 2 February 1977), better known professionally as Shakira, is a Colombian singer, songwriter, dancer, businesswoman, and philanthropist. Born and raised in Barranquilla, she began performing in school, demonstrating Latin American, Arabic, and rock and roll influences and belly dancing abilities. Shakira's first [sep] knowledge2: Shakira: Shakira Isabel Mebarak Ripoll (/ʃəˈkɪərə/ shə-KEER-ə, Spanish: [ʃaˈkiɾa]; born 2 February 1977),[1] known mononymously as Shakira, is a Colombian singer and songwriter.[2] Born and raised in Barranquilla, she has been referred to as the "Queen of Latin Music"[3] and has been praised for her musical versatility.[4] She made her recording debut with Sony Music Colombia at the age of 13. Following the commercial failure of her first two albums, Magia (1991) and Peligro (1993), she rose to prominence in Hispanic countries with her next albums, Pies Descalzos (1995) and Dónde Están los Ladrones? (1998). She entered the English-language market with her fifth album, Laundry Service (2001), which sold over 13 million copies worldwide. Buoyed by the international success of her singles "Whenever, Wherever" and "Underneath Your Clothes", the album propelled her reputation as a leading crossover artist. Broadcast Music, Inc., described Shakira as a "pioneer" who extended the global reach of Latino singers.[5] ; Shakira: Her success was further solidified with the Spanish albums Fijación Oral, Vol. 1 (2005), Sale el Sol (2010), and El Dorado (2017), all of which topped the Billboard Top Latin Albums chart and were certified diamond (Latin) by  the Recording Industry Association of America. Meanwhile, her English albums Oral Fixation, Vol. 2 (2005), She Wolf (2009), and Shakira (2014) were all certified gold, platinum, or multi-platinum in various countries worldwide. Some of her songs have charted at number one in multiple countries, including "Inevitable", "Whenever, Wherever", "La Tortura", "Hips Don't Lie", "Beautiful Liar", "Waka Waka (This Time for Africa)", "Loca", "Rabiosa", "Can't Remember to Forget You", "Dare (La La La)", "Chantaje", "Me Gusta", "Te Felicito", "Bzrp Music Sessions, Vol. 53", and "TQG". She served as a coach on two seasons of the American singing competition television series The Voice (2013–2014). ; Shakira: One of the most influential female artists of the 21st century, Shakira is credited with opening the doors of the international market for other Latin artists.[6][7] With a catalog of 145 songs, Shakira has sold over 95 million records, making her one of the best-selling music artists of all time.[8] Billboard reported that as of 2023, she is the best-selling female Latin artist of all time.[9] Noted to be a "global phenom" whose impact has "reached every corner of the world", Shakira has been described as an "artistic link between the west and the east" for popularizing Middle Eastern sounds in the West, and western sounds in the East (mainly the Middle East).[10][11] Due to her heritage as a Colombian of Lebanese descent, she is perceived as particularly influential for Latino and Middle-Eastern musicians,[12] and has been noted for introducing musical genres, instruments, and techniques from across Latin America, the Middle East, and other regions to a wider audience.[13] Shakira is also credited with popularising music in the Spanish language on a global level.[14] ; Shakira: She has received numerous awards, including three Grammy Awards, fourteen Latin Grammy Awards, five MTV Video Music Awards (including the 2023 Michael Jackson Video Vanguard Award), seven Billboard Music Awards, thirty-nine Billboard Latin Music Awards, twenty-one Guinness World Records, and a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame. She was named the Top Female Latin Artist of the Decade by Billboard twice (2000s and 2010s).[15][16] For her philanthropic work with her Barefoot Foundation and her contributions to music she received the Latin Recording Academy Person of the Year and Harvard Foundation Artist of the Year awards in 2011. She was appointed to the President's Advisory Commission on Educational Excellence for Hispanics in the United States in 2011, and Chevalier of the Order of Arts and Letters by the French government in 2012. ; Shakira: Shakira Isabel Mebarak Ripoll was born on 2 February 1977 in Barranquilla, Colombia. She is the only child of William Mebarak Chadid and Nidia Ripoll Torrado. She is of Spanish and Lebanese descent.[17][18] Her father William was born in New York City to a family from Lebanon. When he was five, his family moved to Colombia.[19] Her mother's side has two Spanish surnames, Ripoll and Torrado, the former of which is Catalan and originates from four brothers who immigrated from Catalonia to coastal Colombia in the 19th century.[20] She has also stated that she has distant Italian roots through an ancestor with the surname "Pisciotti".[21] She was raised Catholic and attended Catholic schools.[22] She has eight older half-siblings from her father's previous marriage.[23] Shakira spent much of her youth in Barranquilla, a city located on the northern Caribbean coast of Colombia.
knowledge1: Philippe Coutinho // Philippe Coutinho Philippe Coutinho Correia (; born 12 June 1992) is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder or winger for Spanish club Barcelona and the Brazilian national team. Born and raised in Rio de Janeiro, Coutinho showed prodigious talent and excelled in Vasco da Gama's youth system. He was signed by Italian club Inter Milan in 2008 for €4 million and subsequently loaned back to Vasco, where he became a key player. He made his debut for Inter Milan in 2010 and was seen as the "future of Inter", and was later loaned to La Liga; Philippe Coutinho // Liverpool Barcelona Brazil Youth Individual Philippe Coutinho Philippe Coutinho Correia (; born 12 June 1992) is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder or winger for Spanish club Barcelona and the Brazilian national team. Born and raised in Rio de Janeiro, Coutinho showed prodigious talent and excelled in Vasco da Gama's youth system. He was signed by Italian club Inter Milan in 2008 for €4 million and subsequently loaned back to Vasco, where he became a key player. He made his debut for Inter Milan in 2010 and was seen as the "future of Inter", and was; Philippe Coutinho // to a local concrete football pitch, where he first began playing futsal. With space restricted and the need for skill and improvisation heightened, the diminutive Coutinho thrived. After joining a local football academy on the insistence of his friends grandmother, his father was later approached at a tournament by youth coaches at Vasco da Gama, where he attended a trial and joined their youth system. Coutinho flourished in Vasco da Gama's youth system and was soon called up to the Brazil under-15 football team. In July 2008, at age 16, he was purchased by Italian giants Inter Milan for €4; Philippe Coutinho // club Espanyol in 2012. In January 2013, he was signed by Premier League club Liverpool for £8.5 million. He flourished at Anfield, where his combination of vision, passing, dribbling and bending long-range strikes earned him the nickname "The Magician" from Liverpool fans and teammates. After he was named in the 2015 PFA Team of the Year, Brazilian legend Pelé tipped Coutinho for a "great future". In January 2018, Coutinho transferred to Barcelona in a record transaction fee reportedly worth €142 million ($170 million), which would make him the world's third most expensive player. Coutinho made his senior international debut in; Philippe Coutinho // 2010, and has earned over 40 caps for Brazil. He was part of the Brazilian squad at the 2015 Copa América, the Copa América Centenario in 2016, and made his World Cup debut at the 2018 FIFA World Cup. The third and youngest son of Esmerelda Coutinho and architect José Carlos Correia, Coutinho was born on 12 June 1992 in Rio de Janeiro, weighing 3.1 kg (6 lbs 10 oz) as a newborn. He was raised in Rio's northern Rocha district between an old shanty town and industrial warehouses. As a child, he followed his elder brothers Cristiano and Leandro [sep] knowledge2: Philippe Coutinho: Philippe Coutinho Correia (born 12 June 1992) is a Brazilian professional footballer who plays as an attacking midfielder or winger for Qatar Stars League club Al-Duhail, on loan from Premier League club Aston Villa, and the Brazil national team. He is known for his combination of vision, passing, dribbling and ability to conjure curling long-range shots.[4] ; Philippe Coutinho: Coutinho showed prodigious talent and excelled in Vasco da Gama's youth system. He was signed by Serie A club Inter Milan in 2008 for €4 million and subsequently loaned back to Vasco, where he became a key player. He made his debut for Inter Milan in 2010, and was later loaned to La Liga club Espanyol in 2012. In January 2013, Coutinho joined Premier League club Liverpool. He flourished at Liverpool, being named in the PFA Team of the Year in 2015. At Liverpool, he formed a formidable attacking quartet with Mohamed Salah, Roberto Firmino and Sadio Mané. In January 2018, Coutinho signed for Barcelona and won two La Liga titles with the club. He was loaned to German club Bayern Munich for the 2019–20 season, being part of the team that won a treble including the Bundesliga, DFB-Pokal and UEFA Champions League. He went on loan to Aston Villa in January 2022 before signing permanently for them in the summer. ; Philippe Coutinho: Coutinho made his senior international debut for Brazil in 2010. He was part of the squad at the 2015 Copa América and the Copa América Centenario in 2016, and made his FIFA World Cup debut at the 2018 World Cup, in which he scored two goals. He was also a member of the Brazil team that won the 2019 Copa América on home soil. ; Philippe Coutinho: The third and youngest son of Esmeralda Coutinho and architect José Carlos Correia, Coutinho was born on 12 June 1992 in Rio de Janeiro.[5] He was raised in Rio's northern Rocha district between an old shanty town and industrial warehouses.[6][7] ; Philippe Coutinho: As a child he was very shy and would prefer to be alone; he started playing football after watching his elder brothers Cristiano and Leandro play with their friends at a local concrete football pitch. He began playing futsal, and he said it helped him develop his skills as a footballer.[7] Coutinho thrived in the street environment, developing skill and improvisation. After Coutinho joined a local football academy on the insistence of his friend's grandmother, his father was approached at a tournament by youth coaches at Vasco da Gama, where Coutinho attended a trial and joined their youth system.[8][9]
knowledge1: Ronaldinho // Ronaldinho Ronaldo de Assis Moreira (born 21 March 1980), commonly known as Ronaldinho () or Ronaldinho Gaúcho, is a Brazilian former professional footballer and ambassador for Barcelona. He played mostly as an attacking midfielder, but was also deployed as a forward or a winger. He played the bulk of his career at European clubs Paris Saint-Germain, Barcelona and A.C. Milan as well as playing for the Brazilian national team. Often considered one of the best players of his generation and regarded by many as one of the greatest of all time, Ronaldinho won two FIFA World Player of the Year; Ronaldinho // nickname "Ronaldinho" – "inho" meaning small – because he was often the youngest and the smallest player in youth club matches. He developed an interest in futsal and beach football, which later expanded to organized football. His first brush with the media came at the age of 13, when he scored all 23 goals in a 23–0 victory against a local team. Ronaldinho was identified as a rising star at the 1997 U-17 World Championship in Egypt, in which he scored two goals on penalty kicks. Growing up, his idols included the World Cup winning stars; Rivelino (from 1970), Diego; Ronaldinho // awards and a Ballon d'Or. He was renowned for his technical skills and creativity; due to his agility, pace and dribbling ability, as well as his use of tricks, feints, overhead kicks, no-look passes and accuracy from free-kicks. Ronaldinho made his career debut for Grêmio, in 1998. At age 20, he moved to Paris Saint-Germain in France before signing for Barcelona in 2003. In his second season with Barcelona, he won his first FIFA World Player of the Year award, as Barcelona won La Liga. The season that followed is considered one of the best in his career as he; Ronaldinho // famous worldwide as 'Ronaldinho' and in Brazil as ‘Ronaldinho Gaúcho’. 'Quadraginta novem' means forty-nine, the number of Ronaldinho's T-shirt at Clube Atlético Mineiro (CAM), his former team in Brazil. Ronaldinho chose the number 49 as an homage to his mother, born in 1949." Ronaldinho Ronaldo de Assis Moreira (born 21 March 1980), commonly known as Ronaldinho () or Ronaldinho Gaúcho, is a Brazilian former professional footballer and ambassador for Barcelona. He played mostly as an attacking midfielder, but was also deployed as a forward or a winger. He played the bulk of his career at European clubs Paris Saint-Germain, Barcelona; Ronaldinho // of the world's greatest living players compiled by Pelé. At international level, Ronaldinho played 97 matches for the Brazil national team, scoring 33 goals and representing his country in two FIFA World Cups. He was an integral part of the 2002 FIFA World Cup-winning team in Korea and Japan, starring alongside Ronaldo and Rivaldo in an attacking trio, scoring two goals, including a free-kick from 40 yards out against England, registering two assists and being named in the FIFA World Cup All-Star Team. As captain, he led Brazil to their second Confederations Cup title in 2005 and was named Man [sep] knowledge2: Ronaldinho: Ronaldo de Assis Moreira (born 21 March 1980), commonly known as Ronaldinho Gaúcho (Brazilian Portuguese: [ʁonawˈdʒĩɲu ɡaˈuʃu]) or simply Ronaldinho,[note 1] is a Brazilian retired professional footballer who played mostly as an attacking midfielder, but was also deployed as a winger. Widely regarded as one of the greatest players of all time, he won two FIFA World Player of the Year awards and a Ballon d'Or. He is the only player ever to have won a World Cup, a Copa América, a Confederations Cup, a Champions League, a Copa Libertadores and a Ballon d'Or.[4] A global icon of the sport, Ronaldinho was renowned for his technical skills, creativity, dribbling ability and accuracy from free-kicks, his use of tricks, feints, no-look passes and overhead kicks, as well as his ability to score and create goals, all prominent characteristics of his early-age background playing futsal. He is known by the nickname "O Bruxo" ("The Wizard").[5][6] ; Ronaldinho: Ronaldinho made his career debut for Grêmio, in 1998. At age 20, he moved to Paris Saint-Germain in France before signing for Barcelona in 2003. In his second season with Barcelona, he won his first FIFA World Player of the Year award as Barcelona won the 2004–05 La Liga title. The season that followed is considered one of the best in his career as he was integral in Barcelona winning the 2005–06 UEFA Champions League, their first in fourteen years, and another La Liga title, giving Ronaldinho his first career double, receiving the 2005 Ballon d'Or and his second FIFA World Player of the Year in the process. After scoring two solo goals in the first 2005–06 El Clásico, Ronaldinho became the second Barcelona player, after Diego Maradona in 1983, to receive a standing ovation from Real Madrid fans at the Santiago Bernabéu. Due to these successes, Ronaldinho is  widely credited with changing the history of Barcelona.[7] ; Ronaldinho: Following a second-place La Liga finish to Real Madrid in the 2006–07 season and an injury-plagued 2007–08 season, Ronaldinho suffered a decline in his performances—often put down to a decrease in dedication and focus having achieved so much in the sport—and departed Barcelona to join AC Milan, where he won the 2010–11 Serie A. He returned to Brazil to play for Flamengo in 2011 and Atlético Mineiro a year later where he won the 2013 Copa Libertadores, before moving to Mexico to play for Querétaro and then back to Brazil to play for Fluminense in 2015. Ronaldinho accumulated numerous other individual awards in his career: he was included in the UEFA Team of the Year and the FIFA World XI three times each, and was named UEFA Club Footballer of the Year for the 2005–06 season and South American Footballer of the Year in 2013; in 2004, he was named by Pelé in the FIFA 100 list of the world's greatest living players. In 2009, Ronaldinho was voted World Player of the Decade 2000s, ahead of Lionel Messi and Cristiano Ronaldo.[8] ; Ronaldinho: In his international career with Brazil, Ronaldinho earned 97 caps and scored 33 goals and represented his country in two FIFA World Cups. After debuting with the Seleção by winning the 1999 Copa América, he was an integral part of the 2002 FIFA World Cup-winning team, starring alongside Ronaldo and Rivaldo in an attacking trio, and was named in the FIFA World Cup All-Star Team. As captain, he led his team to the 2005 FIFA Confederations Cup title and was named man of the match in the final. He also captained the Brazil Olympic team to a bronze medal in men's football at the 2008 Summer Olympics. ; Ronaldinho: Ronaldo de Assis Moreira was born on 21 March 1980 in the city of Porto Alegre, the state capital of Rio Grande do Sul, Brazil.[1][9] His mother, Miguelina Elói Assis dos Santos,[10] was a salesperson who studied to become a nurse.[11] His father, João de Assis Moreira, was a shipyard worker and a footballer for the local club Esporte Clube Cruzeiro (not to be confused with the larger Cruzeiro Esporte Clube).[12] After Ronaldo's older brother Roberto signed with Grêmio, the family moved to a home in the more affluent Guarujá section of Porto Alegre, which was a gift from Grêmio to convince Roberto to stay at the club. Still, Roberto's career was ultimately cut short by injury. It was in their new home where his father hit his head and drowned in the swimming pool when Ronaldo was eight.[13] Roberto has acted as his manager, while his sister Deisi has worked as his press coordinator.[14][15]
knowledge1: Anderson Silva // Anderson Silva Anderson da Silva (; born April 14, 1975) is a Brazilian professonal mixed martial artist currently signed with the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC). He is a former UFC Middleweight Champion and had the longest title reign in UFC history at 2,457 days. This started in 2006 and ended in 2013 and included a UFC record 16 consecutive victories in that span. UFC president Dana White and UFC commentator Joe Rogan are amongst numerous mixed martial arts (MMA) pundits who have at one point named Silva the greatest professional mixed martial artist of all-time. Silva was born on April; Anderson Silva // a stated love of comic books and comic book heroes. Silva has said on numerous occasions that he believes long-time friend and former UFC Lightweight Champion and UFC Welterweight Champion B.J. Penn to be the greatest pound-for-pound fighter in the history of the sport. Silva has also expressed interest in competing in the sport of taekwondo and boxing. He floated around the idea of him competing at the Olympics in taekwondo and fighting Roy Jones Jr in a boxing match. Anderson Silva Anderson da Silva (; born April 14, 1975) is a Brazilian professonal mixed martial artist currently signed with [sep] knowledge2: Anderson Silva: Anderson da Silva[1] (Portuguese pronunciation: [ˈɐ̃deʁsõ ˈsiwvɐ]; born 14 April 1975) is a Brazilian mixed martial artist and boxer. He is a former UFC Middleweight Champion and holds the record for the longest title reign in UFC history at 2,457 days. This started in 2006 and ended in 2013 and included a UFC record 16 consecutive victories in that span.[16][17] Silva left the UFC in November 2020 and returned to boxing.[18] ; Anderson Silva: Silva initially fought in Brazil in the welterweight category. Silva made his professional debut in 1997 with a pair of wins.[27][non-tertiary source needed] Silva recorded his first loss in 2000 to Luiz Azeredo by decision. After that fight, he went on a nine-fight winning streak, winning six of those fights by either submission or TKO.[27][non-tertiary source needed] After winning his first match in Japan, he was put up against Shooto champion Hayato Sakurai on 26 August 2001. Silva beat Sakurai by unanimous decision after three rounds and became the new Shooto Middleweight Champion (at 167 lb) and the first man to defeat Sakurai, who was undefeated in his first 20 fights.[27][non-tertiary source needed] ; Anderson Silva: In 2002, Silva was scheduled to fight then-current UFC Welterweight Champion, and future UFC Hall of Famer Matt Hughes at UFC 36. However, Silva instead signed a contract and began fighting for PRIDE Fighting Championships.[28] In his first fight with the promotion, he stopped Alex Stiebling with a cut resulting from a high kick. In his next match, he won via decision against the "Diet Butcher" Alexander Otsuka. At Pride 25, Silva faced former UFC welterweight champion Carlos Newton. Newton tried to shoot in on Silva, but was hit with a flying knee. Newton collapsed and Silva finished the fight with strikes, winning by technical knockout.[27][non-tertiary source needed] ; Anderson Silva: Although speculation ran rampant about where Silva would sign next, the UFC announced in late April 2006 that they had signed him to a multi-fight contract. It was not long before the UFC started promoting Silva, releasing an interview segment almost immediately after announcing his arrival.[35] ; Anderson Silva: On 18 April 2009, at UFC 97 in Montreal, Quebec, Canada, Silva defeated Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu blackbelt Thales Leites by unanimous decision, and recorded his UFC record 9th consecutive win in the octagon. Leites is credited with being the first man in UFC history to take Silva through 5 rounds to a judges' decision. The crowd repeatedly booed his lackluster performance, bored expression, and frustrated attempts to goad his opponent into fighting, and in the 4th and 5th rounds took to dancing, lowering his guard and slapping his opponent without retaliation. Following the fight, Dana White has stated that he was "embarrassed" by Silva's performance, but still said that he believes him to be "the best pound-for-pound fighter in the world".[48]
knowledge1: Cleopatra // have actually been a daughter of Ptolemy XII, and some use her as an indication that Cleopatra V had died in 69 BC rather than reappearing as a co-ruler with Berenice IV in 58 BC (during Ptolemy XII's exile in Rome). Cleopatra Cleopatra VII Philopator (; 69 – 10 or 12 August 30 BC) was the last active ruler of the Ptolemaic Kingdom of Egypt, nominally survived as pharaoh by her son Caesarion. She was also a diplomat, naval commander, linguist, and medical author. As a member of the Ptolemaic dynasty, she was a descendant of its founder Ptolemy I [sep] knowledge2: Cleopatra: In the Liberators' civil war of 43–42 BC, Cleopatra sided with the Roman Second Triumvirate formed by Caesar's grandnephew and heir Octavian, Mark Antony, and Marcus Aemilius Lepidus. After their meeting at Tarsos in 41 BC, the queen had an affair with Antony which produced three children. He carried out the execution of Arsinoe at her request, and became increasingly reliant on Cleopatra for both funding and military aid during his invasions of the Parthian Empire and the Kingdom of Armenia. The Donations of Alexandria declared their children rulers over various erstwhile territories under Antony's triumviral authority. This event, their marriage, and Antony's divorce of Octavian's sister Octavia Minor led to the final war of the Roman Republic. Octavian engaged in a war of propaganda, forced Antony's allies in the Roman Senate to flee Rome in 32 BC, and declared war on Cleopatra. After defeating Antony and Cleopatra's naval fleet at the 31 BC Battle of Actium, Octavian's forces invaded Egypt in 30 BC and defeated Antony, leading to Antony's suicide. When Cleopatra learned that Octavian planned to bring her to his Roman triumphal procession, she killed herself by poisoning, contrary to the popular belief that she was bitten by an asp. ; Cleopatra: The Latinized form Cleopatra comes from the Ancient Greek Kleopátra (Κλεοπάτρα), meaning "glory of her father",[5] from κλέος (kléos, "glory") and πατήρ (patḗr, "father").[6] The masculine form would have been written either as Kleópatros (Κλεόπατρος) or Pátroklos (Πάτροκλος).[6] Cleopatra was the name of Alexander the Great's sister, as well as Cleopatra Alcyone, wife of Meleager in Greek mythology.[7] Through the marriage of Ptolemy V Epiphanes and Cleopatra I Syra (a Seleucid princess), the name entered the Ptolemaic dynasty.[8][9] Cleopatra's adopted title Theā́ Philopátōra (Θεᾱ́ Φιλοπάτωρα) means "goddess who loves her father".[10][11][note 11] ; Cleopatra: Ptolemaic pharaohs were crowned by the Egyptian high priest of Ptah at Memphis, but resided in the multicultural and largely Greek city of Alexandria, established by Alexander the Great.[13][14][15][note 12] They spoke Greek]and governed Egypt as Hellenistic Greek monarchs, refusing to learn the native Egyptian language.[16][17][18][note 10] In contrast, Cleopatra could speak multiple languages by adulthood and was the first Ptolemaic ruler known to learn the Egyptian language.[19][20][18][note 13] Plutarch implies that she also spoke Ethiopian, the language of the "Troglodytes", Hebrew (or Aramaic), Arabic, the Syrian language (perhaps Syriac), Median, and Parthian, and she could apparently also speak Latin, although her Roman contemporaries would have preferred to speak with her in her native Koine Greek.[20][18][21][note 14] Aside from Greek, Egyptian, and Latin, these languages reflected Cleopatra's desire to restore North African and West Asian territories that once belonged to the Ptolemaic Kingdom.[22] ; Cleopatra: Cleopatra VII was born in early 69 BC to the ruling Ptolemaic pharaoh Ptolemy XII and an uncertain mother,[32][33][note 15] presumably Ptolemy XII's wife Cleopatra V Tryphaena (who may have been the same person as Cleopatra VI Tryphaena),[34][35][36][note 16][note 3] the mother of Cleopatra's older sister, Berenice IV Epiphaneia.[37][38][39][note 17] Cleopatra Tryphaena disappears from official records a few months after the birth of Cleopatra in 69 BC.[40][41] The three younger children of Ptolemy XII, Cleopatra's sister Arsinoe IV and brothers Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator and Ptolemy XIV,[37][38][39] were born in the absence of his wife.[42][43] Cleopatra's childhood tutor was Philostratos, from whom she learned the Greek arts of oration and philosophy.[44] During her youth Cleopatra presumably studied at the Musaeum, including the Library of Alexandria.[45][46] ; Cleopatra: Ptolemy XII died sometime before 22 March 51 BC, when Cleopatra, in her first act as queen, began her voyage to Hermonthis, near Thebes, to install a new sacred Buchis bull, worshiped as an intermediary for the god Montu in the Ancient Egyptian religion.[90][91][92][note 28] Cleopatra faced several pressing issues and emergencies shortly after taking the throne. These included famine caused by drought and a low level of the annual flooding of the Nile, and lawless behavior instigated by the Gabiniani, the now unemployed and assimilated Roman soldiers left by Gabinius to garrison Egypt.[93][94] Inheriting her father's debts, Cleopatra also owed the Roman Republic 17.5 million drachmas.[95]
knowledge1: Michael Douglas // Michael Douglas Michael Kirk Douglas (born September 25, 1944) is an American actor and producer. Douglas's career includes a diverse range of films in the independent and blockbuster genres, for which he has received a number of accolades, both competitive and honorary. These awards include the Golden Globe Cecil B. DeMille Award for "outstanding contributions to the world of entertainment" and the AFI Life Achievement Award, which "honor[s] an individual whose career in motion pictures or television has greatly contributed to the enrichment of American culture". The elder son of Kirk Douglas and Diana Dill, Douglas received his Bachelor of; Michael Douglas // the boycott movement against that country is an "ugly cancer." In 2009, Douglas joined the project "Soldiers of Peace", a movie against all wars and for global peace. Douglas lent his support for the campaign to release Sakineh Mohammadi Ashtiani, the Iranian woman, who after having been convicted of committing adultery, was given a sentence of death by stoning. Michael Douglas Michael Kirk Douglas (born September 25, 1944) is an American actor and producer. Douglas's career includes a diverse range of films in the independent and blockbuster genres, for which he has received a number of accolades, both competitive and; Michael Douglas // accolades for his role, including Golden Globe, Emmy and Screen Actors Guild Awards. Apart from his career in the film industry, Douglas has received notice for his humanitarian and political activism, as well as media attention for his marriage to Welsh actress Catherine Zeta-Jones. Douglas was born in New Brunswick, New Jersey, the first child of actors Kirk Douglas (born 1916) and Diana Dill (1923–2015). His parents met at the American Academy of Dramatic Arts. His father is Jewish, and was born Issur Danielovitch. Michael's paternal grandparents were emigrants from Chavusy (now in Belarus, then part of the Russian Empire). [sep] knowledge2: Michael Douglas: Michael Kirk Douglas (born September 25, 1944)[2] is an American actor and film producer. He has received numerous accolades, including two Academy Awards, five Golden Globe Awards, a Primetime Emmy Award, the Cecil B. DeMille Award, and the AFI Life Achievement Award.[3] ; Michael Douglas: The elder son of Kirk Douglas and Diana Dill, Douglas received his Bachelor of Arts in drama from the University of California, Santa Barbara. His early acting roles included film, stage, and television productions. Douglas first achieved prominence for his performance in the ABC police procedural television series The Streets of San Francisco, for which he received three consecutive Emmy Award nominations. In 1975, Douglas produced One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest, having acquired the rights to the Ken Kesey novel from his father. The film received critical and popular acclaim, and won the Academy Award for Best Picture, earning Douglas his first Oscar as one of the film's producers. ; Michael Douglas: Douglas went on to produce films including The China Syndrome (1979) and Romancing the Stone (1984), for which he received the Golden Globe Award for Best Motion Picture – Musical or Comedy, and The Jewel of the Nile (1985). Douglas received critical acclaim for his portrayal of Gordon Gekko in Oliver Stone's Wall Street (1987), for which he won the Academy Award for Best Actor (a role he reprised in the sequel Wall Street: Money Never Sleeps in 2010). Other notable roles include in Fatal Attraction (1987), The War of the Roses (1989), Basic Instinct (1992), Falling Down (1993), The American President (1995), The Game (1997), Traffic (2000), and Wonder Boys (2000). ; Michael Douglas: Douglas has received notice for his humanitarian and political activism. He sits on the board of the Nuclear Threat Initiative, is an honorary board member of the anti-war grant-making foundation Ploughshares Fund and he was appointed as a United Nations Messenger of Peace in 1998. He has been married to actress Catherine Zeta-Jones since 2000. ; Michael Douglas: Douglas was born in New Brunswick, New Jersey, the first child of actors Kirk Douglas (1916–2020) and Diana Dill (1923–2015).[4][5] His parents met at the American Academy of Dramatic Arts.[6]
knowledge1: Franck Ribéry // club, Ribéry moved to Turkey in January 2005 to join Galatasaray, where he won the Turkish Cup. After six months at Galatasaray, he departed the club in controversial fashion in order to return to France to join Marseille. Ribéry spent two seasons at the club, helping the "Marseillais" reach the final of the Coupe de France in back-to-back seasons. In 2007, Ribéry joined German club Bayern Munich for a then club-record fee of €25 million. With Bayern, he has won eight Bundesliga titles, five DFB-Pokal, one UEFA Champions League and one FIFA Club World Cup, which include four doubles and [sep] knowledge2: Franck Ribéry: De retour en France, sous le maillot de l'Olympique de Marseille il est vice-champion de France en 2007 et finaliste de la coupe de France à deux reprises consécutivement en 2006 et 2007 battu respectivement par le Paris SG et le FC Sochaux. Il remporte tout de même la coupe Intertoto en 2005.
knowledge1: Lali Espósito // Heat Latin Music Award one Tato Award and five Quiero Awards. Lali Espósito Mariana "Lali" Espósito Riera (born 10 October 1991), who records as Lali, is an Argentine singer, songwriter, actress, dancer and model. Espósito began her career as an actress and singer in 2003 when she joined the cast of the children's telenovela "Rincón de Luz", created by producer Cris Morena. She had other subsequent supporting roles in telenovelas "Chiquititas" and "Floricienta" and a main role in "Casi Ángeles", the latter of which increased her fame in Latin America, the Middle East, and Europe. From 2007 to 2012, Espósito, [sep] knowledge2: Lali Espósito: In the last months of 2019, Lali took her Brava Tour to Europe, the United States and the Rock in Rio music festival in Brazil,[88] where she also received a gold certification for "Caliente."[89] It was in these months that Lali officially kicked off her fourth music era: in October, she released her fourth studio album's lead single, "Laligera", which peaked at number 24 on the Billboard Argentina Hot 100;[90] in November, she released "Como Así", which features boy band CNCO, with whom she co-hosted the 2019 Premios Juventud ceremony back in July.[91][92]
knowledge1: Idris Elba // is a DJ under the moniker DJ Big Driis (or Big Driis the Londoner) and a hip hop and soul musician. In 2016, he was named in the "Time" 100 list of the Most Influential People in the World. Idrissa Akuna Elba, an only child, was born on 6 September 1972 in Hackney, London. His father, Winston, was a Sierra Leonean who worked at Ford Dagenham, and his mother, Eve, is Ghanaian. Elba's parents were married in Sierra Leone and later moved to London. His paternal grandfather, Moses, was a sailor and a policeman. Elba was brought up in Hackney; Idris Elba // Honours for services to drama. In 2017, Elba won the male title for the "Rear of the Year" award in Britain. In September 2018, he was one of 50 people named for "making London awesome" and helping to shape London's cultural landscape who were featured in "Time Out" to mark the magazine's 50th anniversary. Idris Elba Idrissa Akuna Elba (; born 6 September 1972) is a British actor, producer, musician and DJ known for playing drug trafficker Stringer Bell on the HBO series "The Wire", DCI John Luther on the BBC One series "Luther" and Nelson Mandela in the biographical; Idris Elba // Idris Elba Idrissa Akuna Elba (; born 6 September 1972) is a British actor, producer, musician and DJ known for playing drug trafficker Stringer Bell on the HBO series "The Wire", DCI John Luther on the BBC One series "Luther" and Nelson Mandela in the biographical film "" (2013). He has been nominated four times for a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Miniseries or Television Film, winning one and was nominated five times for a Primetime Emmy Award. Elba appeared in Ridley Scott's "American Gangster" (2007) and "Prometheus" (2012). Elba portrays Heimdall in "Thor" (2011) and its sequels; Idris Elba // and East Ham, and shortened his first name to "Idris" at school in Canning Town, where he first became involved in acting. He credits "The Stage" with giving him his first big break; having seen an advertisement for a play in a newspaper, Elba auditioned and met his first agent while performing in the role. In 1986, he began helping an uncle with his wedding DJ business; within a year, he had started his own DJ company with some of his friends. Elba left school in 1988, and won a place in the National Youth Music Theatre thanks to a; Idris Elba // £1,500 Prince's Trust grant. His first acting role was in "Crimewatch" murder reconstructions and in 1994 appeared in a BBC children's drama called "The Boot Street Band". To support himself between roles in "Crimewatch" reconstructions, he worked in jobs such as tyre-fitting, cold call advertising sales, and working night shifts at Ford Dagenham. He was working in nightclubs, under the DJ nickname "Big Driis", aged nineteen, but began auditioning for television roles in his early twenties. In 1995, Elba landed his first significant role on a series called "Bramwell", a medical drama set in 1890s England. He played a central [sep] knowledge2: Idris Elba: Idrissa Akuna Elba OBE (/ˈɪdrɪs/; born 6 September 1972) is an English  actor, rapper, singer, and DJ. An alumnus of the National Youth Music Theatre in London, he is known for roles including Stringer Bell in the HBO series The Wire (2002–2004), DCI John Luther in the BBC One series Luther (2010–2019), and Nelson Mandela in the biographical film Mandela: Long Walk to Freedom (2013). For Luther, he received four nominations each for a Golden Globe Award for Best Actor and a Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Lead Actor, winning one of the former.[3][4][5] ; Idris Elba: Elba appeared in American Gangster (2007), Obsessed (2009) and Prometheus (2012). He portrayed Heimdall in the Marvel Cinematic Universe (MCU), beginning with Thor (2011), and Bloodsport in The Suicide Squad (2021), set in the DC Extended Universe. He also starred in Pacific Rim (2013), Beasts of No Nation (2015), for which he received Golden Globe and BAFTA nominations for Best Supporting Actor, and Molly's Game (2017). One of his other prominent roles was that of Rufus Buck in the Western film The Harder They Fall (2021). Elba has also voiced characters in Zootopia, The Jungle Book, Finding Dory (all 2016) and Sonic the Hedgehog 2 (2022). He made his directorial debut with Yardie (2018).[6] ; Idris Elba: In 2016, Elba was named in the Time 100 list of the Most Influential People in the World.[7] As of May 2019, his films have grossed over $9.8 billion at the global box office, including over $3.6 billion in North America,[8] where he is one of the top 20 highest-grossing actors.[9] Apart from acting, Elba performs as a DJ under the moniker DJ Big Driis or Idris and as an R&B singer.[10][11] ; Idris Elba: Idrissa Akuna Elba was born on 6 September 1972[12] in the London Borough of Hackney,[13] to Winston Elba, a Sierra Leonean Creole man who worked at the Ford Dagenham plant, and Eve, a Ghanaian woman.[14][12] His parents were married in Sierra Leone and later moved to London.[15] Elba was raised in Hackney and East Ham;[16] he shortened his first name to "Idris" at school in Canning Town, where he first became involved in acting. He credits The Stage with giving him his first big break. After seeing an advertisement for a play in it, he auditioned and subsequently met his first agent while performing in the role.[17] In 1986, he began helping an uncle with his wedding DJ business; within a year, he had started his own DJ company with some of his friends.[12] ; Idris Elba: Elba briefly attended Barking and Dagenham College,[18] leaving school in 1988 and winning a place in the National Youth Music Theatre after a £1,500 Prince's Trust grant.[19] In order to support himself between roles in his early career, he worked in odd jobs including tyre-fitting, cold-calling and night shifts at Ford Dagenham.[20] He worked in nightclubs under the DJ nickname "Big Driis" during his adolescence, but began auditioning for television roles in his early twenties.[12]
knowledge1: Carmelo Anthony // Carmelo Anthony Carmelo Kyam Anthony (born May 29, 1984) is an American professional basketball player for the Houston Rockets of the National Basketball Association (NBA). He has been named an NBA All-Star ten times and an All-NBA Team member six times. He played college basketball for the Syracuse Orange, winning a national championship as a freshman in 2003 while being named the NCAA Tournament's Most Outstanding Player. After one season at Syracuse, Anthony entered the 2003 NBA draft, where he was selected with the third overall pick by the Denver Nuggets. While playing for Denver, he led the Nuggets to; Carmelo Anthony // he has several guest appearances, namely in the and as a comic character in the "Amazing Adventures" spin-off comics to the 2012 TV series. In 2015, Anthony founded North American Soccer League expansion club Puerto Rico FC. Despite the financial recession in Puerto Rico, Anthony saw this opportunity as a form of community outreach, as well as a long-term investment in a club that could ultimately be profitable. Anthony is also a fan of English football club Arsenal. Carmelo Anthony Carmelo Kyam Anthony (born May 29, 1984) is an American professional basketball player for the Houston Rockets of the National; Carmelo Anthony // Basketball Male Athlete of the Year (along with Kevin Durant) for the third time in his career. Anthony plays the small forward position though he is also capable of playing power forward. His scoring prowess is considered his best asset with his ability to take over any game on the offensive end; he shares the NBA record for second most points scored in one quarter with 33, and holds the New York Knicks single-game franchise scoring record with 62. On offense, Anthony is recognized for being a prolific scorer with a variety of crafty offensive moves. Listed at 6 ft; Carmelo Anthony // EA Sports basketball franchises (NCAA March Madness, NBA Live and NBA Street). In January 2009, Colorado Sports Hall of Fame selected Anthony as its professional athlete of the year for 2008. He and wrestler Henry Cejudo, also a 2008 gold medalist, were chosen to be the special award headliners for the induction banquet held on April 14, 2009. In spring 2012, Anthony guest starred in several episodes of the Showtime series "Nurse Jackie" as a professional baseball player going through drug rehab. He, along with Dwight Howard and Scottie Pippen, also appeared in the 2013 Chinese film "Amazing", a joint; Carmelo Anthony // 8 in (2.03 m) and 235 pounds (107 kg), he has strength and quickness to be an immediate and consistent scoring threat in the post. He also likes creating space from his defenders which allows him to step into his jump shot or put the ball on the floor and drive to the basket and get to the free throw line. Anthony is often known for being one of the premier clutch performers in the NBA; during the 2005–06 season, Anthony made five game-winning shots in the last five seconds of the fourth quarter or overtime. Dave McMenamin, a staff [sep] knowledge2: Carmelo Anthony: Carmelo Kyam Anthony (/kɑːrˈmɛloʊ/ kar-MEL-oh; born May 29, 1984)[1] is an American former professional basketball player. Anthony played 19 seasons in the National Basketball Association (NBA) and was named an NBA All-Star ten times and an All-NBA Team member six times. He played college basketball for the Syracuse Orange, winning a national championship as a freshman in 2003 while being named the NCAA Tournament's Most Outstanding Player. In 2021, he was named to  the NBA 75th Anniversary Team,[2] and is regarded as one of the greatest scorers in NBA history.[3] ; Carmelo Anthony: After one season at Syracuse, Anthony entered the 2003 NBA draft and was selected with the third overall pick by the Denver Nuggets. While playing for Denver, he led the Nuggets to the playoffs every year from 2004 to 2010; the team won two division titles in that span. In 2009, Anthony led the Nuggets to their first conference finals appearance since 1985. In 2011, he was traded from Denver to the New York Knicks days before the NBA trade deadline. In a January 24, 2014 game against the Charlotte Bobcats, Anthony scored a career-high 62 points, setting a Knicks' single-game scoring record and a Madison Square Garden single-game scoring record.[4] Anthony was traded to the Oklahoma City Thunder, where he played one season before a short stint with the Houston Rockets. He spent two seasons with the Portland Trail Blazers prior to joining the Los Angeles Lakers. ; Carmelo Anthony: Anthony has played in the Olympics for the US national team a record four times, winning a bronze medal with the 2004 squad and gold medals on the 2008, 2012, and 2016 Olympic teams. As of April 2016, he was the US Olympic team's all-time leader in points,[5] rebounds, and games played.[6] He currently ranks ninth among NBA career scoring leaders.[7] ; Carmelo Anthony: Anthony was born in the Red Hook Houses in Brooklyn, New York City.[8] His father, Carmelo Iriarte, was born in Manhattan to Puerto Rican parents. Iriarte was of African, Spanish, and indigenous ancestry; some of his roots also traced to Venezuela.[9][10][11] His mother, Mary Anthony, is African-American.[12] Iriarte died of cancer when Anthony was two years old.[13] When Anthony turned eight, his family moved to Baltimore.[14] ; Carmelo Anthony: Anthony commuted to Towson Catholic High School for his first three years of high school.[15] During the summer of 1999, Anthony grew five inches into the frame of a 6–5 swingman.[16] He suddenly became one of the area's top players and made a name for himself in the area, being named The Baltimore Sun's metro player of the year in 2001,[17] as well as Baltimore Catholic League player of the year.[18] During his sophomore year, he averaged 14 points, five rebounds, four assists and two steals.[16] Towson Catholic surged to a record of 26–3 and finished third in the state tournament. Anthony enjoyed a successful high school basketball career as a junior, almost doubling his numbers in scoring and rebounds, averaging 23 points and 10.3 rebounds.[16] Despite his successful year, Anthony was distracted by all of the attention and was suspended on several occasions for skipping classes.[16] He barely registered a blip on the radars of pro scouts with his skinny frame and lack of strength; many scouts felt that he was not ready for the physical demands of the NBA.[16] In the end, Towson Catholic fell short of the state title, although he was named Baltimore's County Player of the Year, All-Metropolitan Player of the Year and Baltimore Catholic League Player of the Year.[16]
knowledge1: Griselda Blanco // Griselda Blanco Griselda Blanco Restrepo (February 14, 1943 – September 3, 2012), known as "La Madrina", "the Black Widow", the "Cocaine Godmother" and the "Queen of Narco-Trafficking", was a Colombian drug lord of the Medellín Cartel and a pioneer in the Miami-based cocaine drug trade and underworld during the 1950s, all the way to the early 2000s. It has been estimated that she was responsible for up to 200 murders while transporting cocaine from Colombia to New York, Miami and Southern California. She was shot and killed on September 3, 2012, at the age of 69. Blanco was born in; Griselda Blanco // Escobar de José Guarnizo". Jada Pinkett Smith used her as a model for her character Fish Mooney on Gotham Blanco was also featured among the Deadly Women top 10 as #3 on the killer countdown. The television series Get Shorty features a character named Amara de Escalones (played by Lidia Porto), who is based on Blanco. Blanco was also featured on ID TV series "Evil Lives Here" The last Blanco. Griselda Blanco Griselda Blanco Restrepo (February 14, 1943 – September 3, 2012), known as "La Madrina", "the Black Widow", the "Cocaine Godmother" and the "Queen of Narco-Trafficking", was a Colombian; Griselda Blanco // rap duo Pengz and Two Two released the single "Griselda Blanco" in August 2017. Blanco played a minor role in Marlon James' book "A Brief History of Seven Killings" (2014). Blanco played a significant role in Jon Roberts' book "American Desperado" (2011). In Comedy Central's "Drunk History", season 3, episode 2 ("Miami"), Dan Harmon tells the story of the rise and fall of Blanco, starring Maya Rudolph (as Blanco), Horatio Sanz, and Joe Lo Truglio. Blanco is portrayed by Mexican actress Ana Serradilla in the Spanish-language telenovela "La Viuda Negra" (2014), an adaptation of the book "La patrona de Pablo; Griselda Blanco // climbed off the back of a motorbike outside the shop, entered, pulled out a gun, and shot Blanco twice in the head before calmly walking back to his bike and disappearing into the city. She was 69. Blanco's first husband was Carlos Trujillo. Together they had three sons, Dixon, Uber, and Osvaldo, all of them poorly educated, and all of whom were killed in Colombia after being deported following prison sentences in the United States. Her second husband was Alberto Bravo. In 1975, Blanco confronted Bravo, who was also her business partner, in a Bogotá nightclub parking lot about millions; Griselda Blanco // Cartagena, Colombia, on the country's north coast. She and her mother, Ana Lucía Restrepo, moved to Medellín when she was three years old. It didn't take long for Blanco to begin living a life of crime. Blanco's former lover, Charles Cosby, recounted that at the age of 11, Blanco allegedly kidnapped, attempted to ransom and eventually shot a child from an upscale flatland neighborhood near her own neighborhood. Blanco had become a pickpocket before she even turned 13. To escape the sexual assaults from her mother's boyfriend, Blanco ran away from home at the age of 16 and resorted to [sep] knowledge2: Griselda Blanco: Griselda Blanco Restrepo[2] (February 14, 1943 – September 3, 2012), known as the Black Widow or Cocaine Godmother, was a Colombian drug lord who was prominent in the cocaine-based drug trade and underworld of Miami, Florida, during the 1970s through the early 2000s, and who has also been claimed by some to have been part of the Medellín Cartel.[3][4][5] Blanco was assassinated in Medellín on September 3, 2012, aged 69.[6] ; Griselda Blanco: Griselda Blanco Restrepo was born in Cartagena, Colombia on the country's north coast. She and her mother, Ana Blanco,[7] moved to Medellín when she was three years old, and this move exposed her to a criminal lifestyle at an early age. Blanco's former lover, Charles Cosby, recounted that at the age of 11 she allegedly kidnapped, attempted to ransom, and eventually shot a child from an upscale flatland neighborhood near her own neighborhood.[1][8][9] Blanco had become a pickpocket before she even turned 13. To escape the sexual abuse of her mother's boyfriend, she ran away from home at the age of 19 and resorted to stealing in Medellín until the age of 20.[1][8] It is also speculated that she engaged in prostitution to support herself financially during this time, although Blanco denied this allegation.[10][11] ; Griselda Blanco: Blanco was a key figure in the establishment of the cocaine trade between Colombia and large American cities like Miami and New York, and to dealers in California. ; Griselda Blanco: In 1964, she illegally immigrated to the United States under an assumed name and with fake papers, settling in Queens, New York with her three children and husband. She quickly set up a thriving drug operation, and in April 1975, she was indicted on federal drug conspiracy charges along with thirty of her subordinates. After fleeing back to Colombia to avoid conviction, she returned to the United States and transferred her operation to Miami in the late 1970s.[citation needed] ; Griselda Blanco: Her return more or less coincided with the beginning of public violent conflicts, including hundreds of murders and killings yearly associated with the high crime epidemic that swept the City of Miami in the 1980s. The struggle by law enforcement to put an end to the influx of cocaine into Miami led to the creation of CENTAC 26 (Central Tactical Unit), a joint operation between the Miami-Dade Police Department and the Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) anti-drug operation.[12][13]
knowledge1: Kaoru Kuroki // Kaoru Kuroki , is a Japanese former adult video (AV) performer and a multi-media personality whose role as a media counselor expressing outspoken views on sex and society have drawn comparisons to La Cicciolina and Dr. Ruth. Kaoru Kuroki (whose stage name translates to "Blackwood Fragrance") was born January 21, 1965 to a conservative, comfortably middle-class family. The daughter of an engineer, Kuroki was a naturally gifted child and showed artistic talent from an early age. She left public school at the age of 15 to attend art college, and later studied Renaissance art history at Yokohama National University. While; Kaoru Kuroki // well as her polite but frank outspokenness on subjects like sex and censorship, Kjell Fornander calls her "the first high-profile AV actress." She permanently changed the way that the AV industry and AV actresses were viewed by the general public in Japan. Kaoru Kuroki , is a Japanese former adult video (AV) performer and a multi-media personality whose role as a media counselor expressing outspoken views on sex and society have drawn comparisons to La Cicciolina and Dr. Ruth. Kaoru Kuroki (whose stage name translates to "Blackwood Fragrance") was born January 21, 1965 to a conservative, comfortably middle-class family. The; Kaoru Kuroki // in the TV Asahi costume drama which was broadcast on March 3, 1989. Reflecting on her popularity, unprecedented for an AV model up to that time, Kuroki points out that there was a social need for someone like her. "I talk about life as a woman, but with my background, obviously the focus is on sex. I seem to have become a spokeswoman for the too many women who are embarrassed to talk about it." In 1988 Kuroki visited Italy where she met Cicciolina, whom she regards as "sensei". She was pleased to find that many of their opinions coincided, [sep] knowledge2: Kaoru Kuroki: Kaoru Kuroki (黒木香, Kuroki Kaoru, born 21 January 1965) is a Japanese former adult video performer and a multi-media personality. Her role as a media counselor expressing outspoken views on sex and society have drawn comparisons to Cicciolina, sex therapist Dr. Ruth, and actress Linda Lovelace.[1] ; Kaoru Kuroki: Kaoru Kuroki (whose stage name translates to "Fragrant Blacktree")[2] was born to a conservative, comfortably middle-class family. The daughter of an engineer, Kuroki was a naturally gifted child and showed artistic talent from an early age. She left public school at the age of 15 to attend art college, and later studied Renaissance art history at Yokohama National University.[3][4] ; Kaoru Kuroki: While still attending Yokohama National University, Kuroki began appearing in adult videos  (AVs), at first considering this to be another form of art. "I wanted to approach it purely as a performance art form, but it turned out to be a lot crazier than that. In fact, if I'd continued to see porno video as art without also acknowledging it as just a fuck film, I wouldn't have gone this far."[5] ; Kaoru Kuroki: Kuroki's adult video debut was SM Poi no suki (SMぽいの好き), released in October 1986 by the major AV company Crystal-Eizou,[7] under the innovative AV director and former porn actor, Toru Muranishi.[3] Muranishi is credited as one of the creators of the documentary style often emulated in Japanese AVs. Kuroki, sharing Muranishi's opinion that the AV should have a documentary quality, continued to work with him when he left Crystal-Eizou to found his own company, Diamond Visual. Her videos for Muranishi usually began with her seated, sharply dressed, and addressing the camera in an improvised talk on a subject like sexual liberation. This would typically be followed by a modeling segment, either nude or in a swimsuit. The remaining video footage would be taken up with various sexual performances, often involving S&M.[8] ; Kaoru Kuroki: Regarding the sex scenes, Bornoff states, "the peripherals in a Kuroki video are fairly violent stuff. She oscillates between abused sexual slave and the epitome of self-assertion with schizophrenic rapidity. To some, the documentary makes for a jarring experience; the feedback she gets from viewers can be surprising. Some say they almost find her frightening; that they can't get a hard-on."[9]
knowledge1: Isla Fisher // Isla Fisher Isla Lang Fisher (; born 3 February 1976) is an Australian actress, voice actress, and author. Born to Scottish parents in Oman, she moved to Australia at age six. After appearing in television commercials at a young age, Fisher came to prominence for her portrayal of Shannon Reed on the soap opera "Home and Away" from 1994 to 1997, garnering two Logie Award nominations. Fisher made a successful transition to Hollywood in the live-action film adaptation of "Scooby-Doo" (2002), and has since achieved fame for her roles in "Wedding Crashers" (2005), "Confessions of a Shopaholic" (2009), "The Great; Isla Fisher // Ayala (איילה), the Hebrew word for a doe, and has described herself as keeping the Jewish Sabbath. In 2014 and 2015, Fisher donated her signed shoes for Small Steps Project Celebrity Shoe Auction. In December 2015, Fisher and her husband Baron Cohen donated £335,000 (US$500,000) to Save the Children as part of a program to vaccinate children in Northern Syria against measles, and the same amount to the International Rescue Committee also aimed at helping Syrian refugees. Isla Fisher Isla Lang Fisher (; born 3 February 1976) is an Australian actress, voice actress, and author. Born to Scottish parents in; Isla Fisher // series. She has been married to Sacha Baron Cohen since 2010 and has three children. Fisher was born in Muscat, Oman, the daughter of Scottish parents Elspeth Reid and Brian Fisher. Her father worked as a banker in Oman for the United Nations at that time. When she was a child, Fisher and her family moved back to their hometown of Bathgate in Scotland, then to Perth, Western Australia, when she was 6 years old. She has four siblings and has said that she had a "great" upbringing in Perth with a "very outdoorsy life." Fisher has stated that her; Isla Fisher // worldwide. Fisher also voiced a professor in a city of microscopic creatures in the computer-animated comedy hit "Horton Hears a Who!" (2008), featuring Jim Carrey, Steve Carell, Will Arnett, among others. Fisher obtained her first leading film role in the comedy "Confessions of a Shopaholic" (2009), where she played a college graduate who works as a financial journalist in New York City to support her shopping addiction. She felt "apprehensive" as she took on her first star vehicle, stating: "I was gobsmacked that anyone would give me my own movie. I am eternally bewildered. Every time I see [producer] Jerry; Isla Fisher // aggressive and precocious younger daughter of a politician falling in love with an irresponsible wedding crasher. On her part in the film, she remarked: "It was an interesting character to play, because she was so crazy and lacking in any kind of social etiquette. She doesn't care what anyone thinks." For one particular scene, involving sexual content, she used a body double. "I negotiated that from the beginning, trying to analyse why. I find pornographic violence, just gratuitous and unnecessary than nudity, because there's nothing more peaceful and beautiful". The film was favourably received by critics and made US$285.1 million [sep] knowledge2: Isla Fisher: Isla Lang Fisher (/ˈaɪlə/; born 3 February 1976) is an Australian actress and writer. Born in Oman to Scottish parents who moved with her to Australia during her childhood, she began appearing in television commercials and came to prominence for her portrayal of Shannon Reed on the Australian soap opera Home and Away (1994–1997), for which she received two Logie Award nominations. ; Isla Fisher: Fisher transitioned to Hollywood with her portrayal of Mary Jane in the live-action adaptation of Scooby-Doo (2002) and has since starred in films such as Wedding Crashers (2005), Confessions of a Shopaholic (2009), Bachelorette (2012), The Great Gatsby (2013), Now You See Me (2013), and Nocturnal Animals (2016). Her other notable credits include Swimming Pool (2001), I Heart Huckabees (2004), London (2005), Wedding Daze (2006), The Lookout (2007), Hot Rod (2007), Definitely, Maybe (2008), Burke & Hare (2010), Visions (2015), Grimsby (2016), Keeping Up with the Joneses (2016), Tag (2018), The Beach Bum (2019), Greed (2019), and Blithe Spirit (2020). She has also voiced characters in animated films such as Horton Hears a Who! (2008), Rango (2011), Rise of the Guardians (2012), and Back to the Outback (2021). ; Isla Fisher: Fisher had a recurring role on the fourth and fifth seasons of the sitcom Arrested Development (2013–2019) and stars on the comedy drama series Wolf Like Me (2022–present). She has authored two young adult novels and the Marge in Charge book series. She is married to English comedian Sacha Baron Cohen, with whom she has three children. ; Isla Fisher: Isla Lang Fisher was born in Muscat on 3 February 1976,[1][2] the daughter of Scottish parents Elspeth Reid and Brian Fisher.[3][4] At the time, her father was working there as a banker for the United Nations.[5] Fisher and her family returned to their hometown of Bathgate, then moved to Australia when she was six years old and settled in Perth.[6] She has four brothers and said that she had a "great" upbringing in Perth with a "very outdoorsy life".[7] She has stated that her "sensibility is Australian", she has a "laid-back attitude to life", and that she feels "very Australian".[8] Her parents later separated; her mother and brothers now live in Athens, while her father lives in Frankfurt.[8] Fisher attended Swanbourne Primary School and Methodist Ladies' College in Perth. She appeared in lead roles in school productions such as Little Shop of Horrors. At the age of 21, she attended L'École Internationale de Théâtre Jacques Lecoq in Paris, where she studied clown, mime, musical theatre, and commedia dell'arte.[9] ; Isla Fisher: Fisher made her first on-screen appearances in commercials on Australian television at the age of 9, and made her professional acting debut in 1993 with two guest-starring roles in the children's television shows Bay City and Paradise Beach. At 18, with her mother's help, she published two teen novels, Bewitched and Seduced by Fame.[10] In a 2005 interview with Sunday Mirror, she said that had she not been successful as an actress, she would probably have been a full-time writer.[11]
knowledge1: Radhika Apte // a registered marriage took place a month before the official ceremony was said to be held in March 2013. Apte has spoken out against sexual harassment in the Indian film industry. She supported the #MeToo campaign in India, stating that she was hopeful that it could create change if enough major industry figures were to participate. Radhika Apte Radhika Apte (born 7 September 1985) is an Indian theater and film actress. Born in Vellore, Tamil Nadu, brought up in Pune, Maharashtra, Apte began acting in theatre productions before venturing into films. She made her feature film debut with a brief; Radhika Apte // Radhika Apte Radhika Apte (born 7 September 1985) is an Indian theater and film actress. Born in Vellore, Tamil Nadu, brought up in Pune, Maharashtra, Apte began acting in theatre productions before venturing into films. She made her feature film debut with a brief role in the Hindi fantasy "Vaah! Life Ho Toh Aisi!" (2005). Apte has since worked in Hindi, Tamil, Telugu, Malayalam, Bengali, and Marathi-language films. Apte's first starring role was in the 2009 Bengali social drama "Antaheen". She made her Marathi film debut in 2009 with the tragic romance "Samaantar". She gathered widespread praise for her supporting; Radhika Apte // work in three of her 2015 Bollywood productions including the thriller "Badlapur", the comedy "Hunterrr", and the biographical film "Manjhi - The Mountain Man". Her leading roles in the 2016 independent films "Phobia" and "Parched" earned her further acclaim. In 2018, Apte starred in three Netflix productionsthe anthology film "Lust Stories", the thriller series "Sacred Games", and the horror miniseries "Ghoul". In addition to her work in independent films, Apte has played the romantic interest of the lead male character in the Marathi crime thriller "Lai Bhaari" (2014) the Tamil drama "Kabali" (2016), the Hindi biographical film "Pad Man" (2018),; Radhika Apte // "Tu", "Purnaviram", "Matra Ratra" and Samuel Beckett's "That Time" with Rehan Engineer. She also performed a commercial Hindi play "Kanyadaan" and an English play named "Bombay Black". In 2013, she was part of a Marathi play named "Uney Purey Shahar Ek", which was an adaptation of Girish Karnad's "Benda Kaalu on Toast" ("Baked Beans of Toast") and she has stated that she has plans to do an English play in London. Apte has said that she prefers to work in experimental theatre. Radhika Apte has also acted in a number of short films, including "Darmiyan", in which she played a; Radhika Apte // Apte first appeared with a small role in the Hindi film "Vaah! Life Ho Toh Aisi!" in 2005, a project she did "just for fun" while still being in college. Actor Rahul Bose, who had seen Apte perform in Anahita Oberoi's play "Bombay Black", suggested her name to director Aniruddha Roy Chowdhury who cast her in his Bengali film "Antaheen" along with Aparna Sen, Sharmila Tagore and Rahul Bose. She played the role of Brinda Roy Menon, a TV journalist, in "Antaheen". Riddhima Seal, writing for "The Times of India", called Apte a "revelation", further adding "With eyes that speak [sep] knowledge2: Radhika Apte: Radhika Apte (born 7 September 1985) is an Indian actress who works primarily in Hindi, Tamil, Telugu and Marathi films. Apte has received several awards including an International Emmy Award nomination, thus becoming the first Indian actress to do so.[1][2] ; Radhika Apte: Apte began acting in theatre and made her film debut with a brief role in the fantasy drama, Vaah! Life Ho Toh Aisi! (2005). Apte's first lead role was in the 2009 Bengali social drama, Antaheen. She gained attention for her supporting roles in three of her 2015 Bollywood productions: the revenge drama Badlapur, the comedy Hunterrr, and the biographical film Manjhi - The Mountain Man. Her leading roles in the 2016 independent films Phobia and Parched earned her acclaim.[3] In 2018, Apte starred in three Netflix productions - the anthology film Lust Stories, the thriller series Sacred Games,[4] and the horror mini-series Ghoul.[5] She was nominated for an International Emmy Award for her work in the first of these.[6] She has since starred in the Netflix films Raat Akeli Hai (2020) and Monica, O My Darling (2022), and portrayed Noor Inayat Khan in the American film A Call to Spy (2019). ; Radhika Apte: In addition to her work in independent films, Apte has also played the leading lady in mainstream films, such as the Tamil action film Kabali (2016), the Hindi biographical film Pad Man (2018), and the Hindi black comedy Andhadhun (2018), all of which were commercially successful. She has been married to London-based musician, Benedict Taylor, since 2012. ; Radhika Apte: Radhika Apte born on 7 September 1985 in Vellore, Tamil Nadu into a Marathi Brahmin family. Her parents were studying and working as doctors at the Christian Medical College & Hospital, Vellore when she was born.[7][8] Her father Dr. Charudutt Apte subsequently became a neurosurgeon and chairman of Sahyadri Hospital, Pune.[9][10][11] She is an Economics and Mathematics graduate from Fergusson College, Pune.[12][13][14] In Pune, she initially studied in a regular school, and then was homeschooled along with four friends by their parents living in the same building, who did not want their children to go through the regular schooling system. Apte found this experience liberating, as it boosted her self-confidence. While growing up in Pune, Apte trained under Kathak exponent, Rohini Bhate, for eight years.[15] It was during this time that Apte became involved in theater in Pune, and decided to go to Mumbai to join films. However, a few months later, Apte got discouraged by her experience in Mumbai and returned to her family in Pune. Apte recounted these times in an interview with Scoop Whoop in 2018, as a learning yet demoralizing experience, wherein she managed with a salary of ₹8,000 to ₹10,000 from theater roles and having to put up with odd house owners and roommates in Goregaon, where she lived as a paying guest. During this time, Apte acted in her first film, a Marathi film called "Gho mala asala hawa" (2009). After this she acted in Rakta Charitra, Rakta Charitra 2, and "I am".[8] ; Radhika Apte: On returning to Pune, Apte made an overnight decision of going to London for a year, where she studied contemporary dance at London's Trinity Laban Conservatoire of Music and Dance for a year.[16] Apte said her experience in London was life-changing, as she was exposed to a completely different and liberating way of working professionally. There she met her future husband Benedict, who subsequently moved to Pune with her, travelling regularly to Mumbai for his work while Apte still did not want to return to Mumbai because of her earlier experience. After a year, she finally agreed to move to Mumbai, and her second experience in Mumbai was far more positive, as she no longer felt alone.[8]
knowledge1: Manny Pacquiao // National: Manny Pacquiao Emmanuel Dapidran Pacquiao, PLH ( ; ; born December 17, 1978) is a Filipino professional boxer and politician, currently serving as a Senator of the Philippines. He currently ranks #4 in BoxRec's ranking of the greatest pound for pound boxers of all time. In 2016, Pacquiao was ranked number 2 on ESPN's list of top pound for pound boxers of the past 25 years. He is the only eight-division world champion in the history of boxing, having won eleven major world titles, as well as being the first boxer to win the lineal championship in five different; Manny Pacquiao // Manny Pacquiao Emmanuel Dapidran Pacquiao, PLH ( ; ; born December 17, 1978) is a Filipino professional boxer and politician, currently serving as a Senator of the Philippines. He currently ranks #4 in BoxRec's ranking of the greatest pound for pound boxers of all time. In 2016, Pacquiao was ranked number 2 on ESPN's list of top pound for pound boxers of the past 25 years. He is the only eight-division world champion in the history of boxing, having won eleven major world titles, as well as being the first boxer to win the lineal championship in five different weight; Manny (film) // in his home province. In 2011, Pacquiao became a congressman of Sarangani, which was met with some criticism to what he focuses on first. In the midst of this, the negotiations to schedule a potential super fight against Floyd Mayweather Jr. for the past three years have faltered out. After his victory against Shane Mosley in the summer, he was scheduled to fight Juan Manuel Marquez for the third time later that year. But in between, Pacquiao became strained with both training and his political work. During the fight, Pacquiao appeared to be less focused, but nonetheless performed well against; Manny (film) // In 2008, Pacquiao was set to fight Oscar De La Hoya in his first match as a welterweight. Through nine rounds De La Hoya could not handle the speed of his opponent, which Pacquiao won by TKO, finally taking place as The Ring's #1 Pound-for-Pound Fighter. His subsequent knockout victories over Ricky Hatton and Miguel Cotto, he became the WBO Welterweight Champion in 2009 by beating the latter, his 7th world title. Pacquiao had obtained the status of an international superstar athlete, gaining endorsements from Nike, HP, Wonderful Pistachios, etc. and starring in films such as Wapakman and "Anak ng; Manny (film) // Kumander" in his native Philippines, and making appearances on Jimmy Kimmel Live! With his status as a superstar, Jinkee fears her husband would go back to his womanizing ways. After his victory against Joshua Clottey in the spring of 2010, Top Rank arranged for Pacquiao to face the imposing Antonio Margarito for the WBC Light Middleweight Championship. Through twelve grueling rounds, Pacquiao emerged victorious winning his record-breaking 8th world title, making him the first and only Octuple champion in boxing. Following this, Pacquiao did not seek to defend his new title but took time off to pursue his political aspirations [sep] knowledge2: Manny Pacquiao: Emmanuel Dapidran Pacquiao CLH (locally [pɐkˈjaʊ];[5] born December 17, 1978) is a Filipino politician and former professional boxer.[6] Nicknamed "PacMan", he is regarded as one of the greatest professional boxers of all time.[7][8] He previously served as a senator of the Philippines from 2016 to 2022. ; Manny Pacquiao: Pacquiao is the only eight-division world champion in the history of boxing and has won twelve major world titles.[9][10] He was the first boxer to win the lineal championship in five different weight classes,[11][12][13] the first boxer to win major world titles in four of the eight "glamour divisions" (flyweight, featherweight, lightweight, and welterweight),[14][15][16] and is the only boxer to hold world championships across four decades (1990s, 2000s, 2010s, and 2020s).[17] In July 2019, Pacquiao became the oldest welterweight world champion in history at the age of 40,[18] and the first boxer in history to become a recognized four-time welterweight champion after defeating Keith Thurman to win the WBA (Super) welterweight title.[19] As of 2015, Pacquiao's fights had generated $1.2 billion in revenue from his 25 pay-per-view bouts.[20] According to Forbes, he was the second highest paid athlete in the world in 2015.[21] ; Manny Pacquiao: Pacquiao entered politics in 2010 when he was elected as the representative of Sarangani. He held this post for six years until he was elected and assumed office as a senator in 2016. He became the leader of then-ruling PDP–Laban party in 2020 (which is disputed since 2021).[22][23] On September 19, 2021, Pacquiao officially declared his candidacy for President of the Philippines in the 2022 Philippine presidential election; he ended up losing to Bongbong Marcos.[24][25] ; Manny Pacquiao: Outside of boxing and politics, Pacquiao was the head coach and a player for the Philippine Basketball Association team Kia/Mahindra for three seasons from 2014 to 2017, before founding the semi-professional Maharlika Pilipinas Basketball League. He has also starred in films and has presented television shows. In music, he has released multiple PARI-certified platinum albums and songs; his cover of "Sometimes When We Touch" peaked at 19 in the United States on Billboard's Adult Contemporary chart after a performance on Jimmy Kimmel Live!.[26] He is an Evangelical Christian preacher, philanthropist, and entrepreneur. ; Manny Pacquiao: Manny Pacquiao was born as Emmanuel Dapidran Pacquiao in Kibawe, Bukidnon, and raised in General Santos, Philippines. He is the son of Rosalio Pacquiao and actress Dionisia Dapidran.[27] His parents separated when he was in sixth grade, after his father had an affair.[27] He is the fourth of six siblings, one of whom, Alberto "Bobby" Pacquiao, is also a politician and former professional boxer.
knowledge1: Vicky Kaushal // Vicky Kaushal Vicky Kaushal (born 16 May 1988) is an Indian actor who works in Hindi films. Born to the action director Sham Kaushal, he pursued an engineering degree from the Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Technology. Aspiring to a career in film, Kaushal assisted Anurag Kashyap in the crime drama "Gangs of Wasseypur" (2012) and went on to play minor roles in two of Kashyap's productions. His first leading role was in the independent drama "Masaan" (2015), which earned him the IIFA and Screen Awards for Best Male Debut. Following the leading role of an unhinged cop in Kashyap's psychological; Vicky Kaushal // co-starring Abhishek Bachchan and Taapsee Pannu. Anupama Chopra took note of how well he used silences to convey his character's pain and desire. As of September 2018, Kaushal has filmed in Serbia for "", an action thriller based on the 2016 Uri attack, co-starring Yami Gautam. He injured his arm while filming an action sequence in it. Kaushal has also committed to feature in "Takht", a historical drama directed by Karan Johar, which features an ensemble cast, including Ranveer Singh and Kareena Kapoor. Vicky Kaushal Vicky Kaushal (born 16 May 1988) is an Indian actor who works in Hindi films.; Vicky Kaushal // thriller "Raman Raghav 2.0" (2016), Kaushal rose to prominence in 2018 with supporting roles in "Raazi" and "Sanju", two of the highest-grossing Hindi films of the year. He also starred in the Netflix films "Love per Square Foot" and "Lust Stories". Kaushal was born on 16 May 1988 in a chawl in suburban Mumbai to Sham Kaushal, a stuntman and subsequent action director in Hindi films. His younger brother, Sunny, is also an actor. His family is Punjabi. Kaushal has described himself as a "regular kid who was interested in studying, playing cricket and watching movies". His father was keen; Vicky Kaushal // working with Kashyap, whom he considers as his mentor. He also began working on stage and had his first acting job in Manav Kaul's production of "Laal Pencil". In film, Kaushal played minor roles in Kashyap's productions "Luv Shuv Tey Chicken Khurana" (2012) and "Bombay Velvet" (2015), and the experimental short film "Geek Out" (2013). Kaushal played his first leading role in the independent drama "Masaan" (2015) directed by Neeraj Ghaywan. Kaushal and Ghaywan were both assistants on "Gangs of Wasseypur", and he was cast in the film after Rajkummar Rao backed out. To play a young man from a [sep] knowledge2: Vicky Kaushal: Vicky Kaushal (pronounced [ˈʋɪkːi ˈkɔːʃəl]; born 16 May 1988) is an Indian actor who works in Hindi films. He is the recipient of numerous accolades, including a National Film Award and two Filmfare Awards, and has appeared in Forbes India's Celebrity 100 list of 2019. ; Vicky Kaushal: After graduating with an engineering degree from Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Technology, Kaushal began his career by assisting Anurag Kashyap in the crime drama Gangs of Wasseypur (2012) and played minor roles in films. His first leading role was in the independent drama Masaan (2015), following which he starred in Kashyap's psychological thriller Raman Raghav 2.0 (2016). Kaushal gained wider recognition in 2018 with supporting roles in the top-grossing dramas Raazi and Sanju, winning the Filmfare Award for Best Supporting Actor for the latter. A starring role as a military officer in the 2019 war film Uri: The Surgical Strike established Kaushal as a leading actor and won him the National Film Award for Best Actor. He earned further acclaim for his portrayal of Udham Singh in the biopic Sardar Udham (2021), winning the Filmfare Critics Award for Best Actor, and had commercial successes in the romantic comedy Zara Hatke Zara Bachke and the biographical drama Sam Bahadur (both 2023). ; Vicky Kaushal: In addition to his acting career, Kaushal endorses several brands and products, and has co-hosted and performed at award ceremonies. He is married to actress Katrina Kaif. ; Vicky Kaushal: Kaushal was born on 16 May 1988 in a suburban chawl in Mumbai to Sham Kaushal, an action director in Indian films, and Veena Kaushal, a homemaker.[1][2] His younger brother, Sunny, is also an actor.[3] His family is Punjabi Hindu who hail originally from Hoshiarpur.[4] Kaushal has described himself as a "regular kid who was interested in studying, playing cricket and watching movies".[2] His father was keen on his son having a stable career away from show-business and thus, he graduated with an engineering degree in Electronics and Telecommunications from Mumbai's Rajiv Gandhi Institute of Technology in 2009.[5][2] ; Vicky Kaushal: During an industrial visit to an IT company in his graduation year, he realised that he had no real interest in an office job and began aspiring to have a career in film.[2][5] He studied acting at Kishore Namit Kapoor's academy while simultaneously participating in theatre with Manav Kaul's Aranya group and Naseeruddin Shah's Motley Productions; doing everything from backstage and announcements to stand-ins.[6] Kaushal would spend the next two years going for various kinds of auditions, but did not get any good opportunities.[5] His first attempt at acting was in a theatrical production titled Laal Pencil in 2011.[5]
knowledge1: Karl Urban // Karl Urban Karl-Heinz Urban (born 7 June 1972) is a New Zealand actor. He has portrayed Leonard McCoy in the "Star Trek" reboot film series (2009–), Éomer in the and installments of Peter Jackson's "The Lord of the Rings" trilogy, Vaako in the "Riddick" film series, Gavin in "Pete's Dragon", John Grimm in "Doom", and Judge Dredd in "Dredd". He earned a Qantas Film and Television Award for Best Supporting Actor for his performance in the New Zealand film "Out of the Blue". Urban was born in Wellington, New Zealand. His father, a German immigrant, owned a leather goods store,; Karl Urban (aviator) // from combat duty during July 1918, Urban became a test pilot. A session for evaluating new aircraft was scheduled for 9–13 July at Aspern Airfield near Vienna. On 12 July 1918, while looping a new model Phönix D.I at 1500 meters, it lost its wings. Karl Urban died in the crash. A week later, he was posthumously promoted to Austria-Hungary's highest noncommissioned officer rank, "Offiziersstellvertreter" (Deputy Officer). Karl Urban (aviator) Karl Urban (29 December 1894 - 12 July 1918) was a World War I flying ace credited with five aerial victories. Karl Urban was born in Graz, Austria on 29; Karl Urban // has cited as one of his favorites. They lived in their NZ$5.25 million mansion in the affluent Herne Bay section of Auckland, New Zealand. The couple announced their separation in June 2014, selling their home for NZ$6.65 million in December 2014. Urban serves as a celebrity ambassador for KidsCan, a charity which currently supports over 16,000 disadvantaged children in New Zealand by providing them with essentials such as food, clothing, and shoes. Karl Urban Karl-Heinz Urban (born 7 June 1972) is a New Zealand actor. He has portrayed Leonard McCoy in the "Star Trek" reboot film series (2009–), Éomer in; Karl Urban // part of British secret service agent 007 in "Casino Royale", directed by fellow New Zealander Martin Campbell. However, he was unable to make the audition because of filming commitments. The role eventually went to Daniel Craig. Urban played John "Reaper" Grimm in Universal Pictures' "Doom" (based on the first-person shooter video game "Doom"), which was released on 21 October 2005. In 2007, he starred in the Viking adventure "Pathfinder". A longtime fan of Westerns, Urban appeared as Woodrow Call in "Comanche Moon", the CBS miniseries prequel to "Lonesome Dove", in January 2008. In 2009, he played Dr. Leonard "Bones" McCoy,; Karl Urban // and his mother once worked for Film Facilities in Wellington. Through his mother, the young Urban was exposed to classic New Zealand cinema, and developed an interest in the film industry. Urban attended St Mark's Church School, where he showed an early love for public performance. His first acting role came at age eight, when he had a single line in one episode of the New Zealand television series "Pioneer Woman". Though continuing to take part in school stage productions, he did not act professionally again until after high school. He attended Wellington College in 1986–1990. He then enrolled at [sep] knowledge2: Karl Urban: Karl-Heinz Urban (born 7 June 1972) is a New Zealand actor. His career began with appearances in New Zealand films and TV series such as Xena: Warrior Princess. His first Hollywood role was in the 2002 horror film Ghost Ship. Since then, he has starred in many high-profile movies, including as Éomer in the second and third installments of The Lord of the Rings trilogy, Vaako in the second and third installments of the Riddick film series, Leonard McCoy in the Star Trek reboot film series, Kirill in The Bourne Supremacy (2004), John "Reaper" Grimm in Doom (2005), Judge Dredd in Dredd (2012), Gavin Magary in Pete's Dragon (2016), and Skurge in Marvel Studios' Thor: Ragnarok (2017). In 2013, he starred in the sci-fi series Almost Human. Since 2019, he has starred as Billy Butcher in Amazon's superhero streaming television series The Boys.[2] ; Karl Urban: Urban was born in Wellington, New Zealand.[3] His father, a German immigrant,[3] owned a leather goods store, and his mother once worked for Film Facilities in Wellington. Through his mother, the young Urban was exposed to classic New Zealand cinema and developed an interest in the film industry.[4] Urban attended St Mark's Church School,[5] where he showed an early love for public performance. His first acting role came at age eight, when he had a single line in one episode of the New Zealand television series Pioneer Woman.[3] Though continuing to take part in school stage productions, he did not act professionally again until after high school.[3] ; Karl Urban: He attended Wellington College in 1986–1990.[3] He then enrolled at Victoria University of Wellington in the Bachelor of Arts programme but left after one year to pursue a career in acting.[3] Over the next few years, he appeared in several local TV commercials in addition to theatre roles in the Wellington area. Eventually, he moved to Auckland where he was offered many guest roles in TV shows (one of which was playing a heroin addict in the police drama Shark in the Park).  Urban then moved briefly to Bondi Beach, Sydney, Australia in 1995 before returning to New Zealand the following year.[3] ; Karl Urban: Urban's first Hollywood role was in the 2002 horror film Ghost Ship. Since then, he has worked on many high-profile movies, including the second and third installments of The Lord of the Rings trilogy (The Two Towers and The Return of the King) as Éomer, The Bourne Supremacy (as Russian Federal Security Service agent Kirill), The Chronicles of Riddick, Star Trek and Doom. The Hollywood Reporter speculated that Urban was one of several actors being considered for the part of British secret service agent 007 in Casino Royale, directed by fellow New Zealander Martin Campbell.[6] ; Karl Urban: Urban played John "Reaper" Grimm in Universal Pictures' Doom (based on the first-person shooter video game Doom), which was released on 21 October 2005. In 2007, he starred in the Viking adventure Pathfinder. A longtime fan of Westerns,[7] he starred as Woodrow Call in Comanche Moon, a television miniseries that aired in early 2008 as a prequel to the Lonesome Dove miniseries based on Larry McMurtry's book series of the same name.[8][9]
knowledge1: RM (rapper) // rappers, capable of switching flows effortlessly as he glides across an array of diverse instrumentals." RM (rapper) Kim Nam-joon (; born September 12, 1994), better known as RM (formerly Rap Monster), is a South Korean rapper, songwriter, and record producer. He is the main rapper and leader of the South Korean boy group BTS, managed under Big Hit Entertainment. In 2015, he released his first solo mixtape, "RM". To date, he has recorded with artists such as Wale, Warren G, Gaeko, Krizz Kaliko, MFBTY, and Primary. RM was born on September 12, 1994, in Ilsan, South Korea. His family includes; RM (rapper) // RM (rapper) Kim Nam-joon (; born September 12, 1994), better known as RM (formerly Rap Monster), is a South Korean rapper, songwriter, and record producer. He is the main rapper and leader of the South Korean boy group BTS, managed under Big Hit Entertainment. In 2015, he released his first solo mixtape, "RM". To date, he has recorded with artists such as Wale, Warren G, Gaeko, Krizz Kaliko, MFBTY, and Primary. RM was born on September 12, 1994, in Ilsan, South Korea. His family includes a mother, father, and little sister. He credits Epik High's "Fly" as one of the; RM (rapper) // with EE and Dino J, RM collaborated with hip hop project group MFBTY for the song "Bucku Bucku". He was featured in the music video for "Bucku Bucku", and also had a cameo in another MFBTY music video for their song, "Bang Diggy Bang Bang (방뛰기방방)." RM released his first solo mixtape, "RM" on March 17, 2015. The mixtape was ranked 48th on "Spin"'s "50 Best Hip Hop Albums of 2015". On April 9, 2015, Primary released his EP, "2-1," on which RM, along with Kwon Jin-ah, was featured in the song, "U". RM collaborated with Marvel for "Fantastic Four"'s; RM (rapper) // reasons he got into hip-hop. After hearing it in fifth grade he became interested in the genre. Before his debut with BTS, he was an underground rapper under the stage name "Runch Randa". He released a number of tracks and once collaborated with fellow underground rapper Zico. He has an IQ of 148, having scored in the top 1.3% of the nation in the university entrance examinations for language, math, foreign language and social studies. RM is fluent in English, which he learned with his mother as a child and through watching "Friends". He has described himself as an atheist.; RM (rapper) // RM was introduced to Bang Si-hyuk, his current CEO, by the rapper Sleepy who had seen RM perform in the underground rap scene. He took down RM's information and gave it to the CEO, who was then inspired to make a group with RM in it after seeing him rap. RM was recruited as BTS' first member back in 2010 during a Big Hit talent audition. RM trained for years with fellow underground rapper Min Yoon-gi and dancer Jung Ho-seok, who later became known as Suga and J-Hope respectively. On June 13, 2013, RM made his debut as a member [sep] knowledge2: RM (musician): Kim Nam-joon (Korean: 김남준; born September 12, 1994), known professionally as RM (formerly Rap Monster), is a South Korean rapper, songwriter, and record producer. He is the leader of South Korean boy band BTS. ; RM (musician): RM released his first solo mixtape, RM, in 2015, followed by his second mixtape, Mono, in 2018. The latter became the highest-charting album by a Korean soloist in the United States in history when it peaked at number 26 on the Billboard 200. RM made his official solo debut in 2022 with the release of his studio album Indigo, which featured contributions from Erykah Badu and Anderson .Paak. The album peaked at number three on the Billboard 200, becoming the highest-charting album by a Korean soloist of all-time.[A] He has also collaborated with artists such as Wale, Younha, Warren G, Gaeko, Krizz Kaliko, MFBTY, Fall Out Boy, Primary, and Lil Nas X. ; RM (musician): Kim Nam-joon (Korean: 김남준) was born on September 12, 1994, in Dongjak District, Seoul, South Korea, and grew up in Ilsan District, Goyang, where his family moved when he was aged four or five.[2][3][4] He has a younger sister.[5] As a child, RM largely learned English by watching the American sitcom Friends with his mother.[6][7] As a student, he actively wrote poetry and often received awards for his writing.[8] He posted his work to an online poetry website for roughly one year, where he received moderate attention. As a result, RM expressed interest in pursuing a literary career but later decided against it.[8] When he was twelve years old, he studied in New Zealand for four months.[9] ; RM (musician): At age 11, in fifth grade, RM became interested in hip-hop music after hearing Epik High's "Fly".[10] Finding that the song had provided him comfort, he decided to look further into the genre. He was introduced to the music of American rapper Eminem by his school teacher, which first sparked RM's interest in lyricism. He would print out lyrics that he felt were "cool" and shared them with friends. RM began songwriting at that time, stating that his poetry became lyrics when combined with music. In 2007, as a first-year middle school student, he began rapping in local amateur hip-hop circles, creating his first self-composed recording with the program Adobe Audition (then called Cool Edit) and later participating in his first concert in 2008.[8] RM became more active in the underground Korean hip-hop scene under the moniker Runch Randa, releasing several tracks and collaborations with other underground rappers such as Zico.[11] ; RM (musician): As a student, RM had an IQ of 148 and scored in the top 1% of the nation in the university entrance examinations for language, math, foreign language and social studies.[12] Because his parents had been strongly opposed to his interest in a musical career due to his academic achievements, RM initially decided to set music aside to focus on his studies. He eventually convinced his mother to allow him to be a rapper, asking her if "she wanted to have a son who was a first-place rapper, or a 5,000th-place student".[8]
knowledge1: Xi Jinping // Xi Jinping Xi Jinping (; ; Mandarin: ; born 15 June 1953) is a Chinese politician serving as general secretary of the Communist Party of China (CPC), president of the People's Republic of China, and chairman of the Central Military Commission. Often described as China's "paramount leader", in 2016 the CPC officially gave him the title of "core leader". As general secretary, Xi holds an ex-officio seat on the Politburo Standing Committee of the Communist Party of China, China's top decision-making body. Xi is the first general secretary born after the Second World War and the establishment of the People's; Xi Jinping // estate investments beginning in 2012. Relatives of highly placed Chinese officials, including seven current and former senior leaders of the Politburo of the Communist Party of China, have been named in the Panama Papers, including Deng Jiagui, Xi's brother-in-law. Deng had two shell companies in the British Virgin Islands while Xi was a member of the Politburo Standing Committee, but they were dormant by the time Xi became general secretary of the Communist Party in November 2012. Xi Jinping Xi Jinping (; ; Mandarin: ; born 15 June 1953) is a Chinese politician serving as general secretary of the Communist; Xi Jinping // "I would put him in the Nelson Mandela class of persons. A person with enormous emotional stability who does not allow his personal misfortunes or sufferings affect his judgment. In other words, he is impressive". Former U.S. Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson described Xi as "the kind of guy who knows how to get things over the goal line." Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd said that Xi "has sufficient reformist, party and military background to be very much his own man." In February 2009, in his capacity as vice-president, Xi Jinping embarked on a tour of Latin America, visiting Mexico, Jamaica,; Xi Jinping // Chinese history, Xi's political thoughts have been written into the party and state constitutions, and under his leadership the latter was amended to abolish term limits for the presidency. In 2018, "Forbes" ranked him as the most powerful and influential person in the world, dethroning Vladimir Putin who held the accolade for five consecutive years. Xi Jinping was born in Beijing on 15 June 1953. After the founding of the People's Republic of China in 1949 by Mao Zedong, Xi's father held a series of posts, including propaganda chief, vice-premier, and vice-chairman of the National People's Congress. Xi's father is; 2015 Xi Jinping visit to Pakistan // civilian award Nishan-e-Pakistan on Xi Jinping for his "outstanding contribution in promotion of relationship between the two countries." This was the fourth time that Pakistan awarded Chinese Premier or President this award, earlier Li Peng (1999), Hu Jintao (2006), Li Keqiang (2013) were awarded. Xi was to visit Pakistan in 2014 during his South Asia trip to India, Sri Lanka and the Maldives but postponed it due to political unrest in the country with opposition leader Imran Khan staging a protest in Islamabad for alleged rigging in 2013 polls. In February 2015, some reports of Xi Jinping's trip to Pakistan [sep] knowledge2: Xi Jinping: Xi Jinping (Chinese: 习近平; pinyin: Xí Jìnpíng, pronounced [ɕǐ tɕîn.pʰǐŋ];[a] born 15 June 1953) is a Chinese politician who has been the general secretary of the Chinese Communist Party (CCP) and chairman of the Central Military Commission (CMC), and thus as the paramount leader of China, since 2012. Xi has also been the president of the People's Republic of China (PRC) since 2013. He belongs to the fifth generation of Chinese leadership. ; Xi Jinping: The son of Chinese Communist veteran Xi Zhongxun, Xi was exiled to rural Yanchuan County as a teenager following his father's purge during the Cultural Revolution. He lived in a yaodong in the village of Liangjiahe, Shaanxi province, where he joined the CCP after several failed attempts and worked as the local party secretary. After studying chemical engineering at Tsinghua University as a worker-peasant-soldier student, Xi rose through the ranks politically in China's coastal provinces. Xi was governor of Fujian from 1999 to 2002, before becoming governor and party secretary of neighboring Zhejiang from 2002 to 2007. Following the dismissal of the party secretary of Shanghai, Chen Liangyu, Xi was transferred to replace him for a brief period in 2007. He subsequently joined the Politburo Standing Committee (PSC) of the CCP the same year and was the first-ranking secretary of the Central Secretariat in October 2007. In 2008, he was designated as Hu Jintao's presumed successor as paramount leader; to that end, Xi was appointed vice president of the PRC and vice chairman of the CMC. He officially received the title of leadership core from the CCP in 2016. ; Xi Jinping: Xi is the first CCP general secretary born after the establishment of the PRC. Since assuming power, Xi has introduced far-ranging measures to enforce party discipline and to impose internal unity. His anti-corruption campaign led to the downfall of prominent incumbent and retired CCP officials, including former PSC member Zhou Yongkang. He has also enacted or promoted a more aggressive foreign policy, particularly with regard to China's relations with the U.S., the nine-dash line in the South China Sea, and the Sino-Indian border dispute. He has sought to expand China's African and Eurasian influence through the Belt and Road Initiative. Xi has expanded support for state-owned enterprises (SOEs), advanced military-civil fusion, overseen targeted poverty alleviation programs, and has attempted to reform the property sector. He has also promoted "common prosperity", a series of policies designed with stated goal to increase equality, oversaw a broad crackdown and major slew of regulations against the tech and tutoring sectors in 2021. Xi met with Taiwanese president Ma Ying-jeou in 2015, the first time PRC and Republic of China leaders met, though relations deteriorated after Tsai Ing-wen of the Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) won the presidential elections in 2016. He responded to the COVID-19 pandemic in mainland China with a zero-COVID approach from January 2020 until December 2022, afterwards shifting towards a mitigation strategy. Xi also oversaw the passage of a national security law in Hong Kong, clamping down on political opposition in the city, especially pro-democracy activists. ; Xi Jinping: Often described as an authoritarian leader by political and academic observers, Xi's tenure has included an increase of censorship and mass surveillance, deterioration in human rights, including the internment of a million Uyghurs in Xinjiang (which some observers have described as part of a genocide), a cult of personality developing around Xi, and the removal of term limits for the presidency in 2018. Xi's political ideas and principles, known as Xi Jinping Thought, have been incorporated into the party and national constitutions. As the central figure of the fifth generation of leadership of the PRC, Xi has centralized institutional power by taking on multiple positions, including new CCP committees on national security, economic and social reforms, military restructuring and modernization, and the Internet. He and the CCP Central Committee passed a "historical resolution" in November 2021. In October 2022, Xi secured a third term as CCP General Secretary, and was reelected state president for a third term in March 2023. ; Xi Jinping: Xi Jinping was born in Beijing on 15 June 1953,[2] the third child of Xi Zhongxun and his second wife Qi Xin. After the founding of the PRC in 1949, Xi's father held a series of posts, including Party propaganda chief, vice-premier, and vice chairperson of the National People's Congress.[3] Xi had two older sisters, Qiaoqiao, born in 1949 and An'an (安安; Ān'ān), born in 1952.[4][5] Xi's father was from Fuping County, Shaanxi, and Xi could further trace his patrilineal descent from Xiying in Dengzhou, Henan.[6][unreliable source?]
knowledge1: Robert Whittaker (fighter) // Robert Whittaker (fighter) Robert John Whittaker (born 20 December 1990) is a New Zealand-born Australian professional mixed martial artist fighting out of Menai, Sydney. He is signed to the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC), and is the current middleweight champion. A professional MMA competitor since 2009, Whittaker was a contestant on the first series of "" and won the . Whittaker became interim middleweight champion after winning the title at UFC 213; he was promoted to undisputed champion after Georges St-Pierre vacated the UFC Middleweight Championship in 2017 due to illness. As of November 7, 2018, he is #12 in official; Robert Whittaker (fighter) // UFC pound-for-pound rankings. Whittaker's father enrolled Robert, aged six, and his brother in a Goju-ryu Karate school, to encourage them in self-discipline and self-defence. After training in the discipline for a little over eight years, and earning his black belt, his father offered him the chance to change to other sport or drop Karate entirely. While his brother decided to drop out, Robert chose to switch to a Hapkido gym run by Henry Perez, following his move to Menai. Not long afterwards, Perez transformed his gym into a MMA gym. Having no other choice, Whittaker began training in MMA and; Robert Whittaker (fighter) // generation to take up combat sports by being a good role model to them. Whittaker has said "I want to be a good role model for young up-and-coming athletes, and I want to be a role model to men in general. If I could affect a kid, then this whole journey is amazing. To help them to have some sort of a career path in the sport and fitness industry, and if I could do that for one kid even that would make my day." GQ Australia Sportman Robert Whittaker (fighter) Robert John Whittaker (born 20 December 1990) is a; Robert Whittaker (fighter) // 2013 at UFC Fight Night 27. He lost the fight via split decision. Whittaker was expected to face Brian Melancon on 7 December 2013 at UFC Fight Night 33. However, Melancon pulled out of the bout citing an injury and subsequently retired. As a result, Whittaker was removed from the card as well. Whittaker faced Stephen Thompson on 22 February 2014 at UFC 170. He lost the fight via TKO in the first round. In the three years following his loss to Thompson, Whittaker won 6 fights in a row prior to earning his fight against Yoel Romero. He said; Robert Whittaker (fighter) // the "Performance of the Night and" the "Fight of the Night bonus awards." Whittaker faced Ronaldo Souza on 15 April 2017 at UFC on Fox 24. He won by second-round TKO and in the process became the first person to finish Souza since 2008. The win also earned Whittaker his third "Performance of the Night" bonus award. Whittaker fought for the interim middleweight title against Yoel Romero on 8 July 2017 at UFC 213, after Michael Bisping announced a nagging knee injury which would go on to keep him on the sidelines for several months. Whittaker won by unanimous decision, [sep] knowledge2: Robert Whittaker (fighter): Robert John Whittaker (born 20 December 1990) is a New Zealand-born Australian professional mixed martial artist.[10] He currently competes in the Middleweight division in the Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC), where he is a former UFC Middleweight Champion.[11]  A professional MMA competitor since 2009, Whittaker was a contestant on the first series of The Ultimate Fighter: The Smashes and won the welterweight tournament.[12] Whittaker became interim middleweight champion after winning the title at UFC 213; he was promoted to undisputed champion after Georges St-Pierre vacated the UFC Middleweight Championship in 2017. As of September 12, 2023, he is #3 in the UFC middleweight rankings.[13] ; Robert Whittaker (fighter): Whittaker was born at Middlemore Hospital in Ōtāhuhu, Auckland, New Zealand.[14][15] His father is an Australian of European descent and his mother is of Māori and Samoan descent.[16][17] Moving to Australia shortly after, Whittaker's father enrolled Robert, aged seven, and his brother in a Goju-ryu Karate school, to encourage them in self-discipline and self-defence.[18][19] After training in the discipline for a little over eight years, and earning his black belt, his father offered him the chance to change to another sport or drop karate entirely. While his brother decided to drop out, Robert chose to switch to a Hapkido[20] gym run by Henry Perez, following his move to Menai.[18][21] Not long afterwards, Perez transformed his gym into an MMA gym. Having no other choice, Whittaker began training in MMA and was immediately hooked, choosing MMA as his preferred sport over rugby league.[19] Whittaker was a talented rugby league player in his younger years and was placed in the development academy of the professional Cronulla Sharks club as a youth.[22] ; Robert Whittaker (fighter): Whittaker prefers not to engage in trash-talk outside of the octagon. As he puts it: ; Robert Whittaker (fighter): I'm the type of fighter that goes into every fight with no ill will towards my opponent. I'm an athlete first and foremost and I love the sport.[23] ; Robert Whittaker (fighter): In 2008 Whittaker signed with Australia's Xtreme Fighting Championships and made his debut 14 March 2009 against fellow pro debutant Chris Tallowin. Whittaker won the fight via TKO in the first round.[24] Whittaker continued his career with Cage Fighting Championships, going 6-0 inside the promotion from 2009 to 2011, with a notable win over fellow TUF: Smashes cast member, Ben Alloway.[25]
knowledge1: Anurag Kashyap // Anurag Kashyap Anurag Kashyap (born 10 September 1972) is an Indian film director, writer, editor, producer and actor known for his works in Hindi cinema. He is the recipient of several accolades, including a National Film Award, and four Filmfare Awards. For his contributions to film, the Government of France awarded him the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres (Knight of the Order of Arts and Letters) in 2013. After writing a television serial, Kashyap got his major break as a co-writer in Ram Gopal Varma's crime drama "Satya" (1998), and made his directorial debut with "Paanch", which never had; Anurag Kashyap (contestant) // Anurag Kashyap (contestant) Anurag Kashyap (born November 23, 1991) was the winner of the 2005 Scripps National Spelling Bee, representing the "San Diego Union Tribune". He also won the "Jeopardy!" Teen Tournament in 2008. Kashyap was born in Muzaffarpur, India and raised in Poway, California. He entered his first spelling bee for Poway Unified School District when he was in fourth grade at Valley Elementary School, and continued competing as a student at Meadowbrook Middle School. In 2004, he placed 47th in the national spelling bee. In the 19th round of the 2005 Scripps National Spelling Bee, 13-year-old eighth-grader Kashyap; Anurag Kashyap (contestant) // Kashyap graduated from Rancho Bernardo High School in San Diego, California in 2010, and had also studied at the Salk Institute in La Jolla, California, first as a summer intern with Inder Verma doing stem cell research in 2008. He enrolled at MIT with intentions to study biological sciences, graduated with a Bachelor's in 2015, and got his Master of Engineering in 2016. Anurag Kashyap (contestant) Anurag Kashyap (born November 23, 1991) was the winner of the 2005 Scripps National Spelling Bee, representing the "San Diego Union Tribune". He also won the "Jeopardy!" Teen Tournament in 2008. Kashyap was born; Anurag Kashyap // acted in the short film titled "Chhuri", alongside Tisca Chopra and Surveen Chawla. He also played the role of the antagonist in the Tamil-language thriller "Imaikkaa Nodigal" (2018). On 20 May 2013, Kashyap was awarded the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres (Knight of the Order of Arts and Letters) by the French government at 2013 Cannes Film Festival, when India was the guest country of the festival to commemorate 100 years of Indian cinema. He has also served as one of the jury members at many film festivals including the 2009 Venice Film Festival, 2013 Sundance Film Festival, 13th; Anurag Kashyap // Kalki Koechlin, whom he first met during the making of "Dev D", at her maternal home in Ooty. In 2013, Kashyap and Koechlin announced that: "they are taking time apart from their more than two-year-old marriage." In May 2015, they were divorced at the Bandra family court in Mumbai. He serves as the Member of board of the NGO, Aangan, which helps protect vulnerable children around India. When asked about his religious views, Kashyap replied: "I am an atheist. Cinema is the only religion I believe in." Directed features: Anurag Kashyap Anurag Kashyap (born 10 September 1972) is an Indian [sep] knowledge2: Anurag Kashyap: Anurag Kashyap (born 10 September 1972) is an Indian filmmaker and actor known for his works in Hindi cinema. He is the recipient of several accolades, including four Filmfare Awards. For his contributions to film, the Government of France awarded him the Ordre des Arts et des Lettres (Knight of the Order of Arts and letters) in 2013. ; Anurag Kashyap: After writing a television serial, Kashyap got his major break as a co-writer in Ram Gopal Varma's crime drama Satya (1998) and made his directorial debut with Paanch, which never had a theatrical release due to censorship issues. He then went on to direct Black Friday (2004), a film based on the namesake book by Hussain Zaidi about the 1993 Bombay bombings. Its release was held up for two years by the District Board of Film Certification because of the pending verdict of the case at that time but was released in 2007 to widespread critical appreciation. Kashyap's follow-up, No Smoking (2007) met with negative reviews and performed poorly at the box-office. His next venture Dev.D (2009), a modern adaptation of Devdas was a critical and commercial success; followed by the socio-political drama Gulaal (2009), and the thriller That Girl in Yellow  Boots (2011). ; Anurag Kashyap: Kashyap's prominence increased with the two-part crime drama, Gangs of Wasseypur (2012). Kashyap subsequently co-produced the critically acclaimed drama The Lunchbox, and the biographical drama Shahid (both 2013), the former earned him a BAFTA Award for Best Film Not in the English Language nomination. His next films were the anthology Bombay Talkies (2013), and the drama Ugly (2014). In 2016, Kashyap directed Raman Raghav 2.0, a film inspired by the serial killer Raman Raghav. His next film was the sports drama Mukkabaaz, which was released in 2018. The same year, he co-directed India's first Netflix Original series, the crime thriller Sacred Games, based on Vikram Chandra's novel of the same name and the romantic drama Manmarziyaan. He is also the co-founder of a film production company, Good Bad Films. ; Anurag Kashyap: Kashyap was born on 10 September 1972 to a Rajput[3] family in Gorakhpur, Uttar Pradesh.[4][5][6] His father Sri Prakash Singh is a retired Chief Engineer of the Uttar Pradesh Rajya Vidyut Utpadan Nigam Limited and was posted in Obra Thermal Power Station in Sonbhadra district near Varanasi.[7] ; Anurag Kashyap: He did his grade sixth from Hill Grange School (Boarding), Dehradun and, grade seven onwards, at the Scindia School in Gwalior. Some of the locations used in Gangs of Wasseypur are also influenced from his own old house where he himself lived with his parents, sister, Anubhuti Kashyap, and brother, Abhinav Kashyap.[8][9] Abhinav is also a filmmaker, who made his directorial debut with the masala blockbuster, Dabangg (2010). Anubhuti has been his assistant in most of his films.[10] She made her directorial debut with Doctor G (2022), a medical campus comedy, starring Ayushmann Khurrana, Rakul Preet Singh, Shefali Shah and Sheeba Chaddha.
knowledge1: Vijay (actor) // Vijay (actor) Joseph Vijay, better known simply as Vijay, is an Indian film actor and playback singer who works in Tamil cinema (Kollywood). His films are often dubbed into Telugu, Hindi, Malayalam and Mandarin Chinese. He is one of the highest paid actors in Tamil cinema. Vijay is referred to by the media as "Thalapathy" (commander). Including the Indian diaspora worldwide and China he has significant following in Japan, UK and France. His films are released in five continents and more than eighty countries. Vijay at the age of ten marked his childhood cinematic debut in drama "Vetri" (1984), he; Vijay (actor) // Indian celebrities. In 2012, he was ranked #28, in 2013, he was ranked #49, in 2014, he held the #41 slot, in 2016, he held the #61 slot, and in 2017, he was ranked #31. In 2017, a third standard Central Board of Secondary Education textbook has displayed Vijay's image with veshti and shirt in reference to the traditional attire worn by Tamil men during Pongal festival in South India. In 2002, Vijay appeared in Coca-Cola advertisements. He has appeared in a Sunfeast advertisement in 2005. In 2008, Vijay was signed up as an ambassador for the Indian Premier League; Vijay (actor) // earned more than $1.5 million in America. Vijay was born on 22 June 1974 as Joseph Vijay in Madras (now Chennai). He is a Roman Catholic. He received his first Holy Communion at a church in Chennai. His father S. A. Chandrasekhar is a Tamil film director and his mother Shoba is a playback singer and carnatic vocalist. He had a sister Vidhya, who died when she was two years old. Vidhya's death affected Vijay very much. It has been said by his mother that Vijay, who was very talkative, naughty and hyperactive as a child, became silent after Vidhya's; Vijay (actor) // actor. After performing as child artist in the films directed by his father, Vijay started featuring in lead roles at the age of eighteen from "Naalaiya Theerpu" (1992). Vijay appeared alongside Vijayakanth in "Sendhoorapandi" (1993), which performed well only to a certain extent at the box office. In 1994, his film "Rasigan" was released, which can be deemed as his first success but not acclaimed by critics. This was the first film in which Vijay was credited with the prefix "illaya Thalapathy" (young commander), an epithet by which he became popularly known among fans and the media for the rest [sep] knowledge2: Vijay (actor): Joseph Vijay Chandrasekhar[1][2] (born 22 June 1974[3]), known professionally as Vijay, is an Indian actor and singer who works mainly in Tamil cinema.[4][5] He is among the highest paid actors in India[6][7] and has featured in Forbes India's Celebrity 100 list on seven occasions.[8][9] He has played the lead in 67 films. Referred to as Thalapathy (transl. Commander), Vijay has a significant following internationally.[10][6] He has won several awards, including an Osaka Best Actor Award and a South Indian International Movie Award.[11][12] In 2023, he became the highest paid actor in India.[13] ; Vijay (actor): Vijay was born as Joseph Vijay Chandrasekhar on 22 June 1974 in Madras (now Chennai), Tamil Nadu.[14] His father, S. A. Chandrasekhar, is a Tamil film director[15] and his mother, Shoba Chandrasekhar, is a playback singer and carnatic vocalist.[16] His father is of Christian descent and his mother is a Hindu.[17][18] Vijay was baptised at the age of 12.[17] Vijay had a sister, Vidhya, who died when she was just two years old.[19] ; Vijay (actor): Initially attending Fathima Matriculation Higher Secondary School[20] at Kodambakkam, Vijay later joined the Balalok Matriculation Higher Secondary School[21] at Virugambakkam and went on to pursue a degree in Visual Communications from Loyola College. While studying at the age of 18, he asked his father if "he would launch him".[22] ; Vijay (actor): At the age of 10, Vijay started his film career as a child actor in Vetri (1984), earning his first paycheck of ₹500 rupees paid for by actor-and-producer P. S. Veerappa.[23] He then performed as a child actor in films such as Kudumbam (1984), Vasantha Raagam (1986), Sattam Oru Vilayaattu (1987) and Ithu Engal Neethi (1988). He also performed in Naan Sigappu Manithan (1985) as a co-star with Rajinikanth, who was the lead actor. ; Vijay (actor): Vijay started to play lead roles at the age of 18 starting with Naalaiya Theerpu (1992).[24] Vijay then appeared in the films Senthoorapandi, Rasigan, Deva and Coimbatore Mappillai. They were commercially successful, though not critically acclaimed.[25][26][27]
knowledge1: Kajal Aggarwal // Kajal Aggarwal Kajal Aggarwal (born 19 June 1985) is an Indian film actress and model. She has established a career in the Telugu and Tamil film industries and has been nominated for four Filmfare Awards South. In addition to acting, Kajal participates in stage shows and is a celebrity endorser for brands and products. Aggarwal made her acting debut with the 2004 Bollywood film "Kyun! Ho Gaya Na..." and had her first Telugu film release in 2007, "Lakshmi Kalyanam". In the same year, she starred in the box office hit "Chandamama", which earned her recognition. The 2009 historical fiction Telugu; Kajal Aggarwal // excellence of professionals in the Telugu Cinema. Winner Nominations Vijay Awards Winner Nominated Edison Awards Nominated The Gorgeous Belle - For Maari (2015) Winner The Gorgeous Belle of the year (2016) Zee Telugu Apsara Awards 2016 Winner Fashion Icon of the year & Most Popular Female celebrity on Social Media Winner - Femina Penn Shakti Awards 2013 Winner - Femina Power List South 2016 Winner - Zee Telugu Golden Awards 2017 Best Actress "Hyderabad Times Most Desirable Women 2016 " -Telugu Kajal Aggarwal Kajal Aggarwal (born 19 June 1985) is an Indian film actress and model. She has established a; Kajal Aggarwal // was a hit, while another film "Special 26" (2013) was also a box office success. Kajal Aggarwal was born and brought up in a Punjabi family settled in Mumbai. Her father Vinay Aggarwal, is an entrepreneur in the textile business and her mother Suman Aggarwal is a confectioner, and also Kajal’s business manager. Kajal has a younger sister Nisha Aggarwal, an actress in Telugu, Tamil and Malayalam cinema, who is now married to Karan Valecha (Managing director Golds gyms, Asia). She studied at St. Anne's High School, fort and completed her pre-university education at Jai Hind College. She pursued her; Kajal Aggarwal // "The Chennai Shopping Mall". In April 2012, Kajal was announced as the brand ambassador for Panasonic. In 2013, Aggarwal was signed by Dabur as the brand ambassador of its hair oil brand DaburAmlaNelli. She also endorses Green Trends, a leading salon brand in India. The Filmfare Awards South is the South Indian segment of the annual Filmfare Awards, presented by The Times Group to honour artistic and technical excellence of professionals in the South Indian film industry. Nominated Filmfare Awards Nominated Winner Nominated The CineMAA Awards are presented annually by the Movie Artists Association Group to honour artistic and technical [sep] knowledge2: Kajal Aggarwal: Kajal A Kitchlu (née Aggarwal;[1] born 19 June 1985[2]) is an Indian actress who works predominantly in Telugu and Tamil language films alongside Hindi language flims.[3][4][5] She has worked in more than 50 films and has received two South Indian International Movie Awards. ; Kajal Aggarwal: Aggarwal made her acting debut with a small role in the 2004 Hindi film Kyun! Ho Gaya Na... and had her first Telugu film release in Lakshmi Kalyanam (2007). In the same year, she gained wider recognition for starring in Chandamama. The 2009 fantasy film Magadheera, one of the highest-grossing Telugu films of all time, marked a turning point in her career, earning her critical acclaim.[6][7] ; Kajal Aggarwal: Her other notable Telugu films include Darling (2010), Brindavanam (2010), Mr. Perfect (2011), Businessman (2012), Naayak (2013), Baadshah (2013), Govindudu Andarivadele (2014), Temper (2015), Khaidi No. 150 (2017), Nene Raju Nene Mantri (2017) and Awe (2018).[8] She has also played the female lead in the high-profile Tamil projects Naan Mahaan Alla (2010), Maattrraan (2012), Thuppakki (2012), Jilla (2014), Vivegam (2017), Mersal (2017) and Comali (2019).[9] Her most successful Hindi films were the action film Singham (2011) and the thriller Special 26 (2013).[10][11] ; Kajal Aggarwal: In 2020, a wax figure of Aggarwal was put on display at Madame Tussauds Singapore, making it the first of an actress from South Indian cinema.[12][13] ; Kajal Aggarwal: Aggarwal was born and raised in a Punjabi family with roots in Amritsar, settled in Bombay (present-day Mumbai).[14] Her father Vinay Aggarwal, is an entrepreneur in the textile business and her mother Suman Aggarwal is a confectioner,[15] and also Kajal's business manager. Kajal has a younger sister Nisha Aggarwal, an actress in Telugu, Tamil and Malayalam cinema.[16]
knowledge1: Kiara Advani // Kiara Advani Kiara Alia Advani (born Alia Advani on 31 July 1992) is an Indian actress who predominantly appears in Hindi and Telugu films. After making her acting debut in the 2014 comedy film "Fugly", Advani went on to star in several commercial and critically successful films, such as the sports film "" (2016), the Netflix anthology film "Lust Stories" (2018), and the Telugu political drama "Bharat Ane Nenu" (2018). Kiara Advani was born to Jagdeep Advani, a Sindhi businessman and Genevieve Jaffrey, a teacher of Punjabi, Scottish, Irish, Portuguese, and Spanish ancestry. Born as Alia Advani, Advani changed her; Kiara Advani // women's sexuality. Advani will next star opposite Ram Charan in an Vinaya Vidheya Rama, a Telugu film. She has committed to feature alongside Kareena Kapoor, Akshay Kumar, and Diljit Dosanjh in the romantic comedy "Good News", and had featured in a music video Urvashi alongside Shahid Kapoor. She will also play the lead female role opposite Shahid Kapoor in Kabir Singh, a Hindi-language remake of the Telugu film "Arjun Reddy". Kiara Advani Kiara Alia Advani (born Alia Advani on 31 July 1992) is an Indian actress who predominantly appears in Hindi and Telugu films. After making her acting debut in; Kiara Advani // first name to Kiara prior to the release of her first film, "Fugly". The elder of two children, Advani has a younger brother, Mishaal. She is also related to several celebrities via her maternal family. Actors Ashok Kumar and Saeed Jaffrey are her step-great-grandfather and great-uncle, respectively, whereas model Shaheen Jaffrey and actress Juhi Chawla are her aunts. Advani made her acting debut in Kabir Sadanand's comedy drama film, "Fugly" (2014), opposite newcomer Mohit Marwah, Vijender Singh, Arfi Lamba and Jimmy Shergill. The film opened to mixed reviews. For her performance however, Advani received generally positive reviews, with Taran Adarsh; Kiara Advani // of Bollywood Hungama saying she "catches you completely unaware" and has the "combination of looks and talent". Mehul S Thakkar of Deccan Chronicle noted her performance as being "very striking" and said she "shows a lot of promise," along with praising her versatility and range as an actor. After playing the leading lady in Abbas-Mustan's action film "Machine", Advani starred in the Telugu film "Bharat Ane Nenu", opposite Mahesh Babu. She later appeared as a shy bride in the Netflix anthology film "Lust Stories". Her masturbation scene in the film, using a vibrator, was praised for its frank portrayal of [sep] knowledge2: Kiara Advani: Alia Advani (born 31 July 1991), known professionally as Kiara Advani ([kɪˈjaːra əɽˈʋaːɳi]), is an Indian actress who works in Hindi and Telugu language films. After making her acting debut in the comedy film Fugly (2014), she played  MS Dhoni's wife in the sports biopic M.S. Dhoni: The Untold Story (2016). She gained appreciation for playing a sexually unsatisfied wife in the Netflix anthology film Lust Stories (2018) and played the leading lady in the political thriller Bharat Ane Nenu (2018). ; Kiara Advani: Advani received wider attention for starring in the romantic drama Kabir Singh and the comedy drama Good Newwz, two of the highest-grossing Hindi films of 2019. She won the IIFA Award for Best Supporting Actress for the latter. Her performance as Vikram Batra's girlfriend in the war film Shershaah (2021) earned her a nomination for the Filmfare Award for Best Actress. Advani had further commercial success in the 2022 films Bhool Bhulaiyaa 2 and Jugjugg Jeeyo, and gained critical praise for playing a troubled married woman in the romantic drama Satyaprem Ki Katha (2023). ; Kiara Advani: In addition to acting, she serves as the ambassador of several brands and products. Advani is married to actor Sidharth Malhotra. ; Kiara Advani: Advani was born 31 July 1991,[1][2] to Jagdeep Advani, a Sindhi Hindu businessman and Genevieve Jaffrey, a teacher whose father was originally from Lucknow and whose mother was of Scottish, Irish, Portuguese, and Spanish ancestry.[3][4][5] Her younger brother, Mishaal, is a musician.[6] She is related to several celebrities through her maternal family. Actors Ashok Kumar and Saeed Jaffrey are her step-great-grandfather and great-uncle, respectively.[7] ; Kiara Advani: Advani attended the Cathedral and John Connon School, and later attended Jai Hind College where she graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree in mass communications.[8]
knowledge1: Muhammad Ali Jinnah // Muhammad Ali Jinnah Muhammad Ali Jinnah ( , born Mahomedali Jinnahbhai; 25 December 1876 – 11 September 1948) was a lawyer, politician, and the founder of Pakistan. Jinnah served as the leader of the All-India Muslim League from 1913 until Pakistan's independence on 14 August 1947, and then as Pakistan's first Governor-General until his death. He is revered in Pakistan as "Quaid-i-Azam" (, "Great Leader") and "Baba-i-Qaum" (, "Father of the Nation"). His birthday is considered a national holiday in Pakistan. Born at Wazir Mansion in Karachi, Jinnah was trained as a barrister at Lincoln's Inn in London. Upon his; Muhammad Ali Jinnah // that renders outstanding and meritorious services to Pakistan and its people. Jinnah is depicted on all Pakistani rupee currency, and is the namesake of many Pakistani public institutions. The former Quaid-i-Azam International Airport in Karachi, now called the Jinnah International Airport, is Pakistan's busiest. One of the largest streets in the Turkish capital Ankara, Cinnah Caddesi, is named after him, as is the Mohammad Ali Jenah Expressway in Tehran, Iran. The royalist government of Iran also released a stamp commemorating the centennial of Jinnah's birth in 1976. In Chicago, a portion of Devon Avenue was named "Mohammed Ali Jinnah Way".; Muhammad Ali Jinnah // his portrayal was not historically accurate. In a journal article on Pakistan's first governor-general, historian R. J. Moore wrote that Jinnah is universally recognised as central to the creation of Pakistan. Stanley Wolpert summarises the profound effect that Jinnah had on the world: Muhammad Ali Jinnah Muhammad Ali Jinnah ( , born Mahomedali Jinnahbhai; 25 December 1876 – 11 September 1948) was a lawyer, politician, and the founder of Pakistan. Jinnah served as the leader of the All-India Muslim League from 1913 until Pakistan's independence on 14 August 1947, and then as Pakistan's first Governor-General until his death. He is; Muhammad Ali Jinnah // (Father of the Nation). The former title was reportedly given to Jinnah at first by Mian Ferozuddin Ahmed. It became an official title by effect of a resolution passed on 11 August 1947 by Liaquat Ali Khan in the Pakistan Constituent Assembly. There are some sources which endorse that Gandhi gave him that title. Within a few days of Pakistan's creation Jinnah's name was read in the khutba at mosques as Amir-ul-Millat, a traditional title of Muslim rulers. The civil awards of Pakistan includes a 'Order of Quaid-i-Azam'. The Jinnah Society also confers the 'Jinnah Award' annually to a person; Muhammad Ali Jinnah // Kingdom. He left a deep and respected legacy in Pakistan. Innumerable streets, roads and localities in the world are named after Jinnah. Several universities and public buildings in Pakistan bear Jinnah's name. According to his biographer, Stanley Wolpert, he remains Pakistan's greatest leader. Jinnah's given name at birth was Mahomedali, and he was born most likely in 1876, to Jinnahbhai Poonja and his wife Mithibai, in a rented apartment on the second floor of Wazir Mansion near Karachi, now in Sindh, Pakistan but then within the Bombay Presidency of British India. Jinnah's family was from a Gujarati Ismaili background, though [sep] knowledge2: Muhammad Ali Jinnah: Muhammad Ali Jinnah (Urdu: محمد علی جناح; [mʊɦəmːəd̪ əli d͡ʒɪnɑː(ɦ)]; born Mahomedali Jinnahbhai; 25 December 1876 – 11 September 1948) was a barrister, politician and the founder of Pakistan. Jinnah served as the leader of the All-India Muslim League from 1913 until the inception of Pakistan on 14 August 1947, and then as the Dominion of Pakistan's first governor-general until his death. ; Muhammad Ali Jinnah: Born at Wazir Mansion in Karachi, Jinnah was trained as a barrister at Lincoln's Inn in London, England. Upon his return to India, he enrolled at the Bombay High Court, and took an interest in national politics, which eventually replaced his legal practice. Jinnah rose to prominence in the Indian National Congress in the first two decades of the 20th century. In these early years of his political career, Jinnah advocated Hindu–Muslim unity, helping to shape the 1916 Lucknow Pact between the Congress and the All-India Muslim League, in which Jinnah had also become prominent. Jinnah became a key leader in the All-India Home Rule League, and proposed a fourteen-point constitutional reform plan to safeguard the political rights of Muslims in the Indian subcontinent. In 1920, however, Jinnah resigned from the Congress when it agreed to follow a campaign of satyagraha, which he regarded as political anarchy. ; Muhammad Ali Jinnah: As the first governor-general of Pakistan, Jinnah worked to establish the new nation's government and policies, and to aid the millions of Muslim migrants who had emigrated from neighbouring India to Pakistan after the two states' independence, personally supervising the establishment of refugee camps. Jinnah died at age 71 in September 1948, just over a year after Pakistan gained independence from the United Kingdom. He left a deep and respected legacy in Pakistan. Innumerable streets, roads and localities in the world are named after Jinnah. Several universities and public buildings in Pakistan bear Jinnah's name.  He is revered in Pakistan as the Quaid-e-Azam ("Great Leader") and Baba-e-Qaum ("Father of the Nation"). His birthday is observed as a national holiday in Pakistan. According to his biographer, Stanley Wolpert, Jinnah remains Pakistan's greatest leader. ; Muhammad Ali Jinnah: Jinnah's given name at birth was Mahomedali Jinnahbhai, and he likely was born in 1876,[a] to Jinnahbhai Poonja and his wife Mithibai, in a rented apartment on the second floor of Wazir Mansion near Karachi,[1] now in Sindh, Pakistan but then within the Bombay Presidency of British India. Jinnah's paternal grandfather lived in Gondal state in Kathiawar peninsula (now in Gujarat, India).[2][3] He was a Khoja of Nizari Isma'ili Shi’a Muslim background from Gujarat, though Jinnah later followed the Twelver Shi'a teachings.[4][5] After his death, his relatives and other witnesses claimed that he had converted in later life to the Sunni sect of Islam.[6] ; Muhammad Ali Jinnah: Jinnah was from a wealthy merchant background. His father was a merchant and was born to a family of textile weavers in the village of Paneli in the princely state of Gondal; his mother was from the nearby village of Dhaffa.[7] They had moved to Karachi in 1875, having married before their departure. Karachi was then enjoying an economic boom: the opening of the Suez Canal in 1869 meant it was 200 nautical miles closer to Europe for shipping than Bombay.[8][9] Jinnah was the second child;[10][11] he had three brothers and three sisters, including his younger sister Fatima Jinnah.[12] Jinnah was not fluent in Gujarati, his mother-tongue, nor in Urdu; he was more fluent in English.[13][14][15] Except for Fatima, little is known of his siblings, where they settled or if they met with their brother as he advanced in his legal and political careers.[16] He has sometimes been referred to as a Muhajir by some writers.[17][page needed][failed verification] However, the use of the term "Muhajir", meaning "immigrant", in reference to his early life, is considered anachronistic by others as this term came into use after the partition in 1947, referring to Muslim refugees who migrated to Pakistan.[18]
knowledge1: Joel Edgerton // Joel Edgerton Joel Edgerton (born 23 June 1974) is an Australian actor, director, writer, producer and filmmaker. He has appeared in numerous Hollywood films, such as "" (2002), "" (2005), "Warrior" (2011), "Zero Dark Thirty" (2012), "The Great Gatsby" (2013), "" (2014), "Black Mass" (2015), "Midnight Special" (2016), "Bright" (2017), "It Comes at Night" (2017), and "Red Sparrow" (2018). In Australia, Edgerton portrayed Will McGill in the drama series "The Secret Life of Us" (2001–02), for which he won the AACTA Award for Best Lead Actor in a Television Drama. He has also appeared in several Australian films, such as; Joel Edgerton // activism and his involvement with The Fred Hollows Foundation as "an escape" from the "materialistic life" that often surrounds an actor. Edgerton's brother, Nash, is a stuntman and filmmaker. Joel Edgerton Joel Edgerton (born 23 June 1974) is an Australian actor, director, writer, producer and filmmaker. He has appeared in numerous Hollywood films, such as "" (2002), "" (2005), "Warrior" (2011), "Zero Dark Thirty" (2012), "The Great Gatsby" (2013), "" (2014), "Black Mass" (2015), "Midnight Special" (2016), "Bright" (2017), "It Comes at Night" (2017), and "Red Sparrow" (2018). In Australia, Edgerton portrayed Will McGill in the drama series "The Secret; Joel Edgerton // and starred in the drama "Boy Erased", about gay conversion therapy. Edgerton was born in Blacktown, New South Wales, the son of Michael, a solicitor and property developer, and Marianne Margarethe (van Dort) Edgerton. His mother is a Dutch immigrant, who was born in The Hague. He graduated from The Hills Grammar School in 1991. He attended the Nepean Drama School at the University of Western Sydney, before moving on to various stage productions, including at Sydney Theatre Company. Edgerton has appeared in such films as "Erskineville Kings", "King Arthur", "Ned Kelly", and as a young Owen Lars in ""; Joel Edgerton // and "". He played Will on "The Secret Life of Us", for which he won an AACTA Award in 2002. In 2005, he lent his voice to the title character of "The Mysterious Geographic Explorations of Jasper Morello", an Academy Award-nominated animated short film. The same year, he appeared as the son of a deceased shoemaker in the British comedy "Kinky Boots". He also appeared in "Smokin' Aces" (2006). Edgerton appeared in the film "Whisper" (2007), "The Square" (which he co-wrote and was directed by his brother), "Acolytes", and "Separation City". In 2009, he starred alongside as Stanley in the; Joel Edgerton // "The Square" (2008), "Animal Kingdom" (2010), for which he won the AACTA Award for Best Actor in a Supporting Role, "Wish You Were Here" (2012), and "Felony" (2013). In 2015, Edgerton received a nomination for the Directors Guild of America Award for Outstanding Directing – First-Time Feature Film for "The Gift", a psychological horror-thriller film Edgerton wrote, directed, co-produced, and in which he co-starred. Edgerton garnered further critical acclaim for his performance as Richard Loving in the 2016 historical drama "Loving", for which he received a nomination for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actor. In 2018, he wrote, directed [sep] knowledge2: Joel Edgerton: Joel Edgerton (born 23 June 1974) is an Australian actor and filmmaker. He is known for his portrayal of Will McGill on the first two seasons of the Australian drama series The Secret Life of Us (2001–02), and for playing Owen Lars in the Star Wars films Attack of the Clones (2002) and Revenge of the Sith (2005); a role he reprised in the Disney+ series Obi-Wan Kenobi (2022). For his portrayal of Richard Loving in the 2016 historical drama Loving, he received a nomination for the Golden Globe Award for Best Actor in a Motion Picture. ; Joel Edgerton: In Australia, Edgerton won the AACTA Award for Best Lead Actor for his work on The Secret Life of Us. He has appeared in several Australian films, such as The Square (2008), Animal Kingdom (2010; for which he received the AACTA Award for Best Supporting Actor), Wish You Were Here (2012), and Felony (2013). Edgerton's other film appearances include King Arthur (2004), Warrior (2011), Zero Dark Thirty (2012), The Great Gatsby (2013), Black Mass (2015), Bright (2017), Red Sparrow (2018), The Green Knight (2021), The Stranger, Thirteen Lives, and Master Gardener (all 2022), and The Boys in the Boat (2023). In 2021, he starred in the Amazon Prime miniseries The Underground Railroad. ; Joel Edgerton: For his work on The Gift (2015), a thriller he wrote, directed, co-produced, and in which he co-starred, Edgerton received critical acclaim and a nomination for the DGA Award for Outstanding Directing. In 2018, he wrote, directed and co-starred in the conversion therapy drama Boy Erased. The following year's The King, which he co-wrote and starred in, was released by Netflix. ; Joel Edgerton: Edgerton was born in Blacktown, New South Wales, Australia[1] the son of Michael, a solicitor and property developer, and Marianne (née van Dort) Edgerton.[2][3] His mother is a Dutch immigrant, who was born in The Hague.[4][5] He graduated from The Hills Grammar School in 1991. He attended the Nepean Drama School at the University of Western Sydney,[6] before moving on to various stage productions, including at Sydney Theatre Company. ; Joel Edgerton: Edgerton has appeared in such films as Erskineville Kings, King Arthur and Ned Kelly. In the Star Wars franchise, he played a young Owen Lars in Attack of the Clones (2002) and Revenge of the Sith (2005)[7] and reprised the role in the Disney+ series Obi-Wan Kenobi.[8] He played Will on The Secret Life of Us, for which he won an AACTA Award in 2002. In 2005, he lent his voice to the title character of The Mysterious Geographic Explorations of Jasper Morello, an Academy Award-nominated animated short film. The same year, he appeared as the son of a deceased shoemaker in the British comedy Kinky Boots. He appeared in Smokin' Aces (2006).[9]
knowledge1: Damon Herriman // Damon Herriman Damon Herriman (born 31 March 1970) is an Australian actor known for his film and television work in Australia and the United States. Damon Herriman was born in Adelaide, South Australia. He began acting in local television commercials at the age of eight, but it was not until he was cast as Frank Errol in "The Sullivans" two years later that his career began to take off. He continued to work solidly as a child actor, with a return to "The Sullivans" a year later, as well as the Australian series "The Patchwork Hero", "Sara Dane", "For the; Damon Herriman // He was recently seen as the violent hitman Buddy in the first season of the HBO/Cinemax series, "Quarry". In August 2018, he is set to portray Charles Manson in Quentin Tarantino's film "Once Upon a Time in Hollywood" and the television series "Mindhunter". In 2018 he was awarded the Orry-Kelly Award, recognising a body of work that contributes to Australia's national identity. Damon Herriman Damon Herriman (born 31 March 1970) is an Australian actor known for his film and television work in Australia and the United States. Damon Herriman was born in Adelaide, South Australia. He began acting in local; Damon Herriman // "The Date". In 2004, he won the Best Screenplay award at Flickerfest for the short film "Soar", in which he also performed. He was a performer and contributing writer on the ABC sketch comedy series, "The Elegant Gentleman's Guide to Knife Fighting". Herriman is known to Australian audiences for playing Claudia Karvan's workmate and friend George Wagstaffe in the critically acclaimed Foxtel series "Love My Way"; as Marcus Dwyer in the ABC comedy, "Laid"; as simpleton Reg in the Australian feature, "100 Bloody Acres"; as well as the title role in the ABC telemovie, "The Outlaw Michael Howe". In 2014,; Damon Herriman // Term of His Natural Life" and "Taurus Rising." He received three Logie Award nominations for his performance in "The Sullivans". After appearing in "The Flying Doctors", for which he won the Penguin Award for Excellence in a Performance by a Juvenile, and the children's mini-series "Elly & Jools", Herriman was cast as Mark Jorgensen, the bespectacled best friend of Ben Mendelsohn's Danny Clark in the Australian cult comedy classic, "The Big Steal". As well as continuing to work solidly in film, television and theatre, Herriman has also written and/or directed many successful short films, including the Tropfest finalsts "They" and [sep] knowledge2: Damon Herriman: Damon Herriman (born 31 March 1970) is an Australian actor. He is best known for his roles as Dewey Crowe on the FX neo-western crime series Justified (2010–15), and Romeo on the  Starz drama miniseries Flesh and Bone (2015). He is also known for having played Charles Manson twice, first on the second season of the Netflix psychological crime thriller series Mindhunter, and later in the comedy drama film Once Upon a Time in Hollywood (both 2019). ; Damon Herriman: Herriman won the AACTA Award for Best Actor in a Leading Role for his role as Punch in the black comedy film Judy and Punch (2019), and was nominated for the AACTA Award for Best Actor in a Supporting Role for his role as Ruse in the historical psychological thriller film The Nightingale (2018). ; Damon Herriman: Damon Herriman was born in Adelaide, South Australia. He began acting in local television commercials at the age of eight, but it was not until he was cast as Frank Errol in The Sullivans two years later that his career began to take off. He continued to work solidly as a child actor, with a return to The Sullivans a year later, as well as the Australian series The Patchwork Hero, Sara Dane, For the Term of His Natural Life and Taurus Rising. He received three Logie Award nominations for his performance in The Sullivans.[1] ; Damon Herriman: After appearing in The Flying Doctors, for which he won the Penguin Award for Excellence in a Performance by a Juvenile, and the children's mini-series Elly & Jools, Herriman was cast as Mark Jorgensen, the bespectacled best friend of Ben Mendelsohn's Danny Clark in the Australian cult comedy classic The Big Steal.[2] ; Damon Herriman: As well as continuing to work solidly in film, television and theatre, Herriman has also written and/or directed many successful short films, including the Tropfest finalists They and The Date. In 2004, he won the Best Screenplay award at Flickerfest for the short film Soar, in which he also performed. He was a performer and contributing writer on the ABC sketch comedy series, The Elegant Gentleman's Guide to Knife Fighting.[3]
knowledge1: Rohit Sharma // Rohit Sharma Rohit Gurunath Sharma (born 30 April 1987) is an Indian international cricketer who is the vice-captain of the India national team in limited-overs formats. He is a right-handed batsman and was an occasional right-arm off break bowler. He plays for Mumbai in domestic cricket and captains Mumbai Indians in the Indian Premier League. Often considered as one of the greatest limited- overs opener currently,he started his international career at the age of 20 and quickly came to be pegged by many analysts as a permanent fixture in the Indian cricket team in the next decade. He made his; Rohit Sharma // to announce Rohit Sharma as the latest Indian cricketer to join CEAT’s family. Rohit is not only an extremely talented batsman but also a great leader and an inspiration to young aspiring cricketers. We believe that his dynamic personality combined with his performance and dependability on the field represents the values that CEAT believes in.” In 2016, Rohit Sharma signed as the "Brand Ambassador" for the world-famous watch brand Hublot becoming second renowned cricketer after former Australian captain Michael Clarke to be associated with the brand. Rohit Sharma is noted for his philanthropic activities and promotes various causes such as; Rohit Sharma // in touch with WWF I learnt that 82% of the world’s rhinos reside in India and I am honoured to be WWF-India’s rhino ambassador to spread awareness and do my bit to contribute to the protection and survival of the rhino and help make this world a better place for them". Rohit Sharma Rohit Gurunath Sharma (born 30 April 1987) is an Indian international cricketer who is the vice-captain of the India national team in limited-overs formats. He is a right-handed batsman and was an occasional right-arm off break bowler. He plays for Mumbai in domestic cricket and captains Mumbai; Rohit Sharma // his good friend and manager, Ritika Sajdeh. They got married on 13 December 2015. Rohit Sharma has been sponsored by several brands including Swiss Watches brand Hublot, and CEAT, In his career spanning 11 years, Sharma has endorsed brands such as Maggi, Fair and Lovely, Lays, Nissan, Energy drink Relentless, Nasivission nasal spray, CEAT Limited, Hublot, Aristocrat by VIP Industries, Adidas and Oppo mobiles. In 2015, CEAT has signed a 3 - year endorsement deal with Rohit Sharma after the 2014 magnificent 264 score in an ODI. Commenting on the partnership, Anant Goenka, MD, CEAT Ltd said, “We are proud [sep] knowledge2: Rohit Sharma: Rohit Gurunath Sharma (born 30 April 1987) is an Indian international cricketer who currently plays and captains the India national cricket team across all formats. Considered one of the best batsmen of his generation and one of greatest opening batters of all time,[3] Sharma is known for his timing, elegance, six-hitting abilities and leadership skills. Sharma holds several batting records which famously includes most double centuries in ODI cricket (3) and most centuries in Cricket World Cup (7). He is a right-handed batsman. He plays for Mumbai Indians in IPL and for Mumbai in domestic cricket. Sharma was a former captain of Mumbai Indians and the team won 5 titles under his leadership. ; Rohit Sharma: Sharma currently holds the world record for the highest individual score (264) in a One Day International (ODI) match and is the only player to have scored three double-centuries in ODIs and also holds the record for scoring most hundreds (five) in a single Cricket World Cup, for which he won the ICC Men's ODI Cricketer of the Year award in 2019. Sharma has received two national honours, the Arjuna Award in 2015 and the prestigious Major Dhyan Chand Khel Ratna Award in 2020 by the Government of India. Under his captaincy, India won the 2018 Asia Cup and the 2023 Asia Cup, the seventh and eighth time the country won the title, both in ODI format as well as the 2018 Nidahas Trophy, their second overall and first in T20I format. ; Rohit Sharma: Sharma was born on 30 April 1987 in Bansod, Nagpur, Maharashtra, India.[4] His mother, Purnima Sharma, is from Visakhapatnam, Andhra Pradesh.[5] His father, Gurunath Sharma, worked as a caretaker of a transport firm storehouse. Sharma was raised by his grandparents and uncles in Borivali because of his father's low income. He would visit his parents, who lived in a single-room house in Dombivli, only during weekends.[6] He has a younger brother, Vishal Sharma.[7] His mother tongue is Telugu. ; Rohit Sharma: Sharma joined a cricket camp in 1999 with his uncle's money. Dinesh Lad, his coach at the camp, asked him to change his school to Swami Vivekanand International School, where Lad was the coach and the cricket facilities were better than those at Sharma's old school. Sharma recollects, "I told him I couldn't afford it, but he got me a scholarship. So for four years I didn't pay a penny, and did well in my cricket".[7] Sharma started as an off-spinner who could bat a bit before Lad noticed his batting ability and promoted him from number eight to open the innings. He excelled in the Harris and Giles Shield school cricket tournaments, scoring a century on debut as an opener.[8] ; Rohit Sharma: He practices an eggetarian diet.[11] He loves to eat Vadapav, Dal-Rice and Beef.
knowledge1: 14th Dalai Lama // 14th Dalai Lama The 14th Dalai Lama (religious name: Tenzin Gyatso, shortened from Jetsun Jamphel Ngawang Lobsang Yeshe Tenzin Gyatso; born Lhamo Thondup, 6 July 1935) is the current Dalai Lama. Dalai Lamas are important monks of the Gelug school, the newest school of Tibetan Buddhism which was formally headed by the Ganden Tripas. From the time of the 5th Dalai Lama to 1959, the central government of Tibet, the Ganden Phodrang, invested the position of Dalai Lama with temporal duties. The 14th Dalai Lama was born in Taktser, Amdo, Tibet, and was selected as the tulku of the 13th; 14th Dalai Lama // bestowed by American lawmakers. In 2012, the Dalai Lama was awarded the Templeton Prize. He later donated the entire prize money to an Indian charity, "Save the Children". 14th Dalai Lama The 14th Dalai Lama (religious name: Tenzin Gyatso, shortened from Jetsun Jamphel Ngawang Lobsang Yeshe Tenzin Gyatso; born Lhamo Thondup, 6 July 1935) is the current Dalai Lama. Dalai Lamas are important monks of the Gelug school, the newest school of Tibetan Buddhism which was formally headed by the Ganden Tripas. From the time of the 5th Dalai Lama to 1959, the central government of Tibet, the Ganden Phodrang,; 14th Dalai Lama // Dalai Lama in 1937 and formally recognized as the 14th Dalai Lama at a public declaration near the town of Bumchen in 1939. His enthronement ceremony as the Dalai Lama was held in Lhasa on 22 February 1940, and he eventually assumed full temporal (political) duties on 17 November 1950, at the age of 15, after the People's Republic of China's incorporation of Tibet. The Gelug school's government administered an area roughly corresponding to the Tibet Autonomous Region just as the nascent PRC wished to assert control over it. During the 1959 Tibetan uprising, the Dalai Lama fled to India,; 14th Dalai Lama // focusing on the topics of Tibetan sovereignty, Tibetan self-immolations, and his succession plans. The Dalai Lama has received numerous awards over his spiritual and political career. In 1959, he received the Ramon Magsaysay Award for Community Leadership. On 16 June 1988 the Dalai Lama was awarded the Dr. Leopold Lucas Prize on behalf of the Protestant faculty of the University of Tübingen by Professor Hans-Jürgen Hermisson who stated that the prize was awarded because of the Dalai Lama's important contribution to the promotion of dialogue between different religions and peoples as well as to his commitment to Tolerance and non-violence.; 14th Dalai Lama // at the age of 15, the 14th Dalai Lama was enthroned formally as the temporal ruler of Tibet. Panchen Lama and Dalai Lama had many conflicts in Tibetan history. Dalai Lama's formal rule was brief. He sent a delegation to Beijing, which, without his authorization, ratified the Seventeen Point Agreement for the Peaceful Liberation of Tibet. He worked with the Chinese government: in September 1954, together with the 10th Panchen Lama he went to the Chinese capital to meet Mao Zedong and attend the first session of the National People's Congress as a delegate, primarily discussing China's constitution. On 27 [sep] knowledge2: 14th Dalai Lama: The 14th Dalai Lama[b] (spiritual name: Jetsun Jamphel Ngawang Lobsang Yeshe Tenzin Gyatso, also known as Tenzin Gyatso;[c] né Lhamo Thondup;[d] born 6 July 1935), known to the Tibetan people as Gyalwa Rinpoche, is, as the incumbent Dalai Lama, the highest spiritual leader and head of Tibet.[2] He is considered a living Bodhisattva; specifically, an emanation of Avalokiteśvara in Sanskrit, and Chenrezig in Tibetan. He is also the leader and a monk of the Gelug school, the newest school of Tibetan Buddhism,[3] formally headed by the Ganden Tripa. The central government of Tibet, the Ganden Phodrang, invested the Dalai Lama with temporal duties until his exile in 1959.[4][5] ; 14th Dalai Lama: The 14th Dalai Lama was born to a farming family in Taktser (Hongya Village), in the traditional Tibetan region of Amdo (administratively Qinghai, Republic of China).[6][7] He was selected as the tulku of the 13th Dalai Lama in 1937, and formally recognised as the 14th Dalai Lama in a public declaration near the town of Bumchen in 1939.[8] As with the recognition process for his predecessor, a Golden Urn selection process was exempted and approved by the Central Government of the Republic of China.[9][10][11][12][13] His enthronement ceremony was held in Lhasa on 22 February 1940 and he eventually assumed full temporal (political) duties on 17 November 1950 (at fifteen years of age), after the People's Republic of China's occupation of Tibet.[8] The Tibetan government administered the historic Tibetan regions of Ü-Tsang, Kham and Amdo.[14] ; 14th Dalai Lama: Subsequent to the annexation of Tibet by the People's Republic of China, during the 1959 Tibetan uprising, the Dalai Lama escaped to India, where he continues to live in exile while remaining the spiritual leader of Tibet. On 29 April 1959, the Dalai Lama established the independent Tibetan government in exile in the north Indian hill station of Mussoorie, which then moved in May 1960 to Dharamshala, where he resides. He retired as political head in 2011 to make way for a democratic government, the Central Tibetan Administration.[15][16][17] ; 14th Dalai Lama: Lhamo Thondup[23] was born on 6 July 1935 to a farming and horse trading family in the small hamlet of Taktser,[e] or Chija Tagtser,[28][f] at the edge of the traditional Tibetan region of Amdo in Qinghai Province.[24] ; 14th Dalai Lama: He was one of seven siblings to survive childhood and one of the three supposed reincarnated Rinpoches in the same family. His eldest sister Tsering Dolma, was sixteen years his senior and was midwife to his mother at his birth.[29] She would accompany him into exile and found Tibetan Children's Villages.[30] His eldest brother, Thupten Jigme Norbu, had been recognised at the age of three by the 13th Dalai Lama as the reincarnation of the high Lama, the 6th Taktser Rinpoche.[31] His fifth brother, Tendzin Choegyal, had been recognised as the 16th Ngari Rinpoche.[citation needed] His sister, Jetsun Pema, spent most of her adult life on the Tibetan Children's Villages project.[citation needed] The Dalai Lama has said that his first language was "a broken Xining language which was (a dialect of) the Chinese language," a form of Central Plains Mandarin, and his family speak neither Amdo Tibetan nor Lhasa Tibetan.[32][33][34]
knowledge1: Ahn Jae-hyun // Ahn Jae-hyun Ahn Jae-hyun (; born July 1, 1987) is a South Korean model and actor. He is best known for his roles in television dramas such as "You're All Surrounded" (2014), "Blood" (2015), "Cinderella with Four Knights" (2016), "Reunited Worlds" (2017) and Beauty Inside (2018). Ahn Jae-hyun began his entertainment career as a fashion model in 2009, appearing in runway shows, magazine editorials and commercials. He gained recognition in 2011 while playing a delivery man in the cable variety show "Lee Soo-geun and Kim Byung-man's High Society". He also appeared in several music videos, including "Sad Song" by Baek [sep] knowledge2: Ahn Jae-hyun: Ahn Jae-hyun (Korean: 안재현; born July 1, 1987) is a South Korean model and actor. He is best known for his roles in television dramas such as You're All Surrounded (2014), Blood (2015), Cinderella with Four Knights (2016), Reunited Worlds (2017), The Beauty Inside (2018), Love with Flaws (2019) and The Real Has Come! (2023). ; Ahn Jae-hyun: Ahn Jae-hyun began his entertainment career as a fashion model in 2009, appearing in runway shows, magazine editorials and commercials. He gained recognition in 2011 while playing a delivery man in the cable variety show Lee Soo-geun and Kim Byung-man's High Society.[1][2] He also appeared in several music videos, including "Sad Song" by Baek A-yeon, "Please Don't" by K.Will, and "Gone Not Around Any Longer" by Sistar19.[3][4] In 2013, Ahn's popularity rose while playing actress Jun Ji-hyun's younger brother in the hit drama My Love from Another Star.[5][6] This led to more acting offers in 2014, including a role in police comedy You're All Surrounded[7] and the webtoon film adaptation Fashion King.[8][9] The same year, he was appointed to be MC for Mnet's weekly music program M Countdown.[10] ; Ahn Jae-hyun: In 2015, Ahn played his first leading role as a vampire doctor in Blood,[11][12] and appeared in the two-episode fantasy drama Snow Lotus Flower alongside Lee Ji-ah.[13] ; Ahn Jae-hyun: In 2016, Ahn starred in tvN's romantic comedy series Cinderella with Four Knights, playing a chaebol and playboy vying for the main female lead's heart.[14] He won the Top Excellence Award at the 9th Korea Drama Awards for his performance.[15] He also joined the cast of travel reality show New Journey to the West, replacing Lee Seung-gi who enlisted in the army.[16] The same year, he starred in the Chinese romance film Perfect Imperfection alongside Taiwanese actress Ady An.[17] ; Ahn Jae-hyun: In 2017, Ahn was cast as the second lead in SBS's fantasy romance drama Reunited Worlds.[18] In 2018, Ahn was cast in the romance melodrama The Beauty Inside.[19]
knowledge1: Maanagaram // it was "one of most genuine films in recent times". Similarly, a critic from The Times of India noted "director Lokesh Kanagaraj gives us an exquisite, even-handed thriller — handsomely shot, tightly edited and propped up by a grungy score — that unobtrusively makes its points while narrating a gripping story". The film became a commercial success at the box office, with screens being increased in its second week after it gained positive word-of-mouth reviews. After release, several other Tamil film personalities including Rajinikanth and Suriya voiced their praise for the film. The movie was dubbed into Telugu as "Nagaram". [sep] knowledge2: Lokesh Kanagaraj: Lokesh Kanagaraj (/loʊkeɪʃ kʌnʌɡʌrɑːdʒ/; born 14 March 1986) is an Indian film director, screenwriter and producer who works in Tamil films. He started his career with a short film in the 2016 anthology Aviyal. He later directed his first feature film Maanagaram (2017). He created the Lokesh Cinematic Universe (LCU) franchise after the commercial success of Kaithi (2019), the franchise's first installment. He directed Master (2021), a standalone featuring Vijay which emerged a commercial success during the COVID-19 pandemic.[2] This was followed by Vikram (2022), the second installment in the LCU, with Kamal Haasan in the lead role, which emerged as one of the highest grossing Indian films. He then worked on Leo (2023), which became his most successful film, it became one of the highest grossing Indian films and an industry hit for Tamil cinema, earning over ₹600 crore (US$75 million) worldwide,[3] collaborating with Vijay again and serving it as the third installment in the LCU. ; Lokesh Kanagaraj: Lokesh Kanagaraj was born in Kinathukadavu, Coimbatore district of Tamil Nadu, India.[4] In PSG College of Arts and Science, he majored in Fashion Technology before pursuing an MBA.[5] He did his schooling in Palanayiammal Matric Hr. Sec. School Kalliyapuram, Pollachi.[6] He is an ex-bank employee. He pursued his passion towards film making by participating in a corporate short film competition. The judge of the competition was Karthik Subbaraj. Impressed with his short film, he encouraged Lokesh to pursue a directorial career making films.[7] ; Lokesh Kanagaraj: Lokesh's career began with the short film, Acham Thavir (2012), which won him the best director, best film and best actor awards at the short film festival Clubace.[8] In 2016, his short film, Kalam, was included in the anthology film, Aviyal, produced by Karthik Subbaraj.[9] ; Lokesh Kanagaraj: In 2017, Lokesh made his directorial feature debut with the hyperlink film, Maanagaram.[10] In late 2018, he began working on a film for Dream Warrior Pictures, the same production company behind Maanagaram.[11] His next venture featured Karthi in the lead role in the action-thriller Kaithi.[12] ; Lokesh Kanagaraj: After Kaithi, his next film was the action-drama, Master, starring Vijay and Vijay Sethupathi.[13] It was released on 13 January 2021, a day before the Pongal festival. It opened to mostly positive reviews and emerged as a commercial success. Master was the highest grossing Indian film of 2021.[14][15]
knowledge1: Joji (musician) // Joji (musician) George Miller (born 18 September 1992), better known by his stage name Joji and formerly by his YouTube username Filthy Frank, is a Japanese singer, songwriter, rapper, record producer, and former YouTube personality and comedian. Miller's start as an entertainer began on his now defunct YouTube channels, DizastaMusic and subsequently TVFilthyFrank, that consisted of rap songs, rants, extreme challenges, ukulele performances and a bizarre show, with most of the main characters played by Miller including the titular character of Filthy Frank. Miller also produced comedy hip hop music under the name Pink Guy, with his discography spanning two; Joji (musician) // Planes", Miller said that his music was inspired by his time growing up in Osaka and furthermore by boom bap instrumentals he listened to while attending Canadian Academy. Miller currently lives in Brooklyn, New York. Miller often flies to Los Angeles for work and has a residence there. Miller has an undisclosed neurological condition that causes stress-induced seizures. This is one of the reasons that led him to quit his YouTube career. Joji (musician) George Miller (born 18 September 1992), better known by his stage name Joji and formerly by his YouTube username Filthy Frank, is a Japanese singer, songwriter,; Joji (musician) // on his transition from his YouTube career to his music career as Joji, Miller said to "Billboard" "now I get to do stuff that I want to hear." During his time growing up in Higashinada-ku, Kobe, Japan, Miller began to produce music and sing with friends as a side-hobby and a way to waste time. After relocating to Manhattan, New York, Miller expanded upon his music career by starting his Pink Guy persona, which paved the way for his Joji persona. Miller originally announced his Joji album on 3 May 2014 alongside the first Pink Guy album. However, Miller subtly; Joji (musician) // On 16 March 2017, Miller performed for the first time as Pink Guy at SXSW. Future plans were stated to include a "long overdue" tour, a third Pink Guy album and more progress on his personal music outside of the Pink Guy persona. However, as of 29 December 2017, Joji has ceased production of all Filthy Frank-related content, possibly including Pink Guy music. Aside from the comedic and often rap-based music he created under the Pink Guy alias, Miller also created more serious and traditional music under another stage name, Joji, which became his primary focus in late 2017. Speaking; Joji (musician) // Waste My Time" as part of the track listing. Joji released the song "Yeah Right" in May 2018, becoming his first to chart on a "Billboard" chart, peaking at 23 on the "Billboard" R&B Songs chart. Joji's music has been described as trip hop and lo-fi that blends elements of trap, folk, electronic, and R&B. His songs have been characterised as having "down tempo, melancholic themes and soulful vocals" with "minimalistic production". He has been compared to electronic artist James Blake, whom he also names as an influence alongside Radiohead, Shlohmo and Donald Glover. In an interview with "Pigeons and [sep] knowledge2: Joji (musician): George Kusunoki Miller (ジョージ・楠木・ミラー, Jōji Kusunoki Mirā, born 18 September 1992),[2] known professionally as Joji and formerly for playing the characters Filthy Frank and Pink Guy, is a Japanese singer-songwriter, rapper, internet personality, and record producer. Miller's music has been described as a mix between R&B, lo-fi, and trip hop.  ; Joji (musician): Miller created The Filthy Frank Show on YouTube in 2011 shortly after moving to the United States, gaining recognition for playing oddball characters on the comedy channels TVFilthyFrank, TooDamnFilthy, and DizastaMusic.[10] The channels, which featured comedy hip hop, rants, extreme challenges, and ukulele and dance performances,[11] are noted for their shock humor and prolific virality. Miller's videos helped popularize the Harlem Shake, which contributed to the commercial success of Baauer's song of the same name which led to the production of memes and collaborations with YouTubers.[12][13] As Pink Guy, Miller released two comedy studio albums, "Pink Season" and "Pink Season: The Prophecy" as well as an extended play between 2014 and 2017. ; Joji (musician): In late 2017, Miller ended The Filthy Frank Show to pursue a music career under the name Joji.[14][15] His debut album, Ballads 1, was released in 2018 and featured the single "Slow Dancing in the Dark". His second album, Nectar (2020), contained the singles "Sanctuary" and "Run". In 2022, he released the US Billboard Hot 100 top-ten single "Glimpse of Us", his highest-charting song,[16] which was later featured on his third album, Smithereens (2022). ; Joji (musician): George Kusunoki Miller[1] was born in Osaka, Japan.[3] His father is Australian and his mother is Japanese.[17] He attended Canadian Academy, an international school in Kobe, Japan, where he graduated in 2012.[5] At age 18, he left Japan and travelled to the United States.[18] ; Joji (musician): Miller created the "Filthy Frank" character during his time on his DizastaMusic YouTube channel, on which he created sketch comedy-based content. The channel started gaining popularity after his 2012 conceptualization of Filthy Frank, a character who was described as the anti-vlogger of YouTube by Miller.[19] The first known video on this particular channel (before his creation of the Frank character) was uploaded on 19 June 2008, and was titled "Lil Jon falls off a table".[20] The DizastaMusic channel has over 1 million subscribers and 177 million views as of October 2021[update].[21] On 15 August 2014, Miller uploaded a video to the DizastaMusic channel announcing that he would not be posting any more video content onto the channel due to the risk of losing the channel due to the numerous copyright and community strikes it received. He also announced that future "Filthy Frank" content would be uploaded to a new channel he had created called TVFilthyFrank.[22]
knowledge1: Iggy Azalea // Iggy Azalea Amethyst Amelia Kelly (born 7 June 1990), known professionally as Iggy Azalea (), is an Australian rapper, singer, songwriter, model and television personality. Azalea moved to the United States at the age of 16 to pursue a career in music, and has since resided in Los Angeles. Her stage name, from the masculine "Egnatius", comes from the name of her dog and the street she lived on. She earned public recognition after releasing music videos for her songs "Pu$$y" and "Two Times" on YouTube. In 2012 Azalea signed a recording contract with Grand Hustle Records, which is owned; Iggy Azalea // of the 9th Annual "Billboard" Women in Music honorees as a chart-topper. In late 2014, it was announced she was placed at number-one on "Billboard" Year-End's Top New Artists chart. In 2015, Azalea also led the 2015 iHeartRadio Music Awards nominations with five. She received twelve nominations at the 2015 "Billboard" Music Awards. In 2016, Azalea was presented with the Woman of the Year award by GQ Australia. Iggy Azalea Amethyst Amelia Kelly (born 7 June 1990), known professionally as Iggy Azalea (), is an Australian rapper, singer, songwriter, model and television personality. Azalea moved to the United States at; Iggy Azalea // for numerous major music awards. Azalea was the first female, and first non-American rapper to be featured on "XXL"'s "Top 10 Freshman List". In 2014, she received two American Music Awards in the Rap/Hip-Hop categories, along with four more nominations, and one MTV Video Music Award for her collaboration with Ariana Grande, along with seven more nominations, making her the most nominated artist at these respective award show editions. She has also won three Teen Choice Awards and one MTV Europe Music Award. Azalea won the 2014 ARIA Award for Breakthrough Artist and the 2015 People's Choice Award for Favorite; Iggy Azalea // because "they thought my raps sucked." But having grown up getting laughed at, she was able to shrug it off. Meanwhile, she'd met someone from Interscope Records who encouraged her to move to Los Angeles, and so in the summer of 2010, she decided to do so. She was briefly managed by Interscope. On 27 September 2011, Azalea released her first full-length project, a mixtape titled "Ignorant Art", saying she made it "with the intent to make people question and redefine old ideals". Her song "Pu$$y" was included on the mixtape, alongside guest appearances from YG, Joe Moses, Chevy Jones,; Iggy Azalea // Hip-Hop Artist. In November 2014, she was placed at number-one on the "Maxim" Hot 100 list in Australia because "few Aussies, female or otherwise, have had a bigger 2014 than Iggy." Azalea also ranked at number 46 on the 2014 edition of the AMID (Australasian Music Industry Directory) Power 50, a list that compiles the most influential figures in the Australasian music world. Azalea received four nominations at the 57th Annual Grammy Awards, including Best New Artist, Record of the Year and Best Pop Duo/Group Performance for "Fancy" and Best Rap Album for "The New Classic". Azalea joined the list [sep] knowledge2: Iggy Azalea: Amethyst Amelia Kelly (born 7 June 1990[1]), known professionally as Iggy Azalea (/əˈzeɪliə/), is an Australian rapper and model.[2] Azalea's accolades include two American Music Awards, three Billboard Music Awards, an MTV Video Music Award, a People's Choice Award, four Teen Choice Awards and four Grammy Award nominations. Azalea is popular on video sites, her Youtube channel has accumulated 3.4 billion views, and 15 of her music videos have received over 100 million views on Vevo. ; Iggy Azalea: At the age of 16, Azalea moved to the United States in order to pursue a career in music. Azalea earned public recognition after releasing the music videos for her songs "Pussy" and "Two Times" on YouTube. Shortly after releasing those two songs, she released her debut mixtape, Ignorant Art (2011), and subsequently signed a recording contract with American rapper T.I.'s Grand Hustle label. Azalea's debut studio album, The New Classic (2014), peaked among the top five on several charts worldwide, but received mixed reviews from within the industry. The album eventually topped the Billboard Top R&B/Hip-Hop Albums, making Azalea the first non-American female rapper to reach the top of the chart.[3] The New Classic was preceded by Azalea's debut single "Work" and chart-topping single "Fancy" (featuring Charli XCX), which hit the U.S. Billboard Hot 100. Azalea was featured on Ariana Grande's 2014 single "Problem", which peaked at number two behind "Fancy". With these hits, Azalea became the second musical act (aside from The Beatles) to rank at number one and number two simultaneously on the Hot 100 with their debut releases on the chart.[4][5][6] In addition, she achieved three top ten hits simultaneously on the Hot 100 with the aforementioned songs and the album's fifth single, "Black Widow" (featuring Rita Ora), which debuted later that year.[7] ; Iggy Azalea: After her debut album, Azalea released a slew of singles to build anticipation for her intended second album, Digital Distortion. However, a series of conflicts with her label, as well as personal conflicts, resulted in the project being cancelled. Consequently, Azalea switched labels, releasing the EP Survive the Summer (2018) under Island Records. Further disagreements led to Azalea becoming an independent artist and creating her own label, Bad Dreams, through a distribution deal with Empire. Her second album, In My Defense, was released in 2019, followed by another EP, Wicked Lips, that same year,[8] and a third studio album, The End of an Era, in 2021. ; Iggy Azalea: Amethyst Amelia Kelly was born in Sydney and grew up in Mullumbimby, New South Wales. Her father, Brendan Kelly, was a painter and comic artist,[9] while her mother, Tanya,[10] cleaned holiday houses and hotels.[11] Azalea lived in a house that her father built by hand from mud-bricks, surrounded by 5 hectares (12 acres) of land.[11][12][13] She has two siblings named Mathias and Emerald Kelly.[citation needed] Azalea has also said that her father "made her look at [art] as a teenager", which has always influenced her life and work.[11] She began rapping at age 14.[13] Before embarking on a solo career, Azalea formed a group with two other girls from her neighborhood: "I was like, I could be the rapper. This could be like TLC. I'll be Left Eye."[14] Azalea eventually decided to disband the group because the other girls were not taking it seriously: "I take everything I do serious [sic]. I'm too competitive."[14] ; Iggy Azalea: In pursuit of her desire to move to America, Azalea dropped out of high school. She worked and saved the money she earned by cleaning hotel rooms and holiday houses with her mother. She claims to have hated school, which, apart from art class, only made her miserable. She also said she had no friends and was teased for her homemade outfits.[15] Azalea traveled to the United States in 2006, shortly before she turned 16. She told her parents she was going "on a holiday" with a friend, but eventually decided to stay and shortly afterward told them she was not coming back home: "I was drawn to America because I felt like an outsider in my own country, I was in love with hip hop, and America is the birthplace of that, so I figured the closer I was to the music, the happier I'd be. I was right."[16] She recalled, "My mum was crying, saying, 'Just be safe.' I was thinking, 'I'm going by myself. I'm fucking crazy!'"[17] After she arrived in the US, she received her General Educational Development (GED), and resided in the country on a visa waiver for six years, returning to Australia every three months to renew it. Azalea worked in the US illegally until February 2013 when she was granted a five-year O visa.[18] She chose the name Iggy after her dog.[19] In 2018, Azalea was approved as a permanent U.S. resident.[20]
knowledge1: Jackie Shroff // Jackie Shroff Jai Kishan Kakubhai "Jackie" Shroff (born 1 February 1957) is an Indian actor. He has been in the Hindi cinema (Bollywood) industry for almost four decades and has appeared in more than 220 films in eleven languages. (Hindi, Konkani, Kannada, Marathi, Oriya, Punjabi, Bengali, Malayalam, Tamil, Telugu, Bhojpuri, and Gujarati) He has won three Filmfare Awards among other accolades. Shroff was born Jai Krishan Kakubhai Shroff in Udgir, Bombay State, India. His father, Kakulal Harilal Shroff, was a Gujarati Hindu and his mother, Amrita Kakulal (“Rita”) Shroff (née Hurunnisa Muratovna Mashurova), was an Uyghur from Kazakhstan. In an; Jackie Shroff // participated in the Hiru Golden Film Awards 2016 in Sri Lanka as a special guest along with Bollywood actors such as Sunil Shetty, Neil Nitin Mukesh, and actresses Sridevi, Madhuri Dixit, and Karishma Kapoor. Jackie Shroff Jai Kishan Kakubhai "Jackie" Shroff (born 1 February 1957) is an Indian actor. He has been in the Hindi cinema (Bollywood) industry for almost four decades and has appeared in more than 220 films in eleven languages. (Hindi, Konkani, Kannada, Marathi, Oriya, Punjabi, Bengali, Malayalam, Tamil, Telugu, Bhojpuri, and Gujarati) He has won three Filmfare Awards among other accolades. Shroff was born Jai Krishan; Jackie Shroff // children, a son, Bollywood actor Tiger Shroff and daughter, Krishna. He is life member of the International Film And Television Club of Asian Academy of Film & Television He has received Doctor of Arts for his valuable contribution in the field of Cinema from the Invertis University. He has an organic farm, where he grows organic plants, trees and herbs. Jackie attended the opening of the environment Jaldhaara Foundation. Shroff was a judge on the magic show "India's Magic Star", broadcast on Indian channel Star One. The show began on 3 July 2010 and ended on 5 September 2010. He; Jackie Shroff // from a Gujarati family of merchants and traders, however they lost their money in the stock market and his father had to leave home at the age of 17. His father met his mother when both were teenagers, they fell in love and got married. Together the extended family lived in a 30 ft by 30 ft room in a chawl in the Teen Batti area of Malabar Hill, Mumbai, where 30 people shared 3 bathrooms. Before entering the film industry, Shroff was a local toughie. However, as a toddler, Shroff relates that he was rather scared, especially when he; Jackie Shroff // saw his elder brother drown and die when he himself was just ten. This incident had a lasting impact on Shroff and it was his mother who protected him all this while. Shroff has no siblings. As a youngster, he modelled in a few advertisements including Savage perfumes. It was one of his classmates in school who gave Shroff his name "Jackie" and then film maker Subhash Ghai stuck to this name when he launched him in the film "Hero". Shroff revisits his childhood home in Teen Batti every week. Shroff dropped out of school after his 11th standard as [sep] knowledge2: Jackie Shroff: Jaikishan Kakubhai Saraf[1] (born 1 February 1957), known by his screen name Jackie Shroff, is an Indian actor and former model from Mumbai, Maharashtra; who primarily works in Hindi film industry. In a career spanning over four decades, Shroff has appeared in over 220 films in 13 languages.[n 1][2][3] He has received several accolades including four Filmfare Awards. Shroff established himself as one of the leading actors of Indian cinema of the 1980s and the 1990s. ; Jackie Shroff: After an uncredited small appearance in Swami Dada (1982), Shroff made his lead debut with Subhash Ghai's action romance Hero (1983), which made him an overnight star. He went onto establish himself with hit films such as Teri Meherbaniyan (1985), Karma (1986), Kudrat Ka Kanoon (1987), Jawab Hum Denge (1987), Ram Lakhan (1989) and Parinda (1989), winning the Filmfare Award for Best Actor for the lattermost.[4] His other critical and commercial successes include Tridev (1989), Baap Numbri Beta Dus Numbri (1990), Saudagar (1991), Khalnayak (1993), Gardish (1993), Rangeela (1995), Agni Sakshi (1996), Border (1997) and Bandhan (1998).[5][6] ; Jackie Shroff: In the 2000s, Shroff took on more supporting and negative roles in notable ventures such as Mission Kashmir (2000), Devdas (2002), Hulchul (2004), Bhagam Bhag (2006), Apna Sapna Money Money (2006), Raaz: The Mystery Continues (2009), Dhoom 3 (2013), Happy New Year (2014), Housefull 3 (2016), Bharat (2019) and Sooryavanshi (2021). Shroff's work in other languages include - Punjabi film Sardar Saab (2017), Konkani film Soul Curry (2017), Tamil film Bigil (2019) and Telugu film Saaho (2019). ; Jackie Shroff: In addition to his acting career, Shroff is an environmentalist. He is married to model and producer Ayesha Dutt, with whom he has two children including actor Tiger Shroff.[7] ; Jackie Shroff: Shroff was born as Jaikishan Kakubhai Shroff or Saraf[8][a] on 1 February 1957 in Bombay (present Mumbai), Bombay State, India.[9][10] His father, Kakubhai Haribhai Shroff, was a Gujarati, while his mother was a Turkmen who fled from Kazakhstan (then the Kazakh Soviet Socialist Republic part of the Soviet Union) during a coup according to Shroff.[b][11][12] His maternal grandmother escaped to Ladakh along with her seven daughters when there was a coup in Kazakhstan. They migrated to Delhi, and finally to Mumbai.[11][12]
knowledge1: Cha Eun-woo // Cha Eun-woo Lee Dong-min (; born ), better known as Cha Eun-woo (), is a South Korean singer, actor and model under the label of Fantagio. He is a member of the South Korean boy group Astro. Cha Eun-woo was born on March 30, 1997, in Gunpo, Gyeonggi Province. Cha graduated from Hanlim Multi Art School in 2016. He is currently attending Sungkyunkwan University, majoring in performing arts. Cha debuted as an actor with a minor role in the film "My Brilliant Life". In August 2015, Cha along with the other members of his group participated in the web-drama "To; Cha Eun-woo // In 2018, Cha starred in the web drama "Top Management". The same year, Cha was cast in the JTBC romantic comedy series "Gangnam Beauty", his first leading role on television. Cha saw a rise in popularity after the series aired, and was included in GQ Korea’s ‘Men of the Year’. Cha Eun-woo Lee Dong-min (; born ), better known as Cha Eun-woo (), is a South Korean singer, actor and model under the label of Fantagio. He is a member of the South Korean boy group Astro. Cha Eun-woo was born on March 30, 1997, in Gunpo, Gyeonggi Province. Cha [sep] knowledge2: Cha Eun-woo: Lee Dong-min (Korean: 이동민; born March 30, 1997), known professionally as Cha Eun-woo (차은우), is a South Korean singer and actor under the label Fantagio. He is a member of the South Korean boy band Astro. ; Cha Eun-woo: Cha Eun-woo was born on March 30, 1997 in the city of Gunpo, Gyeonggi Province.[2][3][4] He attended Suri Middle School and Suri High School before graduating from Hanlim Multi Art School in 2016.[5] He studied at Sungkyunkwan University, majoring in performing arts in the theater department.[6] ; Cha Eun-woo: Cha debuted as an actor in 2014 with a minor role in the film My Brilliant Life.[7] He was the fourth trainee to be officially introduced with the Fantagio iTeen Photo Test Cut. In August 2015, Cha, along with the other members of Astro, participated in the web-drama To Be Continued.[8] ; Cha Eun-woo: Astro debuted on February 23, 2016, with the EP Spring Up. In August, Cha participated in the Chuseok special variety show, Replies That Make Us Flutter.[9] In September, he participated in another Chuseok pilot program, Boomshakalaka.[10] ; Cha Eun-woo: Cha was announced as a host of Show! Music Core alongside Kim Sae-ron, Lee Soo-min and Xiyeon from 2016 to 2018.[11] In 2016, he also starred in the web drama My Romantic Some Recipe.[12]
knowledge1: Nick Kyrgios // Nick Kyrgios Nicholas Hilmy Kyrgios ( ; born 27 April 1995) is an Australian professional tennis player who is currently ranked world No. 35 in men's singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP). He is currently the second highest-ranked Australian in the ATP rankings. Kyrgios has won four ATP Titles, and has reached seven ATP finals, including the 2017 Cincinnati Masters. During his junior career, Kyrgios won the boys' singles event at the 2013 Australian Open and the boys' doubles event at the 2013 Wimbledon Championships. During his professional career, Kyrgios reached the quarter-finals of the 2014 Wimbledon Championships—upsetting; Nick Kyrgios // until Year 8 and completed his Year 12 certificate in 2012 at Daramalan College in Canberra. He is a Greek Orthodox Christian and always wears a gold necklace with a cross on it. Kyrgios was a promising basketball player who represented the Australian Capital Territory and Australia in his early teens before deciding to focus solely on tennis when he was 14 years old. Two years later he gained a full scholarship at the Australian Institute of Sport, where he was able to further develop his tennis. In 2013, Kyrgios relocated his training base from Canberra to Melbourne Park in; Nick Kyrgios // Kyrgios was suspended and fined for tanking in 2016 Shanghai Rolex Masters. Kyrgios is the founding contributor of the athlete direct publishing website, "PlayersVoice", and has also invested financially in the digital platform. Kyrgios received a walkover against Kyle Edmund in the second round. Tournament counts as 1 win and 1 loss for Kyrgios Nick Kyrgios Nicholas Hilmy Kyrgios ( ; born 27 April 1995) is an Australian professional tennis player who is currently ranked world No. 35 in men's singles by the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP). He is currently the second highest-ranked Australian in the ATP rankings. Kyrgios; Nick Kyrgios // Cup debut for Australia in September 2013 against Poland at the age of 18. He replaced Marinko Matosevic after defeating him in a playoff during the lead-up to the tie. He was selected to pair with Chris Guccione in the crucial doubles rubber. They lost to Mariusz Fyrstenberg and Marcin Matkowski in five sets. He then went on to win his first singles rubber, after Michał Przysiężny retired five games into the match. After the media attention attracted during Wimbledon 2015 Kyrgios lost the second rubber of the quarter-final tie against Kazakhstan. His most publicised quote during this match was; Nick Kyrgios // plays aggressively. Former British number one John Lloyd described watching Kyrgios as a "pleasure" because of "the mixture and the flair", adding that his character is one which attracts fans. According to three-time Wimbledon champion John Newcombe, Kyrgios is an "exceptional talent" and "a real individual". Nine-time Wimbledon doubles champion Todd Woodbridge stated in 2015 that despite Kyrgios's occasionally regrettable words and actions, he would mature over time. He is constantly described as "box office". Paul Annacone, a former Top 15 tennis player and once coach to Roger Federer, said in 2017, "I think Nick is the most talented player [sep] knowledge2: Nick Kyrgios: Nicholas Hilmy Kyrgios[6] (/ˈkɪriɒs/ KIRR-ee-oss; born 27 April 1995) is an Australian professional tennis player. Kyrgios achieved his career-high ATP singles ranking of world No. 13 on 24 October 2016.[5] He has won seven ATP Tour singles titles, including the 2019 and 2022 Washington Open, and reached eleven finals, most notably a major final at the 2022 Wimbledon Championships, and a Masters 1000 final at the 2017 Cincinnati Masters. In doubles, during his professional career, Kyrgios has a career-high ranking of world No. 11, achieved on 7 November 2022, winning a major doubles title at the 2022 Australian Open and reaching the semifinals of the Miami Open, both times partnering with Thanasi Kokkinakis. He has also reached three major singles quarterfinals (at 2014 Wimbledon, upsetting then-world No. 1 Rafael Nadal en route, the 2015 Australian Open and the 2022 US Open, upsetting then-world No. 1 Daniil Medvedev en route). ; Nick Kyrgios: Kyrgios is only the third player, after Dominik Hrbatý and Lleyton Hewitt, to have beaten each one of the Big Three (Novak Djokovic, Roger Federer, and Rafael Nadal) the first time he played against them.[7][8] Although Kyrgios has received praise for his perceived entertaining style of play, he is a controversial player whose matches have featured "epic displays of ranting, racquet-wrecking, and trash-talking".[9] ; Nick Kyrgios:  In his junior career, Kyrgios won the singles event at the 2013 Australian Open and the doubles events at the 2012 French Open, 2012 Wimbledon Championships and 2013 Wimbledon Championships.; Nick Kyrgios: Kyrgios was born on 27 April 27 1995 in Canberra, Australia to a father of Greek origin,[10] George,[11][12] and a Malay mother, Norlaila ("Nill").[13][14][11] His father is a self-employed house painter, and his mother is a computer engineer.[15] His mother was born in Malaysia as a member of the Selangor royal family, but she dropped her title as a princess when she moved to Australia in her twenties.[13][16] His older sister Halimah works in dance and musical theatre and as a voice and performance coach based in Hong Kong.[17][18] His brother Christos is a fitness trainer.[19] ; Nick Kyrgios: Kyrgios attended Radford College until Year 8 and completed his Year 12 certificate in 2012 at Daramalan College in Canberra.[20] He also played basketball in his early teens before deciding to focus solely on tennis when he was 14 years old.[21] Two years later, he received a full scholarship at the Australian Institute of Sport, where he was able to further develop his tennis. In 2013, Kyrgios relocated his training base from Canberra to Melbourne Park in an attempt to further his career with better facilities and hitting partners.[22] A year later, Tennis ACT announced a $27 million redevelopment of the Lyneham Tennis Centre in Canberra to lure Kyrgios back home and host Davis Cup and Fed Cup ties.[23] Kyrgios confirmed in January 2015 that he would return home and base himself in Canberra. He also donated $10,000 towards the redevelopment of the Lyneham Tennis Centre there.[24][25]